A+?
A £120k house isn't going to be worth £20k in 5 years time lmao.
A 12 button mouse is going to suck for FPS because of the weight and shape.
A 144hz monitor?
A 240hz monitor and a new phone I guess.
A $300k and a $1m tournament every month.
A £3k gaming PC is just as good as a £60k PC.
A £400 amp is going to be better than a £40 one.
A 5 3.5" m-itx case would end up being just as large as an m-atx case anyway.
A>B.
A basic understanding of mathematics is all you really need.
A battery pack+bluetooth with aux jack?
A bedroom needs to be sealed from the lounge lmao.
A big step up from minimum wage.
A billion people will die.
A bit lower than your £1,400 flat lmao.
A bit NSFW.
A bit overkill on the wattage and price though.
about*.
About 10.
About £10 an hour or something shit like that.
About 10% higher.
about 12% of the lands owned by Her Majesty, The Queen.
About $21m.
About £30.
About 35 IIRC.
About £40 for a 5kg bag that lasts me like a year.
About £40 I think.
About 5,000 hours.
About £600-£700.
About 65% of my salary lmao.
About 74kg and 6 feet.
About £80.54 IIRC?
About 88 I think.
About all I need.
About a year.
About Gaben and discount cd key retailers.
About half a kilo of sugar a day.
About some funeral.
About spending money.
About to buy my home.
About whether machines are included!!!!
Absolute fucking bargain.
Absolute fucking bargain for £74.63.
A car isn't an investment lmao.
According to Google there are two definitions for "liberal" and they could probably be used interchangeably in a sentence to alter the meaning.
Accumulators are a pain though. I CBA to lay sequentially so I just don't lay it.
Acer, AOC, Asus and BenQ will be releasing their models soon.
A closer mic is also better for noisy rooms.
A couple of weeks ago.
ACs aren't really portable though, are they?
Active player count doesn't have a strong correlation to crowdfunding though.
actually.
Actually.
Actually all three.
Actually Asian girls are genetically better smelling than westerners.
Actually do what?
Actually even them.
Actually, even with council tax included, it's still less than my mum was charging me last year for a single room.
Actually, factoring in my £5 gym membership it's £26 higher.
Actually ffs they aren't even drones, they're quadcoptors.
Actually Google Maps says it's only 1.4 miles to walk.
Actually I can't play with Zanacross because his mmr is too low and matchmaking won't let me play with him.
Actually, I can't remember how fast mine is exactly.
Actually, I could probably RDP into my mining rig.
Actually, I could probably use Lync with a headset on my personal phone.,....
Actually IDK if it'll even go up at all since I am on probation.
Actually, I don't think I need a dremel according to that guide.
Actually, I don't think they've started interviewing yet.
Actually, I have a spare m-itx case at home.
Actually, I'll have to do it tonight because I don't have my account info right now.
Actually I'll probably withdraw from Coral tonight too.
Actually, I'm gonna go buy a yoghurt and put it in my yoghurt.
Actually, I might be closer to 6k now.
Actually, I'm not sure if you can get a GTX 1070 that cheap.
Actually, I'm not sure on the availability of 4k torrents nowadays. I only have a 1080p monitor so I haven't been seeking 4k content.
Actually, I'm not sure what it is right now.
Actually I remember someone in IT told me my keyboard is "ridiculous".
Actually, I still do sugar-free energy drinks sometimes.
Actually I think England had a CS:S scene back in the day.
Actually, I think I can do CS:GO at 4k at 100FPS.
Actually, I think I realised I was arbing and then carefully picked my matches to finish the rollover.
Actually, I think it goes up to 184.
Actually I think it's my internet.
Actually, I think my E5 does have brushed aluminium on the top.
Actually, I think probably only around £90k.
Actually, I think the date of birth is wrong.
Actually it'll be hard to lose all of it.
Actually, it might just be a different person sitting at his desk.
Actually it's a director at another company.
Actually it's almost 1.3.
Actually it's okay to get drunk as long as you don't get caught drinking on the job.
Actually, it's the income inequality which is probably the main cause.
Actually it's triple output.
Actually, I was getting £57 a week.
Actually man LTC might be easier.
Actually, maybe only about 8 feet.
Actually maybe then.
Actually maybe the phone a bit depending on which headphones I have plugged in.
Actually, my income might be higher than yours.
Actually no, I get 100+ constant.
Actually, not sure on HDMI.
Actually, now the tax year is changed, I get exactly £15k net.
Actually nvm it's "on ear".
Actually, rory is a headphone enthusiast.
Actually Thailand is.
Actually that article is garbage.
Actually, the bike in the gym says I generate 120 watts of electricity when I'm on it.
Actually, there probably aren't enough miners runnign Windoze.
Actually, the winning party is only voted for by about 20% of the population.
Actually unplug them fully though.
Actually yes.
Actually, you get flamed pretty hard for not having a mic in CS:GO.
A cup is better than B.
A day at Thorpe Park.
Adding a backdoor sounds like an incredibly stupid thing to do.
Adding content behind a paywall to give an advantage is strictly against Dota's game design.
Adding resistance removes precision.
Additionally, Ryan will be attending an anti-bullying seminar in Los Angeles, CA hosted by PACER.
add me.
Add me I'm 420sam.
add me on Spotify, my username is 420sam.
Add me please.
Address is already in use".
Adele likes pie.
A display should just be a display.
A dumbbell set is fucking heavy.
A employer pension is going to be better for sure.
AER I think?
AFAIK nobody but 6700k owners get good FPS in Overwatch.
A fascist politician.
A faster GPU would give me more performance, but it won't matter if I keep my graphics on lowest.
A few.
A few hours a week.
A few £ I think from a couple of Dota competitions.
A few months later beta keys were worthless.
A few people filled it out lmao.
African wtf.
After £1,500 or so you don't really get any more performance.
After a total of 28.5 days, The International 2017 is $1,194,864 (10.5%) ahead of The International 2016..
After being so anti-privacy for so long.
After I get back from Korea.
After that, I still have 17 days to take.
After the initial setup, I haven't needed to use the drivers again anyway.
After the shitshow that was Shanghai major, it looks like Alibaba will be taking over Dota in China now..
After today, I'll probably want 0.1 LTC minimum or fiat. I prefer LTC because then I don't have to work out the exchange rate TWICE, but ultimately I am cashing out to fiat anyway.
After using the same mouse for years.
AFTER YOU MAKE ME GO THROUGH ROBOT OPTIONS TWICE TO TELL ME YOUR OFFICE IS CLOSED.
A fucking good deal.
Against the evil Axis.
Again? Why did you downgrade?
A girl can’t give her heart too easily.
A good amp makes all headphones sound better.
A good bed and a good chair will prevent decades of painful back pain.
A good case doesn't have that problem though.
A good company pension is better.
A good investment atm.
A good phone is a good phone regardless of brand.
Agreed.
Agreed on what?
A grill let me try on Samsung VR in Brighton on Saturday.
A GTX 1080TI if I ever get round to buying one.
A GTX970 should do that wityh pretty much any game though.
Ah.
Ah a scatter graph will be nice a bit later on.
Ah cool. I'll probaly inherit a house unless they need expensive elderly care like my grandmother did.
Ah didn't know that.
Ah good.
Ahhhh.
Ahhhhh back to nice non-laggy quieter equihash.
Ahhhh it's the iphone browser.
A higher refresh rate helps with smoothness and motion blur though.
Ah I guess a 960 for 100 is okay if you're on a budget.
Ah I guess I would need the speed if I ever get a 4k TV.
Ah I guess so.
Ah I just discovered Authy.
Ah I'm not really into any of that stuff.
Ah, I see you've played Knifey-Spoony before.
Ah I thought there'd be something like that.
Ah it's a big double fan cooler.
Ah official nVidia?
Ah okay.
Ah okay then.
a homo.
ah right.
Ah right.
Ah right good joke man.
Ah right recoil patterns.
Ah right yeah.
Ah right yeah Project Manager.
Ah same as before.
Ah so your gf must have been earning at least 7k then.
ah that explains the low bill then. It's been too hot to use electric heating.
Ah that looks good.
Ah, Topcashback is better.
Ah yeah.
Ah yeah I see.
Ah yeah, my colleagues complained about being able to hear my M50Xs at high volume.
Ah you're quite short so 63kg is probably fine.
aids wtf.
AIO is nice and easy, just dust it out every couple of months.
AIOs probably ship okay.
Air goes in through the CPU heatsink, and out through the GPU heatsink.
A+ is small.
AI will draft?
A joint venture.
AKA Wolverine from X-Men.
A kg is a bag of sugar.
AKG is a good brand though.
AKG K702 is only £136 on Amazon now, which is amazing.
AKG K702s?
AKG K702s and V-moda Boompro.
A kitchen, bedroom and living room.
A large flat desk is a good desk IMO.
Alcohol.
Alcoholism and obesity increase your risk of different illnesses.
Alcohol is the most dangerous drug, so it must be good!
Alexis Ohanian, founder of rival site Reddit, said in an open letter to Rose:.
Alibaba is a fucking huge company, kinda like how LoL has Tencent.
Alibaba is awesome.
A LISA won't help me get a second flat.
A list of dates between 2000 and 2030 would be good.
A little bit of additional setup for years of having the best mouse in the world is worth it IMO.
A little bit of diversification can't hurt.
Allahu ackbar muhammed sex house.
All BT-supplied stuff.
All built and ready.
Allen & Harris are selling it.
All girls are like that m9, not that'd you'd know LMFAO.
All headphones are good if you price them low enough.
ALl heroes are free.
All her used panties and shit.
All humans, can switch unlimited times in-game, 6v6, and radical skins.
All I have to do is put the two pictures into a diff checkerer.
All interest is untaxed now, and if you gain more interest than your savings allowance allows, then the government will collect it from your salary.
All it does is confuse me.
All it takes is an anonymous tip-off.
All I want is fast and reliable internet at a competitive price ffs.
All massagers are prostitutes.
All mobile keyboards suck, including Swiftkey.
All my components are m-itx stuff.
All my headphones already have removeable cables.
All my headphones have removeable cables, so I just have one cable on my desk.
All my money is locked up in monthly saver accounts :(.
All my money problems would go away if I get the job....
All my new parts are arriving tomorrow yay.
All my relationships are sam sex.
All my work gave me was a shitty headset, shitty laptop, and shitty phone.
All non-winning bidders have already received a Second Chance offer for this item or have chosen not to receive Second Chance offers..
All of it.
All police officers will need degrees soon#.
All recommended by me ofc.
All scrubs get rekt by Global Elite.
All she's doing is deleting temp files which do not need to be deleted and may need to be regenerated lmao.
All terrible actors.
All the days.
All the fucking time.
All the items look similar.
All the kids who have slept with your mother are 14.
All the noobs are still there.
All the R&D could bring improvements to all sorts of technology.
All these crypto tabs are using up the scarce memory on this shitty laptop anyway.
All these cyber deals are shit.
All these fucking repairs and speeding tickets.
All these large fucking files which probably do nothing wtf.
All the skin fell off her arm, it was disgusting.
All those benefits cuts and NHS cuts are probably going to do a lot more damage than good long-term.
All through the day.
All white girls look the same anyway.
All yes shares.
All you have to do is not be an idiot too.
All you need is a Fidelio X2 with a standard 3.5mm cable and a decent AMPDAC.
Almost 2 billion peak players now.
Almost all workers are legally entitled to 5.6 weeks' paid holiday per year (known as statutory leave entitlement or annual leave)..
Almost an hour without payment now.
Almost ended up homeless!
Almost enough for a 5% deposit on a one bedroom flat.
almost tied for second-most played game on Steam now.
Almost twice as much.
A lot.
A lot more motorbike owners die in motorbike crashes than you too.
A lot of big esports organisations have teams in multiple games.
A lot of older mice like the Naga don't perform as well at other DPIs.
A lot of our internal websites only work with Internet Explorer.
A lot of people get made redundant.
A lot of people thought he was part of production or something, but he was just some random dude.
A lot of people want my item.
A lot of shops charge for the privilege of paying by card.
A lot of small shops like florists.
A lot of songs aren't on Spotify either.
A lot of them combine mobile and desktop chrome too.
A lot of things worth doing have risk.
A lot older than I am.
Already 5% of the way there.
Already bought lots of headphones and amps and dacs.
Already done all that except M&S and HSBC.
Already half way through my game.
Alright, gonna go do some drugs then maybe throw up.
Also.
Also £1,200 but that's cycling through accounts.
Also, £200 into Halifax at 4% + 25% bonus.
Also, alcoholism can cause obesity.
Also because I suck at typing.
Also, can I buy your GTX 1080TI pls?
Also, Christmas sucks.
Also depends on how you define profit....
Also driving.
Also, DT770s are super fucking comfy.
Also, Firefox has a bigger addons library.
Also got text.
Also he has shit headphones.
Also, her visa is expiring next year.
Also, how is Musk going to find suitable people to send? They have to be smart, capable and sane enough to carry out the mission, but with no self-preservation instincts..
Also, I broke the CPU fan cable by letting the fan blade rip it apart.
Also, I can't find all the songs I want.
Also, I didn't take a lunch break today.
Also, IDK what he'll be using the PC for.
Also, IDK what I wrote in Joanna's birthday card earlier, was something like "happy birthday love from sam xxxx".
Also, I fucked up my headphone hooks and the adhesive is coming off my monitors now.
Also, if you're going to borrow any money or get a mortgage, the interest on that will be way higher than your student loan which is like 1%.
Also, I get the feeling nobody actually knows what a VLOOKUP is when they ask me to do it.
Also, I got £186 car insurance when I'm 24 with only one years no claims ^^.
Also I got £30 compensation.
Also, I got a permanent job.
Also, I have a new job.
Also, I just got my first mortgage and just got a new CC with a £2,000 credit limit.
Also, I kept winning with them and I've been afraid of a gubbing for a while.
Also, I like to play a few different games rather than just one.
Also, I'll play Overwatch.
Also, I'm financing a new mining rig.
Also, I'm mining it directly.
Also I'm paying for all my wife's shit.
Also, I need it to fold up.
Also, I need space for my work laptop!!!!!
Also, I never take my phone off silent.
Also, I own a home.
Also, I run it in a seperate Windoze session.
Also, isn't nitrous oxide a really simple chemical compound which can easily be homebrewed?
Also I think he might on 'on the spectrum'.
Also, I think I am Z-lined or some shit.
Also, it's my birthday.
Also, it's my fault for using conditional formatting because now they don't know how to copy the formatting with the data.
Also it's sold out lmao.
Also, I wouldn't believe you.
Also, Keepass keeps locking.
Also, light leakage!
Also lots of Chinese girls.
Also, make sure it's compatible with his GPU.
Also, my parents and grandparents.
Also my speeding ticket.....
Also, no Halloween skins now :(.
Also, overclock your GPU to around 2GHz and your VRAM to around 6GHz.
Also, please buy me one I liked it.
Also, she probably went to Starladder becauses cykas love Dota.
Also, she seems really sleazy.
Also, the 0% period can be extended with a balance transfer.
Also, the Boompro mic is easier to switch between headphones IMO.
Also the fact that Overwatch doesn't support ultrawides properly pisses me off.
Also, the headphones aren't very good for gaming because they are too bassy.
Also, the internet latency would derank me so fucking hard.
Also, the paste is bad.
Also, the rig is only 323KH/s because my 1080TI is in my gaming PC.
Also, TI is on so I'm busy with Dota.
Also vegan scum.
Also, what if my nephew visits? I don't want him going near it.
Also what month did you buy it?
Also why I have such a sexy gf.
Also why would they need automatic weapons wtf.
Also, wouldn't the thermals be bad under my desk compared to on my desk?
Also, you will have to buy two seats.....
Altcoins are all used for criminal purposes anyway.
Although a lot of people will argue that the biometric is redundant.
Although Betfair is often near the top because it's the biggest.
Although Bitmain and Blockstream have too much control IMO.
Although deleting the old one sounds like a good idea too.
Although different set of scales.
Although doing drugs is usually bad for your gaming skills.
Although dual USB-C connections have some merit.
Although even a 6700K at 4.5GHz isn't really good enough, so I'm waiting for the 7700K.
Although feeling down isn't consistent, sometimes I feel great when I'm pwning noobs in online video games.
Although having to go on Youtube for songs not on Spotify is a PITA.
Although hope is probably more prevalent than hype. Everyone is so fed up of Intel's monopoly.
Although I can't plug a cable into them ATM so that kinda sucks.
Although IDK if the board actually makes a difference.
Although I don't buy many games nowadays.
Although I'd probably be happy with 240FPS if I get a 240hz gsync monitor.
Although I'd recommend a proper headphone and seperate mic.
Although I guess it'd be annoying if I was using USB flash drives for stuff.
Although I guess it would suck if you lose your eye on the way to work and aren't able to log in that day because of it.
Although I have a suspicion my mother is factoring council tax into my rent.
Although I have more money on gambling websites than she has in savings.
Although I'm already looking to replace it with a G6 or possibly a V30.
Although I might get some V-Moda M100s.
Although I might look into getting a router to prioritise my gaming traffic over my wife's kpop videos.
Although I might scale the OC back to 5GHz in the summer.
Although I might set my wife up on Coinbase because she pays no income tax.
Although I'm kinda glad they rejected him because they would have just fucked it up into some sort of Dota-PotS hybrid.
Although I'm looking at my app.
Although I'm probably going to get LG for my next phone because I like small bezels and waterproofing and good DACs.
Although I need to buy a new tank of fuel for about £40 with that £120.
Although I only use 7.1 for CS:GO because it lacks its own HRTF.
Although I think I would have earnt more if I did the 200% matched bonus on £100.
Although it's kinda obsolete because my English is evident in the application form and an Economics degree suggests I will be fine mathematically anyway.
Although it's not always a hum.
Although it's not too power-demanding.
Although I use the Steam Inventory Helper which is Chrome-only.....
Although I will be getting some cashback soon which will more than make up my loss.
Although M50s make great portable headphones because they rotate and fold up nicely.
Although maybe the nukes are enough of a deterrant.
Although most of it is on gambling websites or a 5% fixed saver.
Although my 7700K isn't too bad because the single-thread performance is so good.
Although my manager seems a bit concerned.
Although my mum did cook for me most days.
Although my mum wants me to borrow from my stepdad but I don't want to.
Although my pension will go up a fair bit too.
Although my smarkets balance has take a big hit.
Although my wife has a lot too.
Although one day when CPUs are good enough I might scale back down to a smaller case again.
Although she doesn't speak English well so she struggles to follow the plot sometimes.
Although the G6 has smaller bezels.
Although the G6 is looking most likely ATM for the cheaper price and good DAC.
Although the M50X folding is so nice.....
Although the S7 is similar priced with a slightly worse DAC.
Although they banned me from their channel, so I don't know how smart it is for sure.
Although they'll only cover my PC up to £2,000.
Although to be fair he is on a royal diet which probably helps a lot.
Although today I'm in a different office and there's literally just the two of us on the whole floor.
Althought you play LoL and I play Dota so I guess you're the fad one not me.
Although UK electricity is relatively high compared to the rest of the world, so our profits will always be lower :(.
Although with Bet365 a couple of my first bets I could cash out for more than the stake.
Although with the current accounts I've got my savings in, it's more like no risk / medium reward right now.
Although you have to stay in hotels all the time.
Alton Towers is a lot further from my location.
Always.
Always Conservative this or Labour that.
Always do whatever covers your back then.
Always get this same error no matter what I try.
Always go to the Christmas one.
Always has.
Always keep it in instant access bank accounts, it's the golden rule of stoozing.
Always made me feel uncomfortable during receptions every morning when they'd make us sing religious songs.
Always making steam wallet money.
Always prefer stable.
Always spread your savings/investments to mitigate risk.
Always stealing your top secret shady plans!#.
ALWAYS take the easiest option available.
ALWAYS TELLING ME THERE'S A "SECURITY ISSUE" AND THEY WON'T GIVE ME MY SHIT.
Always the same one.
A Mars colony would be better..
A masternode of Dash would be wayyyyyyy too expensive.
amazing.
AMAZING.
Amazing at launch.
Amazing comfort and amazing sound quality too.
Amazing how many old people watch that shit.
Amazing how many unemployed people watch that shit.
Amazing sound quality is amazing, isn't it rory?
Amazon.
Amazon are delivering parcels to my mum, I wonder if any of those are stuff from my wishlist.
Amazon are incredible. I got my new mic in less than 24 hours.
Amazon are so good at refunding stuff when I call them, sometimes I'm tempted to exploit it..
Amazon customer support is a bit shitty today.
Amazon had to send me that keyboard three times.
Amazon marketplace can be a bit luck of the draw.
Amazon said they wouldn't notify the gift giver that I'm returning their gift, but they did anyway.
Amazon Student members get 50% off Amazon Dash Buttons with code STUDENTDASH. Learn more.
A McDonalds burger has protein and carbs and vegetables.
AMD A8-7670K 3.6GHz Quad Core APU.
Amdahl's law.
Amdahl's law looks complicated.
AMD APUs are better performance than cheap dedicated graphics.
AMD CPUs suck.
AMD hasn't made a good CPU in like 10 years lmao they're a joke.
AMD IPC is too low.
AMD is the only competition against Nvidia and Intel.
A mechanical keyboard is superior to a gamepad in fighting games.
a member of a Germanic people that invaded the Roman Empire from the east between the 3rd and 5th centuries. The eastern division, the Ostrogoths, founded a kingdom in Italy, while the Visigoths went on to found one in Spain..
American Office?
Americans can't be trusted with guns though.
Americans usually are.
AmerieHartree commended for teaching.
AmerieHartree is a gril.
AmerieHartree:nobody.
Am I a bad person?
Am I a bad person for never sending read receipts?
Am I a dick for walking away from my desk when someone is coming around collecting money for diabetes or something?
Am I allowed to apply for other jobs whilst at work?
Am I allowed to apply for other jobs whilst on my probation?
Am I allowed to sleep with my tenants?
Am I allowed to wear those at work?
Am I a misogonist or a racist? Really hard to tell.
Am I a smart davehamil?
Am I being paranoid or not?
Am I fattist?
Am I getting workplace bullying?
Am I going to get into trouble for what I wrote?
Am I interesting?
Am I pricing my garlic too high?
Am I the only one who what?
A monitor shelf is pointless too when you could just buy monitor arms.
A month?
An AMPDAC/soundcard?
An apple, a banana, a strawberry, a pair, etdc?
Ana, Reinhardt, Lucio and S76 are all OP.
A NAS isn't a proper backup solution either.
Anchovies probably.
And 0% 12 month overdraft with no £ limit.
And £1000 in a savings account at 5%.
And 17% of my salary goes into it too.
And 188hz.
And £2,150 for my gaming PC.
And 22nd of February off to go to a dentist appointment lmao.
And 30% friends and family discount!
And 3 around Christmas.
And 3 microphones.
And £5 a month before that.
And 75C max temp, and I can get it lower if I put on some better thermal paste.
And ~8p at night.
And a 240hz monitor.
And a 240mm AIO.
And a 7700K.
And a bit of Reddit.
And a blue yeti mic?
And about £500 on Betfair.
And a Dominoes.
And a fat-apologist.
And a Fiio E10K.
And a gaming PC is speccd for gaming too.
And a glue gun?
And a goodnight kiss.
And a good pairing with that monitor.
And a GTX 1080TI.
And a GTX 970.
And a hardware EQ.
And a house.
And a Korean gf.
And a Korean gf that's priceless.
And alcohol.
and a lightly dressed salad but I still wanted more.....
And all of those cores are slower than mine.
And all the swearing.
And all to myself when he/she is on leave or ill.
And almost £8k on gambling sites.
And a lot more once I get all my fucking overpaid tax and student loan back.
And a lot of fast food places don't accept card.
And also with films and TV shows, most people just watch western stuff.
And a mattress.
And a mortgage.
And a music player.
And an ear infection.
And an idle account with £1 in it to stop FD charging me.
And an office gym.
And an SSD.
And an SSD and 16GB of RAM.
And a pie?
And a really big CPU cooler so you can OC your 6700K as high as possible.
And a reference GTX 970.
And a rent increase.
And a sexuality.
And a shitload of things PCs do better than consoles, and growing.
And a state pension.
and at least 8 characters.
And a t-shirt.
And automatically log me into websites.
And Battlefield.
And because I'm a designated driver almost every day.
And because I wanted to buy it before the referendum.
And because of that, Intel hasn't made a good CPU since 2011.
And become homeless?
And becoming a multi-planetary species.
And better sound.
And bet the minimum.
And Beyerdynamic!
And Beyerdynamic Custom One Pro and Philips Fidelio X2.
And binned.
And Bluetooth.
And bluetooth and NFC.
And Blue Yeti picks up the sound of my mechanical keyboard more too.
And bots.
And bought it.
And bought two Fidelio X2s with the savings.
And Brazil?
and bugs.
And build quality ofc.
And buses only accept cash too.
And bus people.
And buy Overwatch.
And buy the flat hopefully.
And cable management is a mess ATM. I need to replace my two drives with an M.2 drive.
And camera and courier.
And can disable my camera and wipe the device and shit.
And cashback.
And certainly better engineered.
And China is rich as fuck.
And citizens shoot and kill the police too.
And Citrix.
And "click Next" a few times.....
And comfort.
And computer components.
And contactless only works up to £30.
And convenience.
And cool.
And COP + Boompro.
and CPU.
And credit scores?
And crypto is trustworthy?????
And Debian wanted to be free?
And delidded.
And detachable cable.
And diabeetus.
And Diablo.
And didn't die.
And didn't get any disputes.
And difficulty is skyrocketing.
And doesn't require a power brick.
And does she really expect us to believe that anyone thinks the UK is a safe haven and the police don't care?!??!?
And does that make it lighter or darker in the morning?
And doing it again every time I change motherboard.
And don't have to pay the carrier to unlock the phone at the end.
And double whammy if I drive there and claim on the mileage!!!!
And do what?
And draw in cool air from outside haha.
And driving.
And driving my automobile to work every day.
And earn some £££ in the mean time.
And easier to install.
And ebay.
And even help to buy isa if it's going to save my life.
And even Steam chat.
And even then it's not guaranteed.
And even then, it's only like 0.9% and you can get way better returns by saving/investing it.
And even with the minimum amount lent to me, I'm probably still not going to pay it all off.
And fat?
And FD is emergency too I guess.
And Filmon supports Channel 4 I think.
And fire brigade, they protect people too.
And for cheap £££.
And forgot to meet the sandwich van.
And for some reason my CPU and GPU usage are both under 50% in every game.
And free.
And fuck mobile.
And furniture for my house.
And game ofc.
And gaming PC upgrades.
And generous company benefits like health plan, fat pension, and complimentary Asian girls.
And George Bush.
And get an extended battery, charge at work, then take it home to mine some more using work's electricity?
And get a V-Moda Boom Pro and have like 3 audiophile headsets ^^.
And get me one too please.
And get rid of road maintenance.
And get rid of the NHS.
And get the power of a 50GHz CPU.
And get the SIM seperately.
And gimmicky.
And goes up to 600ohms!!!!
And gone laggy.
And gonna get some money from my salary too.
And good back support.
And good internet.
And good support.
And got into CS:GO.
And go to Shanghai or something.
And go to Thorpe Park on the 27th.
And GPU fans.
And gym kit.
And had a shitload deducted for student loan repayment.
And has a house.
And has two headphone outputs.
And have a coffee made for us.
And have all the cables dangling from the shelf?
And have been working longer.
And have Korean sex.
And headphones.
And hear enemies in Overwatch.
And heat and batteries don't mix well.
And he didn't build enough cool Zeppelins.
And he even said it was a "private matter".
And he got fired for too many dank memes.
And he hates people who like football.
And "hello".
And her boyfriend.
And her boyfriend is the most boring character ever.
And her boyfriend's commander is gonna be executed for treason.
And here I am with 500 open tabs.
And her libido is too high and it's annoying.
and her skin fell off.
And her sugar daddy too.
And he's a few years older.
And he says he's increased the salary for the new starter who will be doing less work than me.
And he's black.
And he's not even going to resign.
And he's very limited with his budget.
And he was an actual human too.
And hew voted for Brexit.
And high-end laptops can't reach the same level of performance as a high-end desktop.
And hoarding lots of bitcoin.
And holding onto Monero.
And hopefully my gf won't get pregnant and make my house get repossessed.....
And house prices will go down because of it?
And how is that going to help him get more FPS?
And how many more heroes do you have after playing 5000 hours over someone who has played 0?
And how often does that happen? Like once every 10 minutes?
And how the fuck are they "noise cancelling" when they are on-ears lmao.
And how the fuck is £1.50 profitable to them?
And HTC is fixing the camera and moving towards stock Android which I like too :).
And I almost walked into a couple of people at the supermarket.
And I am buying a house.
And I am poor.
And I asked you what gubbing is.
And I can confidently say that the Beyers are superior in terms of comfort, sound quality and isolation.
And I can put my 200GB SD card into it :).
And I can't nail down my portable listening strategy.
And I can't plug my V-Moda Boompro into it either.
And I can't watch films on Stremio!
And I CBA to boot up my work laptop just to check my emails and Lync.
And I CBA to login to each bank account every month and download them all individually when I have like 30 accounts.
And I could upgrade my PC.
And I definitely wouldn't order them without trying them first.
And I'd get a criminal record that would get me sacked and make it impossible to find another skilled job.
And I did other illegal things too.
And I don't have ot mess around with taking lots of meter readings and buying powerpacks.
And I don't like how I can't queue for a game of dota because I have no fucking idea when the food will be ready.
And I don't want to lose my gains.
And I don't want to risk its price going down and losing value.
And I don't want to withdraw from my help to buy isa either, because I want a £3000 grant in 4 years.
And I doubt my contents insurance would cover it.
And I drive a Citreon C1 which is immune to keys.
And if I didn't have to pay for the water.
And if I do buy, I get a sweet bonus from the government.
And if I figure out a way to give it perpetual motion, then I get infinite free energy!
And if I fuck up, I will lose interest or have to pay banking fees.
And if I overvolted my card.
And if I really have to, I can withdraw from my TSB monthly saver.
And I fixed them.
And if there was proportional representation, they wouldn't get 37% votes,  and would get FAR less seats.
And if they make you keep it active, then you won't get blame.
And if they return your stake because they want to shut down your account or if they get the odds wrong, they you can potentially lose like 2k at the exchange.
And if WhatsApp still isn't making a profit after 5 years? What happens then?
And if you already have a semi-decent PC, you can just stick a graphics card inside it.
And if you don't get that large CPU cooler and OC your CPU then it's not future proof, is it?
And if you have a thermal problem, then you will get massive FPS drops.
And if you haven't paid it all back within 25 years, it gets written off.
And if you press ice, does it turn into water?
And if you're withdrawing money, you're harming your account health.
And I generally don't download executable code from the internet.
And I generally don't install executable code from the internet.
And I get £100 too.
And I get 5% contactless cashback.
And I get a personal trainer twice a week.
And I get shit for not getting any work done.
And I got £50 Corsair H105!!!!!!
And I got a big cheque when I requested one from the student loans company.
And I got a student loans refund.
And I got high-end motherboard audio.
And I hate antibiotics.
And I hate these fucking offers which require depositing first.
And I have a car.
And I have a Korean gf.
And I have an Ncase M1.
And I have doubts I'll get the £73.50 now.
And I have like 5 different pairs.....
And I have M50X but I don't use it much and might end up selling it.
And I have mining and betting revenue now.
And I have my COPs and M50X and SE215.
And I have my SE215s if I really need them and also for the gym.
And I haven't been at uni for years.
And I have to pay them an extra £1.50 a month to get a static IP to restore my connection back to normal.
AND I HAVE TO USE A LOWER CASE, UPPER CASE, NUMBER, SYMBOL, AND NO REPEATING CHARACTERS.
And I hope I don't get Tinnitus!!!!!!
And I just configured the driver to use the highest refresh rate in 3D games.
And I just invested £1,000 with Ratesetter.
And I knew he'd love the game.
And I live in the middle of fucking nowhere.
And I live near Iota.
And I'll call them back if I want to speak to them.
And I'll have a cheaper night rate.
And I'll have to go back to using 4 reams of paper to prop my monitors up instead.
And I'll leave my DT770s in the office so I don't need to take them back and forth every day.
And I'll not have to work.
And I'll see how well I can manage the heat in the summer before buying more.
And I'm £5k in credit card debt.
And I mainly stream music too.
And I make my own water.
And I'm basically on minimum wage.
And I'm getting £150 because they scratched up my car.
And I'm going to do a couple of mods on them so they are 'bespoke'.
And I might be asked to repay it....
And I might get a full refund too if I want it.
And I might uninstall Signal because nobody will ever fucking use it.
And I might use ebay to buy Beyerdynamic Custom One Pro and Philips Fidelio X2.
And I mine 24/7.
And I'm making a shitload from gambling and mining, more than you.
And I'm not even sure about LTC.
And I'm not even telling you the NSFW things! If I was not at work, then the box would be even tinier because of racism and stuff!
And I'm paying all the bills for my gf.
And I'm probably going to run up like £40k credit card debt over the next few years.
And I'm sitting here using my Beyerdynamic DT770s like a boss.
And I'm still stronger.
And I'm still stuck living with my parents with a Korean gf in Brighton omfg.
And I'm trying to save up for a mattress that won't ruin my back.
And I'm under 25.
And in a meeting.
And I need a 200hz 21:9 monitor.
And I need more mining rigs.
And I need to cover for her.
And I need to deposit into gambling accounts.
And I need to go to town to get my keys.
And I never get invited to events anyway.
And in good shape.
And I noticed some clipping with my DT770s.
And in the winter I'll use them as heaters.
And I often get free food oto.
And I often get free food too.
And I really don't want to talk to them.
And I said to put "TSB" in the reference and she put "TFP".
And I should wait for Zen too.
And is much much cooler and quieter.
And isn't flexible.
And I sound like a fucking retard.
And I started my NETBET rollover.
And I still don't have it.
And I still don't have the Roadhog halloween skin.
And I suspect it's because I only have a shitty 4.5GHz 4690K.
And it can fit high-end full-power parts.
And it costs the same amount that I was quoted to get a removeable cable attached to my DT770s lmao.
And it doesn't include the £2,000 my father has promised me.
And items.
And it gives you more mouse precision and more responsive control in general.
And it harms my gaming performance too.
And it hasn't!!!!!
And it has to not be region restricted in the UK too.
And I think my left arm is too.
And I think the subscription was cheaper in China.
And I thought console FPS was ridiculous enough.....
And I thought I got a good deal at £127.
And I thought it was starting to plateau.
And it'll take fucking forever for my missing cashback claim to be processed.
And it prevents other 3.5mm cables from being used.
And it requires some planning to build around, but the end result is an exceptional performance:size ratio.
And it's a day late.
And it's a great card.
And it's already been posted to me.
And it's an ASIC crypto.
And it's fixed for 5 years.
And it's fucking awkward trying to navigate it.
And it's got hyper threadings.
And it's hard to do in-play and stuff when we're having sex 24/7.
And it's IPS.
And it's just deducted from the profits anyway?
And it's just not good enough when we have super powerful GTX 1080s now.
And it's more flexible than most others too.
And it's not even a gaming chair.
And it's nothing like LoL.
And it's nothing like SMITE lmao.
And it's not profitable to mine any more.
And it's only £40 more!
And it's open source.
And it's so dirty now.
And it's still not here!!!!!!
And it's too expensive to give me a new machine.
And it's top-end specs.
And it turns out my mum bought it for £60 when it's £30 now.
And it was stolen.
And it won't be written off until they either retire or die.
And it works even if I bought the contract using Topcashback, right?
And I've got better things to do than that.
And I've installed Nova Launcher and Waze on my work phone without problems.
And I want a 50 foot virtual display.
And I want a new GPU so I can downscale Street Fighter from 4k to 1080p.
And I want DT770s with removable cable.
And I want my account to be in good standing.
And I want to get a 480hz gsync monitor for Dota and CS and OW if they ever get made.
And I want to keep my TSB account for the interest.
And I want to remortgage at 60% LTV in 5 years.
And I want to see 5GHz+.
And I want to see what HTC comes out with.
And I won't even have the cable plugged in.
And I won't get my benefits :(.
And I won't have two cables.
And I would have been underpaid for a year and never get the money back.
And just 5 minutes ago it was 89C and 3930RPM.
And just don't watch videos on mobile.
And just get her deported if I don't like living with her?
And just playing troll.
And keep the other one at full brightness and colours.
And KFC.
And Killing Floor.
and kpop.
And laptops/smartphones would be so much better.
And last night I spent 10 minutes switching my Tesco account to Halifax to get £100.
And less comfy than DT770.
And less ripple.
And listen to music!!!!!
and litecoin is disabled at coinbase oh.
And looking at houses.
And lose my 0% promotional rate.
And lots of food.
And lots of newspaper everywhere.
And lower if I wasn't CPU mining too I guess.
And low resolution.
And low spending.
And M50Xs.
And made a child.
And make £££ at the same time.
And makes it run way too hot.
And makes it sound worse.
And making me lots of £££.
And maybe another 1080p stream for my gf too.
And maybe a Samsung Galaxy S7 or HTC One M10 or something.....
And maybe a second bedroom and a lodger.
And maybe buy some Beyer Custom Studios.
And maybe HTC 10 later this year :).
And maybe Vega.
And maybe wrap and tie the cable a bit since it's so fucking long.
And Michael Caine isn't real.
And might still be lower than my co-workers.
And mine is really high now even though all I got was blank pages.
And mobile is growing too.
And money to put into my pension so I can keep gamign when I get old.
And more compact tab height.
And more interest.
And mortgages and shit.
And Mountain Dew.
And mount /tmp and /usr/tmp to tmpfs.
And muddy bass.
And Mussolini.
And my cost of living is much lower since I don't do drugs.
And my ears have been fucked up so I can't enjoy my Fidelio X2 anyway.
And my electricity bill.
And my exchanges have like 1.5k each.
And my gf.
And my gf is Korean.
And my gf isn't invited.
And my gf is v nice too.
And my gf took a bite out of the middle, so she probably got about 1/3rd of my avacado.
And my GTX 970 is about 1/3 of the hashpower of my 1080 TI.
And my house.
And my household was wayyyyyyyy too noisy to sleep well during the day.
And my internet isn't working still.
And my M50X can't replace that.
And my mother gave me so much abuse for being unemployed.
And my parents don't want to help me buy a house like a lot of my friends' parents do.
And my parents have a lot of property.
And my pension is growing by 8.1%!
And my personal PC is much faster.
And my phone call.
And my phone I bought with cash.
And my revenue is a lot higher than that.
And my room was FUCKING HOT.
And my SE215s aren't comfy or Hi-Fi enough for home use.
And my SE215s replace it for portable use.
And my Shure SE215.
And my Silverstone RVZ01 doesn't support it.
And NA is really anti-immigration, so I can't move there anyway.
And nationwide pays out £200.
And Navi came top 4 lmao.
And Ncase M1.
And NFC.
And no 2 consecutive characters and no 2 consecutive characters from a previous password.
And nobody knows how the fuck to do basic formula in Excel except me.
and no recognisable words.
And no rent.
And notes?
And nothing else.
And nothing going on outside.
And nothing other than that so far.
And not make changes to the live.
And not properly when it's pulled out?
And not showering in the morning.
And not work.
And now he wants to buy 144hz monitor and proper headphones to enjoy the game more.
And now I'm struggling to pay rent.
And now it's f2p, the Chinese love that shit.
And now it's out of stock, so I'd have to pay £100 for the brand new one.
And now Mozilla have surrendered to Debian?
And now the £ is worthless anyway.
And now they can't.
And now they don't want more.
And now they're finally fixing it.
And now they want £453 to fix my car.
And obesity.
And ofc you can always build a faster and cheaper one yourself.
And offshore oil drilling.
AND ONCE MY HEARING STOPS BEING FUCKED UP.
Andorra - Andorra v Hungary - Match Result  56.00  Won.
And outputting onto a TV?
And Overclockers and Scan.
And overclock them.
And Overwatch.
And Overwatch!!!
And pay extra for their special beef.
And pay my mortgage.
And people like it because it has the highest production value in the world and because Korean girls are physically and intellectually superior.
And Pharah.
And Philips Fidelio X2.
And phone.
And planning.
And play OW at 300FPS.
And power on my PC for 09:00 start.
And pretentious.
And probably less isolation but without any leakage.
And probably paedos since they don't want to protect the children.
And proprietary.
And PUBG.
And pubs and bars.
And put it next to my desk?
And put them near windows.
And racist..
and RAM.
And RAM.
And really comfy.
And Redit.
And reinstall.
And removing the tab bar when only one tab open.
And replace the cable locking system.
André Villas-Boas.
And /r/kpop.
Android 6.0 niceeeeeeeeeeee.
Android Pay.
Android phone alarm.
And roullette/blackjackl.
And Samsung Galaxy S7.
And Sasha Baron Cohen looking horribly out of shape.
And say what?
And see my power usage to calculate profitability.
And sent to Guantanimo Bay.
And Seoul.
And she calls me "self-centered" wtf.
And she keeps giving me food.
And she'll make me stay for the bank holiday too.
And she's in Rush Hour 2.
And she's making me nice food right now.
And she's not strong.
And Shure SE215 lmao.
And shy.
And since I have financial problems, I will be so unhappy if they don't.
And since it's hosted externally, I can't do a backup.
And skins which are banned in official tournaments for some reason.
And skin-tight clothing is bad for airflow.
And sleep.
And slightly dangerous.
And some fans.
And some Marmite and a can of Dr Pepper.
And someone has already set it up.
And some parts to mod it.
And some Reddit.
And some speakers.
And sometimes I play music at night.
And soon it'll be even lower friction.
And soundstage is an important feature of circumaural, otherwise why not go IEM?
And spending >£1000 on a laptop is hard to justify.
And spend lots of money on her.
And spicy food.
And stay in school.
And still over two days to go wtf.
And stops when profitability stops.
And student loan company doesn't refund you automatically like HMRC does for tax.
And stupid Betway says that the offer isn't available in the UK.
And suck on an ice cube.
And surely cost per GB is cheap enough nowadays?
And switches based on what's most profitable.
And Taiwan.
And take it to coffee shops hahahahhaa.
And tax and pensions.
And taxis.
And that charging for bags actually hurts them?
And that I am a troll.
And that my extreme poverty at uni was caused by my parents being rich.
And that's a pretty small space heater.
And that's a small indie game.
And that's excluding the drink.
And that share is subsidised rent.
And that's using the CPU too.
And that was just a cold.
And that would kill my chances of buying a flat.
And the £100 interest when my TSB saver matures next week.
And the banks gave me shitloads of money.
And the bass is very tight without distortion.
And the bleeding.
And the cable is standard 3.5mm which is super useful for portability, replacement, and for turning into a gaming headset with a V-moda Boompro!
And the clock speed might not boost as high.
And the courier is a retard if they give it to a random person instead of the receptionist.
And the current account is trash because it has no interest.
And the eztv and popcorn time addons.
And the few keys that were affected were very easy to remove and wipe too.
And the Fidelo X2s are really cheap now too.
And the fucking things are a pain to upgrade/replace faulty parts.
And the H105 could be good, but it might be slightly too thick.
And the headlines make it sound like the whole team died too.
And their assets?
And their debts become yours?
And their isolation is beaten by DT770s and pretty much all IEMs and even most closed-back headphones.
And their monthly saver doesn't let you withdraw, miss months, or pay in from non-FD accounts.
And their parent company Tencent.
And the laws are designed by the people who will circumvent them; they design them with loopholes already ready to use.
And the M50s are super comfortable if you rest them on your chest too.
And the mafia.
And the man on the other end kept asking me what I needed it for.
And the most casual.
and then baby CHEER UP.
And then Brexit is cancelled.
And then buy a 240hz gsync monitor.
And the new Nuke looks really pretty.
And the next thing you know they'll be lighting it on fire!
And then flat panels came onto the market and nobody cared about refresh rate.
And then got Spotify to delink it for me.
And then had an affair.
And then have sex with Asian girls in my flat.
And then he alerted your boss and they sacked you?
And then I blocked the toilet.
And then I found a job at the end of January.
And then I have to spend more on heating the house for her.
And then I'll need at least a few weeks to break them in ofc.
And then I started laughing.
And then I want to open a private pension.
And then I was farting.
And then I was told I wasn't allowed to use my own keyboard :(.
And then my CPU would never go above like 45C in actual use.
And then never go there.
And then pay for it over 30 months at 0% interest using my mining profits hahahahahahahhaha.
And then rotate my PSU orientation by 180 degrees, install a 1080TI, install a custom heatsink on it, and install some new fans.
And then run to the toilets.
And the NSA.
And then the headphones had a faulty driver anyway and I had to send them back.
And then the only way to get at that wealth is to sell it and start renting, putting me back where I started wtf.
And then your house catches on fire?
And the positive is your cash?
And the price.
And the problem will only get worse when I add a third display.
And the producers manipulate the production to make some people less likeable?
And the refresh rate sucks.
And there's no automatic backup.
And there's nothing we can do to stop them.
And there's plenty of carbs in bread.
And the same propulsion system?
And the stupid third-story building with all the stairs is bad for my leg DOMS too.
And the wireless version is very very good. It's ~20g heavier but has zero cable drag and very low latency.
And they add comments to cells with dates, so I can't run reports around dates.....
And they also said I had a leaking water pipe that is covered by the warranty.
And they announced Stremio Circle recently which is like Chromecast but for Stremio I think.
And they ask me what I need.
And they call workbooks "spreadsheets" and spreadsheets "tabs" wtf.
And they call workboots "spreadsheets" and spreadsheets "tabs" wtf.
And they get confused when I use correct terminology wtf.
And they got rid of their warrant canary.
And they have a larger soundstage and better sound quality and larger drivers.
And they have a really good continous free bet bonus.
And they have a single removable 32ohm 3.5mm jack.
And they have no competition.
And they have to compete with Ubuntu's app store which is 99% free.
And they'll be paying above-interest rates on it.
And they might decide not to come at all.
And they need to buy software licenses twice because of remote desktop LMAO.
And they offer the worst service.
And they're only $260.
And they're open and non-bassy which turn a lot of people off.
And they're still taking up lots of space.
And they're the most comfy cans I've ever worn.
And they're using Beats all the time.
And they say I'm being unreasonable and profiting from them.
And they still don't know how to copy and paste text.
And they suck with the Boompro because it is XLR instead of 3.5mm AUX.
And they think they're being discriminated against because the doctor told them to lose weight and people don't find them attractive.
And they've got a provision fund.
And this year they're doing 4 tournaments instead of 1.
And to a better country.
And tobacco.
And to discover music.
And told me to order them individually to seperate addresses.
And Tony Blair?
And tooth decay.
And torrents.
And travelled 150 miles to visit her.
And two footlongs for £8.
and type one thing into the keyboard.
And undercutting any big walls slightly.
And unpixelated Japanese.
And use dust filters.
And use risers.
And Valve is relevant.
And VLOOKUPs.
And we can't put people who download cars or smoke joints into jail for the rest of their lives either!
And Wechat.
And we have south-facing patio doors which let in a lot of light.
And we'll go to Five Guys.
And we're busy at work atm.
And what about LoL players?
And "whatever"?
And what if my gf is watching something too?
And what resolution is your monitor?
And where are all the Black Friday one bedroom flats?!?!?!
AND WHERE THE FUCK IS MY KEY.
And why did David Cameron tell Corbyn to resign wtf.
And why do you have two phones?!?!??!?!??!?
And why mention it is f2p?
And why two keyboards wtf.
And with all those savings, I can build a beastly gaming PC!
And without tight restrictions.
And work.
And work better in the gym.
And worked hundreds of times.
And wtf is a concierge.
And X2s are better than HD600s.
And yeah, I kinda feel the same about IEMs.....
And you can fit two 2.5" drives in a 3.5" slot.
And you can get a cheaper 1080TI.
And you can have your own 300" IMAX-sized display next to it.
And you can use it as a Twitch viewing client too.
And you can view your calendar.
And you'd have to re-order, rebuild, and reinstall everything.
And you don't get carrier bloatware.
And you don't have to go days without using the office gym too!!!
And you don't store it on your HDD except in cache.
And you have to mod them so they work with any aux cable.
And you'll still be making a profit".
And you lose everything!!!!
And you're 1k mmr.
And you're in the north where everything is cheap.
and you're stalking her on flightradar?
and your welcome to bring food pls.
And you still have shit headphones.
And you will get banned.
and you won.
An easy fix if you have too much cash.
A necessary evilk.
An email got sent around the office last week telling us we can only use the business's milk for tea and coffee. Then this week the business uses my milk!!!!!!
An esports bar in England is going to fail hard.
A new tab button with just that proxy would be great too.
An extra 1GB for the same price is tempting.
Angry because the subcontractor at my workplace scratched up the side of my car and it's going to cost me £280 to fix but the subcontractor only agreed to pay up to £150 so I requested the CCTV footage from my employer so I can take my subcontractor to small claims court but they refused to give it to me and sent me a photograph of the.
an hour ago.
A nice little bonus.
A nice tasty £900 for you then.
Animals die so I can eat them.
Anime is for nerds and children.
Anime is for weebs.
Anime is proof there’s no god.
An ipad is not a computer apparently.
Annoying isn't it?
Annual.
Annyeoung.
Annyeoung?
Annyeoung hasseyo.
ANNYEOUNG HASSEYO.
Annyeoung hasseyo HansProleman.
Annyeoung rory.
annyoung.
Annyoung.
ANNYOUNG IOTA.
annyoung rory.
Annyoung rory.
ANNYOUNG RORY.
Annyoung SlyRatchet.
Annyoung Zorg.
Annyung.
annyung rory.
ANNYUNG RORY.
An OCed 4690K will be faster than a 4790K.
An office PC with an ATI 460 will shit all over any console.
An old ass fuck graphics card.
A normal retail one is like £320.
Another £50 free in-play bet yay.
Another one to arb I guess.
Another terrorist attack last night lmao.
An ounce wtf that's only 28g.
An overdraft is just a loan you never have to repay.
Answering your fucking stupid questions.
Answer the fucking phone omg.
Answer the fucking question.
Answer the god damn fucking phone.
Answer your PM ffs.
Anthony Hopkins is one sick fuck.
Antibiotics.
anti-PC people are retards.
Anually ofc.
A nuclear powered car is unrealistic. It doesn't scale down that well.
An ultrawide would be pretty great for casual gaming IMO.
An unofficial derivative called WhatsAppTime has been developed, which is a standard Win32 application for PCs and supports notifications through the Windows notification area.[53].
any 3.5" drives and PCI graphics cards?
Any Asians?
Anyeoung.
ANYEOUNG.
Anyeoung chingu.
Anyeoung chingu rory.
Anyeoung HansProleman.
Anyeoung hasseyo.
ANYEOUNG HASSEYO.
anyeoung hasseyo chingu.
ANYEOUNG HASSEYO Lord-Harlot.
Anyeoung Iota.
Anyeoung lota.
Anyeoung Plouescat.
Anyeoung rory.
ANYEOUNG rory.
ANYEOUNG RORY.
Any excess money over the year not used for the draw will then be donated to charity at year end..
Any good promos today?
Any instructions, notification email, notification phone number?
any new features?
Any nice girls in those?
Anyone can do thatr.
Anyone else in London tomorrow?
Anyone has a bigger chest than my gf lmao that doesn't mean shit.
Anyone seen any good Brack Friday deals?
Anyone want to buy some crypto?
Any other good ones?
anyoung.
Any specific angles you want?
Any SSD will do for gaming.
Anything below its price is shit in comparison.
Anything can happen in 16 years, it's a really fucking long time.
Anything more than a 1080TI isn't worth it.
Anything with Cherry MX Red because it's best for gaming.
Any time you disagree with me, I'll just tell you I'm on caffeine.
Anyway, I deleted Facebook last night.
Anyway, I need to mine more to bring down the withdrawal fee.
Anyway, you can go on Ratesetter and get a loan for under 10%.
Anyway, you're not going to be there tomorrow.
Any way you want me to position them?
AOA - Good Luck.
AOA - Heart Attack]#.
AOA - Miniskirt.
AOA's new album is fantastic.
AOC 2460PQU.
AOC 2460PQU overclocked.
AOC did an on-site exchange for my computer display which was pretty good.
A pakcet of oreos?
Apart from Dota.
A pint of what exactly?
A plane moving at 0mph with 0 acceleration can't take off surely?
A plumbus is a fictional toy.
Apple can easily check whether or not I purchased anything.
Apple customers are ignorant to high performance products.
Apple is NOT the most technologically advanced computer maker omg.
Apple products are generally overpriced and underpowered.
A pre-built will only run at 4.5GHz, but you want 5.2GHz.
A pretty good one too.
April, but I can keep 5 until the end of May.
APRIL FOOLS.
A property detached from other properties.
A public playlist I was subscribed to went from >1000 songs to 255 yesterday.
APUs are for casuals.
APUs still suck though.
Archer?
A really light mouse is less fatiguing in fast-paced FPS like Quake and Overwatch.
Are corpses people?
A recruitment agency just called me to ask me about a job offering 17/18k starting salary but could pay more than rory's in a couple of years. Should I go for it?
Are either your GPU or CPU thermal throttling?
Are Koreans dominant in OW now?
Are Labour MPs really that retarded?
Are Macbooks any good?
Are mining rigs noisy?
Are MyHermes really this fucking shit?
Arena FPS is dead.
Arena FPS is like UT/Quake/Warsow/Reflex/etc.
Aren't all games WASD nowadays?
Aren't credit cards usually the best for that?
Aren't genders just a social construct anyway?
Aren't my AKG K702s just as good as your HD600s, but half the price?
Aren't open backed headphones unsuitable for the office? You're subjecting everyone around you to your awful music.
Aren't runes, masteries, summoner spells, etc all in-game stats and abilities?
Aren't there Android apps for that?
Aren't you at work?
Are parliament votes anonymous?
Are Samsung fucking retards or something.
Are some distros more secure than others?
Are the high emissions caused by air conditioning then?
Are the photos okay?
Are there any cheap pay-as-you-go SIMS but with cheap data?
Are there any free items you can buy or under 5p that you get a free bag for?
Are there any ISPs that are good for gamers? I think they're all equally good?
Are there any other websites that could give me a quote to add a removable cable to my DT770s?
Are there any reviews of the S7's DAC yet?
Are there any reviews of the S7's DAC yet? Have you upgraded to the S7?
Are there any words I am banned from using in this channel?
Are there Asian massage parlours?
Are there lots of Asians in leeds?
Are there many asians where you're from?
Are there schools which are like the opposite of grammar schools but you have to pass a stupidity test?
Are these matched bets going to invalidate your cashback claims?
Are the spying tools for Windoze or Linux OS?
Are they Chinese?
Are they fucking retarded.
Are they going to do the same with CS:GO?
Are they going to keep saying "not a leader"?
Are they less secure than mobiles then?
Are they planning to let people play against them 5v5?
Are they still doing well? I thought they're currently losing terroritory and were entirely pushed out of Iraq?
Are they stupid?
Are they worth anything?
Are those jokes supposed to be funny?
Are weeaboos mouthbreathers?
are you a bit drunk after drinking with your daddy?
Are you a computer hacker?
Are you actually fucking kidding me right now?
Are you actually gay?
Are you actually on the spectrum?
Are you actually this retarded?
Are you actually using your overdraft?
Are you a gay racist nazi?
Are you a girl?
Are you a gril?
Are you a grill?
Are you a grill?!?!??!
Are you allowed to beat them again?
Are you a mod on /r/uktrees?
Are you a racist?
Are you a registered cripple?
Are you a sausage-gobbler?
Are you a streamer?
Are you a stuperstitious person?
Are you at work?>.
Are you a virgin?
Are you a white cis male?
Are you being sarcastic?
Are you being serious.
Are you calling me prejudiced?
Are you comparing blink dagger to some other item?
Are you counting the CC payments as a cost?
Are you depositing and betting the minimum amounts?
Are you doing anything to celebrate the new year?
Are you doing it for the cashback or long-term investment?
Are you doing that Betway esports promo?
Are you doing the Sky Vegas prize machine?
Are you excited for Android Pay?
Are you excited for season 7?
Are you excited for SpaceX's mission?
Are you excited for the new Quake?
Are you familiar with Maslow's Hierarchy of Needs?
ARE YOU FUCKING BUSY M9.
Are you gay?
Are you gay for Brighton?
Are you gay or racist or both?
Are you getting a good rate at least?
Are you getting an operation or not?
Are you getting a pay rise for the new tax year?
Are you getting the Co-Op and Halifax monthly bonuses? ez £7 a month that way.
Are you getting the house edge?
Are you going to be filthy rich like rory?
Are you going to buy the HTC M10?
Are you going to ESL Pro League at The O2 Arena next month?
Are you going to gay pride next weekend?
Are you going to gay pride this weekend?
Are you going to get a Kaby Lake and GTX 1080?
Are you going to get Amazon Dash?
Are you going to hack the NSA?
Are you going to leave it on tonight?
Are you going to mine ethereum this winter?
Are you going to sex her?
Are you going to try any of the locals?
Are you going to vote for JC or Theresa May?
Are you gonna buy VR?
Are you gonna vote for Hillary or Donald?
Are you high?
Are you home yet?
Are you in Brighton this weekend?
Are you in Brighton tonight?
Are you in London or Leeds?
Are you interested in meeting Chinese and Korean girls?
Are you interested in Nationwide or Ratesetter?
Are you in the beta?
Are you joking?
Are you kidding? I've been subscribed since they started.
Are you legitimately asking me or just trolling?
Are you living under a rock?
Are you looking forward to your new drone?
Are you maxxing out your employer pension?
Are you mining cryptocurrencies?
Are you mining Ethereum?
Are you mining on a single 1080 TI?
Are you mining on your CPU?
Are you okay?
Are you on any incel subreddits?
Are you on Economy 7?
Are you on EE's central server or osmething?
Are you only trading LTC for GRLC or are you doing fiat too?
Are you on /r/theredpill?
Are you paying £15 a month?
Are you planning to stay single forever?
Are you really getting £2.25 profit?
Are you really that creepy that you can't get a date without my help even though you live in a city with thousands of beautiful girls?
Are you really that culturally ignorant?
Are you referring to some sort of pension?
are you retarded?
Are you retarded?
Are your family all crazy religious people then?
Are you richer than rory?
Are you richer than rory?!?!?
Are you richer than rory or something?
Are you rich now?
Are you right handed?
Are your M50X the only decent headphones you've tried? I think you'd be blown away by how good Philips Fidelio X2 sounds.
Are you running Debian?
Are you running Firefox 57?
Are you running the game on lowest graphics?
Are you running v2.0.1.3?
Are you saying it's not enough?
Are you saying white people all look the same.
are you serious?
Are you serious?
Are you seriously comparing the cancer risk of smoking to eating meat?
Are you signed up to that scheme where you build credit history just by paying your rent?
Are you still going to buy it?
Are you still mining?
Are you still up for it?
Are you still using E17 AMPDAC?
Are you still using the stock cooler?
Are you still using your Fiio?
Are you still using your HD600 with a Fiio E10K? lmao.
Are you still working out regularly?
Are you sure?
Are you sure 72 isn't the average age of church goers?
Are you sure I hit her in the most fertile period? 32-23=9.
Are you sure it's 0%?
Are you sure it's 8%? It's showing as 3.5% for me.
Are you sure it's a 390?
Are you sure it's not a graduate account overdraft?
Are you sure it's not the one on pornhub?
Are you sure it wasn't intel?
Are you sure? My brother says I don't need one.
Are you sure Philips X2 Fidelio isn't high-end?
are you sure that's your account? You've been offline for 1,573 days.
Are you talking about Elijah Wood?
Are you talking about NA housing market?
Are you there?
Are you underlaying?
Are you using Awesome Miner or Multi Pool Miner?
Are you using M50X with stock earpads?
Are you using multiprocess Firefox?
Are you using NiceHash normal or legacy? I just installed legacy because it gives more control without having to go into the config file as much.
Are you using the Stremio 4.0 beta?
Are you voting for Donald or Hillary?
Are you watching Epicenter?
Are you watching it not?
Arguably still very niche.
a rise of 5% would be nice.
Armour regenerates automatically.
Arnie is so ripped.
Around £12?
Around £1246.
Around £1k-£2k usually.
Around £22.6k.
Around 53.
Arteezy is over 9,000.
As a fraction of my gaming PC's total cost, it's getting very small now.
ASAP.
As a treat.
As a white male, you should check your privilege.
As few PCs as possible and as many monitors as possible.
A shitload of people have 2 year old GTX970s right now, so there'll be a shitload of second-hand ones on ebay when Pascal launches for sure.
A shitty subscription service.
Asian bride?
Asian girls age slower because they have better genetics than Aryan girls.
Asian girls are better than other various by various subjective and objective metrics.
Asian girls are objectively more attractive than whites.
Asian girls are really really smart.
Asian parents give their children a fuckload of money.
Asians.
Asian>white.
ASICs.
ASICs are a riskier investment.
ASICs lose value difficulty increases or coins lose value, but PC components don't.
As if David Cameron gives a fuck about my opinion lmao.
As if he ordered a fancy dinner from a resteraunt and then told them he's going to pay them less than he should.
As if I'm sat at home in my undies watching GoT and gambling instead of working or something....
As if it's so fucking difficult.
As if lightning strikes are a crime lmao.
As if the fucking cost of living wasn't high enough already.
A single cable for microphone + multiple headphones.
A single GPU can be ~300W.
A single graphics card with 6 micro DP ports = amazing.
A single overclocked 1080TI would give you a better experience.
A single powerful nVidia GPU is best for gaming.
A single VGA port wtf.
As in mentally retarded.
As in retarded.
As I predicted.
As I said then GOOD JOB VOTING.
Ask for a Dragon Lore AWP.
Ask for help and nobody even looked at me.
Ask her if she's single.
Ask HMRC for another cheque.
Asking "how are you" and shit like that.
Ask internet how to buy it. It is not very hard. Just write "how to buy btc" I give u one day upon reading this message(I placed a tracking pixel in it, Ill know when you open it). If you dont send me the necessary amount Ill send video with you to all your contacts When I get bitcoin- the сompromising evidence will be destroyed.If u require me to show evidence, reply yeah and Ill share video that I made with 3 contacts Ive collected from you..
Ask Iota.
Ask your boss's boss to tell your boss that he pays him so should leave you alone.
A slightly higher framerate would be nice.
As long as I'm pressing the buttons in the general correct place.
As long as it's not my own wealth.
As long as people still want to buy my hashing power, and my graphics card holds its value, I'll never lose money.
As long as the bookie isn't doing anything illegal, you should be able to get your money back.
As long as the government keeps the deficit within 60% and the budget deficit within 3% to stay compliant with EU regulation, we should be fine.
As long as the office PC was made in the last 5 years or so.
As long as there's a cheap option, people will use them.
As long as the room is comfortable and safe, that's all that matters.
As long as they're a fatty?
As long as they still fit in your pocket ofc.
As long as you have a VPN then it's fine.
As long as you pay enough NI then I think you're entitled to JSA for 6 months.
As long as you've seen T2 then that's okay.
A small crime like that would either be a fine or fine + community service, because they probably wouldn't want to jail me over it.
As opposed to what?
As our couriers are self-employed they are not obliged to leave a contact number..
A Spanish sausage.
As part of the Korean Wave, K-pop has been embraced by the South Korean government as a tool for soft power abroad, particularly towards youth.[266].
As rory would say, I'm not a "mouthbreather".
Assholes.
As social media.
As soon as the bombs go off, London becomes a ghost town.
Assuming 3%.
Assuming an average of £10, then that's £200.
Assuming each person drinks 8 pints, then 35 pints is not enough for more than 4.
Assuming they do it internally instead of blockchain.
As the population increases and the supply of land remains constant, the value of property is likely to maintain an upwards trend.
A still image won't be made less blurry with a higher refresh rate.
A stool only needs three.
Asus ROG Strix GeForce GTX 1080.
As well as the Fractal Core 500 if you want really good CPU cooling.
At $0.24 a coin last time I calculated.
At 10,000 calories I bloody well hope they're nice.
At 1LTC the fee is 0.1%.
At 8am this morning.
At almost any company.
At best it's stupid and ignorant, at worst it's stupid and makes no sense.
ATH-M50X.
At home I use a combination of my COP and K702.
A thread on /r/globaloffensive said that it improves framerates.
ATI cards need Freesync displays and nVidia need Gsync.
ATI still has shit Linux drivers.
At least a hundred times.
At least do some research before putting your money in all these platforms.
At least I gave them the idea.
At least I get to use my credit card to build up some credit history.
At least I have 3 options now.
At least I have found a niche for my DT770s.
At least in GoT the characters killed off are actually interesting and relevant.
At least in my relationship I encourage my partner to live a healthy lifestyle.
At least I should get one that's actually good.
At least I think he is?
At least mine is on a decent bookie and not shitty Betway.
At least the Weeabo isn't hurting anyone.
At least try to work up to it.
At least we know what zeus fucking looks like.
At least with Haswell.
At least you're not losing hundreds on accumulators.
At least your PSU hasn't caught fire like mine did.
At least you still have Betway, paddy power and skybet.
At least you still have Betway, Paddy Power and Skybet.
At lowest graphics settings, my 4690K seems to be bottlenecking my GTX 970.
ATM I don't really have anything worth sharing.
ATM I go over the speedometer intentionally because I know it's undertweaked.
ATM I have lots of GBP, but soon a lot of my wealth will be tied up in GPUs.
ATM I'm carrying two.
ATM I'm depositing £5 more but betting the minimum.
ATM I'm just running the VRAM bare.
ATM I'm keeping my DT770s in a locked cupboard in the office permanently.
ATM I'm kinda just building my wealth.
ATM I'm leaving them locked in my cupboard at work.
ATM I'm only getting 180-220 FPS in Overwatch, so I really need to upgrade my CPU+RAM+motherboard.
ATM I'm using Matchbook, Smarkets and Betfair all fairly regularlyu.
ATM I'm using my work laptop just for receiving Lync calls.
ATM I only have 500MB of data.
ATM I only have 7 accounts, so it's manageable.
ATM I think they'd classify my mining income as CGT because I'm in full time employment.
ATM it's $21,530,345 with a low degree of accuracy and could easily be $5m plus or minus.
ATM machine.
ATM my 4690K is the bottleneck.
ATM only £168 each, but they were £310 a month ago.
A trap for woman.
a t-shirt.
At the cost of soundstage, comfort, serviceability and sound quality.
At the moment we don’t have plans to extend the Your Music limit. The reason is because less than 1% of users reach it. The current limit ensures a great experience for 99% of users instead of an "OK" experience for 100%..
At this rate it'll go above $20m.
At this rate it's going to be 10 billion by Christmas.
AT THIS RATE MY NCASE M1 WILL ARRIVE BEFORE MY CORSAIR H105.
At what rate?
At what speed?
At work.
At work?
Audio is subjective, and I have different ears and needs to rory.
Audio quality is an afterthought on every smartphone, nobody gives a fuck!
audited by OWS.
Austria and Germany are very advanced civilisations.
Automatic login too, so you don't have to remember your password manager's password.
Avago A9800.
A VERY important person.
A very solid investment.
A vlookup doesn't work when you change the lookup names every fucking day omg.
A VR headset can do giant and 3D.
A week?
Awesome.
Awesome!
Awesome Miner.
Awesome Miner did it then.
Awesome Miner is bugged.
A whole packet?
A worthless one like media studies.
A year ago?
A year ago I would never have considered spending £160 on a headphone amp.
A year ago there weren't any.
A Youtuber who likes to bully children and people with mental disabilities.
Babies increase income requirement and also make it harder to house.
back.
Backed by gaming too.
Back to 5%.
Back to CryptoNight.
Bacon and eggs and bacon sandwich.
bad bad bad.
Bad for gaming.
Bad government and education.
Bad history can be better than none.
Bad isolation.
Badly AND expensive.
Bad sound quality and very worn-down.
Bad taste in games.
Bad VRAM.
Bandwidth is irrelevant for gaming, and my slow connection is fine for Stremio.
Bank accounts are getting worse.
Banks make it so hard.
Bank switches never not work for me.
ban men from elections wtf?
Banned as well I guess?
Barely.
Barely noticeable.
Barely used.
Barney.
Barney is approximately 4 hours 45 minutes away from you..
Barney is currently making delivery number 8, you are delivery number 89..
Based on data from past hour.
Based on latest gdax trade.
Based on what index?
Based on your Medium-high attitude to risk and the timeframe for this pot, we suggested risk levels 3-7.
Basically anything that takes up a significant amount of my time.
Basically I just want to mount a display in front of my face that isn't the shitty MTV TVs.
Basically the dreams of me being able to go on holidays abroad like my parents has been shattered.
Basically, you only really need water, shelter and food.
Basic income solves eligibility more than wealth.
Basic income will be low though.
bass is bad for gaming!!!!!!
Bass is fun.
Bastion is such a bad hero right now.
Bath is nice though, lots of cute Asians.
Baths take a long time.
bath too.
Batman vs Superman is shit because the most likeable character is killed off about 1/3 of the way through the film.
Battlefield 1?
Battlefield 4?
Battle passes.
bbcnewz.com theguardians.co.uk.
BCH?
BCH down 38% over 24 hours.
BCH has been on a bull run the last few days.
BCH has sufficient liquidity to purchase a modest amount.
BCH is going ham right now.
BCH withdrawals are cheaper.
BCH withdrawals from Trade Satoshi are pretty cheap.
Bear market is over.
Beats and Bose rubbish.
Beats and Panasonic.
Beats are for retards like you.
Beats are the biggest headphones brand in the world now.
BEATS AUDIO BOOMSOUND DOLBY HEADPHONE etc.
Beats have such a bad reputation that I've never bought them.
Beats peasants hate them.
Becase Ireland is in the British Isles.
Because £750 goes into my monthly saver accounts each month and £350 goes to my mum, so not much is leftover for me.
Because Airbus hospitality.
Because all these accounts only pay interest on the first 2-3k.
Because a single powerful GPU is best for gaming and 1080TI isn't a great mining card.
Because ATM 125k-4X my salary = a deposit required of £48,240.
Because ATM I have to sacrifice one feature.
Because ATM it's not catching most duplicates.
Because banning encryption is totally going to help solve this problem.
because Bath is expensive.
Because beautiful Korean grills in their 30s.
Because damage is possible.
Because electric cars would really take off if batteries were better.
Because flats don't have log fires.
Because fuck Google and Microsoft.
Because fucking Amazon never sent mine to me.
Because fuck manual.
Because fuck spending 20 hours commuting every week.
Because he basically just took stuff off the front page of Reddit that everyone already knows because he knows nothing about Dota.
because he's a fucking autist hipster.
Because he's rich?
Because he was Dutch, not German.
Because holding 12+kg in your arm and keeping it stable whilst moving up and down can be a little tricky.
Because I always get accused of listening to music too loud, when I'm actually just trying to avoid talking to them.
Because I am a nice guy.
Because I am in another office.
Because I am obsessed with input latency.
Because I applied for UC near the end of the month.
Because I CBA to give them an economics lesson every time they try to rip me off.
Because I didn't know who he is.
Because I didn't realise I needed the CPU power until after I bought that CPU. It was a huge upgrade over what I previously had, but still not enough..
Because I don't have a cable for them any more.
Because I don't need many minutes or text, but I need lots of data.
Because I don't need to apply for another mortgage for like 5 years.
Because I don't want to pay VAT in two countries.
Because I don't want to sell this PSU for cheap; it's a really good one and there's nothing that's much better than it.
Because I dropped a barbell plate on my foot yesterday.
Because if I have to call them back, I'll be put on hold for ages and have to go through security questions.
Because I finished working on the 24th of December but didn't get paid until the 4th of January.
Because if I rent somewhere then it'll take me a lot longer than 6 months to save up.
Because I forgot my can of soup that I would normally eat.
Because I found it on ebay at a lower price.
Because I have a life and don't have time to play every day ffs.
Because I have more money than her.
because I have no fucking idea.
Because I just lost like £80.
Because I kept being given Universal Credit even when employed for some reason.
Because I'll be going on two foreign trips in the next 6 months or so.
Because I'm an adult still living with my parents.
Because I'm desperate not to become unemployed.
Because I'm not an ass.
Because I'm not happy with my M50X or SE215.
Because I'm not worried that I might be pregnant, it's my gf I'm worried about.
Because I modified them so they don't work with the supplied cables any more.
Because I'm only getting about 150-200 in Overwatch right now.
Because I'm on minimum wage.
Because I'm really disappointed with my M50X.
Because in CS:GO you NEED coms.
Because I need fiat right now.
Because I need more versatility and comfort than the stock cans.
Because I need the 2.5mm to 3.5mm adapter to use them.
Because I need to stop buying expensive electronics for a while.
Because I ordered the black one.
Because I play games with it.
Because I spent so much on this CPU.....
Because I sure wouldn't.
Because it contains carcinogens and radiation that WILL increase your risk of developing serious illness and other health problems.
Because it'd be batshit fast.
because it is on Facebook it is not regulated by Ofcom.
Because it makes scheduling meetings a pain.
Because I told you she was due 4 days ago?
Because it's 11 draws.
Because it's a basic utility nowadays I guess.
Because it's a really fun game?
Because it's calculated each week rather than annually.
Because it's fucking bullshit if she's invited but mine isn't.
Because it's marked as "purchased" on my wishlist.
Because it's much easier to get double the GPU power than double the CPU power.
Because it's NOT 27 miles.
Because it's not a fashionable impractical leather wallet.
Because it's not fucking funny.
Because it's one of my favourites.
Because it's so fast, I don't have to worry about boot times.
Because it's too difficult.
Because it's too hot.
Because it was a Korean wedding.
Because I use my work SIM.
Because I've never had a credit card.
Because I want it to apply to Bittorrent and other things as well.
Because I want to buy lots of Hi-Fi headphones when I'm a pensioner.
Because I want to use my Boompro mic cable.
Because I want to use them with my V-Moda Boompro.
Because I was poor ass fuck.
Because I will be moving into a small house soon.
Because I will have mortgage soon.
Because I will work later.
Because I won't be using Game again if they can't even get my product to me on time.
Because I work out and shit.
Because Japan is a working culture and the company finds you a gf.
Because League sucks.
Because market incentives are almost always stronger than political principles.
Because more performance is better than less.
Because my Creative E5 has dual headphone output.
Because my dad will think she's fucking weird.
Because my M50X doesn't block out the sound of my mum's annoying little dog as much as I'd like.
because my mechanical keyboard is banned at work.
Because my mum does.
Because my new Beyer Custom One Pros will replace it for home use.
Because my office gets fucking noisy.
because my payslips were just over a month apart some months, and HMRC saw I had 0 income for some 28 day periods.
Because my wife is 6 years older.
Because no blockchain yet.
Because noobs always give her extra damage.
Because northerners are too stupid for them?
Because now I can't hear her even though my IEMs aren't plugged in.
Because now I have twice as many presents to buy :(.
Because of 4chan?
Because of cashback.
Because of Christmas payment delays.
Because of compound interest 'n' shit.
Because of double payment.
Because of input lag.
Because of Mandela?
Because of nuclear bombs.
Because of selective pregnancy terminations.
Because of them.
Because of women?
Because OSX is redundant.
Because people at work can hear my music.
Because people have super fucking big mortgages to buy incredibly overpriced houses?
Because portable headphones are a pain in the ass.
Because Scan sent it as a matter of urgency and used the best DPD service.
Because she doesn't have any free time or money or something.
Because she insists.
Because some asshole next to them at the bus station decided to light up a cigarette.
Because subsidised rent is way cheaper than a mortgage.
Because that's all you need to make it.
Because that's going to leave me broke.
Because that's how much they're worth.
Because that's what my E10K's bass boost does.
Because that worked so well for Hitler.
Because that would be a crazy deal.
Because that would give mad savings.
Because the CPU cooler and GPU are large heavy parts hanging off your motherboard.
Because the enemy team has 6 bad players but you only have 5, so you are at an advantage and your winrate will be >50%.
Because the fuck ice froze on the inside of my car and it's fucking hard to defrost it.
Because the government refused to help me.
Because the menu bindings are the same as the gameplay bindings.
Because the new rates are high as fuck.
Because then I can ask where I can buy legal highs and then find the illegal stuff too without asking for it and breaking channel rules.
Because the north is shit.
Because there's a fuckload more dangerous people in USA.
Because there's not much space left on my desk after 2X24" displays and a 48CM mousepad.
Because they are protected characteristics.
Because they are retarded.
Because they are white devils.
Because they could have sent it to me two weeks ago ffs.
Because they don't sell that cheap.
Because they gave me universal credit whilst I was working for some reason.
Because they got a way higher proportion of votes than seats.
Because they kept giving me universal credit even though I had a salary.
Because they're bastards.
Because they're boring fucks.
Because they refuse to cash them?
Because they're only improving the performance of their CPUs by 5-10% each year ATM.
Because they're probably going to die.
Because they're really nice.
Because they're too high.
Because they sound like shit to me compared to my AKG K702s and Beyer DT770s.
Because they took so much of it and I can't afford to pay rent now.
Because those would be long commutes.
because walking distance is shorter, so I can claim more mileage.
Because xmrig has no profit switching and I think zcoin might be more profitable most of the time.
Because you almost had a "heart attack" and then you acted "confused".
because you can skip all the queues.
Because you have to do everything exactly right otherwise you lose money.
Because you're gay?
Because you're only supposed to pay back a percentage of your annual pay, but it's calculated monthly.
Because you were on a darknet market.
BEDTIME NOW.
Been busy buying a house and giving attention to my gf and things.
Been busy playing Dota, watching Westworld, etc.
Been getting ~£350 GBP/month for a few mins now.
Been on the phone for 20 mins now.
been out of work.
Been playing Street Fighter on it.
been so busy this weekend.
Been so ill and so busy.
Been too busy with buying my house and entertaining my gf and stuff.
Been waiting like a month.
Be fast about it, the flash sale will end soon.
Before I even put my salary into my current account, I put half of it into my pension and mortgage deposit.
Before making a Second Chance Offer, try and work things out with your winning bidder first..
Before price increases.
Before we are able to accept the withdrawal, we need to see further game play to fulfil this requirement or we'd like you to get in touch with us. This is a standard requirement for all our customers and a rule which we have to enforce to comply with the requirements of our gambling license..
Befriending is for filthy casuals.
Being a hobo would not be fun.
Being a white supremecist makes you a racist, dumbass.
Being ill diminishes your ability to earn money though.
Being mad you like fat chicks is understandable.
Being paid out in BTC too.
Being prejudiced is not polite omg.
Being redundant is pretty much getting fired.
Being sick and injured I mean.
Being stranded in dessert without any water would be terrifying.
Being too fat for medication is not good.
Below average = scrub tier.
Benchmarks.
bento box.
Be online this evening pls.
Bespoke M50X.
Best case £190, worst case £0 lmao.
Best chair you're gonna get for under £90.
Best gaming chip you can buy.
Best gaming headphones.
best get rid of them to stop the patriarchy!
Best headphones I've ever had.
Best of both worlds.
Best wishes,.
Best Wishes.
Best you can get for under $699.
Bet £10 and get a £50 bonus and £17.5 cashback.
Bet £10 on any sports market on odds of 1.5 or over and we’ll instantly reward you with a £20 Free Bet!.
Bet £50 on the game, then you get a £50 risk-free bet to place during the game.
Betfair is not 2% any more.
Betfair/Smarkets/Matchbook/Betdaq/dutching.
Bet on Fnatic in CS:GO, they're dominant as fuck.
Bet on football and shit like that?
be transferred as part of the switch, not transferred afterwards)".
better.
Better binned CPUs can OC with less voltage.
Better do it within 5 minutes or the prices will change again.
Better input.
Better software support.
Better sound quality, but no noise cancellation.
Better than Noctua's.
Better than not having a job.
Better than rubbish white girls.
Better than you then.
Better value for money for both of us.
Betting firm smarkets tells me there’s an implied probability of 87% that UK interest rates will rise from 0.25% to 0.50% today..
Betway?
Betway has some good deals.
Between HTC 10 and Nexus 6? Sure I can.
betwin.
Beyerdynamic Custom Studio pls.
Beyerdynamic makes some bloody good headphones.
Beyerdynamic, Philips, and AKG produce better headphones than Sennheiser anyway.
Beyond that I'd probably recommend a GTX 1070 at like £315.
bf? Are you gay m9?
Big Daddy.
Big Daddy KFC meal.
BIG DADDY MEAL OMFG <3.
Big Dota tournament this weekend.
Bigger.
Bigger free hero pool burden of knowledge.
Bigger reward.
Bigger than mine and rory's then.
Biggest and best value!
Biggest single-day jump ever.
Big graphics card, big CPU cooler, and big HDDs.
Big heatsink and big fans = win.
Big one.
Bigoted wtf why?
Big screens are good.
Big screwdrivers are not good when you want to work on small electronics.
Bikes are like 10 times more dangerous to drive than cars.
Bill Clinton had sex with his employees.
billionnaire friend*.
Bills and council tax factored in.
Bills are eroding my savings.
Bills included.
Binary file /var/log/irc/snoonet/#uktrees/2016-10-05.log matches.
Bingo.
BitcoinDark is doing well.
Bitcoin down 10.73%, Ethereum up 7.06%.
bitcoin is becoming useless as a currency.
Bitcoin isn't an investment though.
Bitcoin isn't profitable unless you have an ASIC.
Bitcoin is the worst.
Bitcoin is trash, but crypto in general is great.
Bitcoin is way too volatile for me.
Bitcoin's price is fucking crazy.
Bitcoin's price is largely irrelevant to me.
Bitcoin volatility is fucking crazy today.
Bitconnect 2.0?
Bit of both..
Bits on a screen have value.
Bit worried about the coming July now.
Black.
Black Friday sucks because they only sell shit products.
blackjack?
Black Jack.
Black Jack promotions.
Black people have no taste.
Black people I guess.
Black people were only slaves for 100 years or so.
Black velour, I definitely recommend them.
Black with ODD Slot, Black NO ODD Slot, and Silver NO ODD Slot pre-orders will ship on 2016-JUL-27 PST..
Blizzard?
Blizzard are going to need to disable skins in tournamnets at this rate.
Blizzard don't care about input latency.
Blizzard's FPS.
Blizzard's new FPS game.
Blockchain is good.
blog.dota2.com/2017/07/the-2017-2018-competitive-season/.
Blues look best for typing.
Blue Yeti blocks the view of my monitors.
Blue Yeti is better for professional recording than gaming.
BLUNT.
BLUNT LMFAO.
BNP.
BoE sets interest rates, not inflation lmao.
boku no pico.
boohoo.
bookings.com is a big one for hotels.
books are for nerds.
Boris Johnson accuses Corbyn of siding with Britain's enemies.
Born in 1958.
Borrow the next phone you find and call 999?
Bose and Beats may be bigger brands, but they don't actually make any decent products.
Bose lmao.
both.
Both candidates are shit.
Both games have embraced crowdfunding now AFAIK.
Both look good.
Both my grandparents on my mother's side are alive, so I am worried what will happen to one of them when the other dies.
Both these TVs are shit wtf.
Bots just piss me off.
bottle of fizz is worthless anyway. You're just paying for carbonized water, sugar and acid to ruin your health.
Bottom right.
Bought any new headphones recently?
Boylesports, Betway, Netbet, 12Bet and 21Bet.
Brazil, China, etc.
brb.
brb browser is fucking up.
brb checking.
brb going to do a poo and Reddit on my phone and get paid for it.
brb gonna apply for a job at McDonalds.
brb gym.
brb working now.
breeders?
Brendan Fraser was funny.
Brexit voters are so stupid.
Brighton.
Brighton is a common topic too.
Brighton is full of gays.
Brighton is full of homeless people.
Brighton is full of weird fucks.
Brighton too.
Bring down your credit utilisation to under 40%.
Bring Korean girls.
Bring the beer, I'll bring myself.
Bring your own Asian too.
Broadband is only up to 17mbps though.
Broke something important.
Brownies are delicious.
browser.casting.enabled = true.
Bruce Betting, a bookie which I've been inactive in for fucking ages, just offered me a £50 risk free bet "welcome back offer".
Brushed aluminium doesn't have a difference.
BS.
BTC down, everything else up.
BTC has no advantages over other cryptos other than being first.
BTC is technically inferior to RVN.
BTC just dropped under 10k.
BTC just dropped under 10k again.
BTC lost half its value in a week wtf.
BTC price can go down as well as up.
btc too.
BTC up 18% in 24 hours.
btw.
btw are you interested in a fantastic investment opportunity on one of the UK's market-leading P2P investment platforms?
btw are you using G403 now?
btw did I show you a photo from my wedding?
btw did you know that Dota has auto-run tournaments in the client where you can win money?
btw disable DaggerHashimoto if you want to mine whilst using your PC.
btw do you do any stoozing or churning?
btw do you have a shit stack yet or are you still using your Fiio?
btw do you have Quantum yet?
btw do you know how to I can convert to fiat without HMRC sniffing through it?
btw do you use Deezloader?
btw do you want to buy my RVN?
btw I can help you interact with the stones.
btw if any of these sites have mobile only promotions, just change your user agent in Firefox.
btw I forgot your channel name and I am using kiwi IRC on an unstable connection.
btw I found a cool little store in Brighton where I could try on some headphones.
btw if you bought a GTX 1080TI for mining profit you're doing it wrong.
btw I got my £100 from Topcashback.
btw I have a 48CMX40CM mousepad.
btw I have a referral code for Ratesetter if you want a nice fat £ bonus.
btw I have decided to skip 1080TI and wait for Volta instead.
btw I have some tips to help you get more hashrate. I've got 700KH/s from my 1080 TI.
btw I recommend buying the Valve Complete Pack.
btw I've decided on what my next headphones will be.
btw I won pub gee yesterday.
btw my Fiio E10K isn't for sale any more sry.
btw Nicehack paid another 10% today.
btw pug gee tonight?
btw Skybet have a new customer offer.
btw TCR is discontinued.
btw that reminds me, my Beyerdynamic Custom One Pros are on their way!!!!!
btw there's a meal at KFC called Big Daddy which is 1430 calories + a drink.
btw TSB changes today from 5% on £2,000 to 3% on £1,500.
btw what do you prefer out of Thunderbird and Evolution?
btw what do you think of the Ncase M1?
btw what do you think of the Ncase M1? I just ordered mine!!!!
btw what's the humidity and ambient temp of your flat?
btw what's your mmr in OW?
btw you can claim it back if your pay spikes in a single month.
btw you can zoom in further with red dot/holo sight if you press shift again.
btw you got Quantum and the new Tree Style Tabs yet?
btw your welcome to come visit me if you wanna do some drugs in my flat.
btw you should get some of this kurz grizzly paste, it's better than that Artic Silver 5 shit.
btw you should install dust filters. Your mining rig is now also a space heater and air purifier, your welcum!
btw you should limit your fps to 142.
btw you should try an addon called "Honey".
Budgeting is easy, I just pay my mum rent, save the rest, then buy what I need/want.
Budget stuff.
Buggy shit game.
Building a mining rig, for example.
Building it yourself is always better!!!!!!!!!!
Build your system now!
Built-in DACs are the future.
Bulgogi.
bullshit.
Bulwark:.
Bulwark HansProleman.
Bulwark HansProleman rory Madbrad200.
Bulwark no omg.
Bulwark reported for transphobia.
Bungalows are expensive.
burden of knowledge increased toxicity by 9001%!
Bus drivers never die.
Business expense?
Busses have fixed schedules and they also don't stick to them!!!!
Bus timetables.
Busy with gf/gaming/applying for jobs.
But.
But 00:00 Tuesday is apparently 00:00 Wednesday.
But 0% interest on balances.
But 10% of that is paid by the employer, so it's just a 7% reduction of my salary.
But £1,500 will go off-grid for a few days each month because of it.
But £1 saved today will add a lot more to my retirement fund than £1 saved in 20 years from now.
But 214.8985*0.031 = 6.66 not 6.61.
But £300 is a lot of money.
But 30 litres at £1.20 is £36.
But 37mbits is enough.
But 4k to 1080p fits perfectly.
But 5.3GHz is very very hard.
But £5 for 30 seconds of work is probably worth it.
But a 1080TI is only like £150-£200 extra and 30% more performance.
But a 500ml energy drink is at optimum temperatue for an hour with a normal ambient.
But a bit short.
But a coma does.
But all-night gaming sessions will be very cheap.
But almost all my games are now ported, I'm just waiting for Overwatch really.
But amps and dacs and headphones are good, right?
But a recruitment agency asked me to once so I didn't have to go all the way to their office.
But are there actually any DAC reviews yet?
But are they better for gaming than K702s or X2s?
But a single overclocked GTX 1080TI is amazing for gaming.
But as long as it's just one person and they aren't a maniac or anything I think it'll be okay.
But a space heater doesn't give you currency.
But ATM it's my CPU that's the bottleneck.
But ATM the CPU performance is the big problem for me.
But a very effective one.
But being strong doesn't really make it any easier to move a sofa.
But Blizzard need to port Battle.net and all thatshit first.....
But both alcoholism and obesity are pretty damn unhealthy.
But can I run a VM in a VM in a VM in a VM in a VM?
But CDs are an obsolete medium?
But Chrome came preinstalled on my work PC.
But coffee pods are easier?
But considering how incredibly successful it's been, it probably will be.
But Credit Club does affordability scores and % chance of accepting different products and stuff.
But definitely me.
But does Chromecast let me install a VPN on it?
But does it work on Linux?
But doesn't electricity all run on the same lines?
But Dota 2 doesn't put content behind a paywall.
But do you know how to pet a dog?
But even a GTX 1080 can't run 4k well.
But even if you rent, you have to pay to get your washing machine fixed anyway.
But even the bass is beaten by my Beyers.
But every altcoin is imploding.
But extremely powerful.
But fingerprint is wayyyyyyyyyyyy easier to unlock than pattern.
But Firefox struggles really hard when I have 300+ tabs open.
But first impressions are very positive.
But first I need to fix my ground loop noise issue.
But for new builds there's not much reason not to go with 16GB, since it's so cheap.
But for squats it's not very good.
But fuck having to remember a different password every 90 days.
But fuck knows how long that'll take.
But Gaben had the final say.
But "gaming headsets" are mostly just marketing and poor engineering.
But generally OEM braided cables are worse.
But God doesn't exist?
But Google and the NSA are reading your emails!!!!!!!!!!!!!!1.
But got to maximise utility, manage risk, maximise profit, etc!
But heart disease and diabetes isn't?
But he doesn't support PR because then he might not get to be PM.
But he never does.
But he still has a shit AMPDAC and a shit PC.
But how are you?
But how are you making more than me?
But how big is it?
But how do you get to the 4th depth without going through the third?
But how do you know if it's because of the degree? It's possible to skip university and earn more than if you go to uni.
But how long is a "good while"?
But how many consecutive days off?
But how much power do you actually need/want?
But how much £ would I get?
But how will they know what you look like?
But how will we have slumber parties at my house if none of you know my address?!?!??
But HTC might fix that.
But I accidentally bought a 2.5mm female to 3.5mm male adapter instead of a 3.5mm female to 2.5mm male adapter.
But I also want to gain weight.
But I am at work today :(.
But I am lazy.
But I am leaving the country soon and want to sell it quickyl.
But I am not a professional :(.
but I am on probation!!!!!!!!1.
But I am with Vodafone.
But I bet my gf looks younger than his.
But I bet she looks younger than your gf.
But I bought an XLR to 3.5mm adapter!
But I bought from Overclockers :(.
But I came home early.
But I can also use it for phone calls and file transfer?
But I can close the curtains.
But I can get decent high-end speakers? Not £1000 ones.
But I can link some purchase recommendation guides if you want?
But I can survive without a job.
But I can't.
But I can't afford to replace them yet :(.
But I can't buy them because I can't justify the investment after considering the massive depreciation those assets have.
But I can't find it on the supplier's website ffs.
But I can't pay for shit I need with fiat.
But I can't predict future purchases!!!!
But I can't reach high memory speeds atm.
But I can't sell all my shit in one go without it.....
But I can't switch to HSBC because my salary isn't high enough :(.
But I can use A*a12345.
But I CBA.
But I CBA any more.
But I CBA with wagering requirements it's such BS.
But I could have waited a couple more days.
But I could probably get refunds for stuff I'm happy with too.
But I'd argue it's not better than a £200 one.
But I'd be interested to try Coca Cola Raspberry.
But I did....
But I didn't get paid for my final week until January.
But IDK if I can afford them before September :(.
But IDK if I'd use it.
But IDK if she'll let me.
But IDK what games you want to run on it, so your experience might be different.
But IDK whether that would be good for the tubing.
But IDK yet, I might be really pleased with it.
But I do more fun stuff at night.
But I don't, because I have self control.
But I don't do drugs.
But I don't do drugs?
But I don't do drugs, so why do I have bitcoin?
But I don't have a powerful GPU atm anyway.
But I don't have a remote server?
But I don't have that problem.
But I don't have the space.
But I don't have too many pending bets atm.
But I don't live in NA.
But I don't mind a little bit of mechanical hum.
But I don't really have the GPU cooling for it.
But I don't think he wants it.
But I don't think IEMs are ever gonna sound as good as DT770s.
But I don't think so because a lot of charity jobs are voluntary.
But I don't think there's any point paying more than the X7 or O2+DAC.
BUT I  DON'T WANT TO.
But I don't want to be blacklisted.
But I don't want to book directly.
But I don't want to spend more than £150 on a pair of headphones because I don't think the marginal improvement to sound quality is worth the money.
But I doubt it'll get to me in time for exchange of contracts.
But I'd prefer 480.
But I'd prefer it if you signed up to Ratesetter with my promo code.
But I'd prefer the client to run on my PC itself since RDP is shit.
But I'd prefer the first four.
But if a house price rises, it would make the insane mortgage interest rates not such an incredible loss.
But if everyone is >1:1, then surely it would be hard to find people to upload to?
But if I change to 4k then my GPU is the bottleneck.
But if it's high stakes and you win then aren't you even more fucked?
But if it's not broken right now, then it should be okay?
But if it was used more, transactions would slow down?
But if I want quality, I'll go find a decent torrent.
But if I was rich like you I'd go there all the time.
But if I withdraw from my FD monthly saver, then they close my account....
But if my Lastpass gets hacked I will be so fucked.
But if not, I think I’ll fall for you.
But I forgot to bring condoms and a toothbrush omg.
But if they lock gameplay stuff behind a paywall, it makes the game less fun.
BUT IF WE LEAVE EUROPE THAN THE ENGLISH PEOPLE CAN MAKE THEIR OWN LAWS!!!!!!!!!!1.
But if you get a really good cable with no friction and no weight, then it's ideal.
But if you go ultrawide without curved then viewing angles could become a problem?
But if you have a quiet room to listen in, the Fidelio X2s blow the DT770s out of the water.
But if you lift with your legs then it is much better for you.
But if you want a higher quality of life then you need higher-tier needs.
But I gotta crank out as much power as possible in gaming.
But I guess I'll just be a homeowner :(.
But I guess it is too expensive and requires too much maintenance and possibly too dangerous.
But I have a fucking huge CPU cooler to take off first.
But I have a ground loop problem?
But I have an Ncase M1.....
But I have no feedback.
But I have so much money IDK what to do with it.
But I have to carry it around with me all the time and keep it charged.
But I have to index from 5 sheets, and it's hard.....
But I have to take them by thew end of May or I will lose them!!!!!!
But I have to wait about 2 months for it....
But I heard the screen is always-on now which will drain the battery faster.
But I keep myself pure by never mating with my own race.
But I know I do like bass sometimes.....
But I know it's possible to remove the limit with firmware flashing. I managed to remove the minimum fan speed limit, but I still have the power limit and I'm too scared to mess with voltages in firmware.
But I know that I can book them for people.
But I like $$$.
But I like cheap imports.....
But I like to go on Reddit on the toilet.
But I'll be happy with wired if the cable stops dragging I think.
But I'll bribe her.
But I'll just get Fidelio X2 if I want godlike sound quality anyway.
But I'll need a mortgage.
But I'll probably get told to stop using them because using my own equipment is against IT policy.
But I'll probably spent it all pretty soon anyway.
But I'll stick with my K702s when I'm tryharding because they're so detailed.
But I lose 100k in interest!!!!
But I mean my parcels!!!!
But I'm free now.
But I'm gonna keep using them for that sweet £5 a month contactless cashback.
But I'm gubbed with Paddy Power now :(.
But I'm gubbed with Skybet.
But I'm happy not to.
But I might need to withdrew a few thousand.
But I might wait until I get a new CPU first.
But I'm investing for 3 months for £120.
But I miss my mechanical keyboard....
But I'm lazy?
But I'm looking at the LG G6 now. I just want a tough durable and waterproof phone with a good DAC and battery life.
But I'm making too high returns.
But I'm mining so fast now that I can probably sell you 100 garlic every day anyway.
But I'm more concerned with my CPU overclock atm because I play games at ridiculous framerates.
But I'm not going to send it to you.
But I'm not sure if I believe her.
But I'm paid by far the least.
But I'm pretty sure he's wrong.
But I'm running low on cash and might need to withdraw some from bookies.
But I'm thinking of mining it this winter.
But I'm trying to cut down on it.
But in a heatwave with CPU GPU and PSU stressed, the fan noise goes crazy.
But I need a fucking credit report and it's so hard omg.
But I need all my headphones to have detachable 3.5mm cables for it to work.
But I need coin purses for all my coins omfg!!!!!
But I need to build up my savings wallet balance first to minimise fees when I withdraw it.
But I need to exchange to fiat.
But I need to improve my portable setup.
But I need to move it to the front of the house.
But I need to PM you.
But I need to save for my trip to Seoul.
But I need to save up as hard as I can right now.
But I need to save up for a GTX 1080TI.
But I need to switch over the direct debits and standing orders.
But in Overwatch.
But in the summer it's definitely inefficient.
But I only care about profitability today.
But I only have £4,158.27 cash left so I am worried.
But I only have a GTX 970.
But I passed my financial assessment and they passed it onto the housing association to make their decision whether to let me buy the flat!!!!!
But I prefer the crosstrainer overall.
But I quit drinking Dr Pepper because it was giving me obesity and diabetes.
But I really enjoy my hearing so I hope it's not too bad.
But I reduce variance as much as I can.
but i rly want it.
But is it m-itx?
But isn't Kabylake 0.3GHz higher clock speed and 12% faster?
But isn't the PLP supposed to represent the labour party?
But I still can't afford a GTX 1080TI :(.
But I stream movies on Stremio.....
But it could be 50/50.
But it didn't feel like a huge difference.
But it does.
But it doesn't work!!!!!!!
But it fucked up my day because I was supposed to have a meeting with his line manager. I travelled to the other office to meet her, and she travelled to my office because of his death..
But I think I can only do it to the program and not to the file itself.
But I think I have more assets than you.
But I think I'll sell my M50X.
But I think I might need to flash the firmware. The current firmware sets a minimum fan RPM of 960.
But I think I want the full price on ebay because of the sellers fee.
But I think maybe that Time 4 Whey stuff will be nicer.
But I think my SE215s sound like trash compared to my DT770s.
But I think that's all because of the electricity.
But I think the X7 might have better audio quality.
But I think they all sound like trash.
But I think they really should fix it for me for free.
But I think you can lock in a big profit.
But I think you'll agree that none of these companies are forces for good.
But I thought that Facebook collects all WhatsApp metadata?
But I thought your salary was double mine, so how are you in so much debt?
But it hurts poor people more.
But it just seems so bad to store passwords in plaintext for some reason.....
But it'll probably suffer the same fate as all the recent Arena FPS games.
But it looks like it might now....
But it means I might be able to get a 15% deposit, which would give me a very low rate.
But it might be a small gap.
But I told them in the interview that I hate being annoyed by people giving me small talk all the time and that I want to work with less people.
But it pays no interest or anything?
But it's 10 times more expensive!!!!!!!!!
But it's 4k.
But it's a fucking good PC.
But it's a nice little extra.
But it's an upwards trend because I have house edge.
But it's a very minor problem that I'll just have to put up with.
But it's a very nice AMPDAC.
But it's been dropping for a while....
But it's definitely a possibility that motorbikes will be banned one day.
But it seems a lot of numbers cost extra wtf.
But it seems pretty good now.
But it seems stupid that I have to arrive 10 minutes early just because the laptop they gave me is shit.
But it's evolving into its own game.
But it's free.
But it's fucking stupid how I've had this problem for so long.
But it's in another room.
But it's legal....
But it's not bad.
But it's not Dominoes Tuesday.
But it's not reporting the hashrate.
But it's not taxed.
But it's only 3% interest.
But it's open beta now, so we can play together ^^.
But it sounds like your card is faulty if it's doing this at stock settings, so I don't think it's fixable.
But it's picking up cells with words in them.
But it's probably just that I'm more honest.
But it's quite funny?
But it's raining outside.
But it's the only way I can really boost my credit score properly I think......
But it's the up-front fee which failed payment.
But it still finds instability very fast.
But it supports 240mm radiators.
But it's weird being told to "sort it a different way" and not being told how to sort it......
But it's weird how low your thermals are.
But it's worth it for the cashback.
But it was decided that the story was too dark, so instead predators just evolved out of predatoring.
But it was so weird because I've never seen a jew in my life, then suddenly half the people on the roller coasters were jews.
But it was worth ~£80 I saved on it.
But it will be £1,000 a year next financial year.
But it will be enforced soon?
But it won't be bitcoin.
But it wouldn't be worth it anyway because the cashback I get will more than make up for a 30% drop.
But I've been asked to create a flow chart for the process.
But I've ignored a lot of time-consuming and low profit offers.
But I wanna get as much cooling as possible really because I badly need more CPU performance.
But I wanna use an adapter anyway so it'll work with my V-Moda Boompro.
But I want 300.
But I want 5%+.
But I want a new graphics card....
But I want an S8.
But I want a Titan X!
But I want one.....
But I want people to like me because I have such low self esteem.
But I want that £150.....
But I want that Officer D.va skin.
But I want to add 3 more columns.
But I want to improve my credit score.....
But I want to win lots of shit.
But I was told my job is secure, and I might be moving to a new job soon anyway.
But I won't realise any benefit until I sell?
But I would prefer now to, because then I can't redeposit it.
But I would prefer to use what I paid for.
But I would recommend the wireless G403 unless you want to mod the wired's cable.
But looking at the BTC exchange rate, it's pretty bad compared to gdax.
But lower is always better.
But make sure you lift lots so you don't lose too much muscle mass.
But matx can be cheaper.
But maybe I'd do the same if I was as rich as him.
But maybe just buy a couple of nice bottles?
But maybe not because my gf is watching TV all day and I am mining all night.
But maybe not if you change the phone a lot.
But maybe they gave me that free bet in error IDK.
But maybe with driverless cars, the share of accidents that are motorbikes might fall.
But meat is fine.
But men and women do different jobs?
But menus are always supposed to be navigated with a mouse.
But mine has big metal bezels.
But misogonists like it too.
But most guides are recommending X264 now because it doesn't make your CPU too hot.
But most importantly, it downclocks to 135hz now instead of 850hz.
But most people won't because they'll think I'll just spend it on drugs or alcohol.
But multiple GPUs are expensive.
But my brother is too, and he's much more well-off than me.
But my brother told me I need 100% of a property so I can benefit from property value inflation.
But my DT770s don't have the removable cable that I need.
But my electricity is the cheapest on the mrket.
But my fucking modmic keeps falling off.
But my gf might have to leave the country by then!!!!!!
But my interest in crypto is banned.
But my IT department is anti-fun :(.
But my mum always tells me I won't pass my probation unless I pick up my boot straps.
But my mum was giving it to the police because of his mental state.
But my PC produces so much heat that I get all hot and sweaty.
But my PC takes about 10 mins to boot up.
But my pension plan is definitely worth investing into.
But my SE215s are a lot more portable.
But my stepfather was too embarrassed to ask for a free VIP ticket for me this year.
But Ncase takes like 2 months to arrive......
But nobody with that name works here?
But no company would ever consider that enough for mileage.
But not a free bar.
But not a lot of headphone amp....
But not a quiche, that's too boring.
But not as good as a new customer with an EE friends and family discount!!!!!!!
But not fiat?
But not Halifax.
But no, they just call me a dirty thieving pirate who doesn't want to pay for Bradd Pitt's limosine.
But no, they somehow fuck it up and I am seriously inconvenienced.
But not leaving a trail for HMRC to sniff is attractive.
But not the one PoGo deserves.
But not the unique players.
But now I have.
But now I have one pair for esports and one for fun.
But now I need to go visit my gf ffs.
But now I want =INDEX(Response!B:B,,1) too.
But now OW is out and I struggle to get more than 200FPS :(.
But obviously not.
But ofc you have to buy a new motherboard.
But Olympics are a close second.
But on a better airline.
But once I have my own flat, I won't be going to the cinema any more.
But one day I will own an i7 CPU.
But only 17k :(.
But only £21 Betfair Casino which should be £73.50.....
But only when they're getting sweaty, not after they've been all sweaty.
But on myprotein you can get 2.5kg for £21.64.
But other diseases have risen. Some get eliminated and some surge, it's a natural cycle..
But other services have the dealbreaker of not lots of good playlists.
But people have said it's too laggy.
But please research masternodes.
But politicians want to stay in power.
But probably I want to auto convert when I am mining something which has a profitability spike.
But probably with less conflicts and bugs.
But RAM is so cheap now, that I thought I might as well just spend a little more and get 16GB.
But really far along.
But repaid early.
But resolution is a good thing.
But right now, I don't think it's for me.
But rubbish for the office or when dogs are barking and stuff ofc.
But /r/vegan is 100% circlejerk.
But RVN on my rigs.
But selling Hong Kong products for super cheap.
But she'd also demand a lot of my attention when I'm not at work.
But she doesn't speak much English good.
But she has a line manager, right?
But she has more time than me.
But she is Korean....
But she's really fit.
But she wants £20 lmao.
But since you always have it with you, why not?
But smaller than mine.
But Snapdragon is only USA and China, and EU has Exygon.
But some cost more than others to run.
But sometimes bookies don't let me login if I'm using PIA.
But sometimes exchanges with low volume skew it.
But sounds like effort.
But still, £142 is pretty good.
But still, either interpretation doesn't really make sense.
But still, it seemed so weird.
But still peanuts compared to you.
But swallowing is hard.
But that money is earning me too much I don't want to give it up.
But that often results in overeating or undereating.
But that's about it.
But that's good.
But that's how it works IIRC.
But that's more of a long-term plan atm.
But that's more work for me.
But that's nothing to do with Camden?
But that's not too big of a deal in the grand scheme of things lmao.
But that's the only reasons I can think of.
But that's what they offered me.
But that will drop below 9% in a week.
But the 200k property might be worth 425k in 30 years?
But the case is worth like £30-£40.
But the Conservatives and Labour parties do?
But the cost might put me off anyway.
But the cost puts me off, as well as running an open rig.
But the Daily Mail writes derogatory articles about a lot of my hobbies.
But the deficit is a good thing.....
But the end result is a really premium case with an unmatched performance:size ratio and compatibility.
But the fukcing machine they gave me crashes like 10 times a day and takes 15 minutes to boot back up.
But the good kind of weight.
But the government would fine them if they screw with their binaries.
But the HTC 10 has a much nicer metal design and close-to-stock Android and amazing DAC.....
But their privacy policy is a bit better than Google's.
But the LISA is savings....
But the long-term trend is the same.
But the M50X probably beat them in every way, and I don't even think the M50X are good.
But the milk is really nice there?
But the mouthbreathers watch it too!!!!!
But the name is the same.
But the new Sennheiser AMPDAC looks good too.
But then he contradicted himself with "Anything you get from any member of the  Procurement team should be dealt with before all other emails".
But then I am breaking etiquette!!!!!!
But then I can't afford cool shit like Fidelio X2s and Korean grils!
But then I can't play Overwatch.
But then I'd need a new motherboard and RAM.
But then I got it wet and the mic and speaker don't work well now.....
But then I still have 3 other days.
But then it's no more portable than a PC.
But then she had her period.
But then someone said that Beats have even more!
But then when you sell, you get a lot of that interest back?
But the office/lounge/kitchen is all one room.
But the other two aren't.
But there are billions of smartphones in the world so it could happen.....
But there aren't any Asian girls in it, so it's not an urgent priority.
But there are quite a few walls between my PC and the router.
But there is so much free quality software on PC.
But there's fees and interest?
But there's like 20 different columns.....
But there's not much I actually want.
But the resolution is low in current models.
But there's so many others.
But there's still issues, as I found yesterday.
But the retard users struggle to type them in....
But the Scream One sounds promising.
But these are the new version.
But the stupid web security stuff makes it all unstable and unresponsive though.
But they actually have leaves on them.
But they aren't going to accept it, because there are too many cash buyers and first time buyers.
But they can also spin up to 2400RPM if required.
But they have weird-shaped earpads which are hard to replace.
But they just reduced it to 2.39% and I don't think I can reapply now.
But they'll probably just ask me for money.
But they'll probably just take my job.
But they might make me slower in-game?
But they're almost like an open pair, but without the soundstage.
But they're best for isolation and bass response.
But they're cheap.....
But they're nicer.
But they're thinking of extending it up to 10% and 15%.
But they're very nice headphones, like my AKG K702 but with an aux cable instead of this SLXR crap.
But they sent me 2 wtf.
But they sound 74X worse.
But they still have the old offer page up.
But they still won?
But they suck once you find a job.
But they suck with Boompro and Modmic.
But they've started putting stupid gimmicks in their latest mice.
But this is a weird job.
But those are 16 ohms?
But those subs are built specifically to act as a nuclear deterrant.
Buttons just add weight.
But transaction fees to our wallets?
But transfers are super slow, so there's a risk that the price will go down before the transfer is complete.
But Tree Style tabs......
But use a 0% purchase card whenever I can.
But what about gym gains and mmr gains?
But what about in the future?
But what about people who never had vision?
But what does it actually do?
But what if my gaming PC is already fully upgraded, what will I spend my money on?
But what if you farted?
But when I am out somewhere.
But where the fuck is my XLR adapter?
But why?
But why is it the Massdrop one then?
But why should we visit and not tell anyone?
But will she roll back the whole gamers online gaming law?
But with my DT770s, I can listen at max volume no problem.
But with my M50s I can wear them without them plugged into the headphones at all!
But woman hates woman too.
But wtf how can DT770s fit through a letterbox.
but X11.
But yeah, Bitcoin isn't a problem because it's all public.
But yeah import taxes suck. I bought my Ncase M1 from USA and I'm thinking about buying a binned CPU from USA too.
But yeah my gf is very pretty definitely.
But yeah, not really practical.
But yeah, the price is putting me off too.
But yeah, there's some BS there and a lot of it contradicts other theory.
But "yes" is the opposite of "no".
But you alerted EE security.
But you can also lose money.
But you can get stuff for way cheaper.
But you can remember your PSU.
But you can't claim any more.
But you can't use it with V-Moda Boompro.
But you can workaround that with Tesco savings accounts.
But you could do with some RVN.
But you don't encrypt the root directory?
But you don't mind a little additional setup, right?
But you don't use your PC 24/7.
But you earn more than me.
But you get a sucky and expensive experience.
But you have a million browser addons.
but you haven't paid out your external yet???
But you just said it wouldn't?!?!?!?
But you never get any.
But your best weapon is the AK.
But you're missing out on the story.
But you're not on Discord.
But your GPU is probably really weak.
But your holiday is so long.
But your problem is that you don't recognise your inability to play at a higher level than your team mates.
But you said 9-5.
But you spent £30 on a kebab instead of £10-£15.
But you work at EE?
But you work for BT in London?
But you work in the UK.
Buy a 2+ bedroom house, build a few mining rigs in the spare room.
Buy a car maybe?
Buy another house and backup there.
Buy a windowed side panel then.
Buy from your Dave.
Buying 12 GPUs, holiday to Korea, holiday to Ibiza.
Buying a flat.
Buying a flat atm too.
Buying BCH for cheap on Trade Satoshi and selling on gdax.
buying phones on contract is stupid.
Buying second hand is sooooooooo much cheaper than building a luxury bespoke vehicle.
Buy it from me.
Buy it on 0% purchase credit card.
Buy me a 6700K please.
Buy me PUBG please.
Buy me PUBG pls.
buy my garlic?
Buy my garlic.
BUY MY GRLC?
Buy my RVN and I'll listen to it.
Buy online with fiat?
Buy some from your friend.
Buy some new ones every few months, give me your old ones.
Buy some of that.
Buy some proper headphones.
Buy the wired one, or buy the wired one and mod it.
Buy using Panama company.
By being celibate?
By "best" do you mean most effective, or least side effects?
bye.
Bye.
BYE.
BYE RORY.
By four hundred and fucking fifty fucking pounds.
By "investing" do you mean trading?
By looking at my keyboard and seeing hte keys rearranged.
By opting out of content control, am I now on a list?
By the cleaners.
by this loan, plus interest and.
C9 DDR3 2X8.
Cable is too stiff.
Cables are fucking annoying. I wish we had unlimited mobile power and bandwidth with zero latency.
Caffeine is a legal drug.
Caffeine is the most popular psychoactive drug in the world.
Calcium and iron are good!!!!
Calibrated at 3.4k mmr.
Call 999?
Called Tab Tree.
Call sell them both for £110+P&P if you want.
Call your opponents "weak and unstable" and then commit human rights abuses.
calm the fuck down.
Came by way of IT.
cam versions suck.
Can advise you on parts too if you want.
Can a single DP cable carry 4 displays?
Can be.
Can be used as a gaming headset with the Vmoda Boompro.
Can bitcoin be used for tax evasion?
Cancel your order and buy using my code pls.
Cancer immunity would be nice too.
Cancer rates may change 30 years from now.
Can children have religious affiliation and sexual orientation?
Can Clarithromycin Tablets Film-Coated be dissolved in Dr Pepper?
Can coffee cause bowel pain? I've had a lot more pain there since I've started drinking coffee.
Can coffee cause digestive problems?
Can doctors get arrested for overdosing people?
Can give you lots of component recommendations.
Can go to police, but they will not have time to find me , im European, so you will be a star among friends.".
Can happen in any game with a report feature.
Can he stretch to £190?>.
Can I add the values on the chart for the big ones, and just truncate the vertical axis to visualise the small values better?
Can I apply?
Can I borrow £1k for a few months?
Can I borrow £2,000 for 1 year at 2% interest?
Can I buy a gaming laptop, ask work if I can use it as my work laptop, then install a Ethereum miner for the GPU and mine using my work's electricity?
Can I buy a GTX 1080TI and mine at home?
Can I buy a prostitute with a credit card?
Can I buy illegal pornography?
Can I buy your GTX 1080 TI please?
Can I buy your GTX 970?
Can I change the postage to free?
Can I come?
Can I come too?
Can I connect YNAB to my bank accounts?
Can I cum?
Can I eat a Pot Noodle in the office?
Can I embed an email into MS word?
Can I get a cheap 1080TI on Cyber Monday?
Can I get a mortgage if I've recently started a new job?
Can I get cashback + friends and family discount?
Can I get cashback on Premier Inn bookings?
Can I get cheap broadband then?
Can I get EE friends and family discount as well as quidco cashback?
Can I get FLAC kpop?
Can I get Hi Fi monitor speakers which will work with my AMPDAC's line out?
Can I get one of those fancy external GPUs, connect it to my work laptop, and mine Ethereum?
Can I get someone's email address if I know their name and their employer?
Can I give my gf a vasectomy?
Can i have both in one meal?
Can I have food too?
Can I have it?
Can I have your old pads pls?
Can I install f.lux on a company laptop?
Can I just take it to the post office and get it done there?
Can I listen to music whilst stress testing my overclock?
Can I make and receive phone calls and receive texts on the 25GB data only SIM?
Can I meet you when I travel to Leeds?
Can I OC more if I buy a PSU without ripples?
Can I overclock a desk fan?
Can I package my headphones with newspaper?
Can I pay my bills or anything with BTC?
Can I pay my utility bills by credit card?
Can I play Crysis inside a virtual machine?
Can I play games in a virtual machine without losing FPS?
Can I play games on it?
Can I play video games whilst on IV?
can I PM you?
Can I PM you?
CAN I PM YOU.
Can I PM you? I need your help with something.
Can I pull data from esportsearnings.com and make some calculations using macros?
Can I put 0.1 LTC into your ponzi scheme?
Can I put formula like = DATE OR "XXX" ?
Can I put it in the post box too?
Can I run a virtual machine inside a virtual machine inside a virtual machine?
Can I run a virtual machine inside a virtual machine too?
Can I run NiceHash on a headless masheen?
Can I see your spreadsheet again?
Can I stay in your rich-person air-conditioned flat please?
Can I stay too?
Can I suggest my colleague stays at a different hotel so I can maximise my cashback gains?
Can I switch direct debits and standing orders from one bank account to another without closing the original account?
Can it do sequential downloading so you can listen to the song before the download is finished?
Can it reach 20k today?
Can I try them on pls?
Can I type?
Can I use Bitcoin to hide capital from the government?
Can I use data validation to select from a list but also accept dates?
Can I use EE friends and family discount and Topcashback at the same time?
Can I use my room as a background?
Can I use newspaper to pack my items for my ebay buyers?
Can I use newspaper to pack my items for my ebay sellers?
Can I use the points on coffee instead?
Can I watch you play tonight?
Can I what?
Can I withdraw it?
Can I withdraw what I have in Trade Satoshi straight to your wallet for 17p per GRLC?
Can mine when PC is idle.
cannabis should be legalised and taxed, just like sugar.
Can people on cancer still have sex?
Cans.
Can someone help me connect to my work email on my home PC please?
Can someone PLEASE buy me a GTX 1080TI?
Can someone please explain to me what space is?
Can someone please recommend me a pair of headphones with velour earpads, non-proprietary removable cable, low impedance, foldability, and good isolation?
Can't afford taxi.
Can't afford to pay rent.
Can't aim for shit.
Can't, already used the beta codes.
Can't believe I bought from an official Blizzard partner.
Can't believe I got my Custom One Pro for only £74.63 too.
Can't believe I got them in mint condition for £74.63 from Amazon.
Can't believe that Amazon phone call cost me £5.
Can't build my headset until it cums.
Can't buy a house because I'm spending all my money on fucking presents constantly.
Can't close my window because then the heat will be even more unbearable than it already is.
Can't do anything.
Can't even run Firefox with a few dozen tabs.
can't find a NESTIF function.
Can't find any cheaper than that :(.
Can't find anything on the intranet.
Can't find it.
Can't find their fucking 11p tariff.
Can't Germany just learn English?
Can't get a good quality used one.
Can't get it paid from my salary.
Can't get it set up properly on my personal PC and I can't figure out hwy.
Can't go higher than 2X12.5kg unless I get some more dumbells.
Can the NHS afford it?
Can the value of a house rise faster than the interest from a mortgage?
Can they give me bubble wrap by tomorrow/.
Can't hide mining rigs....
Can't I do both?
Can't I just ask you really nicely?
Can't I just give it my spotify username so it can read all my play history from the spotify API and give me stats right away?
Can't I just say my salary is 30k and deposit £1750 in anyway/.
Can't I just use it as it is?
Can't I just VPN in and use citrix natively?
Can't install it :(.
Can't just turn up.
Can't keep up with all this shit.
Can't lay slots :(.
can't leave early today because my manager's manager is still here :(.
Can't people just spoof my number to hack into my whatsapp?
Can't play when the game launches.
Can't remember exactly.
Can't run 200+.
Can't see anything.
Can't see pics of the other side so I'm not sure what type of cooler it has.
Can't send £££ from gdac.
Can't send £££ from gdax.
Can't tell if youi're being sarcastic.
Can't tell if you're being sarcastic.
Can't tell if you're being sarcastic or not.....
Can't tell if you're being serious.
Can't tell if you're being serious.....
Can't tell if you're trolling.....
Can't understand them.
Can turn up the power if I need more heat.
Can't use my mic without it.....
Can't wait for The International so I can actually watch most of the event.
Can't wait to get £2k into debt.
Can't wait to get back from work later.
Can't wait to get dat £££ though.
Can't wait to leave this shit next month.
Can't wait to take it home and listen to my new bespoke Audio Technica M50X.
Can't watch esports at work.
Can't watch that right now.
Can't watch youtube ivdeos.
Can't we sue them if they do it?
Can't you do it for free?
Can't you get an all you can travel tube ticket for like £6?
Can't you just do a 0% balance transfer so you're not paying interest any more?
Can't you just use your laptop to forward itself to your desktop?
Can't you play Dota at the resteraunt?
Can't zoom in.
Can verify it with audits.
can we ban this filthy casual pls.
Can we change the conversation to be less NSFW?
Can we count earnings from investments and savings?
Can we exchange now? I've never had this much GRLC before and it makes me feel uncomfortable.
Can we kick neinneinne1n99 for blasphemy pls?
can you accidentally order some to my flat?
Can you ask for one for me too?
Can you automate my job so I don't have to work any more please?
Can you believe this?
Can you buy GPUs with BTC yet?
Can you buy illegal things with a credit card?
Can you buy legal drugs on the same websites as illegal?
Can you buy me a GTX 1080TI please?
Can you buy some Beyer Custom Studios and let me know your impressions?
Can you cast torrents directly to Chromecast?
Can you charge car batteries using a home socket?
Can you crack Microsoft Office 2010?
Can you detach the screen and use it as a tablet?
Can you do a bank transfer instead? Is easier.
Can you do me a favour?
Can you elaborate? How are you betting you won't fuck up?
Can you even get 144fps in Skyrim?
Can you fight other peoples' pokemon?
Can you fit two people in them?
Can you get a big scotch egg or big sausage roll?
Can you get cashback on Travelodge?
Can you get cheaper watts with different suppliers?
Can you get good interest on euro bank accounts? I might HODL some euros.
Can you get Korean porn on it?
Can you get me a 33% discount on a Samsung Galaxy S8?
Can you get me a cheap S7?
Can you get me a discount on EE broadband?
Can you get me a super cheap S8 too?
Can you get Subway to make you a sandwich with weed?
Can you get wireless adaptors for wired headphones?
Can you give me a guest pass or something?
Can you give me a spec at least? size, amount of drives, performance, price, etc?
Can you give me exact model numbers for each part?
Can you give me some weed too?
Can you give me the tx id so I can look for it on the blockchain?
Can you give me your Skype pls?
Can you give someone marijuanna intoxication against their will?
Can you help me to google it?
Can you help me with something pls?
Can you imagine never having used the internet?
Can you just work from your powerful PC instead of your laptop?
Can you let me know so I know whether to save it for you?
Can you let me know when something does pls?
Can you link me some of the best cashback offers?
Can you link me to your NiceHash stats?
Can you link me to your stats?
Can you mine Ethereum on that?
Can you move your mouse by blowing it?
Can you overdose on it?
Can you pay me in BTC or ETH?
Can you pay me in fiat for my garlic?
Can you please buy me a 1080TI?
Can you press diamonds?
Can you press Sennheiser HD800?
Can you press water?
Can you recommend me a temperature/humidity display?
Can you run it in the background so I can still use my PC like normal and doesn't interfere with my games or anything???
Can you screenshot the "Hub Workers" page for me?
Can you screenshot your Garlium for me?
Can you sell vertcoin for £?
Can you send me a pair to try please?
Can you send me one of the defective S8s you can't sell to customers?
Can you show me your spreadsheet pls?
Can you take your wheelchair friend to Alton Towers?
Can you talk to them even if you're not a quitter?
Can you tell me how many 2.5" and 3.5" drives you plan on installing? I might need to order some more SATA cables for your build.
Can you tell the difference between butter and I Can't Believe It's Not Butter?
Can you tell the difference between FLAC and MP3?
Can you think of any other use-cases I might need?
Can you torrent HD videos on 4G?
Can you use the offer if you're gubbed???
Can you use Windoze as a command-line OS like Linux?
Can you vote for yourself.
Can you withdraw deposit?
Can you write a script to shoot the duck immediately when he spawns?
car allowance?
Cardiff?
cardstone.
Cardstone is so p2w it's a joke.
Careful not to get super fat with that like I did.
Car insurance?
Car insurance is too fucking expensive.
Carnival?
Carrying it around as well as a smartphone is a hassle.
Cars don't connect to each other when driving.
Case and CPU cooler I think? We couldn't find an agreeable price on the PSU.
Cashback how?
Cash ISA.
Cash is making 5% risk-free and I need to hedge the depreciation of my GPUs.
Cash I think.
Cash loses value.
Cash out what/.
Casino is propping up my profits this month.
catch up on your favourite shows whilst you wait.
Catering, drinks, hats, etc.
CBA.
CBA I know I'm right.
CBA though because it will take up a timeslot for lifting.
CBA to answer.
CBA to argue over it.
CBA to buy a decent headset just for Lync which I don't use that much anyway.
CBA to carry about an external AMPDAC.
CBA to dl .qif files for every bank account every month omfg.
CBA to drive to London though.
CBA to ever pay it off.
CBA to go all the way there just for cheapskate Ferrari Rockets.
CBA to go all the way to Leeds either.
CBA to go all the way to Morrisons.
CBA to go see my gf.
CBA to go without a phone for a couple of weeks.
CBA to read all that.
CBA to say online distribution or peer to peer downloading.
CBA to sign up for Facebook to upload shitty videos.
CBA to use my mobile.
CBA to wait to be IDed, so I just shoplifted it.
CBA TO WORK ANY MORE GOING HOME NOW BYE.
CBA with horses.
CBA wit hit.
CBA with self service because they always fuck up and I have to wait for a person to come and un-fuck up the machine.
CBA with smartphone VR.
CBA with them though.
CBA with this stupid profit-switching shit on the CPU.
CBA with water cooled. AIO kits are much easier.
ccminer --algo=scrypt:10 -d 0 -o stratum+tcp://freshgarlicblocks.net:3032 -u Gcj1T1DZsT5LJPk3zDCWiwSBgJkUtzRwx3  -p x -R 15 -p x --lookup-gap=3 -i 20.
Central Asia is India and arab countries.
CGT is about 11k, right?
chalk and cheese wtf are you talking abiut.
Change it to GBP in settings.
Change server then.
Change the cell format to text instead of number.
charges".
Charge up your laptop battery at the office, then mine when you get home.
Charging you £30 to move your money out of their savings account is daylight robbery m9.
Cheaper?
Cheaper E7 electricity too.
Cheaper than a brand new pair of Custom One Pros!
cheaper to run.
Cheapest I can find is Specsavers at £99.
CHEAP rent.
cheap wtf.
Check all temps.
Check Amazon.
Check connections.
Check how much a GTX 1070 costs, then don't go near/above that.
Check out Deezloader btw, it downloads FLACs from Deezer for free.
Check out Iresa. Their customer service is dogshit but their tariffs are really cheap.
Check out LUX and some other coins.
Check the connections.
Check voltages.
Check with PC Part Picker.
Check your email inbox.
Check your inbox.
Check your priviledge.
Cheer up a little more.
CHEER UP BABY.
Cheese kimbap?
Cheese strats have proven to beat it.
Chicago is the Leeds of America.
Chicken.
Chicken is a good source of protein.
chilis are horrible omg.
China has a great wall and almost no mexicans.
China has more attractive grills.
China then.
Chinatown.
Chinese alphabet is fucking horrible though.
Chinese girls are filthy rich.
Chinese girls are really nice.
Chinese, Koreans and Japanese all have their advantages and disadvantages.
Chinese megaconglomerates.
Chinese regulations.
Chinese version of WhatsApp.
chingchong of course. Although I think there's a curry asian at my work who is into me. She looks like Symmetra from Overwatch.
chingu.
Chorizo (Spanish) or chouriço (Portuguese) is a type of pork sausage. Traditionally, it uses natural casings made from intestines, a method used since Roman times..
Chris Brown?
Chris Hemsworth ftw.
Christianity.
Christmas because I'm fucking fed up with it now.
Christmas because it's fucking shit.
Christmas is still almost 6 months away.
Chrome.
Chromecast.
Chromecast has a torrent client then?
Chromecast is good.
Chromecast only £19.
Chrome doesn't support tree style tabs.
Chrome is for stupid people.
CHROME IS NOT GOOD.
Chrome just has the biggest market share.
Chrome, Safari and Mobile Chrome are growing, but Firefox and Internet Explorer are dying.
Chrome's era is coming to an end.
Chromium:.
Chronological? Alphabetical?!?!??!
Chun Tian Wellbeing.
Churning means using all the bank switching bonuses and rewards.
CIEMs?
Cinema is expensive and inconvenient.
Citrix is shit.
Citrix Receiver keeps locking my session omg!!!!!
Claim Update.
Claim your FREE Whirlerz Finger Widget Spinner at The Works!
clamps.
Classic and Classic Plus - £25 (+£10 buffer).
Classic Plus.
Classics like SNSD Gee and T-ara's first album.
Classified sellers have no idea how to price their shit.
Cleaners don't know what elipsises are.
Clickbait.
Click here to assign a widget to this area..
Clock speed is constant 4300Mhz according to Open Hardware Monitor.
Close call.
Closed back, neutral, and removable cable? Go with the Audio Technical M50s like rory and I suggested earlier.
Close to feature-parity with Lastpass.
Closing in on £600 profit this month.
Cloudy drink kills frog.
CNo.
Coaliation of Chaos.
CoD?
CoD4 is dead.
Coffee mostly.
Coffee pods are easier.
Coinbase hack when?
coinfalcon.
Coin Falcon?
Coin Falcon is better than Trade Satoshiu.
Coin Falcon supports euros now.
Colleague puts them IN the cell, I put them attached to the cell.
color 0A.
Come buy my garlic pls.
Come buy my RVN.
Come join me in #physics.
COME ON HERMES GIVE ME MY SHIT OMG.
Come play Dota.
Come play Dota 3.
Come play with me and Zanacross.
Come to Bath.
Come to think of it, I can't think of anyone I'd rather be flatmates with than you.
Come visit me.
Come work with me, I still get free massages.
Comformity is for filthy casuals.
Comfort, mids, highs, soundstage, imaging, detail are all amazing.
Comfort, soundstage, sound signature, detail.
Commend me for teaching.
Communal cleaning, ground rent, window cleaning, etc.
Commuting sucks.
Companies should overclock more.
Company reserves the right to monitor your internet usage, but will always try to.
Compared to cafeine.
Compared to putting money in a savings account with no risk.
Compared to whatever cheap shit you're currently listening to.
Competition is weak ATM.
Competitive gaming?
Competitive mode isn't out.
Compound interest?
Comprehensive policies include £300 Handbag & Contents cover, 24-hr accident helpline, & Courtesy Car when yours is repaired at an approved garage..
Computers and sleep doesn't mix.
Concurrent players. CS:GO has done it before.
Conformity is for Windoze krill.
Congratgs.
congrats.
Congrats.
Congrats!
Congrats!!!!!
Congrats m9.
Congrats on winning your auction!
Congrats, you just saved your job from being stolen!
Congratulations.
Congratulations!
Congratulations m9.
Congratulations - you're now an investor! We have carefully built your personal portfolio by investing your money into a wide range of assets that align to the level of risk you chose..
Considering the age of the medium and progress of technology, surely 2003 is outdated?
Consistency = good.
Console gaming is for peasanta.
Console gaming is for peasants.
Console gaming never took off in China because the government banned the sale of consoles.
Consoles are for plebs.
constant.
Contacting me is basically impossible.
Content creators, not gamers.
Content paywall is bad.
Context?
Context is important!!!!
contracting?!?!??!?
Contrary to the trend over the past few years.
Contrary to what?
Convergence is dead.
cool.
Cool.
Cool!
Cool enjoy your £500 worth of Bitcoin 3 months from now.
Cool, I don't do drugs, but I bought flight tickets to Seoul.
Cool, I'll do a referral now and you'll get it in a day or two.
Cool I'll do that too then.
Cool, I'll get back to you soon probably.
Cool, I'm going to keep using whatever is cheapest.
Cool I'm interested.
Cool kinda like how I am a Distinguished Master Guardian then.
Cool, so it arrived in one piece then?
coral?
Coral and Ladbrokes in-store weekly offers are pretty lucrative.
Coral is back.
Coral just gave me a £50 bonus with 5X wagering.
Corbyn is going to be re-elected then all the MPs will be shitters.
Corbyn wants to build nuclear submarines but not equip them with nuclear missiles wtf.
Corporate restructure.
cost*.
Costing me small amounts of profit :(.
Cost me £5 to call Amazon wtf.
Could a botnet get 51%?
Could be a tumor.
could be pneumonia?
Could do.
Could do 2v2 to balance out skill discrepency.
Could do with some tweaking.
Could get more if I wasn't trying to apply for a mortgage.
Could have made a shitload.
Could it be because I am using powerline for one of the PCs?
Could not locate the specified server. User name and/or password are not valid. Please verify the information is correct.".
Could not locate the specified server. User name and/or password are not valid. Please verify the information is correct."".
Couldn't figure out why until I tested for frameskipping.
Could pass  for Earth.
Could probably get like £160 for them.
Could probably run there within like 6-8 seconds.
Could run it as a server or something too.
Could that 4% interest go up to 20% in the near future?
Could walk over there in like 20 seconds right now.
Could you explain?
Could you send 0.00197385 LTC to LLoMncAqZfXvw3XSPYLum7Bf5tP1gfyobv ?
Could you set up a service like NiceHash to gain 51%?
Courier.
CPU cooler*.
CPU\ Cooler cooler*.
CPU cooler\ Cooler cooler*.
CPU is more important than GPU.
CPU is okay, GPU is bad.
CpuminerJayddeeAesavx2-Lyra2z.
CPU mining doesn't work well whilst using the PC.
CPU mining on GRLC is easy.
CPU, motherboard, RAM and PSU.
CPU usage hovers around 92% and GPU usage at 50-60.
CPU with integrated graphics.
Cracking is just easier than entering in some stupid random key.
Create a S&S ISA and enjoy tax-free investing.
Creating a replica is pretty retarded IMO.
Creative E5 looks like my best bet ATM.
Credit card debt?
Credit Club uses Experian and mine is 719, but should be higher now because it hasn't updated for ages.
Credit ratings are useless, it's your credit history you should worry about.
Creep stacking and camp blocking.
creepy.
Crispin Blunt lmao hahahahahhaahahhahahahahahahhahahahahhahahahhahashahjahahhjajhahjahashjahjhahahaha.
CRISPIN BLUNT LMFAO.
crisps.
Crowdfunded.
CRT monitors are good.
CRTs were made to have high refresh rates so that they wouldn't give office workers headaches.
Cryengine is open source now?
CryptoBridge.
CryptoBridge and Nanex.
Crypto has been getting more and more popular.
Crypto is big business in Korea.
Crypto is crashing again?
Crypto is evolving, don't be left behind.
Crypto is riddled with scammers.
CryptoNight?
CryptoNight, DaggerHashimoto and Decred.
CryptoNight paying insane now.
CryptoNight uses low power and can be mined on a CPU too.
CryptoNight would be better though.
Crypto prices going down.
Crypto volatility is crazy, BTC is down to $9k now.
Crypto went up last night.
Crysis 3?
Crysis is installing Iota rory.
CS:GO.
CS:GO?
CS:GO and OW.
CS:GO and OW use a lot of CPU.
CS:GO at 400FPS.
CS:GO doesn't default to 64-bit on Windoze?
CS:GO has economy and recoil and grenades and movement and stuff.
CS:GO is in bad need of a new client.
CS:GO is like £5.
CS:GO is super easy to watch even if you have no game knowledge.
CS:GO looks playable on this one what?
CS:GO's client is fucking terrible.
CS hero.
CSI Miami>Mr Robot.
CSI Miami > Mr Robot.
Ctrl+F4 K8 shows nothing.
Cuck=someone who voted for Hillary Clinton/Obama's political party?
Cum back, and you've just won £100.
Cum buy my garlic.
Cum play with me and my friend.
Currency is finance related.
currently have one or more orders with us for a quantity of Graphics Cards, so we'd like to give you a little update on their status..
Currently using old textbooks to prop up my monitor because its stand doesn't have height adjustment.....
Curved plain desk.
customers?
Custom One Pro pads warm my ears up.....
Custom One Pro you mean?
Custom terrain is a pretty negligible disadvantage anyway.
Cuts out all the wasteful admin and uncertainty.
Cya l8er m9.
Cycling is too dangerous.
cyCode=GBP&priceType=pcm.
cyka blyat.
d39aee46a9abcfd4d17581eef5e776f4f2dcdcbc84d7c23d31ef103d42189abf.
daebak.
Daebak!
DAEBAK.
daebak jinjja.
DAE have a 4.7GHz CPU?
DAE like kpop?
DAE play Overwatch?
DAE remember Digg.com?
DAE think our government is a fucking joke because it's just rich twats yelling at each other?
DAE watch Family Guy?
Daily".
dailyfail.com.
Daily Mail is sooooooooo stupid.
damage per second?
damn.
Damn.
Damn, and here I am trying to overclock my PC.
Damn, I don't want it to be shared!
Damn, I forgot to leave my PC stress-testing today.
Damn I'm sorry about that.
Damn I should have said "At 9,001 calories".
damn man ur even more paranoid than me.
Damn, my portfolio went down yesterday.
Damn, PIA don't do a 24 month deal any more :(.
Damn really?
Damn son, where'd you find this?
Damn, that could be a problem i nthe future.
Damn, that happened to me too.....
Damn that's a good idea.
Damn, that's a lot.....
Damn that's annoying.
Damn that's depressing when you put it like that.
Damn that's good.
Damn that's good, you have scope for OCing there.
damn that sucks.
Damn that sucks.
Damn the formula required for this spreadsheet is starting to get complicated, look at this shit =IF(OR(ISBLANK(VLOOKUP(A63,Planned!B:W,3,FALSE)),OR(VLOOKUP(A63,Planned!B:W,3,FALSE)="")),"",VLOOKUP(A63,Planned!B:W,3,FALSE)).
Damn there's no crypto conversion to LTC.
Damn, why so high?
Damn you'll still be earning more than me even if I get this job I applied for.
Daniel Radcliffe can't act?
Dark mornings just make getting out of bed even harder.
Dat £100 spin hahahahaha.
dat forehead lmao.
DAT FUCKING TWIST OMFG.
Dat standing charge though.
Dat volatility.
dav3th3brav3.
DAVE.
davehamil is pointless.
David.
david brent lmao.
David Cameron is an ass.
David Cameron was certain Brexit wouldn't win.
David's peers?
Day 1 of Menstruation is the period day?
dcss.
Deadmau5 good mastering.
deaf*.
Deathadder is the only Razer product that isn't terrible AFAIK.
Deaths "INFINITELY BETTER".
Debian is better than Arch.
Debt is bad mkay.
Debt just means the money is worth more now than it is later.
debugging" some of that too.
Deceiving ass fuck.
Decibel A-weighting?
Decoy pricing.
Defeating the entire purpose of living with my parents.
Definitely.
Definitely get dat £400 7700K though.
Definitely interested.
Definitely possible. You can flash the BIOS to give it any level of voltage and clockspeed.
Definitely, that's why they were my first headphones and ampdac. I wanted amazing sound but didn't want to pay much for it.
Definitely worth it.
Delete Facebook.
Delete MaxTemp 85.
Delivered - package posted in letterbox.
Deliveroo?
Dell has been selling Ubuntu laptops for like a decade now.
Democracy is probably a decent system, but the UK is FAR from a pure democracy.
Dentist in 30 mins :(.
Denying is burden of knowledge, voice chat is toxic, graphical improvements is too confusing, etc.
Depending on how hot it gets this summer.
Depending on the radius of the fan ofc.
Depends, I'm often buying cutting-edge technology where not many people are selling second-hand.
Depends on how heavy the water is m9.
Depends on how many kgs the stones are, surely?
Depends on how much power you want/need.
Depends on severity and genetics and other risk factors.
Depends on the resolution you measure it I guess.
Depends on the speed the bus is going at.
Depends on what games.
Depends on what I'd be renting.
Depends on your hashing rate, your power consumption, and your electricity tariff.
Depends, the Chinese ones usually pay for themselves because they're so rich.
Depends what you define as basic.
Depends what you mean by "driving".
Depends which channel your talking about m9.
deposit*.
Deposit £500 and withdraw £1500.
Deposit for a house?
Deposit + legal fees.
Desert map too.
Desktop PCs I agree with.
Despatched to the UK.
Destiny 1 was shit.
detachable cable mod for my DT770s would be sick.
Detail is important to me because I hate distorted audio.
Deus Ex = DE.
Deus Ex = MD?
D.Holic - Chewy.
Diabetes negative too.
Diablo, Guild Wars, Hearthstone, Path of Exile, etc.
Diablo is good if you're unemployed.
Dick.
Did anyone else watch the GabeN AMA last night?
did he die?
Did he die?
Did he know he was a meme before he died?
Did he never look at his payslips?
Did Iota say something?
Did I see you in OW last night?
Did I tell you about that really fit 13 year year old I was perving on at my wedding?
Did it not occur to you that being in debt costs a lot of money?
Did it work, can you see it?
Did JC win?
DID MY DT770S FIT THROUGH THE LETTERBOX.
Didn't a referendum already decide that?
Didn't go above 75C in stress test, and stays around 60C in-game.
Didn't Katie Hopkins have to apologise for her racism recently?
Didn't know you have M50s.
Didn't know you were such an AOA fan.
Didn't like post-Xbox 360 shooters.
Didn't Microsoft make new open standards for some reason?
Didn't see that one coming, did you?
Didn't you already do that?
Didn't you get into massive credit card debt? I'm not sure you're the best person to trust with my money.
Didn't you realise that all of a sudden your interest wasn't taxed any more?
Didn't you study economics or something?
Didn't you think about Economy 7?!?!?
Did someone say peanut butter?
Did someone sneeze?
Did that, still doens't work.
Did the dean randomly find the video whilst browsing?
Did they change benefits from weekly to monthly periods just to make more people ineligible?
Did they change it because the election is coming and they don't want to look stupid?
Did they just not bother to deliver and instead make up random excuses?
Did UKIP absorb them?
Did what?
Did you?
Did you accept the quotation I gave you for £500? I didn't see your response.
Did you add your worker name or user name?
Did you ask them if they are dead? You need them to confirm it to be sure.
Did you bet on the Grand National yesterday?
Did you break your foot?
Did you buy it?
Did you buy Overwatch too?
Did you buy them?
Did you catch AIDS from any?
Did you choose a bad module or something?
Did you do it?
Did you dump her because she got cancer?
Did you enjoy the twist too?
Did you even watch the fucking video?
Did you ever feel like you CBA to sing the hyms any more?
Did you find anything?
Did you fix your Firefoxz?
Did you get any refund on tax/student loan?
Did you get disciplined for reporting it though?
Did you get my call?
Did you get the HD6XX on Massdrop for $199?
Did you get them all sweaty?
Did you get the parcel?
Did you get the standard non-LED K65?
Did you get what you wanted from that website?
Did you have sex with her?
did you hear about how the US government has ordered Apple to unlock someone's encrypted iphone?
Did you hear about Hugh Mungus? Some gril claimed she was sexually assaulted because she asked a man what his name is and he said "Hugh Mungus" lmao.
Did you hear about the RVN pool scam?
Did you hear that League Of Legends has over 100m players now lmao.
Did you hear that your favourite game is getting replays and crowdfunding soon?
Did you inhale it from a balloon?
Did you just assume my peoples' culinary menu.
Did you just call Starcraft Tittyfall?
Did you just get sacked?
Did you just link me my own miner's stats?
Did you just say that Rebecca Black is good?
Did you just violate network rules?
Did you know that a Lannister Always Pays His/Her Debts?
Did you know that BBC studios use DT770?
Did you know that bookies can return your stake whenever they want?
Did you know that Donald Trump has promised to speed up the rate of global warming?
Did you know that DT770s are the headphones use by Radio 1?
Did you know that even if Amazon's website doesn't let you return an item, you can phone their call centre and they will process a return for you.
Did you know that I have a Korean wife?
Did you know that in  America you can buy weed from highstreet retailers?
Did you know that I spent £460 on this CPU?
Did you know that kpop is more addictive than crystal meth?
Did you know that kpop is the best music genre because it has the highest production value in the world?
Did you know that Lastpass can complete forms for you?
Did you know that Lastpass is free now?
Did you know that making pension contributions reduces the amount you owe them?
Did you know that Michael Bay is autistic?
Did you know that more people die from sugar in the UK than any other drug now?
Did you know that more UK citizens lost their lives in the 11/9 terrorist attacks than any other single terrorist attack?
Did you know that Overwatch has stolen a lot of CS:GO's and LoL's player and viewer bases?
Did you know that, rory?
Did you know that some people don't use any browser plugins? omg!!!!!
Did you know that Spotify removed the sharing to other Spotify users feature?
Did you know that standing is just as unhealthy as sitting?
Did you know that the DT770 was first produced in the 80s?
Did you know that the inventor of zombies died 6 months ago from lung cancer?
Did you know that the original story for Zootopia was that predators had to wear collars to inhibit their emotions?
Did you know that you can build a gaming PC as powerful as a console for £150?
Did you like how the program is open source?
did you like it?
did you like that photo I sent you last night?
Did you look at the pcpartpicker link?
Did you not know that flats have service charges?
Did you not like the video? :(.
did you order anything from Myprotein?
Did you overclock memory?
Did you overclock your 1080 TI?
Did you pick the lock?
Did you play with it a bit?
Did you really need to spend all that money on drugs, or could you have gotten by just fine if you spent a bit less?
Did your mummy play it to you?
Did you say anything important?
Did you see any fatties you liked?
Did you see that video on the top of /r/all of those two American guys who snuck into the cinema as one person?
Did you see the GRLC pump?
did you see them crush the book?
Did you see The Walking Dead season final?
Did you send it?
Did you send to my bank?
Did you seriously only plug one in?
Did you tell them to fuck off back to USSR?
Did you think it was weird at the time?
Did you try to get the switching bonus too?
Did you use credit or debit card to fund your 888 accounts?
Did you use the shower after you cycled?
Did you use your real name?
Did you vote for Hillary or Donald?
Did you vote leave?
Did you work at a photography firm?
Difficulty going up.
Diff patching is harder.
Dirty cow lmao who comes up with these names.
Disabled at coinbase wtf?
Discord is good for specific crypto discussions.
Disgruntled users declared a "quit Digg day" on August 30, 2010, and used Digg's own auto-submit feature to fill the front page with content from Reddit.[48][49][50] Reddit also temporarily added the Digg shovel to their logo to welcome fleeing Digg users.[51].
Disgusting filth.
Disks can contain more than just music.
Display Driver Uninstaller.
Display Port.
Display Port omfg.
Distracting fact.
ditto.
Diversify your crypto portfolio.
Divide your income into monthly budgets eg rent, savings, groceries, etc.
Do 100% fan speed if you have to.
Do 5 bananas count towards your 5 a day?
do 800 and 815.
Do a little bit of research, and you'll find a shitload of shady involvement Riot has had with Dota.
Do a Mumble interview, it's better sound quality than Skype.
Do bags for life transfer between supermarkets?
Do both!
Do cleaners bring their own vacuum cleaners?
Do comics count?
doctors*.
Doctors do it all the time.
Do deaf people get discounts on headphones and music concerts and other stuff?
Do Dominoes accept bitcoin?
Does 09/11/2011 mean 11th of September where your from?
Does 13:00 count as before midnight?
Does a blind person get visuals if they take acid?
Does a Korean give it?
Does alcohol cause mental problems?
Does anyone do bath salts?
Does anyone else get creeped out when girls younger than you have made babies?
Does anyone else hate it when people put comments into cell values?
Does anyone else here like to stretch at their desk?
Does anyone else here use Microsoft Outlook for work purposes?
Does anyone have air conditioning?
Does anyone know any headphone modding services?
Does anyone know how to count the amount of cells in a column which have dates before today's date?
Does anyone know what the availability of 4k torrents for TV shows and films is like nowadays?
Does anyone leave the tumble dryer on whilst you sleep?
Does anyone wanna buy my Audio Technica M50X?
Does anyone want to buy my 4.7GHz 4690K?
Does anyone want to buy my Audio-Technica ATH-M50X?
Does anyone want to make £200? I have a referral code.
Does a smart meter tell me how much power is being drawn from each plug?
Does AV really cost £250m more than FPTP?
Does Awesome Miner support lyra2 on the CPU?
Does Citrix Receiver work on Linux?
Does custard have egg in it?
Does Dota count?
Does ear infection count as sick?
Does he think I'm stupid?
Does IRC and Reddit count?
Does it actually say on the envelope that it's a court summons?
Does it allow me to play games at high FPS?
Does it edit your posts to give them random data before deleting them?
Does it even apply to broadband though?
Does it go all the way around Africa?
Does it happen when your GPU isn't installed?
Does it have a UK keyboard?
Does it have replays and a good client and stuff yet?
Does it have the really pretty girl in it?
Does it have Tree Style Tabs?
Does it look good?
Does it look good to you?
Does it make you feel good about yourself when you belittle others?
Does it matter if he wants to be?
Does it run in Wine?
Does it run on Linux?
Does it run on Ubuntu?
Does it support Bittorrent?
Does it turn into ice?
Does it work with my bank accounts?
Does Keepass have form autofill too?
Does LIDL do good meal deals?
Does LoL have prize money like that?
Does marijuanna give people mental problems?
Does MS support all libre functionality?
Does my listing look okay?
Does my maths check out?
Does my mum count?
Does NiceHash make your PC lag at all?
Does NiceHash work on Linux?
Does Nick Griffin want to deport my Korean gf?
Does nobody enable autoupdates any more?!?!??
Does NSA have backdoors to the ASICs?
Doesn't come with any thermal paste though, I already used that.
Doesn't Cuba still have the cheques stashed in a drawer that the USA sends them for Guantanimo Bay?
Doesn't do what I tell it to the first time.
Doesn't he want regulation on Bitcoin though?
doesn’t impact on the performance of your duties..
Doesn't look like there's any penalty.
Doesn't make my PC unusable wtf.
Doesn't make your ears hot.
Doesn't matter to me too much atm because I'm gonna cut down on my spending.
Doesn't really affect me because my parents are rich and willing to loan me short-term.
Doesn't seem right.
Doesn't sound like it'd be usable for police/secret service/government evidence.
Doesn't sound like it will work.
Doesn't that rely on the phone's firmware allowing reading of the SSD through the USB port?
Doesn't that shit happen like every day at every airport?
Doesn't the UK suck for nursing?
Doesn't wood get increasingly expensive though?
Doesn't work unless I am an op?
Doesn't your Fiio AMPDAC have a bass switch too?
Does PIA?
Does she ever tie you to the bed?
Does she shout "suka blyat" a lot?
Does she work?
Does Spotify have an option for mono headphones?
Does that ever actually fix a problem?
Does that have a mic input?
Does that include WhatsApp then?
Does that mean Filmon won't be able to stream BBC channels soon?
Does that mean the actual limit is less than 30GB?
Does that mean the cash buyers trying to steal my flat from me will not want it any more?
Does that mean you have to pay for the handset too?
Does that seem fishy?
Does that sound like a good plan?
Does the £30 include drinks?
Does the BNP still exist or did it get replaced by UKIP?
Does the BNP want to stay in Europe?
Does the EE friends & family discount apply to just internet?
Does the quality of the bed even matter if you've got a good mattress?
Does this look like a decent energy provider? www.powershop.co.uk.
Does this mean I can make use of 888casino bonuses now, or should I wait for my 888poker cashback to complete?
Does this seem strange to anyone else, or am I just becoming an intolerant old fogie?
Does Titanfall even have an esports scene?
Does Twitch and Youtube work on 3G?
Does WhatsApp Desktop support phone calls?
does winminer not have CryptoNight? My CPU is making me hardly anything.
does your boss know you are on an illegal IRC channel at work?
Does your EE friendship discount apply to home broadband?
Does your GTX 1080TI get quite loud?
Does your system crash, or just the GPU?
Does Z68 work with i5-2500k?
Do flats come with washing machines/dishwashers? Or will I need to buy them?
dogecoin had so much potential.
Dogging is wrong.
Do Greek people believe in Zeus?
Dogs are cool.
Do Halifax bank and the police have the same address?
Do homeless people have to do jury duty?
Do I Have a RAM bottleneck or something?].
Do I have thin priviledge?
Do I have to pay the ISP for their router?
Do I have to reinstall the cooler?
Do I have to shave my beard?
Do I have to use routers supplied by ISPs?
Do I just do it manually?
Do I know you from another channel?
Do I know you from Freenode?
Do I need a jacket for my unvented hot water tank?
Do I need a landline?
Do I need any hot water if I do all my showering at work?
Do I need a TV license for Filmon TV?
Do I need a TV license to use Filmon?
Do I need to buy an oven!??!?
Do I need to do a P87 form every year?
Do I need to get injections before I go?
Do I need to inform HMRC about my Bitcoin income?
Do I need to levae work?
Do I need to pay CGT when it goes up in value?
Do I need to play a game after adding myself to the site?
Do I need to tell you things you don't know?
Doing nothing.
Doing this now.
Do it again.
Do it man.
Do it on the PSU side too.
Do I want culture?
Do macs have a 4.7GHz CPU like my Ncase M1 build does?
Dominoes is fucking delicious.
Donald Trump hates China wtf.
Donate the electricity cost to your heating budget.
Done enough shoulders and chest.
Done what?
Do non-techy people think they need to do these sort of things to stop their PC from slowing down or something?!?!?
Don't 100% of ISPs give up the details because it's requested by the court?
Don't be a filthy casual pls.
Don't be an idiot pls.
Don't be a retard pls.
don't be creepy.
Don't be creepy please.
don't be creepy pls.
Don't be racist please.
Don't be racist pls.
Don't BOSE have the best ANC?
Don't bother with FD monthly saver; the exit bonus is more important.
Don't bother with front audio, it's shit.
Don't buy his shit.
Don't buy that.
Don't buy the wired one if you're not gonna mod it, because the cable sucks.
Don't chase losses.
Don't credit cards give you low charges and good rates?
Don't do any BS 10 hour days.
Don't do anything illegal because then I'll get blamed for telling you.
Don't do that then.
Don't forget that you still have GBP0.00 in your NetBet Sport account..
Don't get a stock one.
Don't give me nightmares pls.
Don't give out contact information of dealers, and don't link to, or mention the names of any specific darknet markets..
Don't go for a standard 144hz without adaptive sync because it'll be pointless at 80FPS.
Don't go to A&E.
Don't go to church, my wife makes me go and it's fucking boring.
Don't have space for a Blue Yeti.
Don't have time right now.
Don't have time to slack off.
Don't have to stress about how to visualise a graph all day now.
Don't invest in them.
Don't let your dreams be memes.
Don't like Chinese, don't like Russian.
Don't link that shit pls.
don't listen to AmerieHartree he's trolling.
Don't make your job harder than you need to.
Don't need any earlier/later than that.
Don't patronise me.
Don't pay overdraft charges.
Don't put a PC in your bedroom ffs.
Don't put your money in a S&S ISA if you plan to withdraw it in January lmao.
Don't really know them very well though.
Don't resent me if anything goes wrong like with NiceHack.
Don't Royal Mail have sniffer dogs to find weed?
Don't say that.
Don't sell now, it's going up and up.
Don't spend lots of money on shit you don't need.
Don't the audience just vote people off if they don't like them?
Don't they get caught by Royal Mail sniffer dogs?
Don't they know how precious it is?!?!?
Don't think it's publically visible.
Don't think so.
Don't think they're too expensive.
Don't throw them away ffs.
Don't try it.
Don't use it for any serious investment.
Dont' want to lose £3000.
Don't want to lose money if I can do a simple check to be certain.
Don't what?
Don't worry about it, I'm the one who will feel bad when your 9001 garlics become worthless.
Don't worry about that.
Don't worry about the pepsis and cookies though.
Don't worry about what-ifs.
Don't worry, I will gamble my way out of the mess I've got myself in.
Don't you find your flat gets cold if you don't leave it on at night?
Don't you get ~23 statutory days?
Don't you get bored staying in hotels all the time?
Don't you have a really good Silverstone PSU?
Don't you have to enter your Keepass password every time you start up your PC?
Don't you have work to do?
Don't you make a shitload of money from your job?
Don't you, rory?
Don't you think?
Don't you wish they were all Koreans instead?
Doom has Vulkan now.
Doom is on sale right now.
Do people actually use mics on discord or is it just a chatroom?
Do Schitt make any good portable ones?
Do slots offers.
Do slots too.
Do some matched betting on the side.
Do speed cameras ever flash at you when you're on your bicycle?
Dota 2.
Dota 2 and CS:GO.
Dota 2 at 200FPS.
Dota 2, CS:GO and Overwatch.
Dota 2 has a new compendium and Overwatch has the Halloween event with limited-edition skins. I might book some annual leave to farm all the skins.
Dota 2 has Vulkan now.
Dota 2 is the best video game in the world.
Dota 2 not so much now that it has Vulkan.
Dota 2 obviously.
Dota 2 probably takes the title as the greatest game ever made.
Dota 2 too.
Dota and CS:GO are, fishing is not, LoL is not, Olympics is not.
Dota business model master race.
Dota came first.
Dota doesn't lock anything behind a paywall.
Dota has a shitload of viewers that don't even play the game.
Dota has hundreds.
Dota has more in common with an RTS than what you call "MOBA".
Dota hasn't shrunk at all though.
Dota has prize pools over ten times as large as LoL's.
Dota has runes and masteries.
Dota has the equivalent of summoner spells probably.
Dota is a language-learning tool similar to Rosetta Stone, you also get a rage-simulator included.
Dota is all international tournaments.
Dota is a much much much better balanced game.
Dota isn't a fucking moba.
Dota isn't a moba.
Dota is played all over the world so it has a high average player count but low peak.
Dota is post-TI so the dip is kinda normal.
Dota needs OpenAI because the game is constantly changing and it's impossible to keep the bots up to date.
Dota only sells cosmetics.
Dota pays for itself too.
Dota's entire business model is selling cosmetics.
Dota would work better.
do that and lose your job/health dumbass.
Do the fans and pump take time to warm up or something?
Do the ones which aren't guaranteed profit too.
Do the spins offers.
Do they deduct it from my bank account?
Do they hate mainlanders?
Do they hate my Korean gf?
Do they have a house of lords in USA?
Do they have to be 5 different fruit?
Do they keep it charged?
Do they know you're claiming the cashback?
DO THEY LOOK EAST ASIAN?!?!?!?
Do they not realise that the supermarkets have purposefully been giving away free bags for decades in order to increase sales?
Do they only look for people within 1 year of them?
Do they rip up all the cables and replace with their own ones then wtf?
Do they round to the nearest number or always round down?
Do those headphones come with three different cables?
Double income omfg.
Double the profit.
Doubt I'll ever get it.
Doubt it.
Doubt it, he's too busy living with his parents for free, working at Tesco, going on trips to Europe all the time, and saying "£7 is a lot for me".
Do used SSDs sell on Ebay?
Do we need TV licenses to watch Twitch?
Do what?
Do what properly?
Downdating was ez enough.
Download a 100k person address book, send them all referrals, enjoy your massive amounts of gigabytes.
Download Dota 2.
Downloading thousands of emails isn't quick.
Download xmrig.
Down the drain?
Down to 8 emails in my work inbox omfg.
Do you?
Do you at least have multiple GPUs? I don't see the point in your PSU unless you have a multi-GPU setup.
Do you believe in eugenics?
Do you believe in Gandhi?
Do you believe in global warming?
Do you believe in Zeus?
Do you bet £20 too or bet the minimum £10?
Do you browse /r/kpop???
Do you calculate the profit automatically or input it? I'm thinking of tagging the bets as SNR/Arb/SR and tagging them according to the exchange to get the commission value and then using an IF function to calculate the profit automatically so I just need to input the odds and stakes.
Do you care about people thinking you are a classy man with good headphones?
Do you collect chicken stamps?
Do you consider kpop to be "normie stuff"?
Do you CPU mine too?
Do you do any gaming?
Do you do squats?
Do you drink a lot?
Do you drink protein shakes?
Do you drive?
Do you enjoy the money?
Do you even have a gf?
Do you even know basic division?
Do you even know how much your electricity costs?
Do you ever clean your IEMs?
Do you ever combine promotions?
Do you ever do work when you're working from home?
Do you ever exercise your back?
Do you ever feel like it's too early to go home, but you don't have enough time to really start doing anything?
Do you ever find your Sennheisers or anything leak sound and resort to using your DT770s instead?
Do you ever get discomfort when earpads push the frames of your glasses into the side of your head?
Do you ever get joint pain?
Do you ever go on Chinese dating sites?
Do you ever hang out around the Chinese part of uni?
Do you ever make more expensive bookings to get more cashback?
Do you ever mine Steam trading cards?
Do you ever mod your headphones?
Do you ever roleplay as patient and nurse?
Do you ever shitpost on Reddit?
Do you ever submit posts even though you know it will probably get downvoted?
Do you ever talk about anything other than food and sex?
Do you ever talk about stuff that isn't drugs?
Do you ever talk to girls there?
Do you ever use an EQ?
Do you ever use closed headphones at home, or just your HD600?
Do you ever use company Wi-Fi to stream music?
Do you ever use Excel on Linux?
Do you ever use Ratesetter?
Do you ever use your AD700 for gaming?
Do you ever wear your DT770s out and about?
Do you ever withdraw from bookies? I have money on like 20 different sites right now.
Do you find your mic picks up the sound of your mechanical keyboard and your open headphones?
Do you get a lot of annoying work calls though?
Do you get buffering when watching 1080p Youtube or watching Twitch?
Do you get cloud storage with Amazon Prime?
Do you get free breakfast?
Do you get massages from Asian girls?
Do you get paid lunch?
Do you get vegetable nutrients without having to eat vegetables?!?!?!?
Do you give it to her?
Do you hate foreigners?
Do you hate people who don't do drugs?
Do you have a 1080p monitor?
Do you have a 188hz monitor?
Do you have a bean to cup masheen?
Do you have a chirofractor?
Do you have a FPS cap or something?
Do you have a gaming PC?
Do you have a gf?
Do you have a gym at your workplace?
Do you have a Hi-Fi shop in Leeds where you can try on headphones before you buy them>.
Do you have a job?
Do you have an even cheaper night rate?
Do you have a new phone yet?
Do you have an S7? I thought about buying one.
Do you have an S8 yet?
Do you have any employee discounts on that?
Do you have any experience with posting stuff on ebay?
Do you have any shops near you where you can try on headphones?
Do you have any suggestions?
Do you have anything running in the background, windoze update or malware scanner or anything which might start eating up your resources for some reason?
Do you have a private garden?
Do you have a private garden?>.
Do you have a railcard?
Do you have a real mum, or just a foster one?
Do you have a Samsung Galaxy S8 yet?
Do you have a sister?
Do you have a spare £5000 to invest????
Do you have a spare beta key? I'll play with you.
Do you have a Spree card?
Do you have big muscles?
Do you have Discord or WhatsApp?
Do you have Fidelo X2?
Do you have Firefox Quantum yet?
Do you have gas central heating?
Do you have it on an exchange?
Do you have it up and running yet?
Do you have Ladbrokes showing yet?
Do you have moneysavingsexpert Credit Club?
Do you have multiple VAC bans?
Do you have Nationwide regular saver? Up to £500 a month at 5%.
Do you have NiceHash yet?
Do you have offsite data then?
Do you have Overwatch yet?
do you have PUBG?
Do you have PUBG?
Do you have pub gee?
Do you have Quantum yet?
Do you have Quantum yet? me and HansProleman do.
Do you have the dimensions of your mouse yet?
Do you have the new Firefox? It's the fastest browser now.
Do you have to do much work?
Do you have travel insurance? You can save money by getting in shape first, so you're seen as lower risk.
Do you have two 6XX now then?
Do you have vsync on?
Do you have your CPU now?
Do you have your CPU up and running yet?
Do you have your electric radiators set to a thermostat?
do you have your shit stack yet, or are you still using Fiio?
Do you have your storage heaters on every night?
Do you heat using electricity?
Do you heat your flat with electricity or gas?
Do you hold two dumbells?
Do you just keep making shit up to confuse me?
Do you keep a float on betting sites or withdraw everything?
Do you know any good fidget spinner tricks?
Do you know anyone interested?
Do you know anyone who does a DT770 removable cable modding service?
Do you know anything about flashing GTX 970 firmware to remove the power limit?
Do you know how club draws work?
Do you know how easy it is to photoshop a sign?
Do you know how fast 4k RPM is?
Do you know how fucking hard it is to use kiwi irc on my phone?
Do you know how long CIEMs can last between remoulds?
Do you know how many things you can buy with £60?
Do you know is RDP is fully encrypted so my work can't see it?
Do you know that blink dagger costs over 2,000 gold, is disabled whenever you take damage, and takes up an inventory slot?
Do you know thorin?
Do you know what a dog is?
Do you know what a sunk cost iss?
Do you know what FXAA is?
Do you know where I can get my DT770s modded for removeable cable?
Do you know why Bath is called Bath?
Do you leave your PC running when sleeping or at work then?
Do you like Alodia Gosiengfiao?
Do you like anime?
Do you like Asians?
Do you like bass?
Do you like capacitive buttons? I think they're a great feature.
Do you like cheese kimbap?
Do you like China and Korea?
Do you like Chinese or Korean girls?
Do you like dogs?
Do you like girls who are not fat too?
Do you like her?
Do you like it?
Do you like Jacob Zuma?
Do you like Korean food?
Do you like kpop?
Do you like Kpop?
Do you like Maroon 5?
Do you like mITX rigs?
Do you like MLG kpop?
Do you like my PC case? I have a Corsair H105 inside it.
Do you like Ojka?
Do you like Okja?
Do you like Open Hardware Monitor?
Do you like Outlaw Star? I used to watch that as a kid.
Do you like PCs?
Do you like Russian grills?
Do you like same sex relationships?
Do you like Shenzhen?
Do you like Skrilex?
Do you like Skrillex?
Do you like tab trees?
Do you like The Big Bang Theory?
Do you like the Big Daddy meal?
Do you like the new OW hero?
Do you like the Sharknado films?
Do you like trans people?
Do you like white or asian girls more?
Do you like Zhang Ziyi?
Do you live alone?
Do you live in a flat?
do you live in chavtown or something?
Do you live in the south west? I can recommend you a good one.
Do you live near HansProleman?
Do you live with your parents?
Do you lose your income whilst doing it?
Do you love Asian too?
Do you love Korean food?
Do you mean personally or for gameplay?
Do you mine Ethereum?
Do you mine ethereum yet?
Do you miss Rhodesia?
Do you need any emotional support m9?
Do you never need any isolation at home then?
Do you not have anything better to do than argue with random people on the internet?
Do you not realise how unprofitable mining is right now?
Do you not understand physics?!?!?
Do you only save like £100 a month or something?
Do you open your windows in the winter?
Do you order it from myprotein.com ?
Do you palm grip?
Do you pay CGT on Euros?
Do you pay rent by direct debit?
Do you pick widow even when there are much better options?
Do you play any FPS?
Do you play Blackjack?
Do you play FPS much?
Do you play games?
Do you play pub gee?
Do you prefer full disk encryption or home folder encryption for personal use?
Do you prefer living alone to having a live-in gf?
Do you realise that SMITE only has horizontal movement and aiming?
Do you realise that you're losing money by having thousands of £ stuck in bookies not doing anything?
Do you really think she's going to do that?
Do you really trust Google with all your emails?
Do you remember the Aquasnap cd key you gave me? I've forgotten it :(.
Do you remember the guy who said he put all his savings on AMD shares?
Do you remember the price we agreed? It was £550 including P&P and including the extra protection, right?
do your parents know your a drug addict?
Do you run a gaming PC?
do you see that? ^^^.
Do you sell your garlic through coinfalcon or tradesatoshi?
Do you smoke?
Do you srsly think there were 1.6M viewbots that Valve and MLG weren't able to account for?
Do you still have a gf?
Do you still have just a Fiio?
Do you still have your DT770s?
Do you still play OW?
Do you still play PUBG? I haven't seen you playing for ages.
Do you still use an external AMPDAC with your phone?
Do you still use Stremio?
Do you store contraception in your wallet?
Do you stream TV and films to your TV?
Do you struggle to find girls shorter than you?
Do you then get sued and forced to sell your house?
Do you think anime girls are pretty?
Do you think anything will come to replace What.cd like with Oink?
Do you think Asian girls are superior to whites?
Do you think blink dagger stops channeling spells then?
Do you think Donald is going to be a good president?
Do you think Ethereum could become the #1 crypto this year? It's moving to PoS which could cause a big surge.
Do you think EU, SEA and NA are nicer regions than Africa and the Middle East?
Do you think EU, USA and China have an agreement to combine their supercomputer powers to take over 51% in an emergency or some shit?
Do you think for the good sound quality and isolation?
Do you think GDP would go down if everyone shitposted on IRC all day as much as you?
Do you think hyperthreading would help my FPS?
Do you think I am retard?
Do you think I am well enough to start exercising again?
Do you think I can get a cheap GTX 1080TI on Brack Friday?
Do you think I can make a profit from it?
Do you think I can move my grandparents' sofa by myself?
Do you think I can put a camera in my room and use my room as the background for my virtual desktop?
Do you think I could get 0% finance on a GTX 1080 if I buy it from Amazon?
Do you think I could get a cheap 1080TI on Cyber Monday?
Do you think I could take a big battery to work, charge it during the day, then take it home and use it to power a space heater?
Do you think I'll get a cheap GTX 1080TI on Brack Friday?
Do you think I might have a problem?
Do you think I should buy a GTX 1080TI on my new 30 month 0% credit card and then make the repayments using my mining profits?
Do you think I should start arbing on Tommy French now that I am gubbed?
Do you think it'll be okay to put everything in the case's box?
Do you think it'll compete directly with BTC?
Do you think it'll overtake ETH though?
Do you think it might be related to Brexit?
Do you think it's a good idea?|.
Do you think it's safer to withdraw online or in-store?
Do you think IT will complain about me using my own mousepad?
Do you think I will pass my probation?
Do you think Korean girls are physically and intellectually superior to Aryans?
Do you think listening to music in another language makes me more intelligent?
Do you think LTC will overtake BTG this week?
Do you think LTC will replace BTC?
Do you think LTC will rise to be one of the main currencies alongside ETH and BTC?
Do you think my parents will mind?
Do you think my post will get a helpful response though?
Do you think people are generally meaner to depressed people?
Do you think pub gee will break 2 billion concurrent players today?
Do you think pub gee will reach >2m peak players this month?
Do you think Richard Dawkins is gay for Charles Darwin?
Do you think sex is implied as a condition of her free bed and breakfast?
Do you think she's pretty?
Do you think so?
Do you think some keyboard manufacturers might be putting weights inside the board to give a false impression of high build quality, like Beats does?
Do you think that for small properties the difference in cost between gas and electric heating is smaller than with large properties?
Do you think that Ground Loop Isolator I ordered will solve my problem?
Do you think that if I call Origin they will let me upgrade from broadband to fibre?
Do you think that if the Conversative Party say they will make the economy strong enough times that people will actually believe it is true?
Do you think that is quite big?
Do you think the flat has enough space for a large gaming desk?
Do you think The International 2016 will have the highest prizepool of any esports tournament, or that Dota esports iwll be dying?
Do you think the lecturer is just doing it to increase the sales of his book?
Do you think the NSA has enough backdoors to take over 51%?
Do you think there are cases where someone hates Asian people but has an Asian gf anyway?
Do you think there are stripped-down versions of Windoze you can download just for running games?
Do you think the S8 will have a decent DAC?
Do you think they'll do crystal meth?
Do you think using RDP to connect to my home computer might be against my company's computer usage policy?
Do you think we gambled correctly? I hope I didn't do anything to make me ineligible.
Do you think we should bring back Apartheid?
Do you think your boss might get angry with you for wasting so much electricity?
Do you unlock weapons and equipment like in CoD?
Do you use a Nicehash wallet or external wallet?
Do you use cashback sites too?
Do you use claw, fingertip, or palm grip?
Do you use Creative Sound Blaster E5? I just ordered one.
Do you use it?
Do you use Kodi?
Do you use protonmail?
Do you use Spotify?
Do you use Stremio?
Do you use 'tasks'?
Do you use Truecaller, Google Messenger, or Signal as your SMS client?
Do you want a free £100 then?
Do you want a Ratesetter and Kuflink referal code?
Do you want one with a removable cable?
Do you wan to play pub gee with me and HansProleman?
Do you want them?
Do you want to buy it?
Do you want to buy my Beyerdynamic DT770 80Ohms headphones?
Do you want to buy my GTX 970 so I can upgrade to a 1080TI?
Do you want to buy some garlic?
Do you want to buy them for your gf?
Do you want to come see my flat? I own it.
Do you want to make babies?
Do you want to switch to Nationwide?
Do you watch anime?
Do you watch Game of Thrones?
Do you watch HD Youtube videos and Twitch?
Do you watch Hydraulic Press Channel?
Do you watch It's Always Sunny in Philadelphia?
Do you watch The Big Bang Theory?
Do you watch The Big Bang Theory or The IT Crowd?
Do you watch TI6?
Do you watch Westworld?
Do you wear glasses?
Do you withdraw after doign the bets?
Do you work at a resteraunt or something?
Do you work in IT?
Do you work in IT or something? Why are you blocking people from websites?
DPD always deliver to my office without any problems.
DPD are pretty good I think?
DPD are usually better than this.
DPD>MyHermes.
DPD sent a kid with an Enterprise van wtf.
DPD's prohibited items list is mental.
DPD yeah.
DPI?
Dreamhack?
Dressing gown + drugs and clothes all over the place.
Drink beers in the summer?
Drink coffee, it's better for you.
Dropped off at the ParcelShop 13:50 - Thu 14 Jul.
Dropping what?
Drove into the back of someone.
Dr Pepper has acid in it.
Dr Pepper is delicious but I don't drink that any more.
Dr Pepper is more addictive than marijuanna.
Dr Pepper is not diet drink lmao.
Drugs are a poor investment.
drugs are for losers.
Drugs are for losers.
drunk wtf?
DT770 80 Ohms.
DT770 is clearly superior.
DT770s are amazing for work, aren't they?
DT770s are good because they have such good isolation and detail that you don't need to raise the volume high and give yourself tinnitus.
DT770s are pretty old now.
DT770s are way more comfortable too, even after modding the comfort of my M50X.
DT770s sound better than M50s from what I've read.
Dual core.
Dual headphone outputs.
Ducks are tasty.
Dude I am fucking broke.
dude you sound like such a racist.
Due to a massive surge in demand due to crypto-currency mining many graphics cards have sold out everywhere and are in constraint from the Manufacturers. They have been unable to keep up with the unprecedented demand, and as such our suppliers have completely run out of stock and this has caused a large backlog of backorders..
Dumbell?
Dumbells and kettle bells aren't really heavy enough.
DX12 is pointless.
E10k, XLR to 3.5mm adapter, Boompro mic, cable splitter, aux extension cable, and noise filter cable.
Each time or in total?
Earn more money.
Ears starting to warm up in pleather pads....
Easier to determine correct price.
Easier to leave it out in the rain. The garage had been going over it with a hose pipe or whatever they used, and then it rained and got wet.
East Asians (Chinese, Koreans, and Japanese) have fewer apocrine sweat glands (armpits, groin and earwax glands) compared to people of other descent, and the lack of these glands make East Asians less prone to body odor.[16][17].
Easy = best.
Easy, I have over 300 friends on Steam.
Easy Saver.
Eat more?
ebay.
Ebay fees will eat into the profit though.
Ebay has buyer protection though?
Ebay is £4.
Ebay says Postage cost:£7.57.
ebay wants 10% of the value of everything I sell?
EC1-A is a very good gaming mouse.
EC2-A is good too, but I have big hands so I prefer the bigger EC1-A.
Economically even less so probably.
Economic metrics are more than just revenue and tax and GDP.
Economics 101 m9.
Economics teaches you a shitload of models just to make a decision whether to buy a bigmac or a burrito.
Economy 7.
Economy 7 Day rate 10.685 p/kWh.
Economy 7 Night rate 7.630 p/kWh.
edgy.
Education is never a bad policy IMO.
EE.
EE contracts are expensive.
EE uses traffic shaping according to MSE.
EE will still sell S7s?
Effectively a 50% pay rise.
Effectively doubling my mortgage deposit.
Efficiency != profitability.
EG is playing.
EG won congrats.
Either it's a DAC or it's not.
Either phone or live chat.
Either Roger Dicknuts wins or Dave McFaggot.
Either something is a fact or it's not, right?
Either the labour or the conservative leader ofc.
either the prizepool decreases in the next few years, or we're going to end up with $50m prizepools.
Either they'll they'll bother me when I'm on holiday, or they'll fail miserably and I'll have to pick everything up when I get back.
Either way I'm going to be financially screwed.
Either way, I'm sure £26,250 will bring me a lot of happiness.
Either you get the job, or you have lots of time to farm Lunar New Year skins.
Ejecting a 1080 TI?
Electric heating + gaming PC.
Electronic switches.
Elon Musk says that if we stop giving smart people money to develop technology then our technological level will decline.
else one too.
Email yeah.
Emma Watson?
Emotional loss?
Emotional support wtf?
Employees act on behalf of the business.
Encryption is going to be made illegal to stop this sort of thing from happening again.
Encryption made illegal.
End BST?
Endgame headphones for only £127 would be amazing.
England doesn't.
English want a different kind of visa though.
English weebs.
Enjoy high priced low sound quality audio.
Enough for a Boots meal deal then.
Enough to build a big ass mining rig.
Enough to know she didn't go to Starladder.
enquiries*.
Enter your username.
Entry level PC gaming is pretty cheap nowadays.
Equihash super profitable all of a sudden.
ESL-run local leagues?
Especially a tall person.
Especially because all the heroes are humans too.....
Especially because of your obesity.
Especially from my bottlenecked CPU.
Especially if I have a problem keeping my rigs running.
Especially if it's downhill.
Especially if lifting something from below waist-height.
Especially if the girl is 4 years younger than you but made a baby 4 years ago.
Especially if you have a low sensitivity like me.
Especially if your physical state, mentality and emotion vary.
Especially my K65 with brushed aluminium.
Especially now that I have a fucking ridiculously OP CPU that my GPU is the bottleneck and being worked 100% all the time.
Especially OW.
Especially since I was asked to delete lines outside of a specific date range.
Especially since we fucking agreed on £39 two fucking weeks ago.
Especially when I'm banking with 4 different banks.
Especially when OCed.
Especially with mitx which is more compact anyway.
Especially with the speed it's running at.
Esports is getting so big.
esports tournaments take whole weekends.
Essays are easier.
etc.
Ethereum has been steadily going up after their two big drops.
Ethereum is a shit coin.
Ethereum mining.
Ethereum mining business?
ETH is doing okay though.
EU citizens can still come to the UK.
Eugenics kinda lready exists.
Euroboo.
Europe has too many restrictions.
EU West.
EVE is for nerds.
Even 16GB is so overkill.
Even £210 will get you something decent enough.
Even after losing the majority of my qualifying spins.
Even after the S8 launch?
Even at 120% power.
Even at idle, it spins up to 20%.
Even at some distance.
Even before thinking of mining.
Even better than £76!!!!!
Even China can only afford one of them.
Even fucking electricity is going up.
Even GGG has done it with PoE to an extent.
Even high if I CBA to factor in Economy 7 hours.
Even if garlic is more profitbale.
Even if I am extremely unlucky and get the 5% chance payout, the cashback will easily compensate for it.
Even if I can't understand them.
Even if I got a copy for free I'd probably still pirate it.
Even if I never turned the PC on?
Even if it's just internet?
Even if I use VPN or TOR?
Even if I was rich I wouldn't buy Red Bull.
Even if on the freak chance they make a deal to share it with one of the big two parties, they will have their attempts ruined.
Even if she was still alive, would the parents really want her back at this point?
Even if there was no Brexit vote, the value of the £ might be the same today.
Even if they asked me for my key, I don't know it.
Even if they weren't wireless.
Even if you don't cancel, you can just reject the parcel when it arrives.
Even if you don't use Ubuntu, you should value the competition it brings to desktop Linux.
Even if you're the best player in the world, you're gonna suck if you have 30FPS and a controller.
Even if you're top 1%, you're still a LoL peasant.
Even if your team already has 5 widows?
Even if you work?
Even in the very worst case scenario, the cashback will still more than make up my losses.
Even in the winter?
Even less if you duct the hot air to outside your house.
Even less if you factor in Economy 7 hours.
Even less if you factor in not needing to heat your flat any more.
Even less if you factor in the resale value of your cards.
Even more if I CBA to factor in Economy 7 hours.
Even more if you factor in air conditioning cost.
Even more if you factor in the long term decreasing trend of mining profitability.
Even more if you factor in the opportunity cost of not saving/investing your £2,190 in something else.
Even more than men usually.
Even parts they dont' stock?!?!?
Even PC components?
Even rory doesn't have all that.
Even the n word?
Even the P word?
Even the X word?
Even though Corbyn was the democratically elected leader.
Even though crypto is down.
Even though I am contributing the maximum of 17% of my salary, I'm still going to retire into poverty wtf.
Even though I am not a student.
Even though I do.
Even though I earn half as much as you.
Even though I got it a really good UAG case.
Even though I got them cheap tickets through work and gave them a discount on mileage.
Even though I have to borrow money from my grandparents for the next two weeks.
Even though I know fuck all about the candidates, it was a toss up between Labour and Independent. It's pretty ridiculous that our local and national elections are merged like this.
Even though I never actually got any fucking ink on my fucking paper.
Even though I never visit doctorsa.
Even though I sent it back twice lmao.
Even though it was over 2 years ago.
Even though I've barely arbed them.
Even though I've lent her money lots of times.
Even though I went to an indoctrinated school, I don't think any of my classmates are religious.
Even though my H105 took over a month to get to me.
Even though the manufacturer wants me to return to them, Amazon return policy is too good to ignore.
Even though there's a big button in the top-left of Excel which does that.
Even though they are foreign?
even though they get 10% of the total?
Even though they're losing >£100 from me?
Eventually my Fidelio X2 will arrive.
Even wealthier than rory?
Even when it crashes, it won't be cheaper than it is now.
Even when mining.
Even with fingerprint lockscreen, the government can't get into your phone once it runs out of battery.
Even with no savings in there.
Ever since Valve announced a $1.6m tournament for Dota 2.
Every dead person is an additional soldier of the army of the dead.
Every frame starts with the CPU. Commands from the CPU are buffered, and when the GPU is carrying them out faster than they can be sent from the CPU, you are CPU bottlenecked. The opposite is also true. The framerate bottleneck can switch between the CPU and GPU, depending on the game, the graphics settings used, and area of the game. Buy a CPU based on the framerates you want, and buy a GPU based on the graphics settings you want at that framerate..
Every fucking time.
Every game is different.
Every now and then, my screen goes black just for one second or so. What could be causing this?
Everyone assumes I'm doing fuck all.
Everyone can appreciate good headphones.
Everyone can't hear certain frequencies.
Everyone earning more than 50k does IIRC.
Everyone else is shit compared to First Direct.
Everyone else I work with is worse though.
Everyone else uses shitty work-supplied Platronics shit.
Everyone has guns, so the police need to be better armed.
Everyone is a fucking fatass.
Everyone is a little bit racist.
Everyone is a mouthbreather to someone.
Everyone I work with gets paid more than me for the same work.
Everyone just adds a number to the endand increases it.
Everyone knows basic Excel.
Everyone knows that symbol was created by the illuminati.
Everyone loves me lmao.
Everyone should get 20 votes with preferential order.
Everyone there will likely be dead in about 10 years.
Everyone thinks that.
Everyone would be doing it for the tax benefits.
Every president who has started a war has served a second term.
Every Saturday.
Every second the fan spins 67 times.
Everything Apple makes is garbage.
Everything either has stupid earpads or stupid proprietary twist-lock cables.
Everything is okay as long as you don't get caught.
Everything of hers is tiny.
Every time I ask for a raise I'm being told I am so good but they just want to keep underpaying me.
Every time I've upgraded my PC I've underestimated how much power I want/need, and then always craved more.
Every time I withdraw LTC.
Every time you receive or send an email Google is scanning the shit out of it.
Every year.
EVGA?
EVGA has best warranty and step up programme.
ewww.
ewwww I never want an 80 year old gf.
Exactly.
Exactly!
Exactly....
exactly!!!!!!1.
Excel is hrd.
Except be both comfy, good-sounding, and portable at the same time.
Except Dota does it without locking any of the gameplay behind a paywall.
Except for my nephew I guess.
Except for once every month.
Except for pre-recorded TV shows.
Except it's even worse because it's mixed with acid too.
Except it was all belly fat.
Except kill most of them back.
Except my game isn't shit like yours.
Except my Shure SE215s, I'm not sure if I would class them as Hi-Fi.
Except the shit.
Except the weight is bad, the buttons are bad, the sensor is bad, etc.
Except they can be a lot shorter or longer than that.
Except without the length.
Except you accrue points when you pay it.
Exchange I think.
Exchange straight to fiat and use to fund your next rig(s), and buy stocks.
Excluding peripherals.
EXID.
EXID - Ah Yeah.
EXID - Hot Pink.
EXID scam?
EXID - Up & Down.
Existing or new account?
Exit scam.
Exotic and petite.
Expected by 12 Sep.
Expected delivery 19 May, 2016.
Expect the used video card market to get flooded by ex-miner cards soon if this trend continues.
expediateelectronics IIRC.
Expedite Electronics.
Expensive though.
Explain the science pls.
Externalities..
Extra space, extra weight, extra batteries, more cables, etc.
Exygnos processor.
eye-bee-tha sounds so fucking weird to me.
ez.
ez £££.
ez +100KH/s.
ez £200.
Ez no ads without rooting or using shitty adblockers ^^.
F.
f8de9ab38846509892aa4f202b92056908c0da6242c2171aaf502f248324ec11.
Facebook is a recruitment agency now?
Facebook is for losers.
Facebook is not good for your privacy.
Facebook is wayyyyyyyyy to evil though.
Facebook memes are just reposts from Reddit's front page the day before.
Factors unrelated to their weight.
Failing that, I'll dump my gf.
Failing that, I'll try a loan or credit union.
faithfully wtf.
fake.
Falcon Heavy was better.
false,.
Family Guy did an episode about kpop recently.
Famous esports host and former esports athelete.
Fan service?
Faster and cheaper than LTC?
Faster, can attack both my monitors, better AMPDAC, etc.
Faster horses would still be good.
Faster payments is "up to 2 hours" but usually it's done in seconds.
Fastest and best browser.
Fast food is unhealthy, cinemas are shit, supermarket is within walking distance.
Fatally?
Fat power!
Fat sympathiser.
Fed up of running my 1080TI at 100% fan speed.
Fed up with their shit.
Fee is 0.15 to withdraw.
Feel free to order me Dominoes in the mean time though.
Feels good to be rich man.
Fees are around 1.2% IIRC.
Feminism is the enemy of egalitarianism.
Feminists are real pieces of shit.
FF 53 is supposed to reduce crashes.
FF59 is out, FF continues to get better and better!
FF doesn't load the tabs until I click on them.
fffs the snowglobe is aligned *slightly* off compared to the second image, but IDK if that's intentional or not.
FF is way better.
ffs.
FFS.
ffs at least tag it NSFW.
ffs Blizzard get your fucking act together.
FFS CAN'T CONTACTG AMAZON.
ffs can't get cryptonight working on my GTX 970.
ffs can't get it to work.
ffs can't get my phone to start.
ffs customers keep calling me.
ffs doesn't sound like they have a key for me.
ffs don't you fucking hate it when there's a song you like on Spotify but the sound quality is shit so you can't listen to it?
ffs got chest pain now.
ffs have to get my old payslips and claim it backl.
ffs Hermes where the fuck are my parcels.
ffs I am getting really bad chest pain and I can't get an appointment before the 15th. I'm probably going to be dead by then. It's a fucking joke.
ffs I am in the Firefox beta still so it updated me to Firefox 58.
ffs I can't edit the spreadsheet at the same time as my colleague. She asks me to close it so she can make changes, then flames me for not making the changes to the spreadsheet!!!!
ffs I can't get linear scale to look good.
ffs I can't rent anywhere because everyone only wants professionals wtf.
ffs I can't select GBP any more.
ffs I changed someone and now I'm getting "stratum authentication failed".
ffs IDK what I'm going to do with my DT770s.
FFS I DON'T KNOW IF MY PARCEL IS <1KG OR 1-2KG.
ffs I drank too much caffeine, rebuilding my rig is going to be difficult.
ffs if I marry my gf she'll get like £20,000 worth of property from me and I'll get nothing from her.
ffs if the HTC 10 was waterproof I'd definitely buy it, but I'm worried now.
ffs I had a drink in my hand.
ffs I had to submit manual claims to Quidco for Moneyfarm and Nutmeg and it's taking soooooooooo long to get my cashback.
ffs I hate arguing over classifications like they even matter. It's like the whole "video games is not sports" argument all over again.
ffs I hate it when I'm busy doing something and try to respond to someone in IRC but the conversation has already moved on.
ffs I hate it when someone asks me to do something on Excel on their PC and they have a shitload of acceleration on their mouse and their PC is slow to respond.
ffs I have 16 days of leave left and I don't know what to do with them.
ffs I have no internet connection and I'm worried I won't be able to complete this rollover in time.
ffs I have too much cash and IDK where to put it.
ffs I have to pay $29 to renew my PIA subscription soon.
ffs I have to take 4 holidays by the end of May.
ffs I keep accidentally holding a key down on my new mechanical keyboard.
ffs I keep forgetting the names of all the peopl eI work with.
ffs I keep forgetting the names of the people I work with.
ffs I keep getting disconnected.
ffs I keep getting flamed for not getting a report done that isn't even possible in the system.
ffs I keep having to get up and walk around to turn the office lights back on.
ffs I left my spreadsheet at home.
ffs I'm asleep and working during the entire Manila Major.
ffs I'm dead in my left ear.
ffs I'm going to have a massive fucking bill soon. I just printed out like 100 pages in colour because the printer kept outputting the pages without any ink on them.
ffs I'm missing so many good arbs because of work.
ffs I'm recording this fucking webinar and I fucked up at the end because aparently I called the project "test" and there was already a project with that name. and now I have to do the entire fucking take again.
ffs I'm running out of >=3% interest accounts to deposit my cash.
ffs I'm so fucking sick of people telling me this. Just because I have an Asian gf doesn't mean I have yellow fever omg.
ffs I'm stuck in the office all day.
ffs I need to call 1-888-222-4346.
ffs I need to get my car fixed, but I work full time and they don't do work on Saturdays.
ffs I need to send my wallet back to the manufacturer for repair.
ffs I really need a poo but I am worried that my colleague will flame me for leaving my desk for too long.
ffs I really need a wank but I am worried that my colleague will flame me for leaving my desk for too long.
ffs I saved the spreadsheet with one of the filters applied again. I know I'm going to get undeserved criticism for that soon.
ffs I should probably keep living with my parents for another 12 months so I can save up for a house, but my gf wants me to buy one in 6 months.
ffs I still haven't unlocked any of the OW skins I want.
ffs it costs £2.70 to send an item worth £10.
ffs I think Excel is going ot crash again.
ffs I think my PC had a BSoD at 4AM and now my lounge is cold.
ffs it's so fucking annoying.
ffs it's so hard to find time for Dota, CS:GO and soon Overwatch too.....
ffs it's so tempting to buy lots of expensive electronics when I have £10,000 in the bank.
ffs it's such a pain to try and get my money back from the student loans company.
ffs it takes a day for them to respond each time because I can only email when I'm not at work and they can only respond when I am at work.
ffs I want a 6700K and GTX 1080 but I can't afford it.
ffs I want a coffee but I CBA to make everyone else too.
ffs I want to go for a poo but I am worried everyone is going to time me.
ffs I want to leave my desk, find a quiet place, and listen to my Fidelio X2s, but people keep asking me to do work for them :(.
ffs I want to upgrade my PC case and CPU cooler for the summer, but my car insurance, MOT and service is due.
ffs I was rushed to write it down before the birthday girl came back.
ffs I was slacking off at work and now my mum has come home to annoy me.
ffs I was told that since TWICE is not on Spotify, I have to choose another song for the away day.
ffs I wish I didn't add Scott from work on Steam. Now he can see when I open up games when I'm working from home.
ffs I wish I didn't have to package this fucking thing.
ffs I wish it would track and work automatically.
ffs I wish my fucking co-worker would stop changing the lookup names in the spreadsheet.
ffs I wish my parents didn't buy me a proprietary Sony camera because now I can't extract the photos from the proprietary flash storage card.
ffs I wish people would stop adding possessive apostrophes where they are not needed at my work!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!1.
ffs I would buy a flat and marry my gf this year if she didn't want babies. But since she wants babies I might as well just stay living with my mum and dump my gf.
ffs just got blamed for something I didn't do.
ffs lots of Betway arbing matches today but I can't exploit them because I am stuck at work!!!!!!
ffs lots of people have stayed late today so I can't leave early as usual.
ffs my 1080 TI isnt' coming until 15:00 - 16:00.
ffs my 500GB SSD is full.
ffs my car insurance is probably going to cost me over £100 more than it did last year.
ffs my colleagues told my my M50X is leaking too much sound.
ffs my Corsair H105 CPU cooler has arrived but I can't install it until my Ncase M1 arrives from Taiwan.
ffs my co-worker made a mistake and it makes me look bad.
ffs my ebay seller responded and asked me if I want a partial refund.
ffs my gf is angry with me because I don't want to ask my stepdad to borrow money for a house.
ffs my gf is telling me to buy them myself.
ffs my gf wants me to buy her a train ticket.
ffs my GTX 970 is being bottlenecked by my 4.7GHz 4690K.
FFS my GTX 970 is being bottlenecked by my 4.7GHz 4690K.
ffs my internet fucked up yesterday, so I lost a couple of hours of OW skin farming.
ffs my PC makes my room so hot that I get all sweaty and have to game topless.
ffs my salary is going to cause me big problems later in life when I need to start a family and plan for retirement.
ffs my shoelaces are too tight and it's cutting off the circulation to my foot.
ffs my work laptop doesn't shut down when I close the lid too.
ffs noddle doesn't work for me because I'm not registered to vote or something.
ffs no letter yet.
ffs one more thing preventing me from uninstalling Windoze.
ffs on Friday I was told I needed to do a webinar for something but I forgot what it was, and now I'm too embarassed to ask.
ffs people are asking me why I'm laughing and I have to give them some excuse rather than tell them I'm laughing at the stupidity of someone in IRC.
ffs Quidco owes me so much money.
ffs rory_claus.
ffs Skybet gubbed me.
ffs stupid Twitch makes my PC so laggy.
ffs tag it NSFW omg.
ffs that's what I did too.
ffs that tweet is so fucking stupid.
ffs the headband seems a bit kinked.
ffs there's a bank fee of €0.15 to withdraw from Coinbase.
ffs there's too much small talk in my office.
ffs there were plumbers in the toilets which was putting me off my poo so I had to go use another toilets.
ffs they're exploiting my internet addiction.
ffs this isn't soup. I can't eat this at my desk and go to the gym in my lunch hour ffs.
ffs this is the second time Amazon is replacing my Corsair K65 keyboard.
ffs this medication is irritating my stomach.
ffs this tinnitus is FUCKING ANNOYING.
ffs TSB reduced its monthly saver interest rate from 5% to 2%.
ffs when I get married I'll have to give away half my house but still have a massive debt.
ffs why am I paying for my gf's train tickets and everything when I am on minimum wage.
ffs why are do Juan Carlos and YTS torrents have such bad audio quality.
ffs why can't two people edit an Excel file at the same time.
ffs why did I buy 50x50mm thermal pads.
ffs why did I make my username and worker name different.
ffs why does my mum keep linking me Daily Mail articles.
ffs why don't advent calendar manufacturers put the tabs in numerical order to make them easy to find.
ffs why do some companies not publicly show their email address.
ffs why do these domestic violence charities only work for women?
Fiat is good.
Fiat is less traceable though.
Fibre is overkill for Twitch and Youtube.
Fibre is so expensive.....
Fibre is twice as expensive....
ficl.
Fidelio X2 and Sound Blaster E5 is better, and a fraction of the price.
Fidelio X2 is endgame AFAIK?
Fidelio X2s are open cans but with amazing low-end. Your DT770s can't replicate it.
Fidelio X2s have a shitload of bass.
Fidelio X2 + Vmoda Boompro.
File a claim with my credit card company?
filthy casual.
Filthy casual.
Filthy casuals?
Finally CS:GO doesn't have shit sound.
Finally found somewhere I like.
Finally got my fucking headphones.
FINALLY I am back in Paddys Power.
finally I got through.
Finally I spoke to someone who fixed my problem.
Finally managing hundreds of tabs is easy.
FInding a box large enough is a pain in the fucking ass.
Finding a game quickly doesn't mean it's active.
Finding a high-end AMPDAC with a mic input is so hard.
finding a lawyer who get me unbanned lmao.
Finding Dory was good too, but there were too many annoying children at the screening.
Finding the right adapter is hard and expensive.
Find what? K8 offer?
Fire alarm test in 18 minutes.
Firefox has BY FAR the largest market share:marketing ratio.
Firefox has so many addons and features.
Firefox has the best plugins.
Firefox has treetabstyles and tabtree.
Firefox is a real browser wtf.
Firefox is best for power users.
Firefox is better than Chrome IMO.
Firefox is faster.
Firefox is massive despite very little marketing.
Firefox is the best browser.
Firefox plugins are transferring over to a new system soon though.
Firefox's market share is amazing considering Mozilla is such a small company.
Firefox will be the dominant browser once again.
Fire up Nicehack.
First Direct pay 0 interest though.
FIRST IN THE QUEUE MY ASS.
First masternode coin with X16R.
First they're rolling.
fixmyheadphones.co.uk quoted me £70 to do the removable cable mod.
Fix your PC then.
FLAC is lossless.
FLAC is lossless and open source.
FLAC is the best format.
FLAC will work even 1000 years from now.
Flags have become sentient and have hateful thoughts?!?!?!??!?!?!?
flat.
Flat is justice anyway.
flat panels have only recently caught up.
Flat party!!!!
Flirting with me behind my back.
Fluctuating between £25 and £30 mostly.
F.lux.
Fnatic is BY FAR the strongest team.
Fnatic will win MLG.
Focus on framereates first then worry about graphics.
Following so many channels is hard.
Football is for filthy casuals who can't play Dota.
Football is full of corruption and terrible people.
Football is the best.
football matches mostly.
Football matches rent the stadium for single events.
For £30 you could get a sweet 3 course meal with drinks.
For about a year now.
For a few months.
For a graduate job.
For all altcoins?
For all types of clothes?
For amazing Korean food omg.
For an independant tournament especially. That isn't a Valve-sponsored event..
For an S7?
For a pair of headphones, what frequencies do I want the most isolation at for working in an office or commuting?
For a payment of £1 per week, equating to £4.50 deduction from your monthly salary, you can choose an available number which will then be yours for the duration..
For a price.
For a while.
For basic rate tax payers, you can earn £1,000 untaxed interest a year.
For bitcoins.
For buyers or sellers?
For buying a GTX 1080TI.
For CPU cooling.
Foreign>English.
for free!
For free?
For fun.
For gaming, definitely.
Forget about it.
Forget GPUs, get ASICs.
For getting married.
For good reason.
Forgot about that.
Forgot that UC is the shit one.
Forgot to buy cables.
Forgot to mention that.
Forgot to remove the other one sorry.
Forgot you haven't seen it yet.
For graphics cards yeah.
For home listening, I'll probably be satisfied.
For how many months?
For ISPs.
For lag purposes?
For lease or to keep?
For like £3.
For low bearing noise on my fans.
for lunch.
For market price? Why?
For MBing I guess.
For more framerate?
For most people I recommend 16GB because RAM is so cheap now.
For my car.
For new accounts.
For now.
For only £127!!!
For PIA.
for resale?
For sharing.
For smoking cannabis.
For Some reason filtering isn't enough, I'm being asked to copy paste the values to another document.
For spreadsheets and shit I guess.
For the Britain First retweet?
For the mortgage.
For the vendor.
For video games and energy drinks.
For what?
For what?>.
For what to to be worth it?
For you maybe.
For your phone?
Founders = reference.
Four bass settings.
FPS genre.
FPTP is pretty broken.
Framerate>pretty skins.
freaky.
Free 3 month membership with Taste Card.
Free Battle Cup entry this weekend!
Free borrowing is the best kind of borrowing.
Free Delivery - 1st Class Post (1-2 working days).
Free electricity!
Free for only three months?
Free heat.
Free heating!
Free hex key set!
Free holiday for me!
Free horse shit for everyone.
Free is good!!!!
Freemium business models are retarded.
Freemium with p2w elements.
Free money and a job.
Free money for you?
Free movement between the UK and China would be amazing.
freenode doesn't have one.
free overdraft with Nationwide?
Free overdraft you can generate interest on.
French ecstacy.
French press?
Frequently.
fresh GRLC down.
Fresh GRLC went down, so I changed my .bat to include a failover pool.
Friction is a force which limits movement.
Fridges create more heat than cold.
From 5% to 12%.
From a list, but also dates.
from a user’s device are ever physically compromised, they cannot be.
From excitement and caffeine.
From Fletcher @ Valve.
From LIDL.
From my health plan.
From my manager.
From reviews!!!!!!!1.
From the motherboard.
From the reviews I read, the E5 is worth it for the amp alone.
From the sounds of it, you don't deserve a higher mmr.
From the whites I guess?
From where? I couldn't find it cheaper than £100.
From who?
fuck.
Fuck.
FUCK.
Fuck 10.3 is low.
fuck ads srsly.
Fuck all basically.
FUCK AMAZON IN THE FUCKING FACE.
FUCK ANTIBIOTICS.
Fuck brand loyalty, just buy whatever is the best and most suitable product at the time ffs.
fuck brexit.
fuck Brexit.
Fuck BTC.
fuck cash.
fuck child support srsly it's my worst nightmare.
Fuck Chinese.
Fuck dailies, that shit turned me off Hearthstone.
Fuckers.
Fuck external DACs.
FUCK facebook.
Fuck FIFA.
FUCK FUCK FUCK FUCK.
fuck game omg.
FUCK GLOBAL WARMING.
fuck google and its fucked up URLs.
Fuck GWR.
Fuck Hermes.
fuck horses.
Fuck I accidentally a £25 bet using my main balance instead of my free bet.
FUCK I accidentally have a positive credit card balance.
Fuck I can't get Travelodge cashback?>.
fuck I dropped my beyers and the ear cup fell off.
Fuck, I forgot to keep my prescription receipts.
fuck I got my phone's speaker wet and now it doesn't play sound.
fuck I just farted near all my colleagues.
Fuck I love smoothies.
Fuck I love smoothiews.
Fuck, I'm about to get a lot poorer.
fuck im depressed.
FUCK I'm going to be a VIP at Royal Air Tattoo whilst the ESL One Cologne final is on.....
fuck im hungry.
fuck I'm jealous.
Fuck I'm just throwing hardware at the problem at this point.
Fuck import fees.
Fuck, I'm running out of bank accounts to stash my savings.
fuck I'm so hungry and I don't have time to go to the gym and go to LIDL.
fuck im so rekt.
Fucking 2ghz dual core CPU too.
Fucking 2X8GB DDR4 3200mhz.
Fucking 30 round autosniper.
Fucking £5 milkshake wtf.
fucking aimbot.
fucking aimbotter.
Fucking bargain.
Fucking Betfair owes me like £52 cashback.
Fucking BGO still not tracked, I'm going to have to submit a claim.
Fucking bills though.
Fucking Brexit.
Fucking capitalism.
Fucking cheap as fuck endgame headphones.
fucking cisgendered shitlord.
Fucking collusion with the mobile broadband industry.
Fucking confused.
Fucking Conservative Party.
Fucking console peasants.
fucking Coral aren't giving me my fucking free bets.
fucking coral keeps giving me casino bonuses.
Fucking crazy.
Fucking degenerate.
Fucking directors, why do they always want things from me.
fucking dirty slavs.
Fucking DPD kept bouncing me between each other.
fucking drug addict.
Fucking druggie.
fucking druggie NEET.
fucking Excel crashed.
Fucking exhausted because I lived in a noisy household.
Fucking EXID strategy.
Fucking expensive though.
fucking foreigners.
Fucking frustrating.
Fucking Game has me on hold for over 15 minutes now.
fucking gay.
Fucking good.
Fucking government hasn't given me any social security for my period of unemployment.
Fucking hell.
Fucking hell Apple support is weird.
Fucking hell Hermes are bad.
fucking hell I can't copy it.
fucking hell internet is expensive.
fucking hell it's noisy in my office this morning.
Fucking hell I was told my car isn't visible in the CCTV footage and they have deleted it, but they showed me today's footage with a car in the same spot that is clearly visible.
Fucking hell Starbucks venti mocha is nice.
Fucking hell that subreddit is so retarded.
fucking hell the amount of spam from 888 is crazy.
fucking hell the amount of times I say "good morning" every day pisses me off.
Fucking hell they're bad.
Fucking hell why does my mum insist on buying a new BT router whenever I work from home.
fucking heretic.
fucking HSBC don't want me as a customer. I went to them today and they told me that because my salary isn't £1,750, they would not let me open an account.
Fucking idiot.
Fucking idiots.
fucking ignorant.
Fucking Intel and their monopoly.
Fucking laser sight AK and automatic shotgun.
Fucking legal taking forever.
Fucking live within your means omfg.
fucking lol.
fucking love exbc.
Fucking love Monero devs.
Fucking love those chocolates.
Fucking misogonist.
fucking monkeys.
Fucking nephew running up and down corridor screaming.
Fucking Origin cancelled my Fibre order and I have to wait another 10-14 working days.
fucking Paddy Power just gubbed me.
Fucking Paddys Power is so useless. I've been trying to get into my account for like a month now.
fucking panic alarm test, why don't they warn us before they do that.
Fucking pathetic.
Fucking pay is going down every year.
fucking petrol prices.
Fucking quotas.
fucking racist.
Fucking restarting takes like 20 minutes.
Fucking rich rory beats me again.
Fucking right man.
fucking Sandra is trying to get me back to 888poker now.
Fucking sellout.
FUCKING SERIOUSLY?!?!??!
Fucking sheeple.
Fucking shitty government won't give me my benefits.
fucking speed limit*.
fucking student loans.
Fucking sudden.
fucking tag your shit.
Fucking tiny case too.
Fucking Toals gubbed me lmao.
Fucking Tories discriminating against blind people, it makes me fucking sick.
Fucking TSB just exit scammed £4k from me omg.
fucking useless laptop.
Fucking weeb game.
fucking weird flavour.
Fucking white people music.
Fucking Windoze defender keeps deleting it.
fucking world results omg the import tax is hidden so it's impossible to find what's actually a good deal.
Fuck, I only have £420 to last me until September.
fuck I think I just broke our system.
Fuck it I give up.
Fuck it's expensive but I want amazing m-itx performance.
Fuck it's got so many uses.
Fuck it's so good.
Fuck it's so long.
fuck, I use openmailbox.org.
Fuck I've already got an account with them.
fuck I've gained weight.
Fuck I've got too much TV to watch.
Fuck Jimmy Kimmel he's ruining /r/gifs.
FUCK just crashed my car.
fuckkkkk maybe I do have depression.
fuck knows what my encryption key actually is.
Fuck knows what they want.
fuck man.
FUCK MONDAY.
Fuck, my co workers says that there are mistakes with the conditional formatting, so we're going back to changing formatting manually when dates expire and things.....
FUCK my health plan just reset.
fuck MyHermes.
FUCK MYHERMES.
Fuck my job, so glad I have 10 days off.
fuck my life.
Fuck, my nephew is about 6 today and I don't have a gift for him.
fuck my shit wifi.
Fuck my work is so busy right now.
FUCK my XLR to 3.5mm adapter hasn't arrived.
Fuck Nationwide srsly.
FUCK Nationwide won't lend me the full amount of my Decision in Principle.
FUCK Nationwide won't lend me the full amount of my Dichkead in Principle.
Fuck NiceHack.
fuck no.
Fuck no, I will get them smellier and smellier.
fuck off.
fuck off Intel.
fuck off omg.
Fuck off omg.
fuck off you creepy cunt omg.
fuck off you fucking weeb.
Fuck off you Katie Hopkins fetishist.
fuck off you mapple shill.
fuck off you race traitor.
fuck off you racist.
fuck off you troll.
fuck on-ear.
Fuck Origin.
FUCK ORIGIN.
Fuck other games.
Fuck other people.
Fuck PAYE.
Fuck paying for 10 different video suppliers though.
fuck people who are anti-PC.
Fuck, RBS is lowering their rate from 3% to 2%.
fuck sake.
Fuck sake.
fuck sake Amazon.
fuck sake apparently there are credit card fees when I use my card for gambling.
fuck sake Bulwark.
Fuck sake, current account interest is dropping so hard right now.
fuck sake Firefox keeps crashing.
fuck sake Hermes.
fuck sake I can't stop winning at Coral.
fuck sake I fail at sed.
fuck sake I forgot my can of soup this morning so now I have to order a sandwich from the sandwich van.
fuck sake I forgot to bring a t-shirt into work so now I can't got to the gym today.
fuck sake I have the old number of a neighbourhood officer.
fuck sake I have to leave the router connected 24/7 for 10 days but my gf wouldn't let me plug it in the right place because the TV and Sky are connected to those sockets.
fuck sake I have to prove my capital to the job centre but it's split over like 100 different accounts.
fuck sake I'm guilty by association.
Fuck sake I saved the spreadsheet with a filter activated again. I'm going to get told off so much for that.
fuck sake I think I just overdosed on caffeine.
fuck sake I think it's the Gibson model.
fuck sake I think my phone might have just died.
FUCK SAKE IT'S CARDIO TODAY BUT I FORGOT MY FUCKING IEMS.
Fuck sake I was in a rush to get back to my desk before the minute of silence starts that I put too much milk in my tea.
Fuck sake I was too slow to order my sandwich because the sandwich van has already left.
fuck sake just went over my credit card limit.
Fuck sake looks like Teresa May is gonna be the next PM.
fuck sake lost my work.
fuck sake man.
Fuck sake my brother has osteoarthiritus.
Fuck sake my coffee keeps going cold.
fuck sake my internet connection died mid-call.
fuck sake my manager bought me the red milk from LIDL instead of the green.
Fuck sake now I have too many high importance emails.
FUCK SAKE OMFG.
fuck sake polarised lenses are fucking expensive.
fuck sake rory.
fuck sake rory get your shit together.
FUCK SAKE SOMEONE STOLE MY MILK FROM THE FRIDGE.
fuck sake Spotify is using power faster than my phone can charge.
Fuck sake the house is sold already.
Fuck sake, the "in" and "out" on my ground loop isolator is the wrong way. I'll have to buy an adaptor.....
fuck sake there's lots of noise.
FUCK SAKE THIS SHITTY 13 YEAR OLD VERSION OF VISIO DIDN'T SAVE MY WORK PROPERLY.
fuck sake why does my co-worker do weird things like replace the formula I created in a cell with words like "trend" and shit.
fuck sake why is openmailbox down all the time.
Fuck service charges.
Fuck spending shitloads on rent.
FUCK SUMMER.
Fuck Teresa May our next power-hungry self-centered bitch PM.
fuck that.
Fuck that.
Fuck that holiday so much.
fuck that noise.
FUCK THaTS AMAZING OMG.
fuck that's expensive.
Fuck that shitcoin.
fuck that's lucky.
Fuck the 3,333 song download limit btw.
Fuck the board of directors.
Fuck the Daily Mail.
Fuck them, they can hire someone else and pay them more for a lower quality person.
fuck, the other person in charge of managing our procurement system is going on leave all week.
Fuck these B365 in-play football offers are fucking good.
Fuck these disconnections.
Fuck the sun.
Fuck this AC.
Fuck this government srsly.
fuck this is complicated.
FUCK THIS PIECE OF SHIT COMPUTER.
FUCK THIS STUPID SHIT.
FUCK TINNITUS.
Fuck touchpads fucking useless invention.
Fuck unemployment.
fuck veganism.
fuck water.
Fuck web apps.
fuck white people.
fuck work.
fuck working 5 days a week.
FUCK YEAH GETTING MY NCASE M1 TOMORROW.
fuck you.
Fuck you.
Fuck you and your pizza ignorance.
fuck you and your puns.
fuck you idiot.
fuck you missed it.
fuck you poor pleb.
fuck you're lucky.
fuck you rory.
FUCK YOU SRSLY.
fuck you trolls, I'm going to the gym.
Fuel has gone up in price a lot recently.
fufck sake.
full price retail game.
Fully comp, no black box.
Functioned perfectly, but it looked like shit.
Funds.
FUNDS YOU ARE INVESTED IN.
Fun is good.
Futurama.
g1=0&accessibility_rating2=5.
G440.
G4400.
G4560 is a good CPU.
Gabe actually hinted about HL3 and L4D3 coming.
gambling?
Game.
game design from 2003?
Game of Thrones is pretty good.
Gameplay-affecting things.
Gamers are forced to buy Intel still.
Games like Clash of Clan make so much £££ because they have so many whales.
Games with actual hardcore playerbases include Dota, Starcraft, and Quake.
Game that isn't play to win? Dota.
Gaming benchmarks duh.
Gaming is all about soundstage and detail and balanced EQ.
Gaming is the main thing holding me back atm.
Gaming keyboards are usually just mechanical keyboards with a windows lock key and RGB lighting.
Gaming mice too.
gaming/mining.
Gaming needs clockspeed.
Gaming on a laptop sucks.
Gaming only brings my CPU up to 60C whereas X264 takes it up to 75C.
Gaming PC or cute Asian girl I guess.
garlic bread memes wtf?
Garlic has lost so much value if it loses more I will stop mining it.
Garlic profitability has been on a downwards trend though. If it continues, it definitely won't be more profitable than Nicehack.
Garlic spiked in price yesterday???
Garlic transactions are fast.
gay.
GBP doesn't exist?
Gcj1T1DZsT5LJPk3zDCWiwSBgJkUtzRwx3.
Gcj1T1DZsT5LJPk3zDCWiwSBgJkUtzRwx3 	1806 	0 	100% 	0.021 	394.72 KH.
gdax.
gdax?
gdax/coinbase prices are so much better than bittylicious/localbitcoins.
gdax doesn't support VTC.
gdax especially since the trading fees are low too.
gdax is best IMO.
gdax is way better.
gdax looks a lot like the Steam market.
gdax prices are higher.
gdax will be hacked before you sell your BTC.
GDP is a flawed concept.
Gedit is best.
geeez don't be so cynical m9!
Gender discrimination is illegal.
Generally updating your graphics driver is not worth the hassle of a potential regression unless it's a game-ready driver for a new game you want to play.
Generic platforming game.
genitalia.
genre purity wat?
George Washington didn't need a party.
German engineering is superior to your cheap Chinese shit.
Germany is in a very good place today because of Hitler.
Germany I think?
Get 1080p then downscale from 4k.
Get 16.04 desktop.
Get 300FPS it's so good.
get a 1080p 240hz.
Get a 240hz gsync monitor.
Get a 240hz monitor and run it at 238FPS.
Get a 500GB SSD for £90.
Get a 5GHz CPU.
Get a 7700K and a GTX 1080.
Get a can of compressed air and blow it out.
Get a Fiio E10K then.
Get a G3258 or whatever it is and OC it to like 5GHz.
Get a higher refresh rate monitor.
Get a life.
Get a m.2 SSD for way cheaper than a PCI-E SSD lmao.
Get an Accelero III and put two ML120s on it.
Get an assymetrical barbell then?
Get an itx board and an Ncase or Phanteks or something then.
Get a Red Bull + meaty sandwich and meaty snack.
Get a Samsung Galaxy S7/S8.
Get a shitty low salary like mine then see how much tax you pay.
Get a tasty 30% friends and family discount.
Get a themometer they're cheap.
Get a used one for £70-£80.
Get a Zowie G-TFX.
Get dat Thermal Grizzly Kryonaut.
Get into a corridor and aim shotgun down it usually works quite well.
Get into CS:GO or Overwatch or Dota.
Get like £250 back haha.
Get lots of beans and all that nice shit.
Get lots of free money.
Get Moneyfarm too. Moneyfarm is actually a really good platform.
Get one big paycheck and overpay on student loan.
GET ON WITH IT!
Get ready to lose all your rights.
Get some CIEMs.
Get some decent headphones m9.
Get some proper Beyers.
Get Stremio Circle.
Gets you gubbed.
Get the Beyerdynamic Custom Studio.
Get the big one.
Get the cashback.
Get the COPs/CustomStudios, changing the pads is super easy.
Get the delidded one.
get the E5 then!!!!
Get the MX-4.
Get the sugar free one.
Getting 190-300.
Getting 400+ FPS on lowest graphics really requires a beast of a CPU.
getting >50% contribution from my employer is something I can't beat.
Getting a full refund.
Getting CubanPete's headphones.
Getting one tomorrow and one on Thursday.
Getting some ebay feedback is good for future sales thoughg.
Getting so much profit with them right now.
Getting the ball rolling. I measured the box and ordered my replacement parts.
Getting through to a real person is way easier than other banks though.
Getting worried....
get your shit together.
gfs are expensive.
gf too.
gf too omg.
GHCQ will log it, then it will be used against me in 10 years.
Giffgaff is unlimited data, minutes and texts for £20 a month.
Gilmore Girls?
Gimme dat LTC.
Girl's Day - Expect.
Girl's Day - Female President.
Girls don't have penises.
Girls like SMFCs.
GIVE A FUCKING YEAR OMG.
Give it another 10-20 years.
Give it a rest, you troll.
Give it to someone else.
Give me 0.008834985 LTC each.
Give me 0.0705 LTC.
Give me 11 X 0.38 GBP.
Give me £7.
give me an interview pls.
Give me dat 35k + car pls.
Give me fiat.
Give me invite then.
Give me my money pls.
Give me promos pls.
Give me referral pls.
Give me the Graze boxes pls.
Give shitty anecdotesa.
Gives me an opportunity to stretch my legs during 8 hours of sitting at my desk every day though.
Gives you better detail and positioning.
Gives you the largest surface area for mousepad, monitors, etc.
Give them bad advice about handling electricity?
Give them to me if you don't want them.
Give us a referendum on that.
Giving them an advantage.
Global Top 50.
gmail is a new provider.
Gmail is for NSA fags.
Gnome Shell, after a few customisations, is srsly nice now.
Go ask Blizzard.
Go ask Jeff Kaplan.
Go build a version of Multi Pool Miner that allows 0% donation pls.
Go build me a 0 % donation xmrig pls.
Go buy a big bag of strawberry or something.
Go cash it in now!!!!!!
God Amazon support are being retarded atm.
God damn russian hackers ruining democracy for everyone.
God doesn't exist lmao.
God doesn't exist omg.
God help us all.
God I'd hate to work at Tesco for 5 years.
God I hate my new managers.
god I have so many headphones now.
God I have to do so many workarounds because this workbook is made so badly.
god I hope mobile esports doesn't grow fast and become the dominant platform.
god im so high.
God I must have cost Tesco so much money by opening lots of accounts to switch them.
God it's awful.
God it was horrible.
God made you suffer for a reason, so you have no excuse.
God my Beyer DT770s sound amazing on my Creative E5.
God my profit is so bad this month.
Go download itr.
Go download xmrig.
god portable ampdacs are so inconvenient.
God that's false advertising ass fuclk.
God these cashback sites are fucking slow.
God they are retarded and have no social awareness. Ofc we have high specs because we're trying to min max!!!
God they're so fucking good man.
God they're so stupid.
God this is going to take forever.
God who thought that poster would be a good idea?
God why are people so irresponsible.
god why is the sound quality of these phone calls so bad?
god yolandi is so ugly.
god you creep me out.
god your retarded.
god your such a troll.
God you sound like such a shill.
Goes up to 16 in 2 hours.
gogo.
Go have dinner with rory.
Going to Boots.
Going to find out tomorrow.
Going to have to pay my bills by direct debit.
Going to Ibiza.
Going to install it this weekend.
Going to London.
Going to Seoul.
Going to set up an economy 7 mining rig haha.
Going to use that instead now.
GOING UP RORY.
go karting?
Go KFC.
Go KFC instead then.
Go look at Spotify Top 50 if you don't believe me.
Go mine garlic.
GO MINE MONERO.
Gonna be a cool kid.
Gonna be a problem when I'm mining in the summer.
Gonna be buying all my own groceries and stuff.
Gonna be cool and quiet even with 500FPS.
Gonna be sick.
Gonna be so busy!!!!
Gonna be so upset if I'm either charged it it's not fixed.
Gonna bet on sooner and bigger events and not obscure events 1 week in advance too.
Gonna build a fucking amazing gaming PC.
Gonna build my mining rig today.
Gonna buy a house really soon now.
Gonna buy another one for the other monitor.
Gonna buy my next CPU and monitor second hand.
Gonna buy two 850W PSUs.
Gonna buy waterproof next time.
Gonna calculate my profits accurately.
Gonna clean my protein shaker then go home I think.
Gonna collect some drugs on the way home.
gonna disconnect from the ethernet now.
Gonna do it in the kitchen in case I need to throw up in the sink.
Gonna do that.
Gonna do the same with Lloyds too but get free cinema tickets instead.
Gonna drive my mum to places because I live at home for free.
Gonna fill up my Nationwide current account probably.
gonna finish in 10 mins.
Gonna free up a shitload of space on my desk.
Gonna free up some space on my desk.
Gonna get £102 from student loans company and £100 from Halifax though.
Gonna get 2 bedrooms and get a lodger to pay my mortgage.
Gonna get 2 beta keys sent to me soon.
Gonna get a £50 free bet from Mr Green some time this month.
Gonna get all the OW halloween skins.
Gonna get all the OW skins.
Gonna get another quote.
Gonna get an S7/S8 instead.
Gonna get a ranking in Overwatch.
Gonna get dat Tesco 3% interest.
Gonna get Fidelio X2 at some point too.
Gonna get into as much CC debt as I can and just keep it in instant access accounts.
Gonna get into like 30k of credit card debt.
Gonna get on it this week.
Gonna get ripped ass fuck.
Gonna get some fat interest payments soon ^^.
Gonna get so much more FPS.
Gonna get stoozing.
Gonna get the highest-end board too this time.
Gonna get the morning after pill in the morning.
Gonna give Google all my card details.
Gonna give MultiPoolMiner a try.
Gonna give them to a colleague to test for me probably.
Gonna go back to 5.1GHz once I get a new GPU and cooling system.
Gonna go do a fat dump brb.
Gonna go for my pre-workout poo now.
Gonna go home and mail you a microphone now.
Gonna have a fun day out in one of our other offices.
Gonna have even more after I get paid.
Gonna have lots of holiday.
Gonna have over £17k in a week from now.
Gonna have to spend £150 for a product which I initially only paid £50 for.
Gonna have to withdraw another couple of thousand from the bookies I think :(.
Gonna heat my house this winter using my 1080TI.
Gonna hit $24m I reckon.
Gonna hold onto 5 until April.
Gonna install it on my GTX 970 now.
Gonna invest at lowest risk until I get my cashback then withdraw it all.
Gonna invite lots of Chinese grills.
Gonna keep building it up until I'm £20k in debt.
Gonna keep my DT770s at the office as my office pair I think.
Gonna last me over a year probably.
Gonna level up in CS:GO.
Gonna liquidate what I have left.
Gonna lose my no claims discount too.
gonna mine/hodl for now.
Gonna mod them.
Gonna need to mod these pads.
Gonna need to open some RBS accounts too soon at this rate.
Gonna open another S&S ISA next month to claim more cashback.
Gonna order brand new ones.
Gonna play video games on Wednesdays.
Gonna plug my M50X into my V-Moda Boompro into my Creative E5 into my gaming PC tonight.
Gonna put a Corsair H105 AIO CPU cooler inside a 12.6 litre case hahahahha.
Gonna put a custom heatsink and fans on it.
Gonna put a new cable in it.
Gonna put my IEMs in.
Gonna put myself forwards as official hotel booking person for the business.
Gonna reclaim the space on my desk so I can work from home.
Gonna reign in my spending to buy a flat.
GONNA RELCIAM MY DESK.
Gonna return these.
Gonna return this one.
Gonna save up 552 euros and pay for a honeymoon at a 5 star all inclusive hotel.
Gonna save up to 550 euros and pay for a 5 star all inclusive hotel in Ibiza.
Gonna set a minimum income on it to only mine when profitable.
Gonna settle with the free TV my parents are giving me for now.
Gonna share it with my friend brb.
Gonna spend £3k on a kick-ass mining rig.
Gonna spend around £3k.
Gonna stick to these really high-profile games.
Gonna take it to Seoul with me.
Gonna take my paycheck and move it all into another account.
Gonna try again with some apple sauce later.
Gonna turn off hardware acceleration and see if that helps.
Gonna use Chrome for IRC now.
Gonna use the mining profits to pay off the credit card.
Gonna watch MLG on the toilet.
Gonna win me some money.
Gonna withdraw to gdax and exchange it every few weeks probably.
GO OC it some more.
Good.
GOOD.
Good, catching it early is important to your chances of survival.
Good choice on the KFC though m9 it's some good shit.
Good CPU but shit GPU.
Good DAC.
Good detective work.
Good enough for 60FPS in CS:GO, Dota, Overwatch, Rocket League, etc.
Good for finances.
Good for heating my house.
Good for the winter though.
Good for video conferencing too.
Good headphones will hold its value in UK.
Good idea, if I can find a used one.
Good idea, I know she wants a 2 bedroom house.
Good idea m9.
Good IEMs>Backbeat Pros.
Good it's hell.
Good job.
Good job government.
Good job man now tell me if you did the Ladbrokes offer.
Good job voting for him.
Good little hygrometer.
Good luck.
Good luck anyway.
Good luck getting a job then.
Good luck getting insurance for £1.
Good luck m9.
Good luck man.
Good luck trying to time the market.
Good luck when your house burns up in fire.
Good news.
good news m9.
Good news! Your order will be on its way to you very soon. We're just packing it at the moment and will email you again when it's shipped." - 4 days ago.
goodnight m9.
Good one.
Good point.
Good point, I guess we can't actually retaliate against them then.
Good price for £127?
Good products, like Beyerdynamic headphones, Zowie mice, etc, don't put names on their products and focus on good engineering instead.
Good sound quality makes poverty more bearable.
Good starter spinner then.
Good then.
Good thing I didn't commit too much time.
Good thing I have contents insurance then.
Good thing I realised before I withdrew from MPH.
Good thing I realised before someone stole it.
Good thing Iresa is going to fix mine for 12 months.
Good thing Thailand, China and Korea aren't in SEA then.
Good thing what is over?
Google allows you to download like 50k songs.
Google Certified Shops.
Google has big branding with their websites and Android products.
Google isn't even in the top 50.
Google is tracking you.
Google it, there's a guide that's fairly simple.
Google Photos backs those up.
Googling the error message didn't help.
Go on holiday or something?
Go out with a bang?
Go play Red Alert.
Go see one.
Go set up a pool then.
Got 12 on the way now.
Got 15 garlic.
Got 20 garlics.
Got 225.9819 RVN.
Got 270 garlic.
Got 3 1070 TIs now though.
Got 324 KH/s on my 970 now.
Got £3720 to put somewhere now.
Got 4 1070 TIs.
Got 5.5k gold to spend.
Got 6 GPUs running now.
Got 6 X 1070 TIs.
Got £700 on there now.
Got a bit of a drive home.
Got a call from my manager.
Got a dog called Purdey.
Got a link to a 60hz Hobbit torrent?
Got a lot of free food from HR.
Got ~a month and two weeks left to wait.
Got an email titled "Your William Hill Account".
Got an HTC One M9 and a Samsung Galaxy A3 2016 now.
Got an HTC One M9 atm.
got a phone call from the mortgage consultant after 25 mins on the crosstrainer.
Got a pic?
Got a pic/video of the movement?
Got a shitload of GBP ATM, and soon will have a shitload of GTX 1070 TIs.
Got a wedding and seeing my gf this weekend though.....
Got credit card and paypal.
Go tell Elon he's an idiot then.
Got fed up of telling them to stop giving me benefitds.
Got home, can't reproduce the problem.
Got it.
Got lots to do atm.
Got married.
Got more important stuff to do first.
Got my K702 and M50X modded to be Boompro-compatible :).
Got my new Beyers!
got my one to one in 5 mins.
Go to a kpop concert in London instead?
Got out of bed, stood on a dumbell I left near my bed, put all my weight onto a concentrated spot, and scarred it.
Got over £550 on my Coral account now fuck.
Got pics?
Got SE215s, DT770s and K702s.
Got some cucumbers and humous right now.
Got some fucking ear pain too.
Got some Monacoin now.
Got some Monero now too.
Got some spare velour earpads for extra comfort too.
Got so much in gambling sites too.
Gotta find somewhere to hoard it.
Gotta get those DT770 pads though.
Gotta HODL until tomorrow then.
Gotta keep the profit coming for a while.
Gotta login between 11AM and 3PM to use my free spins.
Gotta play until $13 is gone then.
Got that cash flow problem.....
Got them connected to desk-mounted display arms so the stupid stands don't take up all the space on my desk.
Got to call SLC to ask for a refund again ffs.
Got to figure out how to make my graphics card stop being noisy as fuck.
Got to find a lighter now.
Got to finish work first.
Got to go to Brighton and buy my gf lots of shit.
Got to install some dust filters and hard drives and do some cable management.
Got to put furniture in it too.
Got to set up my powerline adapter again later too ffs.
Got to wait until December so I get some good shit for my birthday.
Got to wait until the end of the tax year though.......
Got to walk dog now bye.
GOT WORK TODAY FUCK.
Got your CPU yet?
Government crackdown on personal freedom.
Government initiatives to expand the popularity of K-pop are mostly undertaken by the Ministry of Culture and Tourism, which is responsible for the establishment of dozens of Korean Cultural Centers worldwide..
GPS?
GPU*.
GPU and monitor are my bottlenecks ATM though.
GPU manufacturers are reputable, and you're not at the mercy of bitcoin price fluctuations, and gamers will still want to buy your cards when they're no longer profitable.
GPU prices going down.
GPUs?
GPUs are pretty resilient, I don't think it'll be a problem.
GPUs are still good for mining currencies, just not bitcoin.
GPUs are the safest asset.
graduate account?
Granted, LastPass’s implementation of autofill in browser is much better and it even lets you do that in apps (check out the video below to see how it all works). KeePass is cumbersome but free..
graphics driver crash.
Great.
Great for mining.
Great for summer, shit for this weather.
Great mining tariff.
Great news! Your claim has been successful. All that's left is for the  retailer to pass the cashback on to us with the next few weeks..
Great news! Your claim has been successful. All that's left is for the retailer to pass the cashback on to us with the next few weeks. You can keep up to date with this in your Activity tab..
Great time to start with Grand National coming up.
Greggs is pretty awful.
Grimsby is pretty bad.
GRLC did well last night.
GRLC is a good investmenrt.
GRLC price going up.
GRLC TO THE MOON.
GRLC uses Allium now which is not on Nicehack.
Gross=before deductions, net=after deductions.
Ground loop problem.
Group stage starts today.
gsync only applies when your framerate is below what the monitor is capable of outputting.
gsync performs better than freesync which is sad.
gsync switched to vsync above 142.
gsync switches to vsync above 142.
GTAV? That game is expensive.
GTX 1070 TI.
GTX 1080TI?
GTX 1080TI would be a good investment, I need dat sweet bitcoin.
GTX 960 isn't bad.
GTX 970.
gubbed by Betway.
Guernsey too.
Guess I get a £20 kebab then.
Guess I have a couple more days to wait.
Guess I have like two weeks to wait....
guess so.
Guess who has Fidelio X2s now omg.
Guns ARE a problem.
Guns make it very easy to kill people.
GW2 is popular in China too. I remember seeing Chinese students at uni playing it.
GYcjKoBFMo33pSxRN2daLfGexWkfwdDXsa.
GYM TIME.
GYM TIME BE BACK LATER.
GYM TIME NOW BBL.
gym time now bye.
GYM TIME NOW BYE.
gysync.
H100 isn't really mediocre.
HA.
haahahahahaha I'm just wearing tracksuits and a t-shirt. I hope nobody tries to webcam call me.
had*.
Had it on my watchlist for a while.
Had lots of poopchairs come in full of shit.
Had no idea it'd take this long.
Had them boxed since.
Had to bring in my own mousepad and keyboard.
Had to call him again, I felt like such a fucking tool.
Had to change a line in the script to override the configuration. Now I just need a 0 donation xmrig.
Had to do Windoze updates.
Had to fix it.
Had to get back to Reddit.
Had to open the fucking developer console.
Had to pay for my gf's train ticket too.
Had to shut it down before I got arrested.
Had to turn off anti virus and firewall.
haha.
Haha.
haha 1k scrub.
haha and all my work gives me is a crappy Nokia.
Haha be sure to make a joke about that in the interview.
haha Beyer calls the COPs "Headphones 2.0".
haha did anyone see that MP who made a speech in parliament about how people aren't angry about tax avoidance, they just hate rich people?
haha FD do an exit bonus too.
haha funny you should say that, I think I have a new bottleneck now.
haha Grimsby looks funny.
HAHAHAA BABY.
hahahaaha £120.
hahaha did you get a bit excited there?
hahahaha.
hahahahaa.
hahahaha Daily Mail supports Hitler.
hahahaha did you see Hodor at the Manila Major?
hahahahaha.
HAHAHAHAHA 69.
hahahahahaa.
HAHAHAHAHAA Iota lives in Brighton and skates.
hahahahaha apparently everyone here thinks I am free to talk when I have my headphones on.
hahahahahah.
hahahahahaha.
hahahahahahaha]#.
hahahahahahaha yeah.
hahahahahaha I got pirated MS Office 2010 with Outlook and Lync all working on my gaming PC with my double monitors and monitor arms.
hahahahahaha I know right.
hahahahahahhaa.
hahahahahah the leader of the racists has resigned.
hahahahaha I just paid £5 off my Credit card.
hahahahaha I just won the Data Protection quiz in front of the CEO and most people in my office.
hahahahaha I love how the sunk cost fallacy causes so many people to make illogical decisions.
hahahahaha it's all black people.
HAHAHAHAHA NEAL BLOUT.
hahahahaha our CEO just walked past my desk.
hahahahaha Samsung just sent me an email asking to meet me.
hahahahaha the bord meeting finishes at 420.
hahahahaha Uzbekistan is beating USA.
hahahahaha why?
hahahahaha Windoze always sets the clock wrong by 1 hour when booting into it from Linux wtf.
hahahahaha your gf is a nurse?
hahahahahha.
hahahahahhaa.
hahahahahhaah.
hahahahahhaaha I wonder why she's doing it then.
hahahahahhahahhaa.
hahahahahha I bet you wish you could.
hahahahah my colleague was just boasting how her phone has 64gb.
hahahaha I could only dream of 21k.
hahahaha I did it.
hahahaha I'm not much of a whisky drinker, so I would never have good whisky.
Hahahaha I'm thinking of doing the opposite.
hahahaha my gym membership is deducted from my salary.
hahahaha personal personal computer.
hahahaha rekt.
hahahaha sure m9.
hahahaha that white bitch.
hahahaha "trump".
hahahaha would be so funny if I applied for that job and then we worked together.
hahahaha yeah.
hahahaha yes I love that but I still have to pay student loan on it :(.
hahahahha.
hahahahhaa Dota is the best for learning russian.
Hahahahhaaha.
hahahahhaa just got a free bacon roll from Greggs.
hahahahhaha.
Hahahahhahaa when I was 17 I'd give the checkout person my driving license which said I was 17 but most of the time they still sold to me anyway!!!!!!
hahahahhahah.
hahahahhahaha hell no.
hahahahhahaha I just set a photo of my favourite band as my desktop wallpaper.
hahahahhahaha I just wrote a long email to my manager and colleague and I'm going to defer it until early tomorrow morning to make it look like I started work early when actually I'll still be in bed.
hahahahhahaha nice.
hahahahhaha I got the Chinese version of the HTC One M9 and I had to change the language and it was so hard.
hahahahhaha nice.
hahahahhaha same.
hahahahha I stole the leftovers.
hahahahha kimchi.
hahahahha same.
hahahahha same ;).
hahahahha that's what my colleague said.
hahaha I applied for a £2,700 overdraft just to see if I'd be successful.
hahaha I never do any cooking or cleaning.
hahaha I watched that like a week ago.
hahaha I went to the toilet to have a poo and the person in the cubicle next to me was farting.
hahaha my bank balance is so low too.
hahaha would be funny if I lived in Chipping Norton and bumped into him at the supermarket every week.
hahaha yeah.
hahaha yeah that's why I stopped drinking those kind of drinks.
hahahhaa.
hahahhaa I already have boobies.
hahahhaa yeah me too.
hahahhaha.
hahahhahaa in 2 weeks we have an away day and we all have to choose a song to be played during the day.
hahahhahaa I remember when you spammed the ops with logs to get me banned once.
hahahhahaha I love how Richard Dawkings disproves omnipotent deities but all the religious people just ignore him.
hahahhahaha I love how Richard Dawkings disproves omnipotent deities but all the religious people just ignore me.
hahahhahaha Neil from IT told me that I look great yesterday.
hahahhahaha same.
hahahhaha yeah.
haha I am working in my boxers today.
haha I asked if we could put Doom or something fun on it and they said it's only Tour De France....
haha I complained about a punctured coffee pod and they're going to send me a new batch.
haha I'd just not subscribe until I want to use it.
haha I don't need to do that, my dad is straight up giving me £2,000 for my house deposit.
haha I found a mistake on Oddsmonkey's EV calculator and they thanked me for telling them.
haha I get £21 free from my banks just for paying in money by standing order and out to my Tesco savings accounts by direct debit of £1.
haha I get that sometimes.
haha I just skip the sales now.
haha I know where you live now.
haha Iota may need to get some amnesia.
haha I pirate windoze too.
haha I remember when the job centre said my universal credit payments would stop automatically when I found a job. However, sometimes I went a whole 30 days between payslips and I got universal credit anyway.
haha I saw a thread on /r/headphones about manky DT770 pads.
haha I thought that.
haha I told my boss I saved the company thousands of man hours and she got angry with me.
Haha it was just an example m9.
haha I used to do that in Wales.
haha I used to think that's how tax brackets worked when I was like 10.
haha I've been on the Gatwick Express quite a few times.
haha I was considering getting a deskmat.
haha I was just about to say that.
haha I was so fucking frugal at uni.
haha I was thinking that too.
haha jokes on you because I can swim.
haha last night I was arguing with a friend about whether my AKG K702s or his Logitech G933s are better.
haha like my gf.
haha like when I'm in the gym and trying to bench 60KG.
haha McDonalds?
haha me too.
haha me too, I lost the hearing in my left ear and was bleeding out of it.
haha mine goes over 4000RPM.
haha my co-worker is going to bring his Beats into work soon.
haha my co-worker says she doesn't mind violence if it's against men.
haha my flat too.
haha NEETS.
haha next thing you know someone will tell me that I don't really play Dota!
haha nice.
haha no I don't.
haha no, they will just edit it to fit their agenda if they can.
haha okay.
haha one of the directors is right in front of me as I shitpost on IRC.
haha reminds me of Germany where they blamed CS:GO and banned E-League from broadcasting because a terrorist went on a shooting spree.
haha same.
haha saw that last night.
haha so it's less addictive than kpop and dota then?
haha testicles.
haha that reminds me of when 2GD said "cunts" instead of "cants" at an official Valve event.
haha that's what I thought.
haha that's why I love working from home; I use my Sound Blaster E5, V-Moda Boompro and Philips Fidelio X2.
haha that's why I'm trading in EUR too.
haha they will unless you vote UKIP!
HAHA TRICKED YOU NOW YOUR LITECOINS ARE MINE.
haha Volvo DDoSed themselves on Sunday.
haha whiney.
haha why?
haha yeah.
haha yeah 4k downscaling is awesome if you're on 1080p.
haha yeah I loved the bolt action rifle in Killing Floor.
haha yeah, I might wear them in the office when people want to talk to me.
haha yes.
haha you don't want me.
haha you live near rory.
haha you should see my email address and my phone.
haha you totally should m9.
haha you would too.
hahhaa.
hahhaahha my friend has finally learnt how shit his gaming headsets are and is considering purchasing a Philips Fidelio X2, V-Moda Boompro, and Creative E5.
hahhahahahhaa just did a Lync call using my Creative E5 + Beyer Custom One Pro + V-Moda Boompro.
HAHHAHHAHA.
Hair dryers are electric omg.
Half a second of firing the LMG will move your crosshair to the sky.
half-finished is an overestimation.
Half-Life 2 is a good one.
Half Life was released in 1999 IIRC.
half lit wtf.
Half your case is just for the GPU section, it's ridiculous.
Halifax gave me £2,000 credit card.
Hamster in a wheel lmao.
Hangul.
HansProleman.
HansProleman_.
HansProleman_:.
HansProleman:.
HansProleman 0% comission at Matchbook.
HansProleman 36.5mbps out of the possible 38.
HansProleman £500 profit so far this month.
HansProleman £600 profit so far this month.
HansProleman About 7.2 times faster than my ADSL lmao.
HansProleman all on black wtf.
HansProleman Almost hit £1k profit.
HansProleman and I are both leaving.
HansProleman And won.
HansProleman Another £50 free in-play Bet365 bet!
HansProleman Bingo is such BS.
HansProleman Bulwark rory lmfao so Origin are charging me for line tests to fix my broken connection now.
HansProleman Can't fix it.
HansProleman Come play pub gee.
HansProleman do you even know how to play this game?
HansProleman Do you have Quantum yet?
HansProleman ffs have to install flash player.
HansProleman fuck sake I broke my Ultimatcher.
HansProlemanGet a Free Bet by placing a bet!
HansProleman got raped by two men last night and I killed them both with my shotgun.
HansProleman hahahaha I won a bingo chat bonus.
HansProleman has probably done just as much betting as me, maybe more.
HansProleman has seen my gf and he says she's super cute and we are a cute couple.
HansProleman hello.
HansProleman HOLY SHIT.
HansProleman How can I bet £10? Max stake is $10/$20?
HansProleman how much do you both weigh now?
HansProleman:How oldschool.
HansProlemanI am gubbed from Sky Vegas, Casino, Poker and Bingo now.
HansProleman I am instant messaging my co-worker who I'm sitting next to because neither of us want to take off our headphones.
HansProleman I bet £10 on black and lost.
HansProleman I bet on 0.
HansProleman I CAN'T FUCKING STOP WINNING AT CORAL.
HansProleman I'm making more money outside of work than I am in work.
HansProleman I need you.
HansProleman, Iota is a girl?
HansProleman Iota Madbrad200 what mattress should I buy?
HansProleman Iota rory.
HansProleman is always up really late.
HansProleman I seem to be getting pretty much the maximum possible.
HansProleman I shouldn't accept the free £20 welcome bonus, right?
HansProleman I should quit my job.
HansProleman_ is just being stupid.
HansProleman I've never won a penny.
HansProleman_:I've set my alarm time to be the same for weekends as weekdays now.
HansProleman Just won £225 from a 10p spin.
HansProleman:lmao.
HansProleman needs constant movement to really get a good feel for the mouse.
HansProleman Oh cool I can remote into my mining rig from my work PC.
HansProleman oh EVERY race.
HansProleman oh ffs I have over £1k on Ladbrokes now.
HansProleman Oh fuck there's a minimum withdrawal limit of £15.
HansProleman Oh shit do I actually have to play poker? I don't know how to play this game.
HansProleman oh wait we already did 888casino.
HansProleman omfg.
HansProleman omg.
HansProleman OMG DOUBLE TELL A FRIEND BONUS.
HansProleman poker is not roulette.
HansProleman pub gee?
HansProleman rory.
HansProleman, rory and I have SFF.
HansProleman rory_claus crypto is crashing.
HansProleman rory fuck sake IT is trying to make me stop using Firefox because it's unsupported.
HansProleman rory look at this fucking heretic.
HansProleman said you're not as rich as rory.
HansProleman Should I withdraw my remaining £10?
HansProleman This fucking slot is the gayest shit ever.
HansProleman Up £300 so far this month.
HansProleman "Up to 38mbps".
Hansproleman:Wait, what?
HansProleman wants to buy a new mouse and I am advising him.
HansProleman was gonna pay £30 + P&P.
HansProleman Weight mostly.
HansProleman What should I bet on?
HansProleman what the fuck 1,996,196.
HansProleman why can I only pay in $ on 888poker?
HansProleman:wtf.
HansProleman wtf is going opn.
HansProleman wtf mabn.
HansProleman yay I have a new Halifax Reward account and 30 month 0% credit card.
Hansproleman:Yeah but £200 better.
Hansproleman:Yeah but can you get >400 FPS in CS:GO?
HansProleman:Yeah tha'ts what I'm thinking.
HansProleman You really fucked up by betting on horses.
HansProleman your weird.
Happy 420.
happy 911.
Happy April Fools day btw.
Happy Friday.
Happy Gwangbokjeol.
Happy Hyeonchung-il everyone!
Happy Prime Day.
Happy Samiljeol!
Happy Tomb Sweeping Day m9.
Happy Tuesday.
Happy Ubuntu release day.
Happy Women's Day!
HAR014.
Hardly anyone uses that Dota forum.
hard to connect to a server, and then that server lagged the fuck out.
Hard to give a good answer because noise is relative and I don't know how loud your GPU will be.
Hard to take my Amazon parcel to Royal Mail because they're only open when I'm at work wtf.
Hard to tell.
Hard to tell because Travelodge is down.
Hardware EQ.
Hardware profiles.
Hardware SBX Pro Studio.
Has anyone else been to Five Guys yet? I went with my gf the other day and fuck it's so good but fuck it's so expensive.
Has anyone else got the new Windoze 10 update?
Has anyone else listened to the new AOA album yet? It's fucking incredible.
Has anyone else seen Batman vs Superman?
Has anyone used Android Pay yet?
Has been for a while now.
Has Bitcoin finally reached its peak?
Has it arrived?
Has mics built-in.
Has the jewish population recovered to pre-1939 levels yet?
Has your debit card been blocked at all?
Has your drone arrived yet?
Has your G403 arrived yet?
Has your mmr increased at all this year?
Hated it.
Hate that.
Hats don't affect gameplay.
Hats don't give me a hero with different skills and different stats.
Have a look.
Have a look for the Zowie G-SR that one is pretty good.
Have a think about it, but I think we can trust each other.
have been using social media websites excessively when you should be.
Have Deliveroo exploded in the last year or something? I never used to see them, and now they're everywhere!
Have fun walking your cat and picking up its poo.
Have her try on a pair of DT770s or AKG K702s.
Haven't been able to use them since I got them.
Haven't even looked at it.
Haven't had a holiday in so fucking long.
Haven't had anything.
Haven't had much time to play it yet. I played a new map last night, never played it before, made sure to flame everyone all game, they tried to kick me, but I still won the game at the top of the scoreboard.
Haven't moved in yet.
Haven't really looked into HW/SW specifics, but I'm sure it can be done.
Haven't used an optical disc for about 5 years now.
Have they been disabled so that you can get high?
Have they broken into Master Password?
Have they laundered the money yet?
Have they made divisions for upper and lower class people too?
Have they recreated the failed anti-sink systems?
Have to drive over to Brighton straight from work.
Have to keep my window closed to keep the insects out.
Have to mod the shit ouf ot them to make them any good.
Have to pay for my petrol to visit her, for her train tickets to visit me, for the food we eat, etc.
Have to quickly stop drinking and put it on the table and type .bang without making a mess.
Have to record these fucking webinars.
HAVE TO REDO IT BECAUSE IT'S SHIT SOFTWARE.
Have to stay in a hotel when my gf visits me.
Have to unscrew the PCB too.
HAVE TO WAIT UNTIL THE 18TH FOR MY FIBRE.
Have to walk to the other side of the office to use the nice toilet.
Have you?
Have you ammended your build yet?
Have you been secretly weighing me?!?!?
Have you been stalking me?
Have you been told there is no money left in the budget?
Have you been to see a psychiatrist?
Have you bought any AMD shares?
Have you bought it yet?
Have you bought Overwatch yet?
Have you checked out Winminer too?>.
Have you claimed the TSB switching bonus yet?
Have you compared them to DT770s or SE215s at equal decibells?
Have you compared them to the DT770s?
Have you completed the CS:GO co-op operation yet?
Have you considered buying a Ryzen 7 for CPU mining?
Have you considered getting a defective pair of Beyers or something that only has one functional driver?
Have you considered moving to USA?
Have you considered purchasing a multi-GPU rig for heating your flat this winter?
Have you decided who you are voting for yet?
Have you done any accumulators yet?
Have you done any bets where you have to do it from a mobile device yet?
Have you done the BGO cashbakc yet?
Have you done the Ladbrokes offer?
Have you done whatever you're doing with that website yet?
Have you eaten a kangaroo? They're really fucking tasty.
Have you enabled 2FA for everything?
Have you even tried Quantum? It's so fucking good, way better than Chrome!
Have you ever been to chinatown?
Have you ever been to Five Guys?
Have you ever been to London Dungeon?
Have you ever been to Tortila?
Have you ever bled out of your ear?
Have you ever bought stuff from China?
Have you ever compared them to DT770s?
Have you ever considered building a m-itx rig?
Have you ever considered buying a masternode?
Have you ever considered getting a dog?
Have you ever considered getting CIEMs?
Have you ever considered prostitution?
Have you ever considered sharing the internet with your neighbour so you only have to pay half each?
Have you ever done matched betting?
Have you ever gotten a semi by the sea?
Have you ever had a ground loop noise problem with your audio equipment?
Have you ever had interracial?
Have you ever had sex with a girl on her period?
Have you ever heard of a barter economy?
Have you ever made money from free spins?
Have you ever played Day of Defeat? The recoil in that game is INSANE.
Have you ever played Guild Wars?
Have you ever played Portal?
Have you ever rented a room before?
Have you ever seen a kpop girl?
Have you ever seen a m-itx motherboard before?
Have you ever stayed in a Japanese love hotel?
Have you ever thought about maybe playing a decent videogame?
Have you ever tried hybrid pads?
Have you ever tried open headphones?
Have you ever tried Stremio?
Have you ever tried using HRTF?
Have you ever used a 189hz monitor?
Have you ever used Popcorn Time?
Have you ever used the Philips X2 Fidelio? Those might be my next pair.
Have you ever used the stock M50 earpads?
Have you ever won any money from the free spins promotions?
Have you experienced tinnitus before?
Have you figured out a way to export the Moneydashboard transactions? My gf wants to see all my account information but I'm hesistant to give her my banking passwords.
Have you fixed your 1080 TI yet?
Have you fixed your GPU yet?
Have you found a way to hot switch between IGP and GPU?
Have you got 16.04 LTS yet?
Have you got Danske, Co-Op, Halifax and Barclays reward accounts?
Have you got the SSD and GPU plugged in?
Have you heard of EXID?
Have you heard of Zscaler?
Have you looked at the SensorPush sensors?
Have you met aliens yet and engaged in interspecies marriage?
Have you met any Asian girls playing Pokemon Go yet?
Have you met any Asians playing Pokemon Go yet?
Have you modified the build?
Have you never bled all over them?
Have you never heard of the expression "lift with your legs"?
Have you not bought your laptop yet?
Have you not factored in diminishing returns per mega bit?!?!?
Have you noticed any muscle growth since you've started working out?
Have you not OCed your 1080 TI yet?
Have you OCed your 1080 TI yet?
Have you OCed your CPU at all?
Have you OCed your GPU?
Have you opened the box yet?
Have you opened your LISA yet?
Have you played Ana yet?
Have you played Crysis?
Have you played CS:GO's co-op missions and single player?
Have you played Dota?
Have you played Far Cry?
Have you played Overwatch yet?
Have you plugged all the PCI-E cables into it so it's getting enough power?
Have you precisely benchmarked every algorithm?
Have you pre-ordered? I already promised my spare key to a friend so I can't give it to you....
Have you printed out all the spare parts of your 3D printer yet?
Have you put that pcpartpicker build together yet?
Have you read the whitepaper?
Have you replaced the cable yet?
Have you seen Crouching Tiger Hidden Dragon?
Have you seen Goen Girl?
Have you seen Gone Girl?
Have you seen how LoL is dying in Korea right now?
Have you seen Olympus Has Fallen? That film was a fucking masterpiece.
Have you seen Origin's 24 month super saver deals?
Have you seen Pitch Perfect 2? It's pretty much a feature-length advertisement for Beats.
Have you seen The Emoji Movie yet?
Have you seen the HTC 10 yet?
Have you seen the new Pepsi commercial?
Have you seen the new Sennheiser ampdacs?
Have you seen your friend who has CIEMs yet?
Have you sent the BTC yet?
have you signed up for the beta?
Have you spoken to a psychiatrist about it?
Have you spotted any good cashback offers recently/.
Have you suggested that they just turn gay?
Have you tried Custom IEMs?
Have you tried dutching?
Have you tried Fidelio X2s yet?
Have you tried gdax?
Have you tried googling 'download thunderbird'.
Have you tried Heaven Benchmark? I use that to test my GPU.
Have you tried MultiPoolMiner?
Have you tried out WinMiner?
Have you tried the hybrid pads? Velour on the inside and pleather on the outside.
Have you tried them yet?
Have you tried using your student email?
Have you tweaked your CPU clockspeed and voltage yet?
Having a permanent base on Mars will act as an incentive to bring down the cost of space travel.
Having a tiny little PC that's quieter and more powerful than a PC 10X its size is pretty cool.
Having both is excessive.
Having cards on one device is more convenient than carrying them all in your wallet.
Having fun is what is most important.
Having no cables makes managing 3 headphones much easier.
having racial preferences doesn't make you racist omg.
Having the fan at 0RPM at idle is pretty nice though.
Having the taskbar and the notification tray/time/date on the same panel doesn't work for me.
HD600 connects to the cable on both earcups?
HD600 is such a scam. AKG K702s and Philips Fidelo X2s are just as good despite being cheaper.
HD600 sound like shit compared to the HD800.
HD800*.
HD800s are overpriced.
HD800s cost like £600.
He.
Headphone cables piss me off so much.
Headphones.
Headphones are cheaper in Singapore?
Headphones hold their value a lot better than drugs.
Headphones into E10K and mic into motherboard and lots of noise!
HEADPHONES IS A GOOD CONVERSATION CHOICE!!!!!!! ISN'T IT, RORY?
Headphones with removable cables are more expensive.
Headset is a very important peripheral.
He also told me my portfolio will take 3 days to clear after I liquidated it yesterday.
He ate lots of meat.
He ate lots of poultry.
Heat is good during the winter though.
heat is good though.
Heavily modified.
Heavy CPU heatsinks cause a tiny bit of bend and no problems.
He basically built the world's largest parasol.
He basically only wants to pay me 19p per mile.
He called again.
He can?
He can earn more money if he does more jobs.
He could tell you're gay.
He did a lot of good things actually, people just focus on the people he imprisoned and killed.
He didn't mention the timings.
He didn't say anything offensive.
He does LoL stuff too.
He doesn't drive though.
He doesn't know how to profit from it like me.
He doesn't want to learn.
He eats a lot of bacon.
HEER UP BABY.
He got a massive grant and I got a puny loan.
He has a job as a personal trainer for a little while.
He has mental problems AFAIK.
He has no clue.
He has stage 4 autism.
He has the same protein shaker and fan as me.
He has time to lose.
He hates people who aren't white.
He is O now.
He just got back with his gf, but now he wants to go with me.
He just needs to wait for RYZEN launch.
He just says I can take time off whenever I want.
He just wants to suppress Firefox's rightful place as king of web browsers.
He just wasn't my line manager until now.
He just wore a shirt and lost his family and job and hounded by the media about it.
He knew what he was doing.
He'll definitely die some day.
hell no.
hello.
hello?
Hello.
Hello?
HELLO.
HELLO?
HELLO FROM KOREA.
Helloi.
Hello Nathan from Ashford.
He looks like me when I was really fat.
help.
Helps me with my poverty a bit.
Help to Buy ISA I guess.
He made a lot of very funny jokes.
He must be very popular in Zimbabwe.
He must have no life.
He needs his money to be safe.
He played it for like 1 hour.
He posts on /r/vegan and /r/tressless lmao.
He probably had to disable HT too. I remember I had to disable HT to get the highest OC on my i3 530.
He probably has a fedora.
He quit the Royal Mail to work at my office.
Her culture is weird.
Her dishonesty has finally caught up with her.
He really likes it, and I'm having lots of fun too.
He really needs a rework.
Hermes definitely fucked up.
Hermes don't.
Hermes is going to deliver to my grandparents' house, but I'm a bit worried about that. My grandfather might not be at home at the random time they choose to deliver, and they might be too impatient to wait for him to answer the door..
Heroes, in-game stats and abilities, etc.
Heroes never die.
Heroin maybe?
heroin or marijuanna or whatever you kids call it.
He's actually trying to cause Brexit.
He's a filthy casual then.
He's a freak.
He's a grown man he can do what he wants.
He said he agrees that I should be paid more, but there is no money in the budget to increase my salary.
He said he had a death in the family to buy him some time.
He said he will retaliate if North Korea attacks one of their allies.
He said it's not fair.
He said "my country".
He said the courier says that reception isn't taking parcels.
He's always been a pain to work with.
He's an active ebay seller and knows how to test headphones with Sinegen.
He's a race traitor.
He says he'll pay me for the tickets and parking and £11/£17 that I asked for the mileage.
He says I should move in with him for 6 months and build up my credit score..
He says that all his emails are high importance even though none of them are tagged as it.
He says to be careful who to trust when taking advice, because my mother and father may not give me the best advice.
He says you can't buy ETH with fiat, and he doesn't even mention LTC.
He's black though.
He's bringing them on Tuesday.
He sent his army of followers to bully and send death threats to an autistic man and then he got a massive backlash for it.
He's fat and hairy.
He's gay though.
He's getting it from his South African friend, but he doesn't even like it.
He's got 3 daughters.
He should be tried for manslaughter.
He should have got the Z35 200hz.
He should have picked a better name then.
He should just play Dota.
He shouldn't have pressured me to move out.
He shouldn't, since I have more headphones than you.
He should use Keepass or Lastpass.
He's in the new Mummy.
He's just a filthy casual.
He's just jealous that you don't have to dry your clothes manually.
He's just rambling on.
He's losing his hair too.
He's mentally unable to appreciate the beauty of a Korean girl.
He smoked it.
He's my friend's brother and an officer in the armed forces, so I need him to be my personal reference for work.
He's not advising me to stay living at home for another 6-12 months to save up more money and build up my credit score.
He's not compliant to the high standards people uphold his position to.
He's not responding t my request....
He's not responding to my emails.
He's not the dealer rory deserves, but the dealer he needs.
He's now advising me to stay living at home for another 6-12 months to save up more money and build up my credit score.
He's now advising me to stay living at home for anowher 6-12 months to save up more money and build up my credit score.
He's obviously not going to pay me.
He's old.
He's only a mile away.
he's on Steam.
He sounds like a pretentious neckbeard FUCK.
He's pre-judging me even though he doesn't know me.
He's probably not even aware of my existance.
He's saying he only wants to refund me 30%.
He's so fuckign old.
He's so fucking rich.
He's still 2k lmao.
He's still working on it atm.
He stayed around to get all the glory now leaving to avoid the fallout.
He stays in power and gets rid of all the whites.
He's upset you're not home when he's an hour early wtf.
He's way too loyal to the brand.
He talks a lot.
He thinks I'm noob.
He thinks poor people don't deserve a pension.
He thought I graduated and worked at Sainsbury's for 2 years lmao.
He told me he dumped his garlic on the exchange and the price dropped.
He told me he trusted that I would set a fair price.
He told me I'm one of those assholes who talk during a film.
He told me I should be sleeping.
He told me it's ridiculous that I included wear and tear into my mileage calculation and not just fuel, is it?
He told me lots about the job and then told me the pay is 17/18k and I was so disappointed.
He tried to produce Dota content but he wasn't received well.
He was a great host.
He was a long time ago.
He was a womaniser?
He was probably a political activist or a Russian spy or a crime boss or drug dealer or something.
hew mungus?
hew mungus wat????
He works for the RAF.
hey.
Hey.
hey btw wanna buy a GTX 970?
Hey can you buy me a 21:9 200hz monitor please?
Hey, do you want a Ratesetter referall code?
Hey do you want to switch to Nationwide and make £200?
Hey good news.
Hey how does that build look?
Hey how is your Netbet rollover going?
Hey I have a 4.7GHz CPU.
Hey I just had an idera.
Hey I need some advice.
Hey I need your help with something.
Hey my birthday is coming up, and I really want a pair of Fidelio X2s.
hey rory.
Hey rory.
Hey sorry I was AFK.
Heyt.
Hey wanna buy my M50X?
Hey wanna buy some headphones?
Hey wanna buy some more snuff from me?
Hey wanna buy some more stuff from me?
Hey we're friends on Spotify now.
Hey you want a Ratesetter referral code?
heyyyyy.
heyyyyyyyyyyy.
heyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyyy.
hi.
HiFiMan RE-400 Waterline 8.60   $79.
High back support.
High demand, low supply.
High-end gaming mice used to only be £20-£30 and now they're like £50-£70 wtf.
Higher clockspeed.
Higher pay with easier work.
Higher rent, electricity and council tax though.
High framerate gaming is becoming more popular.
High framerates.
High management fees.
High refresh rate is important to minimise input lag.
high refresh rate monitors rarely have high resolution.
High refresh rates have been very niche until recently.
High RTP.
Hillary and Donald are such fucks.
Hillary Clinton isn't any better lmao.
Hillary Clinton is probably going to become president.
Hinge snapped during normal use after one month..
His £750 will be much more than £750 when HansProleman is 55.
Hi Samuel.
His brother told me he doesn't know his email address.
His entire upbringing was financed by tax dodging.
His head is so fucking shiny.
His head is so fucking shiny and he has weird-ass tattoos.
His name is Tom Cruise and he's a crazy scientologist.
His parents also let his gf stay for free, and he told me he doesn't want to move out and live with his gf because he doesn't want to pay rent.
His son is a fucking noob.
His spreadsheet says he made a loss.
His top two subreddits are /r/tressless and /r/vegan the fucking weirdo.
Historically the World Trade Center was very safe.
His ult isn't very good anyway.
His wall idea could be really good at keeping out Mexicans; China has a great wall and almost no Mexicans.
His website template isn't even complete.
Hit 35 what?
Hitbox is HTML5 4k 60fps now lmao.
Hitler supported good treatment for animals and turned Germany's economy around.
Hitler was an immigrant and look how many crimes he did.
Hitler wasn't a dumb man.
Hitler was the leader of the most advanced civilisation in Europe.
hjahahahhahahahhaha.
HL2 was a year before Doom 3.
HL and HL2 are sick games.
hmmm.
Hmmm.
Hmmm#.
hmmm 3p/Mhash/Hr would probably only give me like £5.04 a day revenue according to this calculator.
Hmmm I'll have a look now.
Hmmm I mean Sunday.
Hmmm it seems to stop charging when I plug my phone into it.
Hmmm it turbos to like 4GHz though I'm sure.
Hmmm it works better than wifi for me.
hmmmm.
Hmmmm.
hmmmm 180lbs is like 82kg.
Hmmm maybe the second image was misaligned intentionally to throw off diff checkers.
Hmmm maybe you don't even need to open a new account.
Hmmmm do you mean the story missions or just defending the bombsites?
Hmmmm do you think Google Cardboard would work on the crosstrainer?
Hmmmm from his messages he seems to acknowledge that wear and tear exists, but claim that he shouldn't be paying for it, and that I am profiting even if he's not paying for it.
hmmmm I can't really afford EU citizenship right now.
hmmmm IDK Guild Wars 2 has a lot of players.
Hmmmm IDK how they calculate that price, I just calculated it as £7.06.
Hmmmm if I get an interest only mortgage, I can borrow from my parents and pay them back quickly.
Hmmmm I guess you'll be okay then.
hmmmm I have a guess.
Hmmmm I have a new laptop and dock now, I wonder if it would support three screens.
Hmmmm I'm pretty sure I can set an upload limit of 0kb/s in Transmission.
hmmmm I need to order new parts for my PC to replace the parts I'm selling, then I need to remove the old parts from my case and install them in the other case and reset the motherboard settings.
Hmmmm is there a reason you'd need to get rid of your reg saver? I pay into mine from my TSB account.
hmmmm I think rory overdid it with his AMPDAC.
Hmmmm I think the noise isolation is okay, but it's the sound leakage which is the real problem with the M50X.
Hmmmm it makes more sense than what she said to me actually.
hmmmm it's not in the guide.
Hmmmm I've read that my headset mic might not work with the Creative E5 on Linux.
Hmmmm I wonder when my Lastpass subscription will expire.
Hmmmm kinda.
Hmmmm look at the RVZ01 website. I think it's 3 but I'm not sure.
Hmmmm looks like you can have 3 3.5" drives in my Ncase.
Hmmmmm.
Hmmmm maybe.
Hmmmmm I just realised it's getting even more complicated because of 50% stake refunds and matched deposits and shit like that.
hmmmmm is there anything I want to buy on Amazon.
Hmmmmm I still have my Corsair Vengeance 1500 headset somewhere.
Hmmmmm I think my work wifi may be blocking IMAP and SMTP ports.
Hmmmmm I think Runescape might have the biggest playerbase actually.
Hmmmmm it's still more profitable than Nicehack even though it's lost most of its value.
Hmmmmm I've read that the Custom One Pros don't sound as good as my DT770s.
Hmmmmm maybe I can keep the interest if I renew.
Hmmmmm my company outsources our office cleaning, so the cleaning staff here wouldn't get any big bonuses like that.
hmmmmm what do you think about GoT? Lots of mouthbreathers watch that but it's actually a really well produced show with lots of plot.
Hmmmmm what's the cheapest S8+SIM contract?
Hmmmm my gf would probably like that.
Hmmmm not sure, maybe because some people need integrated graphics.
Hmmmm previously it came through really fast.
Hmmmm seems to be a depreciating asset.
Hmmmm she has mentioned before that her period has been late. She also says she's sick at the moment.
Hmmmm so I need to get people to avoid premier inn / travelodge then.
Hmmmm sometimes I wish my IEMs were wireless when I'm in the gym.
Hmmmm that's an idea. I'm not sure if I have any stable surface to put it on though.
Hmmmm that's a thought... do you think there's a market for renting graphics cards?
Hmmmm that second pic could work.
Hmmmm that's kinda similar to what I've been thinking.
Hmmmm there's nothing comparable in Dota.
hmmmm when I am hangover I can't eat. Would a protein shake be good?
hmmmm yeah actually IDK how well the fan will hold up.
Hmmm never used bitcoin before.
Hmmm not sure I've never undervolted a GPU..
Hmmm not sure. Try liquipedia, gosugamers and hltv.
Hmmm okay but I still prefer my X2 + E5.
Hmmm technically he said "All emails you get are important.".
hmmm that could work.
Hmmm yeah so yesterday, today and most of tomorrow.....
hoax.
hodl until 0.15BTC.
Hodor is one of the characters in GoT.
Hogging all the energy with my overclocked computer.
Hollywood actors aren't very attractive IMO.
Holy crap Nutmeg is shit. I've made £1.12 returns but paid £0.35 in fees.
holy fuck.
Holy fuck.
HOLY FUCK.
holy fuck 150lbs.
holy fuck 30%.
Holy fuck BCH is still on the bull run.
Holy fuck First Direct is good.
holy fuck I'd quit my job for £3.5k a day and just live off that.
holy fuckign shit this is the weirdest fucking random voicemail I've ever heard.
Holy fuck I got downvoted so hard for saying I like bacon sandwiches on /r/vegan.
holy fucking shit omfg.
holy fuck it costs me £20 per 1GB of mobile data I use.
holy fuck it's 1.5/10 on IMDB.
holy fuck I've been talking to Barclays for over half an hour and they can't figure out why I can't make payments.
HOLY FUCK OMFG.
holy fuck that video is pretentious.
HOLY FUCK THAT WAS THE NASTIEST TASTING PILL I'VE EVER EATEN.
holy fuck the playlist I created on Spotify has 62 followers.
Holy fuck there's so many filthy casuals at my office watching Football on their computer monitors.
Holy fuck these headphones are incredible.
holy fuck they're comfy.
holy fuck what the fuck.
holy fuck yes kpop is addictive.
holy fuck your rich.
holy shit.
Holy shit.
HOLY SHIT.
Holy shit £222.
holy shit 29k seconds?
holy shit 30k wow.
Holy shit £3,721 a week?!?!?
Holy shit £37.96.
holy shit 40k.
holy shit 45k.
Holy shit £51 now.
Holy shit £68 a month.
holy shit £9,111 is a lot of money for someone on minimum wage.
Holy shit adding monitor arms to the two monitors on my desk is FUCKING NICE.
Holy shit a free SGS8.
holy shit after student loans and tax I see less than £300 of my £500 bonus.
Holy shit a plane is about to hit it.
holy shit ATX boards are big.
Holy shit BTC to the moon Iota.
Holy shit BTC up 35% in 24 hours.
HOLY SHIT £Competitive + benefits.
Holy shit episode 7 is freaky.
Holy shit fixmyheadphones.co.uk will do it for me for £69.95.
Holy shit fucking Guild Wars 2 is taking up 30GB.
holy shit I could borrow £120k which would give me money to buy a house!!!!!
Holy shit I'd love that.
Holy shit I just tried plugging my Fidelio X2s into my PC's frontpanel headphone output and it was fucking awful.
Holy shit I'm making £115 a month.
Holy shit I played with someone in OW who was lvl 1489 last night.
Holy shit I spend a lot on this game....
Holy shit I thought I broke my headphones 10 mins ago.
holy shit it looks massive.
holy shit it's still going up.
holy shit I've just plugged my X2s into my desktop AMPDAC and they're fucking incredible.
Holy shit I want that fucking omelette.
Holy shit kiwi IRC with an unstable connection is fucking awful.
holy shit label that NSFW omg.
holy shit my GPU is 75C.
Holy shit my GPU was just running at 90C and 4017RPM.
Holy shit my income would almost double if my salary doubled.
holy shit rly?
holy shit Spotify recommend to me Global Top 50 after I renewed my Student Discount.
holy shit srsly?
Holy shit, srsly?
holy shit srsly? I need to tell my wife to get some from the market.
Holy shit Terry Crews is ripped.
Holy shit that's £1,250 a month.
holy shit that's crazy.
Holy shit that's expensive.
holy shit that's more than my standard salary.
holy shit that thing is massive.
holy shit that was a near-miss twice.
Holy shit the box is tiny.
Holy shit the Manila Major has some insane production value.
holy shit there's a lot of rain today.
Holy shit there's jobs being advertised internally for £60k and £63k.
Holy shit there's someone born in 1899 that's alive today.
Holy shit the Samsung Galaxy S7 is expensive.
Holy shit they're expensive.
Holy shit they're selling £60 headphones for £300?
Holy shit this guy is 60.
Holy shit this production value is insane.
Holy shit we breached 2%?
Holy shit when I minus the property price inflation assuming 5% a year, the 100% property brings the total cost wayyyyyyyy down.
holy shit wtf.
holy shit wtf BTC is $7,600.
holy shit you got skunk enabled?
holy shit your a violent little fuck, aren't you?
holy shit your rent is expensive.
holy shit your richer than rory.
holy shit you've only just done that?
home.
Homefront, Brink, Titanfall 1, etc.
Homelessness sucks.
Homeless people aren't taxpayers now?
HOMETIME.
HOME TIME.
HOME TIME BYE.
HOME TIME BYE HOPE IM STILL ALIVE TOMORROW.
Hometime for me in 60 mins!!!
HOME TIME NOW BYE.
home time wtf.
Honey is a sweet substance created by bees.
Hopefully Elon Musk makes it happen.
Hopefully get another 1070 TI soon.
Hopefully get some free money from the government.
Hopefully I get a real one this time.
Hopefully I'll get another 1070 TI before I leave, but IDK because of the weather.....
Hopefully I'll get that within a few months.
Hopefully it'll be charged by hometime.
Hopefully it'll work and I can get my 15% off KFC in a minute.
Hopefully it stays profitable until crypto picks up again.
Hopefully it will today.
Hopefully it won't restrict the stuff I need too much.
Hopefully LUX will make it hotter though.
Hopefully Monero will take its place.
Hopefully most of the pain will subside by bedtime.
Hopefully my crashing problem is fixed.
Hopefully my PC should be quieter at idle and cooler at load now.
Hopefully no more.
Hopefully people will stop calling me and telling me I had a car accident now.
hopefully that'll sort it.
Hopefully we'll get 480hz monitors within a couple of years.
Hope they don't close down.
Horizontal tab bars are for plebs.
Hospitality tent.
hotspot.
hours(.
hours as long as it doesn’t impact on the performance of your duties..
House could catch fire.
House obviously because you spend more time in it, it's a better investment, won't become obsolete in the near future, and other reasons srsly what a fucking stupid question.
Houses will never be worthless.
housing.
hout inspection..
how?
How.
How?
How about some nice LTC?
How about that?
How addictive is cannabis exactly?
how am I being silly omg.
How am I supposed to argue with that? I just told him that we had a contract and that he should honour it because I CBA to take him to small claims court.
How am I supposed to connect more than one display to it?!??!?
How am I supposed to play video games if I'm working 18 hours a day?!?!?!??!?
How are Apple going to find that any easier than the FBI? I would have thought the FBI/NSA would be the encryption-cracking experts.
How are cyclists even supposed to know how fast theyr'e going?
How are they are all related?
How are they meme?
How are they reselling BT for such a low price?
How are we supposed to have this socialist utopia you always go on about if you can't even stick to vegan-only food?
How are you beating me wtf.
How are you cashing out?
How are you constantly in debt wtf.
How are you coping with the G403's cable, and have you decided on a mousepad yet?
How are you earning more than me?
How are you getting an 8% bonus on Amazon?
How are you mining it.
How are you mining that coin!??!?!?
How are you not 3k yet?
How are you paying your rent?
How are you people using them so fast.
How are you so bad with money.
How are you today.
How are you today?
How are you today, m9?
How big is the cut?
How big is your float?
how big is yours?
HOW BIG IS YOURS?!?!?
How can a brand new modern laptop be so shit and struggle to run Windoze lmao.
How can an organisation make a review?
How can I make my electricity cheaper?
How can I make my PC produce more heat?
How can I save when I am paying so many bills?!?!?
How Can Mirrors Be Real If Our Eyes Aren't Real?
How can they share data that is encrypted?
How can you afford to buy new headphones and upgrade your PC every month if you're paying so much in rent?
How can you afford to live without an income?!?!?
How can you ban legal highs? Isn't the point of them that they are legal?
How can you gym if you work 90 hours a week?!?!??!
How can you have an RVN wallet and not realise it?
How can you pay for shit without an internet connection?
How can your profit erode?
How common..
How did he get caught then?
How did I add my company email and Lync to my personal phone and PC?
How did you fuck up so badly that you needed to borrow so much?
How did you get a 390 for half the price of a GTX 970?
How did you get cashback?
How did you get it then? I thought Mayson had it?
How did you get those vouchers?
How did you get to that concluson.
How did you measure your power consumption?
How did your friend die of a stroke?
How did you sell your DT770s? I want to sell mine.
How do bonuses work? Do I have to bet them and I lose them if I don't?
How do bullets penetrate androids but not humans?
How does 11.771p per kWh sound?
How does it cure depression and cancer with magic waves?
How does it feel to know that you watch a TV cartoon specifically made for Japanese children?
How does it work?
How does SIM cashback work?
How does tensing check them?
How does that work.
How does that work?
How does the membership fee get paid?
How do I adjust my PWM fan curve?
How do I backup my 2FA?
How do I change virtualbox to a bigger display resolution?
How do I compare the specs of two ten year old TVs? I have the model numbers.
How do I contact someone whose email address I do not know?
How do I convert it?
How do I convince my wife to let me build a mining rig?
How do I create a column containing the values of four different columns?
How do I delete messages on IRC?
How do I do this in Libreoffice Calc?
How do I exclude it from picking up "Sole Trader"?
How do I figure out what piece of hardware is bottlenecking my framerate in games?
How do I filter out non-Asians from my Tinder search?
How do I find duplicates, but not remove them?
How do I find out what the password is for my wallet?
How do I find the values of my deductions? wtf even are deductions?
How do I get a tax refund?
How do I get cashback for a Travelodge booking?
How do I get cisco vpn + citrix?
How do I get it?
How do I get it to import my stats?
How do I get mortgage projections?
how do I get that?
How do I get the cash back?
How do I get the cashback? Do I use topcashback?
How do I get the most BTC for my GRLC?
How do I know?
How do I know if I have a BT line? They told me on the phone it could take weeks....
How do I know if my gf is a catfish?
How do I know if we use office 365?
How do I make a box heavier to make my dad think I bought him something nice?
How do I make mining less laggy?
How do I make the scale logarithmic in my bar chart omfg.
How do I mine garlic on muiltiple GPUs?
How do I overclock my 4690K to 6GHz in a case that is 12.6L?
how do I pay my co-workers small amounts ~£1 for getting me something for the shop? I only have a £20 note.
How do I politely tell him to fuck off?
How do I profit from being 25?
How do I route the majority of my traffic through the VPN, but whitelist things such as Steam?
How do I save a route on Google maps to use later on my phone instead of the autogenerated one?
How do I search a column for a value of "1" then output the value of another cell on that row into a seperate spreadsheet?
How do I sell mine?
How do I sell my unmodded ones?>.
How do I set that up?
How do I set this up?
How do I sign up?
How do I snipe ebay items?
How do I stop error checking in a document?
How do I stop my PC from making my room super hot, and how do I stop my GPU from being so loud?
How do I toggle "always on top" for my windows?
How do I turn them off?
How do I urinate in a sample bottle without getting it on the outside at all?
How do I use tree-view file browsing in Windows?
How do I use video and voice on whatsapp web?
How do I vote?
How do I vote btw?
How do I withdraw from it to my UK bank account?
How do my COPs on max bass setting compare to Beats?
How do people get away with selling that shit?
How do they compare to my Fidelio X2 or rory's HD600?
How do they know I'm busy?
How do you budget your finances with your gf? Do you pay 100% of all your incomes into a joint account, or do you only pay a percentage and keep some for yourself?
How do you check the settings then?
How do you convert VTC to fiat?
How do you decide what fee to pay?
How do you explain all the in-shape people who play Dota then?
How do you generate electricity?
How do you get security updates for Tin Hat Linux?
How do you get two whales in a car?
How do you have so much debt?
How do you hear it across the corridor and through the wall/door?????
How do you heat your flat?
How do you know?
How do you know if foreigners are mouthbreathers if they don't have Daily Mail and page 3 and football?
How do you know my car insurance is such a good deal if you've never bought car insurance?????
How do you know so much about the courts system?
How do you know that's me?
How do you know them?
How do you know there are viewbots?
How do you make it?
How do you pre-install Ubuntu anyway, is root and a user account already setup?
How do you trick someone into killing themselves wtf.
How efficient is my PC for warming my flat?
How else are 4 people going to queue without a solo player?
How else do you suggest I sell my shit?
However, the TI6 prizepool is now $16,832,276 which is good.
How expensive are they?
How far can you push the VRAM?
How far do you walk to work?
How hard is it to exchange to LTC? Have you done it yet?
How heavy are those mice?
How hyped are you for Overwatch?
How is an enterprise SSD different to a consumer one?
How is building up my credit card debt getting myself into financial trouble lmao.
How is Donald Trump going to make Mexico pay for the wall wtf.
How is it any different than ranking weight?
How is it getting silly?
How is Protonmail any more secure than openmailbox?
How is that a special wtf.
How is that cheaper than buying it standalone?
How is that fair!??!?
How is that fair wtf.
How is that going to solve my problem?
How is that illegal?
How is the price she paid for it at all relevant to its current value wtf.
How is your muscle definition?
How is your ponzi scheme doing?
How is your rent 3x my mortgage?
How large is that case?!?!?
How long ago did you graduate?
How long ago was that!??!?
How long are they valid for?
How long do I need to be in a permanent job for before I look for another job?
How long do I need to leave my drink in the fridge before it is cool?
How long do you think it'll take me to save up for one of those?
How long has he had them for?
How long have you been going to the gym now? Have you noticed significant muscle growth yet?
How long have you lived there for?
How long is it valid for? It might be a good idea to wait a few weeks.
How long was I?
How long will it take? If I withdraw my investment after 30 days will I still get my cashback?
How long will you hold onto it? The lower management fees over 40 years might outweigh the transfer fees.
How low will the £ drop? I want to get off Farage's wild wild AmerieHartree.
How many accounts have you registered with it?
How many confirmations does fiat need?
How many cursors does LoL have?
How many do you have?
How many flats are in your appartment block.
How many GHz do you have?
How many grams is a packet?
How many holiday days does everyone have remaining? I have 18.5 but I have the option to buy more in September.
How many hours a week do you work?
How many hours do you have/what rank are you?
How many hz does your laptop have? Probably like 60.
How many is "high"?
How many men do you know that are married to other men?
How many miles?
How many ohms are your HD600s?
How many people actually play Football though?
How many people do you share a room with?
How many simultaneous offers are you working on?
HOW MANY SQUARED FEET OMG.
How many squared metres is it?
How many square feet is your flat?
How many tabs do you have open?
How many watts was yours?
How many years in jail do you get for doing that? 10+ probably?
How much £?
How much additional do you deposit?
How much are you in debt by?
How much are you paying for it?
How much Bitcoin do you have?
How much BTC have you mined so far?
how much BTC you have?
How much BTC you have?
How much cash do you have?
How much cash do you have right now?
How much +core and +memory?
How much data do you actually need?
How much did Deliveroo charge for your KFC delivery?
how much did new pads cost you?
How much did NiceHack steal from you?
How much did she weigh?
How much did the cable cost?
How much did the value of Bitcoin change over the last financial year?
How much did they cost?
How much did you lose?
How much did you pay and what model?
How much did you pay for it?
How much did you pay for your 1080 TI?
How much did you pay for yours?
How much do 960 cost normally?
How much do ebay charge?
How much does a Dominoes cost?
How much does a double bed cost? I need to get one so that I can have girls over at my flat.
How much does an ASIC cost?
How much does it cost?
How much does that cost?
How much does your gf weigh?
How much does your net go up by?
How much do I need to budget for food? £150-£200?
How much do they charge?
How much do you actually bench?
How much do you bench?
How much do you budget for food and laundry and ironing?
How much do you earn?
How much do you get?
How much do you get off a phone at EE?
How much do you have in your internal wallet?
How much do you have in your Nationwide regular saver?
How much do you pay a month in interest?
How much do you pay for Spotify?
How much do you pay for Spotify Premium?
How much do you pay for that?
How much do you put into your pension a month?
How much do you spend on your gf a month?
How much do you weigh?
How much Ethereum do you have?
How much floor area?!?!?
How much garlic did you lose?
How much has the battery increased by?
How much haver you mined?
How much have you mined now? I wonder if I've caught up yet.
How much interest did you make?
How much is 36 garlic coins in LTC?
How much is that in LTC?
How much is that in £ PPP?
How much is your average gas bill at the moment?
How much is your electricity bill each month?
How much is your rent as a proportion of your net salary?
How much mg of caffeine did you consume?
How much money are you making and how much time are you putting into it?
How much money do you have on smarkets? I have £1,260.
How much money have you made selling in-game cosmetic items?
How much more deposit, how much more bet?
How much more expensive do you think electric radiators are in the winter compared to gas central heating?
How much of a performance improvement will I get from OCing my CPU from 4.5GHz to 4.6GHz?
How much pension do you earn?
How much pension do you get?
How much profit from matched betting have you made now?
How much would food and ironing and laundry cost me a week?
How much would that cost?
How much £££ you made?
How often does an NBA game go into overtime?
How often does your flat get cleaned?
How often do you contact your bank lmao.
How often do you go to the gym?
How often do you lift?
How often should I wash my car?
How old are you?
How old are you and what do you study?
How old do you think you'll be when you retire?
How old is she? Is she single?
How old is your flat?
How old is your gf?
How quickly would low effort get me fired?
How rude is the word?
How so?
How's that different from the current paper ballots?
How's the CPU?
How stupid do you think I am?
How tall are you?
How tall are you and how much do you weigh?
how the fuck.
HOW THE FUCK.
How the fuck am I supposed to wreck scrubs and pwn noobs in Overwatch if the game won't even run?!?!?!??!?!
How the fuck are they going to catch people?
How the fuck can they possibly fuck up so fucking much?
How the fuck can you even spend all that.
How the fuck did they get "security issue" and "occupant refused delivery".
How the fuck does phone # auth work?
How the fuck does Windoze support ejecting GPUs?
How the fuck do I open a PDC file?
HOW THE FUCK DO I SWALLOW CAPSULES.
How the fuck do these people hire economics graduates on 16.5k.
How the fuck do you solve pregnancy?
How the fuck do you spell it.
How the fuck is beer going to be good for your productivity?
How the fuck would that make my PC produce more heat?
how the fuck would you know.
How to export Outlook emails as CSV file?
How? What's your grip?
How will they access my webcam if I don't have one plugged in?
How will you beat my interest?
How will you deliver it?
How would a fastened CPU cooler come loose?
How would the world look today?
How would they know.
How would they know I still have a student email address?
How would you watch Youtube or do online banking?!?!?!?
HP=Hit Points.
HR girls flirting with me again.
HR is for girls.
HR is full of girls.
HSBC declined me because my salary is too low :(.
HSBC won't give me an account because my salary is too low.
HTB ISA.
HTC 10 for sure is amazing.
HTC 10 hands down the best DAC.
HTC 10 has the best reviews.
HTC 10 is a very nice phone.
HTC 10 is close to stock.
HTC loading screen.........
HTC One M9.
HTC phones are srsly good sources.
HTC phones get A LOT of flak in /r/android.
Hugely disappointed and outside the return window..
Hugh Mungus wot.
Huh?
Hummus is so good.
hum stop box is an accurate name too I guess.
hundreds of £.
Hurry the fuck up, I wanna OC my CPU.
Hyperbole!
HyperX Cloud I guess.
HyperX Cloud is really cheap.
i5's can't handle overwatch if you want to get 100 fps+ constant..
I aborted after "midget google images".
I abused their promotions really hard.
I accidentally bet on the same event twice with fun88, so I lose like £2 :(.
I activated location settings on Weechat and now lots of Chinese girls from the local university are talking to me.
I actually have my 4690K running at 4.5GHz with very cool temps and very quiet and relatively low voltage, so I'm pretty happy now :).
I actually still have a scar on my foot from when I stood on the edge of a dumbell years ago.
I actually still used IDE drives up until last year, I reused 10 year old ones.
I added my mum and stepdad to my policy which brought the cost down a lot too.
I adjusted the fan curves so my PC is really quiet now.
I agree, Dota is extremely confusing for new players. When I saw the pick screen I didnt know where to put my credit card info.
I agree with a lot of what incels say though.
I agree with one of those sentences.
I almost died from exhaustion.
I almost have them all.
I almost lost an entire playlist.
I already did.
I already did and told everyone they are retarded for not knowing what a spreadsheet is.
I already do.
I already gave you pics omg.
I already get told not to do things.
I already have a car.
I already have a dehumidifier.
I already have a GTX 970 I will put in there.
I already have a kickass PC at home, I just wish I could use it for work purposes.
I already have a motherboard better than yours.
I already have Lync, Citrix, Outlook, etc all set up.
I already have someone looking after it for me for free.
I already have the hardware.
I already know what I want, I'm just waiting for the products to go on sale.
I already know with at least a 50% certainty who is going to be the next prime minister.
I already let him off.
I already own a flat.
I already took 3 of them.
I also don't see the point in that network adapter, optical disc drive, and I think that PSU is a bit overkill at 750W.
I also got HL2 in like 2004.
I also have a 2.5" HDD lying around that I wonder what sort of illegal goodies are on it.
I also have a 5.1GHz 7700K.
I also have a gf and rory does not, so it's not as black and white as you make it out to be.
I also have an asset worth 108k.
I also have a private garden for hanging clothes.
I also have no stands for my headphones.....
I also have pending bets on Betright, Totes and Toals.
I also invested £1000 on Ratesetter.
I also make money from cryptomining, savings interest, and bank bonuses.
I also need a 240hz monitor.
I also play Doki Doki Literature Club.
I also really like tool-less cases, but I can see why they used traditional screws to save space.
I also see 60FPS Twitch streams sometimes.
I also want a 6700K but Kaby Lake is coming out soon.
I also want to buy a GTX 1080 but I am saving for a house......
I also want to get a 1.1TB m.2 SSD so I can get rid of some cables in my build.
I also want to make it child/animal friendly in case my nephew or a dog comes into my house.
I also went to the stationery cupboard for a little bit.
I always ask.
I always buy AIOs instead of big HSFs mounted on the motherboard.
I always fail them.
I always find that with torrents it takes quite a few seconds for the client to find peers and the speed to pick up though.
I always get asked to do easy tasks in really hard ways for some reason.
I always get bad bins.
I always get confused between the two.
I always google the numbers, but most mobiles don't come up.
I always had that with cheap headphones.
I always laugh at the people who say that it would be a disaster if the prize pool went down because then the prize pool will only be £15m and Dota will be a dead game lmao.
I always leave my alarm on max volume and my phone on silent, so I literally only need to ever change my media volume.
I always listen to that song when I'm gambling.
I always mod mine.
I always opt for free delivery.
I always paid it off in full up to now.
I always pay my debts.
I always pay my debts though.
I always play with lowest graphics to maximise my FPS.
I always prefer something unscripted even if it's dumber.
I always shower half way through the day to make sure I don't smell like you.
I always steal the leftover catering food after board meetings.
I always use ethernet anyway.
I am.
I am?
I am 420sam.
I am 5k mmr.
I am about to buy a house.
I am a coffee pod pleb.
I am a fan.
I am afraid to take time off work because my gym is at work.....
I am a homeowner with a mortgage now, so my credit record is going to look pretty good.
I am always worried that my gf is secretly trying to get pregnant.
I am an economist. A pure free market system technically has no government intervention, which has market failure and requires government intervention.
I am at home.
I am at home gambling and gaming.
I am at risk!
I am at work.
I am at work and doing work things too.
I am at work now.
I am back.
I am banned.
I am building the ultimate gaming headset.
I am buying an extra 5 day of holiday from my employer.
I am cash and time poor :(.
I am catching up to you :).
I am currently Eth mining on my GTX 970.
I am Dave from Bath.
I am doing drugs.
I am doing work.
I am dropping half a pound a day.
I am eating a chicken, bacon, avacado and mayo sandwich.
I am eating a chorizo sausage.
I am getitng paid in a week.
I am getting a massage from a chinese woman soon.
I am going to Brighton tonight.
I am going to build a new headset tonight.
I am going to buy a sandwich in 20 minutes.
I am good.
I am good at every game I play.
I am happy for your continued profits, but I am concerned that you haven't measured your electricity consumption and unit rate.
I am here.
I am hesitant to spend too much on a phone because they lose value so fast and they're easy to break, lose or theft.
I am heterosexual.
I am his godfather.
I am holding onto my LTC and XMR.
I am in a noisy office too!!!!
I am in Brighton tomorrow, can I see your flat?
I am in England.
I am injecting skunk.
I AM IN SEOUL.
I am in so much debt now.
I am interested in anything Beyer though.
I am interested in it though.
I am in the south.
I am jacked.
I am jacking it.
I am just remoting into it from my desktop PC.
I am kinda.
I am kinda chubby.
I am King Jung Un firing rockets at Donald Trump and America.
I am lazy.
I am mining bitcoin gold.
I am mining CryptoNight on my CPU and my GPU whilst using my PC.
I am mining LTC.
I am mining Monero directly now.
I am mining RVN.
I am mining skunk.
I am more familiar with GBP than BTC.
I am not a comedian!!!!!!!!!1.
I am not a student either, but I still get £5 Spotify.
I am not a tech person.
I am not in IT either!!!!
I am not interested in discussing that.
I am not taking a 16.5k job and losing my quality pension and health plan and gym and everything.
I am on a standard flexibility contract.
I am on student plan 1 and 7% pension deduction.
I am on the electoral register though because I see it on my credit report.
I am operating an extremely heavy machine at extremely high speeds, I can't afford to make unsafe manoeuvres!!!!!!!!!!1.
I am paying.
I am poor.
I am probably quite good at AoE because I play so much Dota.
I am probably the strongest in my family.
I am profit switching on the GPU and auto exchanging for BTC, and running xmrig on the CPU.
I am repaying now.
I am running Garlic.
I am running Spotify.
I am rural.
I am seriously low on cash.
I am so anxious today because I'm waiting for a phone call to tell me whether I will get the job.
I am someone who needs to buy a GTX 1080TI.
I am so popular.
I am so tilted by Bet on Brazil.
I am starting to worry that I will never be as wealthy as my parents who did not go to university.
I am still mining a little GRLC on my 1080 TI because it's non-laggy.
I am subscribed to the channel on Stremio.
I am the butler lmao.
I am the Cashback King.
I am the youngest, so I will be last-in-line to inherit anything :(.
I am thinking about building a mining rig.
I am thinking of selling my Sound Blaster E5, Audio Technica M50X, and Beyer Custom One Pro.
I am trying to decide whether to drive or get the train to Brighton.
I am trying to get a consistent >200 FPS in Overwatch but it's hard because this game runs so badly.
I am using 152%.
I am using all the extra launch parameters to make it non-laggy and disabled a few algorithms.
I am using Powerline, do you think that adds latency?
I am using Quantum with Tree Style Tabs.
I am using the internal wallet.
I am using the Nicehack miner.
I am watching the Kiev Major.
I am willing to pay more for something really good.
I am withdrawing £2.5k.
I am working in my boxers again.
I am working on 5 atm.
I am worried about mining in the summer though.
I am worried I will be resentful of my gf when I visit her because I won't be able to do my daylies :(.
I am worried that Trade Satoshi will get hacked and I'll lose al my garlic.
I applied for an M&S credit card but they keep rejecting me :(.
I applied to work at another company.
IASIF is so unoriginal and cringey.
I ask "does he needs the right to create projects?" Her response "he gets them automatically" that's not what I asked omg.....
I asked for £39 each which covers their tickets to Thorpe Park, 170 mile round trip and parking.
I asked for a £2,000 credit limit and they approved it.
I asked for a quiet room, so I can have lots of sex with my gf.
I asked her, but I don't understand the response I got.
I asked her for £200 to cover food and bills and stuff and she said that's going to be too much.
I asked her if I can borrow some money, but she said no.
I asked her if she wanted to rent, and she said only if I pay for it all.
I asked her to pay and she said no.
I asked him to tag future urgent emails as high importance so I can prioritise my inbox better and he basically just said no..
I asked my manager to mark urgent emails with the "High Importance" tag, and he told me that ALL emails are High Importance. Do you know if I can create a rule to mark incoming emails as High Importance?
I asked the estate agents if they or the seller could clean it and they said no.
I asked them to add the text as comments or to cells in another column, but they told me no....
I asked the person sitting behind me if they can hear anything and the response "none at all".
I assumed her race.
I assume I do?
I ate SO MUCH food.
I ate the footlong and the six inch and my gf had the other footlong.
I bank with everyone.
I beat they're leaking my kpop to everyone in the office too.
I believe he has more morals than Teresa May.
I believe I should be a millionaire, doesn't make it true.
I believe my dog does too, so it's not much to brag about.
I believe you're misinformed there m9.
I bent a pin on the USB3 front panel connector, so one of the front panel USB sockets won't work.
I bent my motherboard really badly, remember?
I bent my motherboard with clamping force when installing my CPU cooler, should I be worried?
I bent the pins on the motherboard.....
I bet 970s are gonna be awful in the summer.
I bet against the teams I want to win quite often.
I bet an extra £5 to prevent gubbing.
I bet Currys only has shit.
I bet David Cameron and Nigel Farage and Rupert Murdoch think you're a mouthbreather.
I bet DonaldJDuckface plays Dota 2.
I bet he has a shitty CPU too.
I bet he's a dick IRL.
I bet he thinks you're a creepy asian fetishist who pervs on Asian grills instead of doing your work now.
I bet his Beats have pleather pads too, which I could use to get more bass, but pleather pads suck for comfort.
I bet I can pwn you even with my inferior hardware.
I bet I could if I took steroids.
I bet if I didn't get such a shit chip that requires a shitload of voltage to stabalise, I could probably get to 5GHz.
I bet if I went into my office today I'd be too cold because our air conditioning is overpowered.
I bet I have a lot more cash and investments than you.
I bet I have more sex in my flat than yours.
I bet I have more than you.
I bet I'll get negative feedback if I send these back now. Because Hermes fucked up so many times.
I bet Iota hangs out in gay clubs.
I bet Iota knows all the gays.
I bet it isn't.
I bet it'll perform amazingly.
I bet it's horrible.
I bet it's noisy too.
I bet it's not as noisy as my GTX 970's fan running at 4000RPM.
I bet it sucks.
I bet it would suck if you actually do get whiplash.
I bet I've consumed more sugar than you.
I bet I've stabalised my 7700K at a lower voltage at 5GHz than you will be able to.
I bet JC is loving it right now.
I bet Katie Hopkins hates my gf because she's a foreigner.
I bet Microsoft paid the filmakers to discredit open source so businesses don't switch to Linux lmao.
I bet my electricity bill is going to be really high when I move into my flat.
I bet my flat is warmer than yours.
I bet my FPS will be triple yours.
I bet my gf and gaming rig are smaller than yours.
I bet my PC will be super fast too.
I bet my wife has smaller boobies than you.
I bet rory and Donald Trump have a lot in common.
I be trying to increase my wealth, or reduce my costs?
I bet she'd look great in my M50s.
I bet she's fat and ugly.
I bet she sucks at CS.
I bet she was fat.
I bet that song sounds amazing on your DT990s.
I bet the price will go up by the time my one arrives though.
I bet there'll be Christmas skins.
I bet they are awful.
I bet they'll stay low whilst I'm saving, then increase when I want to buy lmao.
I bet they sound like shit.
I bet this guy is going to arrange a meeting for when I'm in another office because I sent him a table that says I'm not working from home that day.....
I bet you and I have a lot in common even though I despise most things you do.
I bet you and me have a lot in common even though I despise most things you do.
I bet you buy Beats headphones.
I bet you can't find an HTC One M9 on contract for anywhere near the price I paid.
I bet you can't get headphones this good for cheaper than £75.
I bet you can't get nicer headphones than these for less than £75.
I bet you'd fuck her if you could.
I bet you'd say that even if I linked you a lolcats video.
I bet you go the whole day at work without showering once.
I bet you notice no difference to the sound quality.
I bet you play Genji.
I bet your bank is looking into it because they suspect you're buying drugs again.
I bet your electricity costs a lot more than mine.
I binged it.
I binned it.
Ibiza in 2 weeks.
I blocked a toilet at the office with my shit once.
I blocked my company's toilet.
I booked a room at Travelodge in London for £36.
I bought a chorizo and 2 scotch eggs.
I bought a Fidelio X2 and my friend says that it's just a placebo over his Razer Kraken.
I bought a GTX 1080 TI.
I bought all my own furniture.
I bought a Maisonette because it's like a flat but not in a block of flats and has its own front door but is cheaper than a house.
I bought a modmic too, but it keeps falling off and it's less convenient having two separate cables is annoying and they get tangled more often.
I bought a new monitor last year, and it was still only 1080p.
I bought a packet of beef jerkey at the weekend!!!!!!
I bought a PSU for the case which I have since repurposed for my Ncase M1..
I bought a quadcoptor.
I bought a really nice gaming chair for only £60.
I bought BCH for cheap on one exchange and sold it for expensive on another exchange.
I bought her a couple of meals and topped up her Starbucks card.
I bought it.
I bought it for £30 and returned the one my mum got me.
I bought it from the sandwich van.
I bought it specifically for that case.
I bought mine from overclockers.co.uk though :(.
I bought my car from them last summer and got a 12 month warranty.
I bought my gf a margarita and she went so red omg.
I bought my M50X for only slightly more than the mod.
I bought my mouse about 6 years ago, Logitech replaced it a couple of times.
I bought one on ebay last night.
I bought Philips Fidelio X2.
I bought some items on the Steam Market for 9p a year ago which are worth £8.60 now.
I bought Street Fighter, but the PC client is fucking awful, I gave up when I couldn't navigate the menu using my mouse and had to use wierd-as-fuck keyboard bindings instead.
I bought the Harambe Christmas skin.
I bought the milk for me.
I bought the TI7 compendium the other day.
I bought the tickets and the parking and drove.
I bought the wrong cable it seems.
I bought things!
I bought two Chromecasts though.
I built a PC for someone before.
I built my PC inside my Ncase M1 last night.
I built them myself.
I buy her a lot of food.
I buy lots of foreign goods.
I buy shit like holidays and food with fiat.
I calculated that roughly 45% of Dota players regularly watch pro games but only about 14% of LoL players.
I calculate I'm earning 8.97% on 15k right now.
I calculate it at 4.375% + £600 a year interest.
I call BS.
I called ebay and the female on the other end of the phone seemed very confident I will get my money refunded if my sellers does not do so by the 13th.
I call them and INSTANTLY speaking to a real English man.
I can access it at 55 to supplement the lost income as I get older.
I can afford a GTX 1080TI now!!!!!
I can already move my mouse along the pad by blowing at it.
I can also tell the difference between 60FPS and 200.
I can always just return it or get Philips to repair it, right?
I can barely even remember their faces.
I can barely hear the mids.
I can be.
I can bench more than you.
I can bring the monthly payments below £350 a month.
I can buy on a 0% credit card instead.
I can buy up to 5 days.
I can claim drugs on my expenses form?!?!??!?!?
I can coach you!
I can confirm that rory's headphone budget and suggestion is good.
I can confirm that your account is eligible for the offer..
I can convert to fiat for basically free anyway.
I can crack peoples' passwords and steal their monies.
I can do it on older games, but I prefer a higher framerate at 1080p for most modern games. Use smoothness 0% don't use anything else..
I can do more with my money if I don't repay it.
I can drink water.
I can easily get some money from my grandparents too.
I can either keep it or give it back to my father.
I can enable all the algorithms and benefit from more price spikes :D.
I can export from Outlook, but not the subfolders. I need Outlook 2016 ffs.
I can find the most profitable cryptocurrency, then switch on my mining PC as a 1kw heater remotely before I get home.
I can fit my desktop PC in a rucksack.
I can for a year, but I must do it really soon.
I can get £20 tickets through work.
I can get 3% in a Tesco current account.
I can get an extra 0.1GHz out of it now, but I like keeping it cool and quiet.
I can get even cheaper electricity at night, but that day rate is too good to give up.
I can get lots of M&S food.
I can get more FPS with one of those than he can with 40.
I can get you a student discount.
I can give you your £8 back or send you 254 GRLC, your choice.
I can go buy a £10,000 car without financing tomorrow if I wanted to.
I can go buy shit.
I can grow facial hair because I am a man.
I can have my finger holding down a button without even noticing!
I can hear the dog barking at home, and my colleagues complained about the sound leakage.
I can if I save up.
I can just backup on dropbox or something.
I can just drag it through the doorways.
I can just get a cheap kettle and toaster and microwave and toastie maker.
I can just google things if I don't know something.
I can just reinstall the OS if a drive breaks.
I can just revert it.
I can just unchange it.
I can keep them in my pocket.
I can leave at 16:00 on Fridays if I want to only take a 30 min break and get into the office at 08:30.
I can link my paypal to my credit card?
I can listen to new music and update my kpop playlist.
I can make it a lot quieter if I buy a new GPU and GPU cooler and essentially turn my case into a one-directional wind tunnel.
I can make that in a single promo.
I can mine 1GRLC in like an hour on my 1080 TI.
I can mine using coffee shop electricity!!!!
I can neither confirm nor deny that.
I can notice the difference instantly just by moving my mouse around the screen omg it's amazing.
I can only pay £200 a month into it :(.
I can pay it, I just don't want to reduce my savings.
I can play with you some time.
I can plug my custom-built headset into it.
I can probably get 1k out pretty easily.
I can probably get a similar amount of value in a gift card by just transferring the money to my bank account then buying a gift card through work anyway.
I can probably sell you 10 or more GRLC every day whilst I'm still mining it.
I can protect it from external damage, but there could be an overload of g-forces if it's tossed really hard.
I can put a draft build together.
I can put bubble wrap over the main surfaces, but not the edges of the screen.
I can put it towards a GTX 1080TI.
I can put them on my lap and then lean backwards, but I CBA.
I can read, I just choose not to.
I can recommend you a really shit casual mouse if you want.
I can recommend you cases.
I can reduce the voltages so much.
I can remember names of graphics cards pretty well, I should just assign them each a graphics card name and call them that.
I can run CS:GO at 4k at 60FPS I think.
I can save an additional £6,000 over the next 6 months.
I can save more money living at home!
I can see how much power each is using, and reboot them individually.
I can sell all my headphones and get more than I paid for them if I want.
I can sell for 38p.
I can sell GRLC and RVN.
I can sell it, I just need to give the council 25% of the sale.
I can sell you 300.
I can send it to him if he really wants.....
I can send my gdax BTC to any address for 0 fees.
I can send them to you later.
I can shoot  better now.
I can still arb them.
I can still get £6,000 at 3% with Tesco and £1,500 at 3% with TSB.
I can still give you a lot of build advice though if it's gaming performance you're after.
I can't.
I can't afford anything because I bought a fucking pre-binned delidded 7700K.
I can't afford it right now, but I might look into it later this year.
I can't afford my 5.2GHz delidded pre-binned 7700k now :(.
I can't afford one myself but very occassionally my mum will buy me one.
I can't afford the risk right now.
I can't afford to right now, but I'll come next year.
I can take a £250 hit, but not multiple times.
I can't apply for more right now because I am trying to get a mortgage :(.
I can't because I am poor.
I can't because I'm fucking poor omg.
I can't, because that would be cheating.
I can't because trolling is strictly forbidden in our company policy..
I can't believe how difficult it is to get my stuff. I've literally never had a problem with DPD.
I can't believe I just bought my endgame headphones for £116.99.
I can't believe I'm a permanent employee, it's like a dream come true.
I can't believe that it's the CURRENT YEAR and I can still see people outside having a smoke break.
I can't be tricked into watching gay propaganda.
I can't buy most of the shit I need with bitcoin.
I can't check the full report without paying for it.
I can't decide between Tab Tree and Tree Style Tab.
I can't decide on Seoul or Shanghai though.
I can't decide what phone to buy.
I can't discuss specifics because it's against the rules IIRC.
I can't do it....
I can't do shit from the office though.
I can tell the difference between my HTC One M9 and Soundblaster E5 easily.
I can tell the difference even just moving the cursor around my screen.
I can tell you how to do it btw.
I can tell you how to do the basics.
I can't even use my Boompro cable with my DT770s!!!!
I can't exchange <0.1 LTC. My hashrate is higher so I can probably sell 15 garlic at a time now instead of 10.
I can't figure out how to create a fan curve for my CPU. Aida 64 says my RPMs are the same before and after stability testing.
I can't find a 4TB drive for cheaper than that.
I can't find anything on there.
I can't find the right portable headphones for me. I can't find any over-ears with a standard 3.5mm cable and replaceable earpads :(.
I can't find where they're made.
I can't fit in all the gaming and cooking and sex and working all into one day if I walk to work!!!!!
I CAN'T FUCKING FIGURE IT OUT.
I can't fucking keep to the speed limit if I don't fucking know what the fucking speed limit fucking is omfg.
I can't fucking wait to try out Vulkan next week in my favourite game.
I can't get a consistent 300FPS yet.
I can't get cheaper than that.
I can't get CPU profit switching to work well.
I can't get it because my salary doesn't pay £1,750 a month :(.
I can't get my work email setup on my desktop PC for some reason though.
I can't get them to unlock my account.
I can't get to the "refund sent" stage until ebay updates ffs.
I can't give you the full list of reasons without getting fired for racism.
I can't go back to normal browsers.
I can't go on holidays because I have rent and mortgage and council tax and bills to pay :(.
I can't go outside because I'd literally get sunburnt within a few minutes.....
I can then sell the eth on gdax for USD or EUR.
I can't imagine a democratic country having a worse political situation than the USA has.
I can't imagine browsing without it.
I can't imagine owning my own houses like my parents do.
I can't install any mining software on my work laptop because it keeps getting blocked by the anti virus wtf???
I can't justify spending more than a few hundred pounds a year on audio......
I can't live without it now.
I can't man.
I can't open the windows because there are children and insects outside.
I can't overextend too much.
I can't phone them now because I am at work.
I can't post it until Monday anyway, because the fucking post office in my town has the same opening hours as my working hours.
I can't predict the fucking future.
I can't produce it as cost effectively as a large power station.
I can't protect the shit I want without locking the shit they need.
I can't remember any of their names though.
I can't remember exactly. I think I just thrusted inside a bit and then pulled out and jizzed on her tits.
I can't remember how far I got with them though.
I can't remember how I did it.
I can't remember if I had deposited funds on the site or not.
I can't remember last time I did it.
I can't remember my age.
I can't remember the last time I used BETDAQ.
I can't replicate the same kind of isolation, water-resistance and small space of my Shure SE215 IEMs.
I can't retrieve the value of my Steam inventory because I had to make it private to stop constant spammers and beggars.
I can't return the wired one because my ebay seller doesn't accept returns.
I can't see how it'll protect children but it's got some very clear censorship implications.
I can't see your sell order now?
I can't show up to court if I don't even know about it omg.
I can't speculate until I've at least paid off the depreciation.
I can't stress-test my PC overnight because it makes my room too hot.
I can't survive on £56 a week lmao.
I CANT SWALLOW THEM OMG.
I can't take anyone seriously who says that.
I can't take it any more, I really need to do a poo!!!!!!!!!1.
I can't tell if it's serious or not.
I can't tell if you're a really boring dedicated troll or just have autism.
I can't tell if you're serious.
I can't tell if you're trolling.
I can't tell if you're trolling me.
I can't tell you about every good one.
I can't use it ATM anyway because my Ncase M1 is still in Taiwan.
I can't use it on 3G.
I can't use my new mouse until after work :(.
I can't use the gym atm because I'm ill :(.
I can't wait for my GTX 1080TI but I'm worried about what my wife will say/do to me when she finds out I've spent £550 and will spend another ~£80 on the cooling system.
I can't wait for my Ncase to arrive because I'll be able to get a sweet OC on my CPU.
I can't wait for the summer.
I can't wait to actually get a 144hz monitor though omg.
I can't wait to go home to do my dailies.
I can't wait to plug them into my soundcard tonight.
I can undervolt a 1070 TI a lot.
I can use it to buy good headphones and 4.7GHz CPUs and shit.
I can use Lastpass to automatically fill forms for me.
I can use RDP and get the inbox up that way.
I can use their electricity, gym and shower.
I can use this to measure the growth of the scene eac hyear.
I can use WhatsApp for messaging.
I can withdraw more often so I don't lose a big balance again like with NiceHash.
I can work at a coffee shop and buy coffees all day using my mining profits.
I care!!!!
I care about amdahl's law.
I CARE ABOUT MYPROTEIN.
I care more about being a good player and pwning noobs like Iota rather than arbitrary scores on co-op missions.
I care more about framerate and input lag.
I CBA to add all the free CD keys any more though.
I CBA to argue about the credibility of the Daily Mail; their readers are fucking delusional.
I CBA to change the auto start to garlic because IDK how long I'll be mining it for.
I CBA to change tips....
I CBA to do all that.
I CBA to dress well.
I CBA to write a cover letter 100 times.
I CBA with wall mounts.
I certainly wouldn't say "less people" in an interview.
Iceweasel=unbranded firefox.
I changed it to 1.
I checked my client earlier and it said I'm making 74p a day from my CPU.
I checked my Experian credit rating last night and it's 915 which is pretty good I guess.
I checked the VPN comparison spreadsheet and PIA does pretty well.
Ich nicht sprechen sie Deutsch!!!!!
I choose £2.28.
I choose every part.
I choose to only pay them £5.
I chose a bet with odds 1.99 ffs.
I chose good headphones over good food, and I don't regret my decision.
I cleaned my car last night.
I climbed Mt Snowdonia a couple of years ago.
I closed an account with Lloyds and they sent me a cheque for like £0.11 that I never bothered to cash in.
I combine the Coral bet club and acca insurance every week.
I concur.
I connect two displays by using the laptop dock.
I contribute 7%, my employer contributes 10%.
I copy pasted my bat file to you.
I could.
I could bring my Beyer COPs+V-moda Boompro into the office but I CBA.
I could build a much better PC in the exact same case for the same price.
I could build a really sick gaming PC.
I could build the most amazing gaming PC ever.
I could buy a 35" Acer Z35 21:9 200hz monitor.
I could buy an i7 6700k.
I could buy another for my brother's Christmas present.
I could buy a second car.
I could buy so many things.
I could buy the phone for £560 on Amazon and £120 contract = £680.
I could carry around my Sound Blaster E5 but it's bigger than my phone and I don't want to carry it around with me.
I could complete my job on 2GB of RAM, it just took me all dya.
I could copy you.
I could do, but I'm afraid of a gubbing.
I could do some research and find lots of facts and figures to build a really strong argument.
I could do that.
I could do the case+CPU+PSU combo if you want though.
I could do with a laptop.
I could do with the money to buy a house anyway.
I could drink water or some shit instead.
I could easily set up a standing order for £1,750 if I could just open the fucking account omfg.
I could eat way larger portions if I really wanted to.
I could even put them in RAID.
I could even send it back to the manufacturer too and get a second wallet if I really wanted.
I could finally move away from the parents I hate so much!
I could get an interest only mortgage for like £160 a month.
I could get a pair of M50s too as they're fairly good travelphones.
I could get faster if I really wanted to.
I could get more work done if I go home and use my own PC.
I could go bankrupt if I'm not careful!
I could go live in a massive fucking 1000 year old mansion right now if I wanted to.
I could go to Bath and play Pokemon Go and meet lots of Chinese girls....
I could have another NiceHack on my hands.
I could have a really long shower after work if I wanted.
I could have asked for more.
I could have asked you for more than 0.009.
I could have done more, but I ran out of lunch hour.
I could have got 2 Chinese massages.
I could have gotten a delidded pre-binned at 4.9GHz for like £390 if it was in stock.
I could have had 1GB instead of 500MB.
I could have made more if I didn't price my garlic so low on the BTC market.
I could have made more if I really committed to it.
I could have probably got a new one installed for me for like £60 somewhere else.
I could have taken them last week, but I was covering for someone else.
I could include an SSD.
I could just buy one.
I could just keep using my uni one if I wanted to.
I could just not drink tea.
I could just put a Titan X in my PC and I would instantly have 200% more GPU performance.
I could just undervolt and tune the fan speeds, but I'd probably lose hashing power.
I could liquidise my portfolio whether you tell me that or not.
I could live with my brother for £300 a month.
I could make more money from betting if I put more time into it.
I could never use HD600s in my office.
I couldn't find anything decent, so I thought I'd just get a couple of bowls.
I couldn't find the exact same models for the motherboard and RAM, but the parts listed are the closest I could find to the parts I have.
I couldn't find you.
I couldn't get my mic to work on Linux..........
I couldn't see the lines because they're so faint.
I couldn't see very well because of the sun glare.
I couldn't use my Amazon gift card though :(.
I could only get the name from the URL.
I could probably book a room and work on my bill.
I could probably get more if I could be bothered to run a separate overclock just for mining.
I could probably invest in a mining rig and do mining + betting to make a tax-free income higher than you.
I could probably keep using it though.
I could probably lift it onto my back and walk away with it easily if it's under 60kg.
I could probably take the side of my case off and just leave the H105 hanging in the air....
I could probably withdraw from all my gambling sites and put £20k into crypto.
I could recommend you some decent headphones for like 1/10th of the price.
I could recommend you something smaller.
I could run the same framerate with halve the heat.
I could sell all my Dota and CS:GO assets for lots of money.
I could sell them and buy a 7700K.
I could sell them to you.
I could sell the PSU, motherboard, CPU, cooler and RAM installed.
I could send it to you if you cover my costs.
I could set my PC to start up and mine only during Economy 7 hours......
I could staircase to 100% ownership too, but people warn me about staircasing because it's "expensive".
I could tell the police that you have a stash of something and they'd break down your door tomorrow morning.
I could tell they were jews because they had all the jewish clothes on.
I could try opening them up to see if there was a problem with the mod.
I could turn my gaming PC into a little miner/space heater.
I could use other softwares too though.
I could walk to work from my new flat but it'll take 50 minutes each day to get there and back but only 18 minutes by bike.
I cracked my phone's camera yesterday :(.
I create a new account every couple of years.
I created a ~1000 song playlist on Spotify and songs keep disappearing from it :(.
I created a spreadsheet containing specs of lots of mice so I could analyse what is the best mouse, but I could also use it to recommend you a mouse.
I create new accounts every couple of years.
ICT, legal, stationery, etc.
I current prediction for the TI6 prizepool is $21140003.23443516.
I cut myself shaving last night.
I cut the amount of spam emails i receive by 100% when I switched from Hotmail to Openmailbox.
I'd advise you to be very careful.
I'd also recommend a bigger CPU cooler than that.
I'd also recommend spending £1,000 for a PC if you have the money. You want to get an i7 6700k and GTX 1070.
I damaged my HTC One M9 with water.
I dare you to read The Bible.
I'd back HTC and Valve over Facebook and Mark Fuckerburg any day.
I'd be fine with that. The reviews of the refurbished one say that it's as good as new, so I thought it's great value for £50, but unopened probably has a way better warranty.
I'd be happy if I could not live with my parents and still save a shitload of money every month.
I'd be happy if they just got rid of the decay alltogether.
I'd be happy with even 1/10th of that.
I'd be higher if my gf had a job.
I'd be more interested in a G404 with some minor improvements.
I'd be pretty happy with my M9 if the fucking camera was any good.
I'd be so pissed if I was him.
I'd buy a gaming laptop if they weren't so fucking difficult to upgrade and repair.
I'd buy a SENNHEISER Momentum 2.0 if the cable wasn't proprietary.
I'd buy Beats if they were only £5.
I'd buy wireless if it wasn't so heavy and if the battery was easily replaceable.
I'd definitely be happy with more Chinese girls coming to the country though.
I'd DEFINITELY recommend you them.
I'd definitely wear a wifi jammer over going to prison.
I'd do it for 1k.
I'd drink sugar free all the time, but the citric acid is bad for my teeth.
Ideally people should also get a say over stuff debated in parliament, surely?
Ideally you want one CC for cash withdrawals and one CC for card payments.
I decided against getting the Etymotics this weekend, and I'm going to save up for CIEMs instead!
I decided that I want to save up enough for a flat by January.
I decrypt my phone with my pattern.
I definitely prefer them over my M50X.
I deleted my Facebook account.
IDE optical drives.
I deposit an extra £5.
I'd give it a try if it was free. I don't want to spend that kind of money on games that won't last long atm.
I'd go for 240hz.
I'd google gogo girl but I'm afraid that what I might find is NSFW.
I'd go to Shanghai.
I'd go wireless, but the battery adds weight, the battery will slowly degrade over a couple of years, I'd need to plug it in to charge every now and then anyway.
I'd guess so.
I'd hate for you to get scammed.
I'd hate to go through London with anything illegal; if the police catch you you'll get arrested for terrorism or something.
I'd hate to lose thousands of £ if someone burgled my home or it caught fire or something though.
I'd hate to play CS:GO on a laptop.
I'd hate to withdraw to an address that's not mine any more then lose all my money.
I'd have 0 liquidity if I invested all my savings now.
I'd have so much time for gaming and ignoring my gf.
I'd have to drive into work to pick it up.
I did.
I did?
I did 40 £1 bets on 20 Black with 1:36 odds and won three times!!!!!
I did 888poker and lost everything because I don't know how to play poker.
I did a £150 arb on Betway last night.
I did a Quidco £5 cashback on everything5pounds.com and bought an item for £5 that I would never buy without the cashback. The cashback didn't track and it was a special limited to the first 14,000 people promotion on Quidco and now I think I might have wasted £5.
I did a rory yesterday.
I did but couldn't find the right setting. Only "quiet" and "normal" and "performance".
I did for the first week.
I did Grosover Casino last night.
I did =INDEX(Planned!B:B,,1).
I did it and added logarithmic scale to make it more readable.
I did it before, greyhound is hard to lay.
I did it even more actually.
I did it even when paid hourly.
I did it for my gf last night too.
I did it in Portal 2.
I did it on pcpartpicker.
I did it through Quidco.
I did like 7 poos a day with Reddit time.
I didn't.
I didn't agree to £8 though, I want £0.0315 per GRLC.
I didn't bet my Bet on Brazil free bets this week.
I didn't choose engineering or computer science.
I didn't connect the microfilter.
I didn't cut anything away, I just swapped the pads lmao.
I didn't even realise it was a question.
I didn't get any.
I didn't get long to test the V-Moda M100 because my gf was kicking off about being bored :(.
I didn't get the fastest RAM.
I didn't get the fastest SSD.
I didn't get the job :(.
I didn't get the job. I was told I performed really well in the interview, but they got an external candidate who was already doing the job..
I didn't go into detail, cheap build quality, instrument seperation, etc.
I didn't intend to be owed any money.
I didn't, I paid for my holiday entirely from the EUR deposits from selling crypto on gdax.
I didn't know it can do that.
I didn't know Samsung made headphones.
I didn't know that.
I didn't know that Signal was a ban evasion app.
I didn't know there was as much competition until after I made the offer.
I didn't know there was even an election.
I didn't know there were categories to selfies.
I didn't know there were immigrants up north.
I didn't know what she meant.
I didn't laugh, but I told him I understood it.
I didn't like her anyway because she was fat, annoying and white.
I didn't like some of the sexual jokes.
I didn't like them.
I didn't like WhatsApp before because I thought it was a spying platform.
I didn't mean landlord actually.
I didn't opt in at unibet.
I didn't realise I had to collect every item I ordered when I go to the locker, I wanted the toolbox to go back.
I didn't realise it was bending until I finished tightening.
I didn't remove the default formatting, so when it changes to something where the rule doesn't apply, it goes back to whatever the cell was manually formatted to a while ago.
I didn't request that.
I didn't see anyone call it NiceHack before me.
I didn't see her.
I didn't think he meant 1 year into the future.
I didn't think I signed up for membership....
I didn't think they gave 0% overdrafts that high.
I didn't think we exchange birthday presents?
I didn't want to.
I didn't want to use the included thermal glue because it's permanent.
I didn't waste my money on my K702s+Creative E5 I hope?
I didn't watch the video, I just listened to it on Spotify.
I did some antibiotics earlier this year when I had a nasty ear infection.
I did some cable management, cleaned the dust filters, repositioned the radiator slightly, and changed the fans from pull to push, and now my temps are better.
I did some work.
I did start replying to her and she just says "I'm talking to myself".
I did that once to my bottom and it hurt like a bitch for about 15 minutes.
I did that too and now I have an M50X just sitting in a box.....
I did that when I had a phone call with the bank. I told them I had to go for a phone interview.
I did them all except for Ladbrokes.
I did, then they got all bitchy about the noise my keyboard was making.
I did wonder why they needed my phone number at the start.
idiots!
I discovered the sticky note program in Windoze and now I have covered my screen in sticky notes.
I'd join you if I lived in Leeds.
I'd just get my gf deported.
I'd just need a new cable.
I'd just prefer not to.
I'd just rather give you no advice than bad advice.
I'd just rather it not be actual shit.
I'd just walk it.
IDK.
IDK 1150 or something?
IDK 75C is fine.
IDK about £800 a month I guess.
IDK about Artifact yet, we know nothing about it.
IDK about LUX, it's really profitable but I think the price might be artificially high because you can't deposit onto any exchange atm.
IDK about mice with numpads.
IDK about production/serial number.
IDK about the case and CPU cooler, I'll check what I can get on ebay for them tonight then adjust them for fees and postage and get back to you.
IDK about the mornings because I am asleep in the morning.
IDK about the S7 actually.
IDK about those, I just look at what has the highest interest rate and rewards.
IDK about you.
IDK a couple of years.
IDK Adam and Eve?
IDK after charges it'll probably not be too dissimilar to the amount HansProleman was gonna pay me.
IDK any more.
IDK ask game developers.
IDK average I guess.
IDK average I think.
IDK changes all the time, probably ~2 months for ~£120.
IDK could be shady.
IDK desktop PCs are just so far ahead in terms of price:performance right now that I don't see it changing any time soon.
IDK does it count as IT?
IDK driving?
IDK either.
IDK even what a burqa is exactly.
IDK every week maybe?>.
IDK exactly how coinmarketcap determines the price.
IDK figure it out.
IDK for sure.
IDK get a laptop or tablet or TV then?
IDK give me a little higher than the buy order.
IDK good I guess. I won't find out until today.
IDK hard to follow chat.
IDK have a look.
IDK have a lot.
IDK haven't checked.
IDK haven't herard of ontrees.
IDK have you seen some 16 year olds nowadays?
IDK how.
IDK how accurate those stats are yet.
IDK how a non-RGB gamin keyboard is any different from a business keyboard other than the fact it has a windows lock key.
IDK how do I check?
IDK how good the price is.
IDK how I accidentally downloading >100k uni emails instead of my own inbox.
IDK how I can buy a quadcoptor + shipping from China for £8.
IDK how I can retire on the tiny pension I'm building because my salary is so small.
IDK how I didn't notice earlier.
IDK how I ended up with so much cash with them.
IDK how I ever browsed without tab trees lmao.
IDK how I feel about it. They have a provision fund but IDK if it'd secure my capital or notr.
IDK how I'm stake restricted, I've barely used Bruce Betting.
IDK how in Outlook.
IDK how long I have to hold it for.
IDK how much I use them.
IDK how old are you? I'm 24.
IDK how other than plugging each monitor in twice or switching the cables each time.
IDK how she even knew it was a court summons without opening it.
IDK how she's survived so long.
IDK how that works.
IDK how they can live without it.
IDK how they decide on hotels.
IDK how to fix that.
IDK how to merge them.
IDK how to show matches between two sets of data.
IDK how you can live paycheck to paycheck like that.
IDK I built a pretty good PC.
IDK I didn't look closely.
IDK I don't give laptops much attention.
IDK I don't monitor DOGE.
IDK I don't trust that source.
IDK I'd probably need to do some research and make an informed decision. I quite like the idea of socialised healthcare as people who are ill might struggle to generate the income to get better.
IDK if 888 or Ladbrokes had those.
IDK if F2P even accurately describes it with the current definition of F2P.
IDK if I can achieve 5.2 on this chip.
IDK if I can cope with the heat from more than 3 rigs in my 1 bedroom flat.
IDK if I CBA with it.
IDK if I count as a new customer?
IDK if I even want to sell it actually.
IDK if I ever registered a NUS card sry.
IDK if I like it.....
IDK if I like that feature.
IDK if I'll always be earning this much.
IDK if I'll be able to get these skins again.
IDK if I'll be using 21:9 in the future though.
IDK if I'll like the comfort.
IDK if I'll spend £1k to build a mining PC though....
IDK if I'll use it.
IDK if I'm earning or not.
IDK if I'm interested until I see your stuff.
IDK if Iota has any features that girls will find attractive.
IDK if I overpaid or underpaid the fee.
IDK if I should be gambling with my house deposit money.
IDK if I should link a report with my home address on the internet.
IDK if it even needs to.
IDK if it'll beat last year's $18,429,613.
IDK if it'll make any difference to me.
IDK if it's any better nowadays, but I've got enough other games right now.
IDK if it's more or less profitable than MPH.
IDK if it's policy or not, I'll ask.
IDK if it's still good because I stopped watching anime when I turned about 14.
IDK if it's worth it.
IDK if I want it now, I ideally want lots of 1070 TIs.
IDK if I want to spend lots of money on Amazon right now.
IDK if Noddle does that.
IDK if Noddle is comparable to Experian.
IDK I followed the guide.
IDK if she meant workbook or spreadsheet.
IDK if there's a market for that. People either want sugar or they don't.
IDK if the VPN is blocked or if there's just some weird firewall that's causing an issue on my work wifi.
IDK if they do hard drugs they might be risking their health?
IDK if you even need to OC it though, it's powerful enough for gaming at 100% power and 100% power is enough for mining too.
IDK if you have a third-party card with some sort of OC profile system on the board itself?
IDK if you should CPU mine.
IDK if you skip the first 5 series and just start on the 6th then the show is okay.
IDK I have like £18,000 in my bank right noow.
IDK I have to factor in mining profits and noise too.
IDK I have to move out of my parent's house at some point.
IDK i just copy pasted it from somewhere.
IDK I just do the accumulators which are always above 2.0 anyway.
IDK I just look at current reloads.
IDK I just save 90% of my salary and get all the cashbacks I can.
IDK I just want something a little bit better.
IDK, I like theme parks though.
IDK I'll figure something out.
IDK I'll just take it to Royalmail in the morning and ask them for the cheapest option to arrive by 19/05.
IDK I'll probably just tell them that they needlessly inconvenienced me by making my product arrive late and that I'll just get my games through digital distribution from now on.
IDK I'm not gaming.
IDK I'm not logging hours. Not too many.
IDK I never look.
IDK I never look at ATX cases.
IDK install Photoshop with WINE.
IDK I only use SSDs now.
IDK I overclock both.
IDK isn't Telegram inferior to WhatsApp anyway?
IDK isn't that what ISPs usually do?
IDK it doesn't make sense what they said.
IDK it feels like "program" should be the correct word.
IDK it gives no competitive points and low XP.
IDK I think if you aren't violent or have any reason for them to suspect you of doing any crimes then they won't pursue a normal drug user in their own home.
IDK I think it might be scam.
IDK I think it's dead and haven't seen any evidence otherwise.
IDK I think that might be fraudulant.
IDK I thought we agreed to just buy/sell direct from the exchange.
IDK it's all the same freemium bullshit.
IDK it's just the sort of thing that the anti-EU people are saying nowadays.
IDK it's quite an expensive premium mouse, so I don't want to just give it away..
IDK it won't be too bad unless Intel start making better CPUs.
IDK I've been told very little.
IDK I've not seen a game grow this fast before.
IDK I've only just signed up too.
IDK I was CPU bottlenecked at the time.
IDK just get rid of VAT altogether then.
IDK just go on Stremio and look for something.
IDK just let me know.
IDK just thought it was interesting that Valve chose a different direction from the franchise system LoL is doing.
IDK just treat it as a fun day to slack off.
IDK just wondering how disabling Wi-Fi saves you battery.
IDK Korean things?
IDK lack of skills and experience?
IDK like 100 I guess.
IDK like £10k.
IDK like £20.
IDK like £200 I guess.
IDK like a month.
IDK looks like the playlist author just decided to slim it down a shitload for no reason.
IDK lots of people have weird hobbies.
IDK m9.
IDK making a single vote doesn't seem very influential to me.
IDK man.
IDK man I CBA to go visit my gf.
IDK man I just don't like waking up into darkness.
IDK man I like the bass boost on my E10K.
IDK man I'm still experimenting too.
IDK man I need to get some more furniture first.
IDK man it's probably bad.
IDK man I've never thought about that.
IDK man Japan is fucking weird.
IDK man stick some watercooling on it and you can get a lot more clockspeed on the GPU.
IDK man your view on female attractiveness is so warped that I doubt you'd value my input.
IDK maybe call the police to deal with the situation.
IDK maybe he thinks TOR is scary and illegal.
IDK maybe if I want to have a little squat or fold up my legs or run or something.
IDK maybe it gives you a bad throat?
IDK maybe rory is right.
IDK maybe the company that hosts the system makes backups.
IDK maybe the top 2-3 Korean teams.
IDK might do. Animations are a lot more fluid.
IDK might just buy it.
IDK my wife does all that.
IDK Netbet keeps sending me these weird emails.
IDK never needed to replace them.
IDK never tried Beats.
IDK not running ATM.
IDK physical abuse can cause permanent damage/disability or even death.
IDK probably.
IDK probably buy a lottery ticket for a huge lottery payout or something.
IDK, probably only a few £ a day.
IDK probably something stupid because you never add anything meaningful to a conversation.
IDK racism is treated very seriously nowadays.
IDK robots are taking my jobs.
IDK rory likes to joke that I am an autist or something.
IDK save it as a profile.
IDK seems to be working fine?
IDK sex?
IDK, she demands I plan everything.
IDK, she said "spreadsheet" but I'm not sure what she means.
IDK she's changed it like 3 times this year.
IDK she's confusing me now, I thought that 00:00 means both end of day/start of next day.
IDK she wants babies and I don't.
IDK someone else will probably steal your LTC because you said your private key in a public IRC channel.
IDK someone will complain that they can't write an essay in a cell that should be the expiry date of an insurance document or something.
IDK some sort of analyst course.
IDK some sort of ht=true or less threads 0 option.
IDK something about supporting our colleagues who have Samsung devices or something.
IDK something like £144 with Moneyfarm and £120 with Nutmeg.
IDK something like £5 EV, but I get 2 X £5 bets too.
IDK, SpaceX has a plan and roadmap, but I'm pretty pessimistic about it.
IDK stock Firefox?
IDK strictly speaking I was owed the money by the government because of the UC rules.
IDK that seems less convenient.
IDK that's like nothimng.
IDK that sounds like quite a reasonable reaction.
IDK the article says they can?
IDK the default one?
IDK the DT880 doesn't look like it has deep bass.
IDK the media?
IDK then.
IDK the person sitting next to me is listening to her ipod and talking to herself all day.
IDK there's a lot of evidence that girls prefer men who are already in a relationship.
IDK there's a lot to analyse there.
IDK the worst case scenario is I just lose my balance.
IDK this internet is shit.
IDK thousands.
IDK too much text.
IDK tracksuits or some shit.
IDK use a virtual desktop.
IDK wat though.
IDK what a "bonus" is though.
IDK what Blizzard were thinking.
IDK what brand that is.
IDK what BTL is. They bought their houses.
IDK what calculator app I use.
IDK what coin I'm mining with lyra2 right now, but it's very profitable.
IDK what else she does with herself.
IDK what her name is.
IDK what if Pakistan and India start a nuclear war which causes global fallout? Seems just as likely.
IDK what I'll do about his friend who owes me £6 still though.
IDK what I'll do about the massive storage heaters. They take up so much space I hate them.
IDK what I'll do, I might have to put some cash in a 2% account.....
IDK what I'm going to do.
IDK what it's good for.
IDK what it's like with Skylake.
IDK what it would do for me.
IDK what mine was, CoE probably.
IDK what my notice period is, one month probably.
IDK what nicehash is.
IDK what professional poker is.
IDK what Safari is.
IDK what's an absolute references?
IDK what sort of GPU you need for that game.
IDK what's the usual reason people want babies?
IDK what that is.
IDK what the airflow and compatibility is like in it though.
IDK what the first number is, I'm guessing the second is daily profitability, and the third is unpaid balance?
IDK what the rules are.
IDK what they actually do.
IDK what to do.
IDK what to do with all the spare cash in my bank account.
IDK what to do with all this surplus RAM.
IDK what to do with my Beyers though. They're a great office pair because they don't leak at all.
IDK what to do with my old Corsair Vengeance 1500 7.1 gaming headset. I might just throw them away.
IDK what utopia is.
IDK what was his position on Asians?
IDK what world some people live in.
IDK what you do.
IDK what you're saying TBH m9.
IDK what you're worried about, it's the UK which is leaving the EU and has no USA to fall back on, we're the fucked ones.
IDK when I'm retire though. I might retire at 55 or I might retire at 70.
IDK where they got that. The cheapest I could find was £49 on ebay.
IDK whether Excel is going to finish the job or it's crashed.
IDK whether I should be calculating my interest rate including that bonus.
IDK whether I should drive to work tomorrow.
IDK whether it's possible to hear the difference between 320kbps MP3 and FLAC.
IDK whether NiceHack or MPH is best.
IDK whether the event will be repeated next year, so it's hard to decide whether to save or spend.
IDK whether to buy Ncase M1 + Corsair H100 or not.
IDK whether to buy this flat or move in with my brother.
IDK whether to get a 1080 or a 1080TI.
IDK whether to renew my 16-25 rail card.
IDK whether to save up and buy a 200hz 21:9 monitor or a VR headset.
IDK whether to stake another £50 or not.
IDK whether to tell her I'm making more.
IDK whether to use Amazon payout omg.
IDK whether Valve intend it to increase every year.
IDK which to prioritise.
IDK who any of these people are btw.
IDK who really complains about the sound of my typing wtf.
IDK whose fucking bright idea was to put a one-legged table right next to the larder.
IDK who told her to do it.
IDK why.
IDK why all the upper management at my workplace has them.
IDK why aren't you?
IDK why because he's rich.
IDK why girls are sluts.
IDK why he spent so much on a GPU and cheaping out on the monitor though.
IDK why I bother asking when I can just google shit.
IDK why I bother sharing my hobbies with people, I just get backlash for it.
IDK why I bother working extra hours and not taking lunch breaks and doing everyones' work if they refuse to pay me as much as the others.
IDK why I'd need a seedbox.
IDK why I enabled it.
IDK why I even need ID for it, you can't get drunk off it.
IDK why I'm still not getting my Halifax and Co-Op monthly rewards.
IDK why it fixed it though but it did.
IDK why it fluctuates so much?
IDK why it has 32 and 34.
IDK why it keeps doing this.
IDK why it's doing this.
IDK why it's so hard to make a foldable over-ear headphone with good isolation and a standard cable.
IDK why it's so unstable recently.
IDK why Microsoft doesn't just develop a decent window manager.
IDK why my hash rate is so low.
IDK why my mum reads that shit.
IDK why people always compare Dota to LoL then get confused why the game is nothing like it.
IDK why people keep making Davebots, I guess I must have a really interesting personality./.
IDK why people still buy consoles.
IDK why she has to laugh at every single fucking thing too.
IDK why there are so many fucking fat people; my workplace has an obesity rate of about 75%.
IDK why these headphones are so popular.
IDK why they can't just give me a 4.7GHz quad core and an SSD.
IDK why they can't just release a good PC version.
IDK why they can't just remember their fucking password or use Lastpass or something.
IDK why they couldn't deliver to any of my addresses.
IDK why they didn't make the bars linear wtf.
IDK why they don't just sell laptops with a blank hard drive and have USB OS installers as an optional extra.
IDK why they even bother.
IDK why they have such a bad reputation.
IDK why they have to convolute the answer with castaways, desert islands, discs, etc.
IDK why they put glue on the earpad connector.
IDK why they're so popular.
IDK, why wouldn't it?
IDK why you buy such a rubbish one.
IDK why you can still add people as friends on Spotify now.
IDK why you didn't just get an E5 or X7 or O2+DAC or Schitt Stack.
IDK why you don't just build it yourself; it'll save you a lot in shipping and labour, and it's really easy to do.
IDK why you'd want to watch that pleb shite.
IDK why you play it.
IDK why you're so fixated on the currency, it doesn't matter if it's Reddit karma, Bitcoin, or if you pay in fucking potatoes.
IDK why you thought that.
IDK wouldn't a USB 3.1 cable have way better bandwidth?
IDK wtf you're talking about.
IDK yet. I'm going to some viewings at least.
IDK you can get DT770 for cheaper now.
IDK you know that expression?
IDK you'll have to check with Silverstone.
IDK you'll have to look into it.
IDK you'll have to look up benchmarks for the two cards.
IDK you might be in breach of contract if you don't pay it?
IDK you seem like an expert on Origin internet.
I'd laugh if he becomes president and triggers WW3 or a zombie epidemic.
I'd laugh if it went down next year and LoL players will say how Dota is a dying game because the prizepool is only $20m lmao.
I'd laugh if Labour win.
I'd laugh if the police pulled you over for speeding on your bicycle.
I'd laugh if the police raided your house.
I'd laugh if you didn't notice any difference after spending £300 on your AMPDAC.
I'd like 3D model blueprints to build a boat?
I'd like a pair of Philips Fidelio X2s.
I'd like to go on a holiday too at some point.
I'd like to go to China.
I'd like to see 5v5. 1v1 isn't really Dota.
I'd like to try HD600 some time, but I can't :(.
I'd like to try your DT990s too.
I'd live somewhere for £100 a month. It's cheaper than living with my parents and I get the whole place to myself.
I'd look at the G6 if the DAC wasn't so terrible.
I'd lose a bit from the exchange rate to convert Steam money into £.
I'd love a 500hz gsync/freesync/async monitor so I can have a synced refresh rate without having to lower my FPS.
I'd love a curved desk with a huge level surface area.
I'd love European citizenship.
I'd love to be able to mine Bitcoin directly.
I'd love to see a base on Mars.
I'd mine on it, but I don't have a spare motherboard, CPU, RAM, PSU, case, etc.
I'd mostly just get it for my gf.
I'd need a phone with a fingerprint scanner though.
I'd need to book a room to go and wear them.
I'd need to lock them inside something.
I'd never buy the DT770s nowadays.
I do.
I do?
I do actuallu.
I do a lot of things with my gf that I can't do with a prostitute.
I do caffeine and protein powder.
I do cardio so I will be fine.
I do hundreds of slot masheen spins a day.
I do it right?
I do kinda wish mouse manufacturers would make their mice a little bigger in general.
I do like all the Asians there though.
I do like how it is less wide in the middle though.
I don't.
I don't actually care about the minimise to tray.
I don't actually save £1,250 a month, I just drip-feed.
I don't aim to make babies, but my wife does.
I don't, because I have a gf.
I don't believe in party politics, it doesn't seem very democratic to me.
I don't believe it.
I don't believe you.
I don't buy cheap RAM modules.
I don't care about a retail key.
I don't care about bed size really, although a bigger bed is nice for when I have girls round.
I don't care about cosmetic cabling.
I don't care about speed any more, as long as my film torrents stream smoothly.
I don't care about that irrelevant currency.
I don't care about VAT receipts until I get in trouble for it.
I don't care about your identity.
I don't care if the bed is a single, but I need a big desk for PC gaming.
I don't care if Youtube bans my account.
I don't care so much about being a millionaire if I can never touch the money.
I don't carry a bag around with me all the time in case I go to the shop.
I don't cut people off because I practice safe driving.
I don't cycle.
I don't do crosswords.
I don't do drugs.
I don't do drugs because I have a gf and a gaming PC and soon a house.
I don't do drugs because it affects my gaming performance and I am trying to save up for a flat or a house.
I don't do drugs other than protein and caffeine.
I don't do much at home though.
I don't download many large files.
I don't drink alcohol.
I don't drink because I don't want cancer.
I don't drink or smoke because it affects me psychoactively.
I don't earn much :(.
I don't eat breakfast.
I don't eat  that much food.
I don't even answer calls to my work phone.
I don't even have £300 headphones, rory has the most expensive ones.
I don't even have a webcam plugged in atm.....
I don't even know C++.
I don't even know my own phone number.
I don't even know who the "liberal elite" are, does it mean the establishment?
I don't even like wine, so I'll just give it to my father.
I don't even need a gf who has money, just enough to contribute a proportion.
I DON'T EVEN NEED THAT.
I don't even need that level of sound quality for a mic anyway.
I don't even stream music, I listen to offline playlists.
I don't even want the item any more.
I don't even watch anime.
I don't ever go to 4chan.
I don't fucking read books omg.
I don't fucking read omfg.
I don't get heat death. How is it possible to have lots of energy in the universe and then just run out of it?
I don't get it.
I don't get it?
I don't get it, what's the limitation preventing a desktop client?
I don't get much food from my mother because she steals alcohol out of my room and falls asleep and forgets to cook for me.
I don't get paid for 3 more days :(.
I don't get paid until the 27th and I don't have enough money for this month....
I don't get the joke.
I don't get the last one.
I don't give a fuck.
I don't give a fuck about sexiness.
I don't give a fuck about those.
I don't give a fuck if his profit margin is only 7-8%.
I don't give a shit if there are high profile games if there are no promotions omfg.
I don't give into temptation easily like you.
I don't go to the toilet either because someone always complains if I take too long.
I don't have :(.
I don't have £20 to throw around.
I don't have a boiler or a washing machine lmao.
I don't have a doctor.
I don't have a fetish because I'm not a fucking perv.
I don't have a landlord.
I don't have a log fire.
I don't have a lot of money.
I don't have a lot of voltage headroom remaining, so I probably won't bother trying for 4.8GHz.
I don't have a mining rig.
I don't have a monitor connected at all.
I don't have an accountant.
I don't have any coffee at home.
I don't have anything over 62 any more.
I don't have anything to do with myself for my holidays htough.....
I don't have a Paypal account.
I don't have a PIN.
I don't have a problem paying rent, but I have a problem losing so much of my net pay to it.
I don't have a PSU spare, and I wouldn't want to sell this PSU for cheap.
I don't have a seedbox because I am poor :(.
I don't have a seperate room to put a mining rig in.
I don't have a spare PCI slot.
I don't have a username because I'm not registered.
I don't have diagnosed osteo, I have diagnosed low bone density.
I don't have dxracer or mountain dew.
I don't have enough information to give you any good advice on your decision.
I don't have enough money to buy the entire 25% share.
I don't have Facebook.
I don't have much to backup anyway. A few spreadsheets.
I don't have my own laptop.
I don't have my phone in my pocket most of the time.
I don't have one at home :(.
I don't have other cans that use 2.5mm.
I don't have paypal, can you do bank transfer?
I don't have space for any internal cards.
I don't have space on my desk at home to use my work laptop and my PC.
I don't have space on my desk for my enormous CS:GO mouse pad, my 2X 24" monitors, and my Ncase M1 PC case :(.
I don't have the balls.
I don't have the balls to do the mod myself.
I don't have the bookmarks on this PC.
I don't have the money.
I don't have the same dirty mind as you.
I don't have the space on my desk for the case though.....
I don't have the time.
I don't have the time to answer all of your stupid questions.
I don't have time.
I DONT HAVE TIME.
I don't have time for #ubuntu any more because of gaming and gf and having a job and a house now anyway.
I don't have time for work, exercise, Dota, AND GF.
I don't have time to play every day.
I don't have time to play UT this week.
I don't have to login to Lastpass every time?
I don't just want fiat.
I don't keep my PC in the bedroom like rory.
I don't know.
I don't know....
I don't know about American cars.
I don't know all the new pokemons.
I don't know any of my passwords.
I don't know how much I spend on food.
I don't know if there were any seller fees or not from the auction.
I don't know, I never got accepted for Noddle.
I DONT KNOW OMFG.
I don't know what though!!!!!
I don't know what would happen to my nephew if my sister died.
I don't know when to take them.
I don't know where the fuck I'm going half the time.
I don't know who could be calling me!!!!
I don't know who I need to call if I have been burgled though.....
I don't know who the fuck S Atkinson is.
I don't know why Hilary Clinton thinks she has a chance. Americans would NEVER vote for a woman; they hate woman so much that they voted for a mixed-race president to keep a woman from becoming president.
I don't know why I'm so obsessed with making more money since IDK what to spend it on.
I don't leave it on 24/7, I'm gaming a lot.
I don't leave it on. I might leave it on in the living room in the winter for mining/heating.
I don't leave mine running 24/7 because it annoys my gf when I'm at work.
I don't like a lot of the food my mum cooks me, and sometimes she gets drunk and forgets it and burns it anyway.
I don't like boys.
I don't like how you can't use the funds to buy a house until >1 year after opening.
I don't like it.
I don't like it when my colleague next to me is day-snoring and talking to herself, but I don't bitch about it like a bitch.
I don't like light bodyweight exercise.
I don't like multiple workspaces, or a hidden taskbar.
I don't like musicals.
I don't like my SE215s.
I don't like pointless cartoony UIs.
I don't like rounded glass though, because it's more fragile.
I don't like telephones though.
I don't like the curved glass on the S8 because it's more fragile.
I don't like the ones on the market atm because the response times are so high.
I don't like the term "future proof" but GTX 1080 will run games well for longer into the future than most other cards.
I don't like to buy personal laptops because laptops have such poor price:performance ratios.
I don't like to hold too much cash, because if I lose my job then the government will tell me to just support myself on my savings.
I don't like white, can I get asian instead?
I don't listen to that shit.
I don't mind benchpress or OHP too much on the smith machine.
I don't mind buying a new PSU and installing it in the build. I'll keep the PSU I'm using ATM and you can have a brand new PSU. You said you would prefer a brand new PSU anyway.
I don't mind doing it, doesn't take too much of my time and they are always thankful for it. It's just weird how it's always the same people.
I don't mind hostels.
I don't mind if the bluetooth doesn't work.
I don't mind if you find/earn cosmetics though.
I don't mind, I'll upgrade my CPU within 10 years anyway.
I don't mind it spinning up when I'm gaming because I'll have my headphones on loud anyway, but it's stupid how it's loud even at idle.
I don't mind minor cosmetic damage to the fucking box.
I don't mind not receiving my Corsair H100 for a month because I need my Ncase M1 first.
I don't mind not receiving my Corsair H105 for a month because I need my Ncase M1 first.
I don't mind paying for 75%, but 90% is a bit of a burden.
I don't mind paying the for item, I just CBA to queue for 10 minutes for it.
I don't need a budget, I just need more money.
I don't need DT770 now that my Custom One Pro fills that niche for me.
I don't need Fidelio X2, M50X K702 AND DT770s.
I don't need more cores, I need faster cores.
I don't need more than 1080p.
I don't need one because mine majically replaces itself.
I don't need super fast.
I don't need the heat now.
I don't need the laptop if I'm at home. I have used the laptop when waiting at the Car Dealership whilst my car was being worked on though.
I don't need the removeable cable for my office desk anyway.
I don't need to be spied on any more now that WhatsApp will encrypt my messages.
I don't need to borrow money any more but ty for offering.
I don't need to make a profit, I just need to mitigate my losses.
I don't need to see the mining windows.
I don't need to unplug it much anyway.
I don't play any more though, I don't have time and CBA with the power treadmill.
I don't play LoL.
I don't play much.
I don't read books..
I don't really know how loud the PSU is because I can never hear it over my loud as fuck GPU fan.
I don't really live paycheck to paycheck any more anyway.
I don't really live paycheck to paycheck. I just live with my parents for free and everything else is savings.
I don't really need a budget.
I don't really need the speed, I don't download many big games.
I don't really use it.
I don't really use my Prime.
I don't really use my work SIM for anything other than personal stuff.
I don't remember asking you where you taught English.
I don't report to them, I report to my manager.
I don't require one, otherwise I would have bought one already.
I don't rewatch stuff I've already watched most of the time anyway.
I don't round it at all?#.
I don't run it 24/7.
I don't see anything wrong?
I don't see how it's Apple's job.
I don't see how the Conservative or Labour parties are in any way "liberal" in the dictionary definition at least.
I don't see myself needing more than 16GB for at least a few years.
I don't see the point.
I don't see the point in a 7740X when you could just buy a pre-binned delidded 7700K.
I don't see the point in being in a relationship with someone if I'm just going to cheat on them.
I don't see the point in my employers discount site.
I don't see the problem.
I don't see why I would need a remote desktop for Microsoft Office when I have it installed on my laptop.
I don't shower at home.
I don't smoke weed because I have other things to spend my time and money on at the moment.
I don't speak Deutschland m9.
I don't spend much on drugs and takeaways.
I don't spend too much time on that since it has negligible impact on performance and I don't buy windowed cases anyway.
I don't they can outcompete myprotein.com though.
I don't think any are missmatched except for my Fidelio X2s.
I don't think anything could possibly taste worse than my antibiotics.
I don't think deafness and tinnitus is a good enough reason to skip work.
I don't think DPD accept parcels larger than 1000kg anyway.
I don't think dual entry is much of an issue, I just don't understand the point of it.
I don't think for everyone.
I don't think he does.
I don't think he's coming back.
I don't think he's mentally disabled, just bad at English.
I don't think I actually like any of the characters.
I don't think I actually use the library anyway, I just save playlists.
I don't think I can afford to move out.
I don't think I can do the Ladbrokes one because I already signed up through Topcashback :(.
I don't think I can justify the cost, as I already have AKG K702s+Modmic.
I don't think I can provide a high resolution copy.
I don't think I'd actually make use of it though.
I don't think I have a boiler.
I don't think I have a Paypal account, could you just do a bank transfer?
I don't think I have switched to Halifax yet.
I don't think I'll ever own a whole bitcoin.
I don't think I'll upgrade my Fiio E10K for a long long time.
I don't think I'll want to spend too much on speakers.
I don't think I'm temp limited.
I don't think I need more than 2GB really.
I don't think I need much power at all really. Anything that needs power I'll just do on my desktop PC.
I don't think I need much storage.
I don't think I shooted exactly.....
I don't think it'll ever be possible to make a gaming PC less than 2.5L.
I don't think it's good to do both.
I don't think it was 5.
I don't think I've ever seen my RAM usage above 60%.
I don't think I've ever taken a selfie.
I don't think I was doing more than 68 though.
I don't think I will be able to advise you on this one.
I don't think linguistics.
I don't think many people flash their GPU's BIOS though.
I don't think my car has been washed in over a year.
I don't think my employer pension is good enough even though it is 7% and 10%.
I don't think my fans are running on a curve, they seem to be a fixed speed.....
I don't think my grandparents like me.
I don't think my grandparents like my gf because she's a foreigner.
I don't think people are going to accept any new presenters because the old trio were in place for so long.
I don't think production will increase.
I don't think /r/pcmasterrace is as much of a circlejerk as /r/vegan.
I don't think Satanism is a legally recognised religion?
I don't think Scan will invoice me.
I don't think she cares too much.
I don't think she knows that I have like 5 pairs.
I don't think she liked that question.
I don't think so.
I don't think so, but I can't really remember.
I don't think so, but they aren't too bad.
I don't think so. You don't pay capital gains tax if £ goes up in value.
I don't think that's correct.
I don't think that's even possible.
I don't think that's kpop.
I don't think there's a Linux driver.
I don't think they use .se any more.
I don't think they use .se any mroe.
I don't think they've quite caught up to modern society.
I don't think throttling occurs below 80C anyway.
I don't think ultrawides are quite good enough for me atm.
I don't think you'll need to close any Nationwide accounts actually, I think you'd just need to open a second one.
I don't think you should be eating a packet for lunch.
I don't tip because it's the employer's job to pay their staff properly.
I don't trust anyone else with an item this high value.
I don't trust any product with less than 4 stars.
I don't trust them.
I don't trust you.
I don't understand my mother. If she hates living with me so much, why is she trying to scare me from leaving?
I don't understand people who want more £ for an item on classifieds than it would cost me from some shop.
I don't understand tax codes.
I don't understand why it's doing this.
I don't understand your question.
I don't use binance.
I don't use Facebook because I have a life.
I don't use it anymore, I just use my HTC One M9.
I don't use much space nowadays because my internet connection is pretty good.
I don't use my front panel at all other than the power button.
I don't use post-its, I just use electronic notes.
I don't use SMS, but I receive SMS sometimes from bank, bookies, phone service provider, etc.
I don't vote.
I don't want a baby ffs.
I don't want a future where crypto is dominated by BTC.
I don't want anything fancy, I just want it to work.
I don't want garlic's price to crash whilst I'm away and then I'm wasting money.
I don't want letters from my ISP.
I don't want my bank balance to go much lower.
I don't want my manager to think I'm slacking by taking personal calls.
I don't want resistance.
I don't want that shit, it'll hurt my mmr.
I don't want the MPAA to sue me for £100m for installing f.lux on my work PC without permission.
I don't want the stress of worrying about high data charges.
I don't want this shit.
I don't want to be embarrassed to the whole company.
I don't want to brick the damn thing.
I don't want to comment on illegal drugs at work and lose my job lmao.
I don't want to do custom loop watercooling because it's super expensive and a bitch to maintain.
I don't want to do more cashback right now because I don't have great cashflow right now.
I don't want to eat because I need to lose weight.
I don't want to  get my DT770s all sweaty.
I don't want to get raised by the FBI.
I don't want to give them a reason to shut down my account completely.
I don't want to go bankrupt from copyright infringement when IT checks in 6 months.
I don't want to go to Australia because it's too hot and I don't like scary animals.
I don't want to have to alter my playstyle so drastically because of bots.
I don't want to invest in crypto, it's way too volatile.
I don't want to listen to their shit music.
I don't want to lose cash just because I've forgotten about the bookies.
I don't want to lose my job some time in the next 6 months.......
I don't want to make babies wtf.
I don't want to manually export all my bank accounts all the time.
I don't want to max the graphics out, I want to max my framerate out.
I don't want to meet drug dealers IRL.
I don't want to pay for shitty line rental.
I don't want to rent a router.
I don't want to run a full-fledged OS in a VM just to run a game.
I don't want to see your gf.
I don't want to set up email forwarding either, because my Hotmail gets a lot of spam.....
I don't want to shower twice a day ffs.
I don't want to spend £100+ just to try them.
I don't want to stay here.
I don't want to stop at a shop.
I don't want to take days off sick then my manager tells me I'm well enough to work and then I get into trouble.
I don't want to upgrade my chair right now.
I don't want to use it if it's too high maintenance.
I don't want to use my holiday days because my mum will complain I am just spending all my time playing video games and ask me to walk her dog and do chores and shit.
I don't want to use my storage heaters because their heat output is so inflexible.
I don't want to withdraw from my Nationwide 5% regular saver if I can avoid it.
I don't want to work, I just want a salary.
I don't watch anime.
I don't watch any TV atm anywya.
I don't watch LoL.
I don't watch much TV.
I don't watch porn because I have a gf.
I don't work with him.
I do omg.
I do press-ups between matches.
I do protein and caffeine.
I do sometimes.
I do that a lot too.
I do the bet club and acca insurance at the same time.
I do three big poos a day.
I doubt 1080 TI price will go down.
I doubt he does.
I doubt I'd be shocked, I didn't dust my PC once for like 2 years and it was fucking disgusting inside, I could grab big lumps of dust.
I doubt I'll ever pay it off completely.
I doubt I'll ever really retire, but I won't be earning as much at 70 as I will at 40.
I doubt I'll pass the credit check.
I doubt it.
I doubt it, 1v1 with restricted rule set is an extremely limited form of the game.
I doubt it, he doesn't even have an Asian gf.
I doubt it, he's really fat.
I doubt it, rory is loaded.
I doubt it's a feature I'll use then. I'll probably just use USB and use my mic in the toslink port.
I doubt it's that extreme.
I doubt it's that much bigger than my G403.
I doubt it's the RAM.
I doubt it will this year.
I doubt it would make /that/ much difference, but it'd be like 500%+ the size of the Ncase M1.
I doubt PC World stock them.
I doubt that's more efficient than a fund.
I doubt the market will be flooded with 1080 TIs.
I doubt they'll be anything special.
I doubt they're as good as my Shure SE215s.
I doubt you'd get fired just for that, but maybe you'll get a disciplinary or something.
I doubt you'll need 24GB?
I doubt you will.
I downloaded Office 2016 the other day. Should I use Office 2016 or Libreoffice 5.0?
I downloaded the Creative update because I read that the 'Game Mode' increases framerates. The fucking /r/csgo thread lied to me and it decreased all my framerates significantly.
I download my maps on Google Maps, downloaded my songs on Spotify.
I'd pay for a good service like with Steam but no they are greedy fucks.
I'd prefer a single button, but whatever.
I'd prefer if it was unlimited.
I'd prefer it if they gave me 24" monitors instead of 20" though.
I'd prefer just to dip into my savings or bookies or something.
I'd prefer to do a bath if I didn't have to run it.
I'd prefer to save money on phone upgrades and upgrade my PC instead or save up for a house.
I'd probably be satisfied with 30GB though.
I'd probably do that actually.
I'd probably get arrested for growing marijuanna though.
I'd probably go up to £50 at the most.
I'd probably kill myself if anything happened to my hearing.
I'd probably pay less if I could find one with just data.
I'd probably want to sell at gdax trade prices.
I'd probably work really hard for her and make sure she gets my full priority.
I'd quite like a free black S7 though.
I'd quite like to be able to import cheap computer parts from USA.
I'd quite like to have money and not work though.
I drank lots of coffee and held it in from last night because there was no toilet paper, then today because I had meetings.
I drank out of a coconut at Morrisons.
I'd rather 100 English people die than 1 North Korean girl.
I'd rather be a sick fuck than a racist.
I'd rather buy a Fiio E17K or something and plug it into a phone.
I'd rather carry just a phone than an external AMPDAC.
I'd rather do the important stuff like plumbing/heating/damp/mould before any cosmetic stuff.
I'd rather have a fat salary too.
I'd rather have a few different Hi-Fi headphones than go all-out on the HD600.
I'd rather have a Korean than a white fatty.
I'd rather have an HTC.
I'd rather have cheap and reliable like they have in europe.
I'd rather invest in some GTX 1080 TIs and mine.
I'd rather just get a 27 month 0% purchase card and buy a phone and pay minimum payments.
I'd rather move to Korea or China.
I'd rather not.
I'd rather not die from a fucking heart attack just because I CBA to do cardio.
I'd rather not pay for all the extra features I don't need though.
I'd rather pay for a VPN to use Stremio than pay for Netflix lmao.
I'd rather play Dota or something.
I'd rather put £3.70 towards a GTX 1080.
I'd rather rescue my gaming PC.
I'd rather save the money so I can enjoy the conscious parts of my trip more.
I'd rather they just type to me in Lync.
I'd rather use my contactless TSB and get 5% cashback, and I'll switch to a cashback credit card once the TSB offer is over.
I'd rather Valve monetise games through optional cosmetics rather than a paywall gating gameplay.
I'd rather wait until I need it before paying.
I'd rather you have the money than some fat cat.
I'd recommend a full-length card and not a mini card..
I'd recommend against it.
I'd recommend a second hand 144hz adaptive sync from ebay.
I'd recommend K702s and DT770s over your current headphones btw.
I'd recommend less RAM but faster modules.
I'd recommend spending £300 or more though.
I'd recommend waiting for the upcoming 240hz displays.
I'd recommend Zowie mousepads though.
I'd replace my monitors at home with VR if it was good enough.
I drink cold water because it tastes nicer.
I drink energy drinks so I know exactly how much caffeine I take.
I drink protein shakes.
I drink water.
I drive 1.5 miles to work.
I drive it every day.
I drive my car because I don't want to die.
I drive to Brighton and Gloucester and places easily.
I drive to work every day in my car.
I drop it too often :(.
I'd say 2k is scrub tier.
I'd say Dota is probably the hardest.
I'd say it's more like Skyrim than SMITE and LoL.
I'd say some of Dota's custom game modes are the best teamfights.
I'd sell the Sllverstone PSU to you depending on whether we could agree on a price.
I'd seriously sign up to that.
I'd suggest Biltong/jerkey as an alternative to your sweets, but it's so fucking expensive.
I'd surge ahead if CPU mining worked better in Awesome Miner.
I'd totally go if it was in Bath.
I'd totally spend it on on soft drinks.
I'd use it if I get a small discount.
I'd use VR as my monitors if the resolution was a lot better.
I'd vote for him if he changed his last name to Thornberry.
I'd watch it jsut for that girl.
I earn 20%, you pay 20%.
I earn £8 an hour.
I eat 1,000kcal+ of Biltong.
I eat a kilogram of chicken in one go sometimes.
I eat lots of poultry.
I eat so many fucking animals omfg.
IE didn't even have tabbed browsing until like 4 years after Firefox.
I either go to the gym or I don't have a lunch break.
I emailed Scott in IT and he said it's a scam.
IEMs are best for isolation IMO.
IEMs are by far the most portable.
IEMs take some time to get the fit in right.
I end up realising they're shit games and that I'm not going to waste my time on them any more.
I enjoy the rises in the vlaue of my Dota and CS items.
IE was never the superior browser.
I experienced noticeably lower framerates.
If 100 points could get you either a £10 coffee or a £5 footlong, which one would you choose?
If 1150L is the usual tax code which means people have 11,500 personal allowance.
If 888casino cashback is confirmed, does that mean I can take advantage of all these bonuses now?
If a game has £10k liquidity, then a shitload of people are betting on it, which means it's high profile.
If a girl has STDs, how do I make her pregnant without catching anything?
If a grill lived with me and shared half the cost, the flat would be great.
I failed on their questionnaire.
I failed pre-eligibility for virgin CC :(.
If an immigrant does a crime, why shouldn't they be blamed?
If anyone has said anything to me today I've probably not seen it.
If anything, custom terrain and weather puts you at a disadvantage.
If anything, I'm a victim of rape.
If anything in my wishlist goes on sale, I might buy it.
If anything you should overvolt.
If a smartphone is really fucking hot in a car on a hot summer day, does the battery stop charging?
If Bernie wasn't eliminated and there was a choice of three, could he have won?
If both your CPU and GPU are getting used fully, then you should have higher thermals.
If Brexit can happen, Trump can be USA president.
If BT shares plummet, you're fucked.
If buying computing power on nicehash is profitable, then why isn't everyone doing it?
If crypto was as popular as fiat, most criminals would use crypto.
I feel a little bit better.
I feel dirty when I tell people I use Ubuntu....
I feel like I need to rush into buying a property.
I feel like I should be using Debian.
I feel like I should do cardio at least once a week.
I feel like I've been lied to and taken advantage of and insulted at the same time.
I feel like my 1080 TI is overkill for 1080p but not powerful enough to downscale from 4k :(.
I feel like shit today.
I feel nervous about only having £3,203.63 in my bank account.
I feel nervous having less than £2k spending money.
I feel so fat and lazy now :(.
I feel so much better than the past few weeks, but I don't want my illness to come back.
I feel so nervous carrying more than £20 around with me.
I feel so rich.
I feel the same way about Guild Wars 2.
I feel uneasy having less than £5k in the bank.
If everyone had nukes then we'd be safe.
If Garlic is equal or less profitable than Nicehack then I'm not going to bother mining it any more.
If he earns 100X less than us but has 100X cheaper living expenses, then he is no poorer.
If he earns 100X less than us but have 200X cheaper living expenses, he's probably richer than us.
If he has an ATI GPU, then that monitor would be great for him.
If he wasn't so fucking old I'd say he's being intentionally vague.
If he was the PM of Iceland he would have resigned by now.
If Hitler met Korean girls there wouldn't have been a WW2.
If Hitler was alive today, he'd be using the same headphones rory and I use..
If I applied and got the job, I'd be doing less work for more pay.
If I bought them together, I'd be paying like £50 every month for two years.
If I bring my mechanical keyboard to work and just go on IRC all day, I'll seem like the hardest worker in the office despite being the least.
If I broke my headphones during modding, I won't know for at least a week.....
If I build two big mining rigs and make like £300 a month in profit, do I need to declare my earnings to HMRC?
If I buy 6 GTX 1070s, I can make £305.76 profit a month.
If I buy an item that makes me gain in-game currency at 10X the rate  of someone who doesn't pay, then I get more heroes and stuff.
If I call someone a bitch on Facebook are the government going to try to arrest me for internet trolling harassment?
If i can just find Roadhog then I'll save 3k gold.
If I can reach 300FPS, I can start upping the graphics too.
If I can't afford to look after her baby, she'll have to go back to Korea.
If I can't get a mortgage, then I can't buy it.
If I come to London, will I get free beer and pizza?
If I could be arsed to sell the CPU cooler individually I would have done it by now.
If I didn't have a driving license, I'd have to carry my passport around with me.....
If I didn't have gf I would beat you.
If I didn't know any better, I'd say it was rigged.
If I do it I'll share what I've got.
If I don't have a tv license and have a lodger, who gets prosecuted if the lodger watches TV?
If I don't make babies, will I be richer and retire at an earlier age?
If I don't want to touch my money until I'm in my 60s then I'd just deposit into a SIPP.
If I dump my gf I could keep it up np.
If I earnt above the threshold for some months for student loan repayments but still below the annual threshold, do I still need to make the repayments?
If I ever find I need more GPU power, I can get a hybrid graphics card and change the CPU cooler.
If I get a really good credit score then I can get a cheap mortgage and maybe 0% car finance on my next car!!!!
If I get drugged enough I can lose video games to one of you.
If I get the job, I am going to buy a delidded 7700K.
If I go create a LoL account now, how many heroes can I play? 110?
If I got a job as a professional football player I could earn a billion every day.
I figured out how to change the MultiPoolMiner to 0 donation.
I figured out that you can tell if a game is high profile by the amount of liquidity in the exchange.
If I had £100k I could pay off my mortgage in full every year omg.
If I had 100 votes, then maybe I'd use them.
If I had £1bn I could hire a team to invest my money for me and I would become perpetually richer without doing anything myself lmao.
If I had 30k to invest, I'd put it somewhere with a much lower management fee than Nutmeg.
If I had 400k I'd probably retire.
if I had a £30 dinner budget, I would get a fancy 3 course meal.
If I had a tonne of money I'd put it in R&D for 8K VR.
If I had more money I would buy all the headphones on my wishlist.
If I had more money, I would upgrade my PC, buy HTC 10, and buy Philips Fidelio X2.
If I had this pension plan but with a £500k salary, I'd be a billionnaire when I retire.
If I had to choose, I'd go for the S7 because of the waterproofing though.
If I had to pay child support, I could become homeless and lose my job.
If I hang out with you will you buy me a GTX 1080TI?
If I have an Economy 7 meter, do I have to go with an Economy 7 tariff?
If I have my own router, can I tell the ISP not to charge me to send me one?
If I have to buy the same product again but can't find it at such a low price, I'm going to be pissed.
If I have to, I'll just take money out of my monthly saver.
If I hit you, you're more likely to die than me.
If I increase the voltage to make it spin faster?
If I inherit some money I'll put it into my mortgage to get to 60% LTV.
If I insure my PC, will they actually pay me £1,500 if someone steals it?
If I just buy my 1080TI using my credit card, I can pay back the debt by mining!!!!
If I knew the language I'd definitely consider it.
If I leave at 08:45 I arrive at 09:00 but if I leave at 09:00 I arrive at 09:05 wtf.
If I leave my car at my employer's car park and go back to it a few hours later and find a wooden pallet resting against the car door and some scratches on the car door, who is liable to pay for the damage?
If I lived in London, I wouldn't have a car.
If I lose my job because of this I'm going to be so pissed.
If I lose my phone right now I'm fucked.
If I lost my job tomorrow I have £13k to live on.
If I'm currently being burgled, shouldn't I probably try to stop them instead of chatting on the telephone?
If I'm doing any more complicated calculations I'll be doing it in Excel or something.
If I'm going to be using lots of electricity I want to get something out of it.
If I miss any payments, you get your 1080TI back.
If I'm lucky, I'll get my grandparents' house.
If I move into my own flat?
If I'm so dumb then why does HansProleman think I am so smart?
If I'm still not completely satisfied with it, then maybe sell it for £50 or something.
I finally bought a new gaming mouse.
I finally found a worthy successor to my Logitech G400s.
I finally got Overwatch yesterday.
I find 500MB is fine if I just don't look at any videos or music or download anything.
I find her brand loyalty to certain businesses quite disturbing.
I find it AMAZING for Reddit.
I find it less fucking about.
I find my 16GB is already more than enough.
I find my 4690K at 4.5GHz isn't powerful enough to run Overwatch at 1080p.
I find my Beyers don't leak as much sound as my M50X, so office colleagues don't complain.
I find myself shutting my PC down more now.
If in doubt, it's 3 months.
I find that any attempt to do any EQing myself just ruins other frequencies.
I find that my DT770s isolate good enough for the office.
I find the sound quality and comfort to be a lot better.
I find your attitude so weird.
If I need to use them again, I'll just deposit into them.
I finished work on the 24th and the UC period is 25-25th.
If interest rates go up, will cash be more attractive than real estate?
If in the future I decide that I need more GPU performance and don't need the CPU performance, I can swap the 240mm radiator for a 120mm one and get a GPU with a 120mm one too.
If I open the box and try them on, can I still return them to the ebay seller?
If I owned a house I would literally never have to worry about becoming homeless.
If I park next to a skip and the workers cause damage to my car, who is liable?
If I pay for next day delivery I expect it to be on time.
If I put money on my supermarket card, is it deducted from my salary pre-tax?
If I put that into a 5% account I can earn £27.80 interest.
If I really need the money, my parents or grandparents will give it to me.
If I really wanted to, I could buy a Samsung Galaxy S7 EVERY month.
If I remove the bonus, it's only 4.98%.
IFISA.
If I save heavily into my work pension, will that make me ineligible for my state pension?
If I save too much and lose my job, I won't get benefits.
If I scale up my operation by 100X then I can earn £2,780 interest.
If I sell my car I lose my job.
If I spend time on the phone, they could easily escape.
If I spoke Chinese, I would move permanently to Shanghai.
If I start smoking, can I do less work?
If I start up the engine for too many short trips.
If I still don't like the cable after modding it, what should I do with my G403?
If I stream to Chromecast from my PC, will the VPN work>.
If it continues at this rate, it'll be the most played game in the world by the end of the year.
If it doesn't arrive today, I'm never going to buy a boxed game copy ever again.
If it doesn't go away within a few months, I'll probably kill myself.
If it gets caught, will I have to pay VAT and import fees?
If it goes down in price, I'll still earn the same amount in fiat.
If it has a <2ohm output impedance and Linux support, I'll probably buy it.
If it hits you at an extremely high speed, you will probably die.
If it hits you at an extremely low speed, nothing will happen.
If it keeps crashing, I might have to go even higher.
If it prevents you from lifting with your back then it's good.
If it's a housing association shared ownership does that make a difference?
If it's all you eat and you don't get all the nutrients you need then sure.
If it's a success, we're one step closer to having a permanent settlement on Mars.
If it's free/subsidised food/drinks then why not?
If it's good enough for rory then it's good enough for you.
If it's harmless fun, why would you not want to play it?
If it's just a Live CD, then it can't get security updateS?
If it's just one beer then I wouldn't worry about it.
If it's languages maybe.
If it's linear, only two items go higher than 5% of the vertical axis.
If it's men/unattractive women and in english then it's just One Direction lmao.
If it's not a level playing field, it's p2w.
If it was a good one they'd want people to know.
If it was "definitely" better then people wouldn't be using external wallets.
If it was easy to make games utilise all 8 cores then it would be done already.
If it was Linux it wouldn't get into the official distribution repositories, right?
If it was monthly then most people couldn't afford it.
If it was my mum, she'd never admit her mistake.
If it wasn't so fucking big.
If it wasn't so fucking hot I'd start mining.
If it was on FTSE it'd be Fortune 500 probably.
If it was profitable, people would just buy hashing power on Nicehack.
If it was that profitable, people would mine it on Nicehack.
If it works, don't fix it.
If it works well I'll order a second one for my other monitor.
If I unplug the power cable.
If I unsubscribe from emails from 888, will that stop me getting the cashback?
If I use a VPN, will traffic shaping still apply against me?
If I vote do I get the day off work?
If I wait to 1LTC before I withdraw, then my withdrawal fee is 0.1%.
If I walk to work then I don't have time to go to the gym.
If I want a game, I just sell a couple of Dota or CS:GO items and use the Steam Wallet funds to buy the game.
If I wanted to kidnap you, all I'd have to do is look at your history to see where you go, then prepare an ambush.
If I wanted to use it just as an Amp I would use line-in probably.
If I want more money I'll just withdraw £1k from a bookies or something.
If I want to make any big purchases before then, I will have to take it out of one of my monthly savers.
If I want to read something scripted, I'd read a fucking book, and you know I never read books.
If I was a designer at Beyerdynamic I could make a really nice pair of portable Hi-Fi headphones.
If I was a higher rate tax payer I'd pay into a SIPP and get dat sweet 40% tax relief.
If I was a homeless person, I wish people would give me money.
If I was an evil dictator, I would make toilet paper illegal.
If I was a prostitute I would be for just Asian girls.
If I was as rich as you I would buy a GTX 1080TI.
If I was doing more srs mining then maybe I would use Claymore.
If I was going to go multi GPU I'd buy four ATI cards.
If I wasn't 100% certain then I could lose money and damage my credit rating.
If I wasn't working full time, they might class it as income tax.
If I was playing one-handed like you, I'd use WASD to control the camera.
If I was president, I would blow up the son.
If I was prime minister I would give free visas to Korean girls.
If I was rich like rory I would buy a pre-binned 7700K.
If I was selling regularly, then sure.
If I was to buy a CPU today I'd get a 8700K.
If I was to buy a mouse today, I'd probably get DM Pro 1 S.
If I was to get multiple GPUs I'd get 4 ATI ones for mining.
If I was you.
If I was your I'd push it harder.
If I went with this 25% share of the flat, what would I invest my money in instead of real estate?
If I win all I have to do is lose it again.
If I withdraw to my bank account, will I need to pay income tax?>.
If I work there do I need a kickass laptop too?
I fixed it by sorting the list A to Z then Z to A.
If kpop was around at the same time as Bach, he wouldn't have ever gotten famous..
I flashed a new BIOS onto my GTX 970 last night..
I flashed the firmware on my graphics card so I can run it at 0RPM now.
If McCree uses high noon, the enemy can just kill him before he finishes channeling.
If most votes decided elections then Hillary Clinton would be president right now. Do you really think that's a good system?
If my car is never cleaned, won't it corrode and rust?
If my copy hasn't arrived by 16:00 I'm going to call Game and complain.
If my credit score was better, I'd have a £2,000 interest-free overdraft right now.
If my DT770s could fold up and had a removeable cable they'd be perfect.
If my eyes can see more than 24fps then I'm sure I can hear a good DAC.
If my gf divorces me, will I have to pay her alimony?
If my gf had even half as much money as me, my life would be so easy.
if my gf wants to make a baby then I'll either have to sell my flat and rent a house or I'll have to forego buying GTX 1080 and Samsung Galaxy S8 and holidays and stuff to save up for a house.
If my K702s can sound this amazing, I bet the X2s sound like audiogasm.
If my manager caught me looking at guns at work I'd be in so much trouble.
If my manager would fucking approve my holiday then it gets done automatically.
If my Modmic falls off my K702s again I'm going to buy the V-Moda BoomPro mic instead..
If my PC crashes, how do I know if it's caused by my CPU, GPU, RAM or Windoze?
If my PC has just done 66 loops of X264 without a crash, does that mean my OC is good and stable?
If my salary sucks then it doesn't really matter.
If my stepbrother's gf is invited, should I not go to my sister's wedding?
IF(N2="","","")))).
IF(N2="SNR",(D2-F2-L2+(K2*((100-I2)/100)))/2,.
IF(N2="SR",((D2-L2)+(M2*((100-I2)/100)))/2,.
If NiceHack used LTC instead of BTC this whole problem would never have happened.
If not, I don't think he can get a 144hz adaptive sync.
If not, it's only £8.
If not, then CBA.
If not, your commute is long ass fuck and you should move closer to your office.
If only 10m people use Lastpass, does that mean that 99.9% of people don't have a password manager?!?!?!?
If only it was that simple....
I forget the problems I have with Tree Style Tab, use it for a bit, then remember the instabilities and go back to Tab Tree.
I forgot that my original cables still work.....
I forgot the name of someone a metre away that I've worked with for months and went off to another site together for two days this week.
I forgot to bring my headphones into work too.
I forgot to pack them.
I forgot to take to work the packed lunch mummy made me.
I formatted over an old SSD without even checking the contents the other day.
I forsee a big visibility problem coming soon.
I forwarded the Nationwide recommendation email to Nationwide@rory.sh.
I found a 250ohm DT770 with removeable 3.5mm port for a fair price on ebay last night.
I found a CPU I really want.
I found a good one last night but you weren't online.
I found a music video you might like.
I found an even cheaper supplier.
I found an exceedingly good electricity tariff though.....
I found an item from watching a CS:GO game that I sold for like £200.
I found another productive thing to do whilst at work.
I found a replacement for Tree Tab Style.
I found a solution. Instead of a single column for stake, I made it into three columns. "Own money" "Bonus money" and "stake". "Stake" adds "Own money" and "Bonus money" together. The "calculated profit" then adds the bonus money to the final value..
I found a song that makes me think of you.
I found cheap train tickets to Brighton.
I found it from Google.
I found out about nVidia fast sync over the weekend.
I found out that the biggest bottleneck in the audio chain is not the DAC, AMP or even the headphones, but your own ears.
I found out that you can get XL pads for the V-Moda M100 which don't suck.
I found out when I OCed it to 189hz.
I found out why my internet is shit.
I found that you don't need to reinstall Windoze on a new motherboard any more.
I found this one on Zoopla.
If Overwatch gets ported over to Linux, then I can uninstall Windoze.
If parliament votes were anonymous, Brexit could be stopped.
If people are allowed to come into the office being overweight, am I allowed to come into the office with overgrown facial hair?
If people like that can get a job at your place, then I can too.
If profitability drops too much, just sell the GPUs.
If Russia and North Korea didn't have nukes, the USA would have destroyed them by now.
If Russia wanted to, they could kill everyone in England today.
If Saddam and Gadaffi had nukes, they'd still be alive.
If Santander didn't decline my application for a graduate account, I'd have £12,000.
If she gets deported, I won't have to?
If she had chemo then she would lose weight.
If she sat on you, you would helplessly crushed.
if she was serious, why doesn't she just say something like "police forces will receive more funding to tackle sexual abuse" or something?
If someone adds some static text in the same cell as a date, is it still possible to make formula and reports based on dates?
If someone wants to get in touch with me they can send me a text message.
If something doesn't have a fixed period of time to do it, then it doesn't need to go in the calendar.
If so, please can I come live with you for a few days?
If supermarkets want to reduce shoplifting, they should make self service machines less shit.
If Teresa May becomes PM, she's gonna try and spy on everyone.
If that's what you're referring to?
If that was true, then how did my mmr increase?
If that was true, then why don't I have LEDs in all my gear, and why do I have audiophile headphones?
If the AIO was gone my PC would be silent.
If the Beyers were more portable they'd be perfect.
If the coastline of Great Britain is measured using units 100 km (62 mi) long, then the length of the coastline is approximately 2,800 km (1,700 mi). With 50 km (31 mi) units, the total length is approximately 3,400 km (2,100 mi), approximately 600 km (370 mi) longer..
If the DAC is good, I'm definitely going to buy it in 6+ months.
If the Daily Mail was the biggest newspaper then we wouldn't have gone to war with Germany.
If the desk is too small, it will be a deal-breaker.
If the framerate is locked at a specific value, then you will have less input lag in CS:GO.
If the heat evaporates into the air, then the air is hot, you still have to exhaust the heat somehow.
If the HTC 10 was waterproof I probably would have bought it.
If the police catch you smoking weed, can they confiscate your drugs and/or arrest you?
If the police have reason to suspect the public is in danger, they'll go straight in guns-blazing.
If the police raided me I'd be fined like 500 billion for piracy.
If the police seize your computer hardware, do they have to refund the value of the parts?
If the P&P price isn't more than about £40 then £550 in total is fine with me, I'll get back to you tonight.
If the price of bitcoin rises, then the NiceHash wallet becomes worse compared to the external wallet.
If the price was predictable then it wouldn't be so volatile.
If the price was the same, people would just buy from the Steam Market directly.
If there an app for people to go to dinner together so they don't have to go to the restaurant alone?
If there isn't a torrent, go to the library, borrow the book, and make a torrent.
If there's 5 people in a team, but only 4 people in a party, then someone MUST be solo.
If there's no miners, then transactions will be slow.
If there's regular flights, then it'll push space travel more.
If there was a Asian girl candidate I would vote for her.
If there was a button to auto convert all coins to LTC then I might do it.
If there was a hole in the floor, I could get there within 1 second.
If the salary is fat enough I can afford not to have to work any more.
If the storage heater has better insulation, then it can release the heat slower and better in the day/evening.
If the threshold never changed, then inflation would cause you to pay more and more each year.
If they all say no, I'll just borrow from myself at 5%.
If they can remove the "please remove item" and identity checks and all the latency then they'd be okay.
If they challenge my miles, I will tell them that their standard journey miles are wrong and ask them to prove it's only 27 miles.
If they charge £10 for a coffee, then your £/points ratio is skewed.
If they could do liquid nitrogen cooling for <£200 and without maintenance, then it would be marketable.
IF THEY DIDN'T GO ON THEIR STUPID MISSION TO CAPTURE A ZOMBIE THEN THE ZOMBIES WOULD NEVER HAVE FOUND A WAY TO GET PAST THE WALL OH MY FUCKING GOD.
If they don't block up the other entrance, then people will pull out in front of them.
If they don't, I don't see how they're bags for life.
If they go above 85C then you have a thermal problem.
If they got the train it would cost them so much more.
If they had a few cores which were overclocked so we could use them for single-threaded stuff, that'd be great.
If they had any concerns with the price they should have said something weeks ago.
If they leave any furniture it would be great, because I don't have any.
If they made a deal with Icefrog and made a Dota 2, they wouldn't be in this casual mess they are now.
If they need to stop the crosshair on the enemy, they need it to suddenly stop.
If they're good, I might sell my DT770s.
if they're not stock, then try to crop out any irrelevant stuff to just include the product, then do the reverse image search and hope for the best.
If they're so exclusive, then how are they so comprehensive?
If they've sent us the wrong passport, they've probably misplaced hers.
If Thunderbird loses its IRC feature I'll just go back to Pidgin.
I fucked up.
I fucked up again.
I fucked up. I sold my GRLC for 0.0099BCH and then realised I can't sell less than 0.01 on gdax.
I fucking hate nice people.
I fucking hate peasants so much.
I fucking hate this country.
I fucking hate those captchas.
I fucking hate voicemail.
I FUCKING HATE YOU.
I fucking love beef jerky.
I fucking love board meetings. They always have catering and I always have the leftovers.
I fucking love Dominos.
I fucking love DT770 earpads.
I fucking love hummus thoughg.
I fucking love IMAP.
I fucking love Lastpass autoform filling.
I fucking love my DT770s for the office.
I fucking love Stremio now.
I fucking love the Hydraulic Press Channel.
If we all pitch in, it's a low cost for all of us.
If we asked 25 white girls and 25 Korean girls if they want to be my gf or yours, who would they choose?
If we divorce over it then I'll probably lose like 50k of my money.
If we do not learn from the mistakes of the future, we are doomed to repeat them for the first time..
If we get enough global warming, I won't have to scrape the ice off my car.
If we leave the EU and join NAFTA then we could get cheaper PC components....
If we made a crypto together, I'd steal 40k from you.
If we're going to spend billions on a nuclear deterrant then it should at least work lmao.
If we're gonna have a second election to change the labour PM, should we have a second election to change the EU result too?
If what were the case?
If you are leaving a job and have a couple of weeks holiday built up, can you use your two weeks holiday and start another job during your holiday?
If you are lifting something heavy from the floor by having your legs fully erected and bending forwards with your back and then bending your back upright again then that is bad for your back.
If you are weak, you can't do manual labour.
If you attack the USA you can bet they're going to use that $999b military industrial complex against you.
If you bid £500 I don't mind because I would love to have that much money.
If you borrow 100k to buy a house and the house goes up in value by £500k do you owe the mortgage provider 100k or 500k?
If you bought a 970 in 2014, it would be fine until at least mid-2016.
If you build that system you are a pleb.
If you buy a GTX 1080TI for gaming, breaking even is irrelevant.
If you can get one for £150 you will get a bargain.
If you can pay off your credit card in full for a few months before your application that will help a lot too.
If you can smell that, does that mean they have to check for leaks?
If you can't get approved for a rental, where the fuck are you supposed to live?
If you can wait 30 years for good headphones, what's another 5 days?
If you care about portable Hi-Fi, you should buy HTC.
If you contain it early enough, you have a good chance of surviving.
If you could fit it in your budget.
If you could make a specific frequency better without ruining other frequencies, would you?
If you count matched betting and cryptomining as "work with numbers".
If you delay withdrawals, you can earn more from your mining.
If you did 20g of caffeine you'd die.
If you don't communicate then you're not working as a team.
If you don't drink, then why aren't you Global Elite?
If you don't have any interest-free overdraft any more, then sure.
If you don't pay enough NI, then they might not give you JSA or a state pension.
If you don't play the game, why did you buy lots of lootboxes?
If you don't spend any money, eventually you will have a lot of it.
If you don't withdraw often.
If you do them right, you always make money.
If you drop it, the glass might shatter!
If you factor in the fees to do it manually then it's the same?
If you fulfil your part, then I guess so?
If you get a chance, give the Beyer Custom One Pros a try.
If you get a Dominoes then you get your money back as increased share prices.
If you get caught you will be put on the sex offenders register.
If you get enough points then you can have 6 months JSA no questions asked.
If you get hit by me, you will die.
If you get married to someone, doesn't their credit history become yours?
If you give Apple shitphones to a gorilla, does it complain that you didn't give it beyerdynamics?
If you got a £20 pair of DT770s with only one working driver that would be amazing for you.
If you had to go to Shanghai, would you get your expenses refunded?
If you hate him so much, then why didn't you vote for the other one?
If you have 5 idiots then the enemy has 6.
If you have £6k sitting in betting sites, that's £15 interest you're losing a month.
If you have an economical car like mine, you actually make a good profit with the mileage expenses.
If you have more heroes than me.
If you haven't already claimed it.
If you improve yourself, you should invevitably go up mmr because of statistics.
If you know you're about to die, should you spend lots of stuff on credit cards?
If you like shitposts, you should subscribe to /r/dota2.
If you like your stuff to work without you having to tinker and customize it endlessly, go for LastPass..
If you love Dota you can earn millions of $$$.
If you love him so much, then why don't you marry him?
If you make a mistake you could be found contempt of court and go to jail for 20 years.
If you make it an S7 I'll buy it.
If you mass-produce paper and post it to give the population a vote every week, you don't think that would be expensive?
If you need more heat you can either buy more GPUs or a space heater.
If you need the heat then it doesn't matter if you make a profit or not.
If you never buy a house, and you get ill and cannot work, you could become homeless in the future.
If you only want something to store passwords securely and you absolutely need to access them on mobile devices, but can do without the autofill functionality, go with KeePass..
If you payout your Topcashback cashback to Love2Shop you can buy your Boots lunch.
If you pay the 0.001 LTC fee, I will sell to you whenever.
If you pay using Paypal but don't have a Paypal balance, does it come out of your bank account by direct debit instead?
If you plan ahead, you will never go into debt.
If you pre-fire or just spam shots in spawn room or to destroy the environment then it reduces it.
If you put £250 in every month until you reach £3,000, you'll get £80.
If you put some ML120 fans on it at 400RPM it'll be pretty much silent anyway.
If your CPU is shit then no game will run well even if you have a GTX 1080.
If your credit score is good, maybe you'll get a 0% £5k overdraftr.
If you're a billionaire then you don't have to pay tax.
If you're arbing you're probably gonna go for a high stake.
If you're going to ask a question, at least put a questionmark at the end.
If you're gonna go on-ear you might as well go all the way and go over-ear.
If you're looking 20+ years into the future then you definitely want to invest and not save.
If you're on a budget, I recommend Oneplus 3 or ZTE Axon 7.
If you're on a low salary in the USA you'd be fucked when you retire.
If you're using >30GB just go unlimited.
If your GPU goes up to 91C then suddenly drops down or if your GPU/CPU frequencies drop down suddenly, then your hardware is probably thermal throttling to keep your temps within safe limits.
If your house burns down or you get burgled or flooded, then the data is still lost.
If your original listing was an eBay Charity listing, the donation preferences that you specified will apply to this Second Chance Offer..
If your shopping basket costs £17.67 or less then I don't see why not.
If you say "john downloaded the file to the server" then you are fucking triggering me.
If you see another good deal on a reference GTX 1080TI please can you let me know?
If you take an exam and don't know any of the answers then you'll fail.
If you tell me your electricity rates, and tell me your wattage, I'll calculate your profit for you.
If you think playing only one hero every game is limiting your mmr, then why don't you play some others?
If you think the results might be different a second time.
If you told me 7 years ago that we'd see a TI6 prizepool every month I'd never believe it.
If you turn down the graphics and limit the FPS it will run cooler.
If you used PayPal, you should receive the refund to your account within 3 to 5 business days..
If you use it as a verb you have to use it in the right context.
If you use my referral code you get £100.
If you've already filled up your H2B ISA and Nationwide FlexDirect.
If you've never proved you can repay credit, then how would you have a credit score?!?!?
If you want portability, get in-ear.
If you want to go to Europe, you should do it before the UK leaves the EU, otherwise you won't get free movement of peoples any more.
If you want to make transactions then use LTC.
If you want to measure a country's development, you need to consider life expectancy and health, literacy, PPP, inequality, internet speed, etc.
If you want to mitigate listening fatigue, then why not buy AKG K702?
If you were alive in the 30s, you would have supported Hitler.
If you were captured by terrorists and they told you to praise Allah or die, would you?
If you withdraw early then you lose money.
If you would like to choose one and send me an email back with authority to deduct the £4.50 from your salary, I can then forward to people services for deduction from the next available date and you will be in with a chance to win in each month’s draw, which at present issues 11 prizes per month with extra amounts at Christmas and Easter depending.
I gain and lose weight constantly, but I'm a lot lighter now than I was a year ago.
I gained 1lb over the weekend.
I gained 3 stones in less than a year.
I gave mine to my friend for free without owing any favours.
I gave up applying to Noddle because they couldn't confirm my identity.
I generally dislike IEMs, I just like how portable they are.
I generally ignore coinmarketcap and look at exchanges directly.
I generally recommend never going above 1.4v on a 7700K.
I get £0 wtf.
I get 1% £190.
I get £1,230 a month after deductions.
I get 15% student discount.
I get 17%.
I get 17% of my salary towards my pension, that's not bad I guess.
I get 1% and I couldn't be happier.
I get >20MH/s on my GTX 970.
I get 3.5% on my Halifax H2B ISA + a bonus when/if I purchase a property or retire.
I get >4% on >10k.
I get 5% cashback on all contactless payments.
I get a 10% student discount on hotels.com.
I get a £1,100 boost from my help to buy isa.
I get a 25% bonus from the government on all the interest I make.
I get a constant 1488mhz on my GPU now.
I get a free personal trainer.
I get a prize if I guess it correctly.
I get a student discount though.
I get everything delivered to my office anyway.
I get free meals at work.
I get gifted enough.
I get issued a shitty Windoze phone I never use.
I get it when I go to Brighton.
I get laid even when I don't want it.
I get laid whenever I want.
I get Nectar points.
I get poopoo FPS in Overwatch :(.
I get really cheap rent atm, so I can save most of my income.
I get so much shit.
I get that.
I get the feeling they don't trust me as much as my previous managers.
I get the least sex though :(.
I get the special £30 anti-scratch anti-glare coating.
I get through to a person instantly.
I get to drive home earlier.
I get unpaid overtime.
I give you £100.
Ignorance breeds misconceptions.
Ignorance is for plebs.
ignore Iota, he's trolling you.
ignore Iota I'll marry you instead.
Ignore profits and loss.
I googled it and the Booking.com one was at the top.
I got 0.14300 LTC.
I got 10.
I got +160 core, 120% power, +480 memory, 1000RPM and 67C at max.
I got £33 from his friend on the day, but he said he needed to get the remaining £6 for me later.
I got 5 viewings arranged last night.
I got a 144hz gaming monitor.
I got a £25 toolbox for free last year because I told them I only wanted one item from the locker and didn't want to take both with me.
I got a bit angry with him.
I got a casino bonus from the weirdest place last night.
I got accepted for a £500 overdraft last night. I'm going to spend it on an Ncase M1 + 240mm AIO liquid cooler.
I got a Decision in Principle for £91,000 but they said they'll only lend me £86,000.
I got a drinkable cocunut from the £3 Morrisons meal deal yesterday!!!!!
I got a final value fee of 50p for that graphics card.
I got a free hat.
I got a massive crisp box from the supermarket but it's slightly too small.
I got an annual subscription for £23.31.
I got an EVGA one for £550.
I got a new webcam in case in ever get a Skype interview.
I got a new Zowie GTF-X recently.
I got a quote from EE, and even with the 30% discount it's like £900 over 2 years!
I got a really fucking good deal on these.
I got a six inch sub + a drink for £1.50 last night.
I got a text from Tesco this morning.
I got banned for saying "wtf" in #ubuntu.
I got banned from a pool.
I got clipping on my Beyers with my Fiio E10K but not with my Soundblaster E5.
I got fed up of him telling me I'm greedy and making excuses, so in the end I told him that I CBA and he can have the trip for free.
I got fed up of Sainsbury's after 3 months.
I got first pick of the leftovers.
I got free VIP tickets last year.
I got fuck all when my other grandparents died.
I got goosebumps when Bernard said "it doesn't look like anything to me".
I go there a lot to meet Asians.
I go there sometimes, it's a short train journey from Swindon.
I got it.
I got it for £10 cheaper than Amazon ^^.
I got it on launch.
I got it sent to my NiceHash wallet.
I got it, thanks.
I got lots of free tools from Amazon.
I got lots of in-work benefits.
I got mine fully comprehensive and £100 excess for £186.
I got my 144hz monitor replaced yesterday because it was frame-skipping above 60hz so wasn't real 144hz. Holy shit the difference is incredible.
I got my blood sugar tested last week and it's nice and low :).
I got my Duronic monitor arm today.
I got my first NiceHash payment today.
I got my H105 refurbished for about £50.
I got my mining rig online now.
I got my network switch.
I got my PC overclocked to 4.5GHz only going up to 74C in stress testing and really quiet too ^^.
I got my PC to work after 5.5 hours, but I broke the USB3 socket on my motherboard :(.
I got my Philips Fidelio X2 for £127.
I go to a couple a year.
I go to Somerset a lot.
I go to the gym in my lunch hour.
I go to the gym in my lunch hours now ^^.
I go to the gym over lunch most days.
I got paid just within the first UC period, which made me ineligible for benefits.
I got quadruple discount at Superdrug. I used my cashback credit card to buy love2shop vouchers, I used the love2shop vouchers to purchase the items at a reduced rate, student discount for another 20% off, then the in-store card points for a further discount.
I got some Beechams instead.
I got some cheap stuff on g2a.
I got something delivered to the office, then I couldn't be arsed to go get it.
I got such a good deal at the time considering I'm under 25.
I gotta take out insurance on this.
I got the best deal for my needs and my area AFAIK.
I got to SMFC on 60hz only playing occasionally.
I got to the bootloader and forced a reboot.
I got triple discount at Superdrug. I used my cashback credit card to buy love2shop vouchers, I used the love2shop vouchers to purchase the items at a reduced rate, student discount for another 20% off, then the in-store card points for a further discount.
I go work for them and then my pension is fucking 7% + 16%.
I go work from home so people in the office won't talk to me, but my gf talks to me and disrupts me more than people in the office do!
I guess a £5 cable will probably last longer than a 50p one though?
I guess I could.
I guess I could just work using my gaming PC?
I guess I could punt it from my mobile.
I guess I like the Night King because he'll kill al the characters I hate.
I guess I'll just do the bookings which I get cashback for then.
I guess I'll just hang on to my HTC One M9 for a while longer.
I guess I'll keep increasing by 0.01 every time my PC crashes.
I guess I should deal with that team lunch he sent me before this really importance stuff then.
I guess I should stop protecting and providing for my gf to stop patronising her.
I guess it should have been?
I guess it's to stop people from using non-random <9 point patterns.
I guess it's true that white people all look the same.
I guess I won't be buying HTC again.
I guess my main motivation is so that I have enough for the future.
I guess so.
I guess so, I switch bank account just for the cashback often.
I guess that's why Topcashback pays more.
I guess the G6 would probably be the best bang for the buck and have the least depreciation.
I guess these don't have a cable so they're more portable to take into the office each day.
I guess they don't feel like having a third Bush president.
I guess they're more lower-midrange.
I haave HTTPS Everywhere, Decentraleyes, Disconnect, Privacy Badger, and Ghostery, is that overkill?
I had a game earlier with 4 dps and no communication.
I had a lot in my NiceHack wallet#.
I had a lot on the exchange which I forgot to list.
I had a more secure password before they started forcing this shit on us.
I had an ear infection and I think my ear drum got perforated and now I have deafness and tinnitus.
I had a pizza on Tuesday.
I had a problem with Hermes once where they tried to deliver it to my office 3 times and somehow failed. It took like a month to get it sorted.
I had avacado and bacon burger.
I had it driving a GTX 970 fine. Did you plug the cables into your GTX 970? It could be an issue with your GPU?
I had japchae and bulgogi in London.
I had like 50 a day.
I had performance and stability problems with Tree Tab Style.
I had sex last month.
I had some problems caused by my Dr Pepper addiction so I stopped doing Dr Pepper.
I had that problem so I switched to Powerline.
I had the opportunity to buy 6 1070 TIs for £410 back in late December/ early January but I wanted to wait until my motherboard arrived first.
I had the same problem.
I had this problem when I used to run Battle Net in the background which would randomly update itself and make my game go super sluggish.
I had to call an ambulance for my grandmother last night.
I had to chase Student Loans Company for ages to get my money back.
I had to crack it again when I changed motherboard.
I had to deposit a couple of thousand to offset all the payments.
I had to drive back home.
I had to get married for immigration purposes.
I had to lower all my graphics to minimum just to get 200+ FPS.
I had to order a set of hex keys so I can put it back together.
I had to phone them and they kept asking me what I wanted the money for and I kept giving them really vague anwers.
I had to remove it like 5 minutes after installing it, because I fucked up the orientation and had to reorientate it.
I had to reset the powerline today.
I had to rush it through for immigration reasons, I only invited my parents.
I had to switch them last night, and now my PC is so quiet.
I had to use the crack again though.
I had tuna salad my Korean gf made me.
I had wealthier friends at uni.
I hate being 8 hours without my headphones every day.
I hate being blamed for others' mistakes.
I hate buying new CPUs because I have to buy new motherboard and RAM too.
I hate cables.
I hate CS bots so much.
I hated working at Sainsbury's; I was working 10 hour night shifts on weekends and my mum expected me to do my job searching 9-5 on weekdays.
I hate having that much skin exposed.
I hate holding onto my GRLC for more than 2 days.
I hate how many cables I have at home desk omg.
I hate how much kpop is not available in the UK.
I hate how my ear wax gets stuck on my IEM tips ewwww.
I hate how some games have really shitty AA which just blurs the screen, so I have to disable it to get a sharp image.
I hate how Street Fighter is locked to 60FPS in a time when you can buy 200hz monitors.
I hate how they're turning Mac gay.
I hate how Windoze has no default 'always on top' toggle.
I hate how Windoze manages software updates.
I hate it, it doesn't go where I am it.
I hate it when bass distorts the audio and you lose clarity though.
I hate it when my gf visits me because my parents don't let me have girls to stay over, and the hotel is fucking expensive.
I hate it when my own created playlist randomly shrinks.
I hate it when the Indians answer the phone.
I hate it when the library for an artist is non-existant.
I hate laptops.
I hate leaving a web browser with 500 tabs open all the time.
I hate my IEMs though.
I hate on-ears and cramped headphones like the M50X, but there's no market for portable over-ears :(.
I hate roundabouts with multiple lanes.
I hate shows with too much boring character development.
I hate subscription fees.
I hate sweating, but this weather makes me sweat :(.
I hate that.
I hate that, but Lastpass is pretty good at adapting to websites like that.
I hate the daily 9-5 grind.
I hate the inconvenience and danger of motorbikes.
I hate their fake laughs.
I hate them.
I hate them so much.
I hate these clowns.
I hate these offers which require me to gamble at work.
I hate this 24hz shit we've been stuck with  for over a century.
I hate this commercial. Commented a week ago about how Apple thinks this its clever to make this girl a grating pedant, while failing to realize it's not even pedantic because an iPad IS a computer. The same way someone claiming not to know what coffee is while drinking an espresso. Just fuck right off..
I hate this fucking time-sensitivity too; my gf wants to live with me before she gets deported in November next year.
I hate this illness so much.
I hate this monopoly.
I hate this phone.
I hate tits though.
I hate touchscreen buttons.....
I hate vendor lock-in.
I have.
I have £1000 on smarkets.
I have £10 Amazon credit from my cancelled Fidelio X2s.
I have 10 garlics.
I have 16 bookies with more than £100 right now.....
I have 16GB.
I have 16ohm Beyer Custom One Pro.
I have 16 so I can run a couple of different games at the same time.
I have £1k on Ratesetter I can withdraw if the worst comes to the worst.
I have £2,067.87.
I have 214.9.
I have £21 payable from Betfair casino but they should have paid me £73.50 ffs.
I have 24/7 uptime on my mining rig now.
I have 259 GRLC right now, you want it?
I have 28MH/s.
I have 28 MH/s right now, and planning to get way more.
I have 2 X 710ml bottles of Corona to enjoy tonight.
I have 300 euros now.
I have 300 garlic.
I have 300 grams of Reeces.
I have 302 tabs open in Firefox right now.
I have <30C at idle but it's still a bit loud.
I have 330 euros from selling crypto now.
I have 3,333 songs saved on my phone, but stupid Spotify won't let me save more.
I have 337 GRLC.
I have £3,400 in mine right now at 3.5%.
I have 34 MH/s.
I have 4.
I have 426 GRLC.
I have £4,500 in savings now ^^.
I have 520 GRLC.
I have £5-£30 on like 20 websites now.
I have ~550.
I have 588.
I have 612.
I have 6 free months of Amazon Student Prime.
I have ~£6k on gambling websites.
I have 6 months of free Student Prime.
I have 719 and it's "poor".
I have £8,500 sitting in Nationwide accounts earning me 5% right now, but that will soon change to 1% :(.
I have 8GB sticks.
I have 8 GPUs in the lounge.
I have a >£1,000 gaming PC.
I have a 1080 TI.
I have a £125 M&S gift card.
I have a 12 month warranty and I think the problem might have been present since I bought the car, since it is a water leak and I bought the car in the summer.
I have a 200GB MicroSD card in my phgone.
I have a 4690K and I might buy a 4790K or 7700K.
I have a 500GB SSD and a 200GB HDD.
I have a 500GB SSD and a 200GB HDD in this build.
I have a 555 character formula now.
I have a 5GHz 7700K and a GTX 1080 TI.
I have a 5GHz 7700K delidded.
I have a Betdaq account but it's been idle for so long. If it starts coming up in oddsmatcher searches, then I might start using it.
I have a big 240mm radiator and high-end GPU, so it kicks out a lot of heat.....
I have a big desk so I'm not so horribly cramped.
I have a big liquidity problem right now.
I have about 500 Steam games I've never played.
I have a busy week and I can't play this weekend because I have to go visit my gf in Brighton :(.
I have a capacity of £3,000 ready in my Tesco account in case I get more money.
I have a car, house, GTX 1080 TI, GTX 1070 TI, 5.1GHZ 7700K.
I have a car so I can easily get around.
I have a cashflow problem atm.
I have a Chinese friend in Durham.
I have a Chinese friend who is fluent in Spanish, English and Chinese.
I have a Citreon C1.
I have a company health plan.
I have a couple of spare Nationwide accounts I'm not using.
I have a Creative E5 external soundcard now.
I have a desktop and a smartphone.
I have a feeling that the industry is generally bad.
I have a flat too.
I have a friend at uni who lived off Dominoes pizza for a while and would eat one a day.
I have a fucking massive bag of protein powder on my desk right now.
I have a gf.
I have a gf....
I have a gf because I am in good shape and charismatic.
I have a gf, I only like girls, and I don't like whites.
I have a gf too.
I have a GTX 970 for sale if you need a replacement..
I have a Halifax Help to Buy ISA already.
I have a healthy Korean gf and better headphones than you, so I think I'm doing just fine m9.
I have a house deposit.
I have a job.
I have a job, but it doesn't pay enough to buy anything.
I have a  Korean gf.
I have a Korean gf.
I have a Korean gf and a 5GHz CPU.
I have a Korean gf because Korean girls are the best.
I have a liability of ~£1,100 for a high odds SNR bet I made last night.
I have a life instead of being a drug addict.
I have a limit of £1,200.
I have all this £££ right now.
I have a Logitech G400s.
I have a lot of expensive shit in my house.
I have a lot of garlic.
I have a lot of money in Steam skins.
I have a massive heatsink on my GPU now.
I have a mining rig now.
I have a mortgage direct debit now.
I have a multi-monitor setup and don't have any space to put my PC case without blocking the view of my monitors or taking up space on my mousepad. Where should I put my PC? I am concerned about putting it on the floor in case I accidentally kick it and move it with my feet which could damage it and wear down the case's feet, and also concerned abo.
I have an aggressive reinvestment strategy and I have to get her approval somehow.
I have a name and name of an employer and his brothers' contact information.
I have an E5.
I have an E7.
I have an EeePC 901.
I have a Nespresso masheen.
I have a new strategy for dealing with ads on my phone. Instead of using Adguard which will eat up my battery and prevent me from using a VPN, I will just use unofficial/paid apps and an adblocker on Firefox.
I have an extra £18k or so.
I have an H105 CPU cooler dying to be used.
I have an HTC One M9.
I have an immersion heater.
I have an order for 6 X Gigabyte 1070 TIs for £457 each, but I think I might cancel it.
I have a pair I could sell you.
I have a permanent job!!!!
I have a permanent job too ^^.
I have a playlist for Korean girls and a playlist for Chinese girls.
I have a pretty ridiculous number of valuable assets considering my salary. I'm pretty different to you. You have a high salary but low wealth due to holding few assets.
I have a question.
I have a Ratesetter referral code.
I have a shit credit rating.
I have a shitload of accounts.
I have a shitload of loyalty and gift cards.
I have a Sound Blaster E5.
I have a spare M50X I will probably sell.
I have a spare of that CPU cooler too you can have.
I have a speedometer on my car and my Waze.
I have a student discount.
I have a surplus of holiday days anyway.
I have a third screen, but only two screens work at a time.....
I have a very fast CPU and GPU and I have an SSD.
I have a very small deposit of around £5,000, but I can build it by like £1,000 a month.
I have a vote for what?
I have a VPN.
I have a wedding and a gf this weekend lmao.
I have a wife there already.
I have a work laptop too but I'm using my gaming PC instead.
I have been registered to vote and had a student overdraft, but that's about it.
I have before.
I have better headphones than Iota.
I have Beyer COPs. Audio Technica M50X, Shure SE215, Philips Fidelio X2 and AKG K702.
I have black pupils.
I have capital.
I have cash today, a lot of it.
I have Cherry MX Red which is something like 45g of actuation force.
I have completed on my purchase.
I have different electricity at day and at night, so the optimum TDP is different all the time.
I have done everyone reasonably expected of me omg.
I have doubts I'm going to have a >1080p monitor within 5 years at this rate :(.
I have doubts they'll compensate me at all.
I have dual screen.
I have enough for a 20% deposit.
I have enough money to need to do something with, but not enough money to do anything with.
I have enough savings for 2 years of mortgage payments.
I have entered the correct tracking number to ebay.
I have everything on minimum settings in-game.
I have family in Portsmouth who can put me up.
I have friends in China and Korea who would let me stay with them for free.
I have gf and job but I don't want children but my gf does omg.
I have good motherboard audio now.
I have Guild Wars 2 too.
I have had SE215 for years.
I have ideas.
I have it facing the side.
I have it on a VM but I can't switch from Windoze until Overwatch is working........
I have it set up on my phone but I can't get it to work in Thunderbird wtf.
I have it set up on my phone no problem.
I have just as much money as you because I don't waste as much of it on drugs.
I have just withdrawn about £1,100 from my exchanges.
I have less mental and health problems.
I have like £10,000 in current accounts.
I have like £13,000 in my bank.
I have like 15 current accounts.
I have like 20 days.
I have like 500 tabs open.
I have lodged a manual cashback claim for Ladbrokes.
I have loosened the laces by a shitload to give my feet some relief.
I have lots of £1 direct debits into my savings accounts.
I have lots of Amazon alerts.
I have lots of cash now though.
I have LTC.
I have Magnetic Levitation fans in my PC.
I have magnetic levitation in my PC.
I have money now, I just have to wait for my 12 month monthly saver to expire and I get £3.6k!
I have more BTC than you and I've never bought any.
I have more important things to buy.
I have more space on my desk now ^^.
I have moved my money to Tesco.
I have multiple good headsets.
I have my cable attached to my monitor, but it's still a bit too stiff.
I have my COPs on maximum bass right now.
I have my co-worker's Beats with me.
I have my IEMs in my coat pocket and take them out for the gym.
I have my M50X and K702s for home.
I have my subreddits open, then open individual links under the tree.
I have my work PC using my email with Outlook too.
I have Nexuiz.
I have no assurance of that.
I have no reason to watch a TV show or film twice, so streaming is fine for me..
I have no respect for sellouts like Mr Scruff and Jack Black.
I have now.
I have £££ now.
I haven't been in contact with the court though.
I haven't been on a holiday since I was 14 :(.
I haven't been on holiday for fucking years.
I haven't been on holiday since I was about 16.
I haven't calibrated yet.
I haven't damaged it.
I haven't done anything with the router except plug it in.
I haven't done many new account offers recently.
I haven't even thought about it.
I haven't found a cheaper supplier.
I haven't had any time off all year, I'm so excited!
I haven't had a problem with 1080p youtube for years.
I haven't had it since though.
I haven't had time off for so long.
I haven't heard anything about HD600s being good for gaming.
I haven't heard something so stupid since last week.
I haven't met my co-worker yet, but I hope they're into kpop as much as I am..
I haven't, no.
I haven't opened windows yet though.
I haven't placed it this week yet.
I haven't played post-nerf yet.
I haven't played that game in fucking forever.
I haven't reached endgame yet, so I am still researching and testing.
I haven't really learnt any of the heroes yet anyway.
I haven't received any payment though, and I CBA to chase it.
I haven't seen a £50 note for like 25 years.
I haven't seen a lot of old films.
I haven't seen my doctor about it.
I haven't seen that film.
I haven't switched back to NH yet.
I haven't touched my heating since I've moved in.
I haven't tried Crysis yet.
I haven't tried Google Auto. I use Waze.
I haven't used the NHS for over 10 years, and now I actually need it they're making me wait almost a month before seeing me wtf.
I haven't yet.
I have obesity.
I have one and it's a fucking beast.
I have OneNote at home because I pirated it.
I have one of those.
I have outlook set up on my work laptop.
I have over £10k on gambling sites now.
I have over £17k in savings.
I have over 200 garlic for sale.
I have over 300 garlic right now.
I have over 300 GRLC and probably more than that by tonight.
I have over £5,000 in savings for emergencies.
I have over £5,000 now.
I have over £6k in my bank accounts now.
I have over £6k on betting sites again....
I have overdrafts and credit card.
I have Philips Fidelio X2.
I have PIA.
I have PIA now.
I have pics.
I have pool operators literally begging me to join their pool now.
I have PUBG.
I have Sainsbury's CC.
I have shitloads of money.
I have Shure SE215s atm and they sound like shit compared to my full-sized Philips Fidelio X2.
I have smoked before.
I have so many emails, I want to make some stats.
I have some BCH now.
I have some bitcoins from mining.
I have some Eastern European person's passport now.
I have some M50X in perfect condition I could sell you.
I have some new mouse skates.
I have some pads I can sell you.
I have some Shure SE215s but I really don't like the sound and comfort....
I have some wine I don't want. If I leave it on my desk whilst I'm away, my mum will probably notice it and steal it when she's drunk.
I have so much cash, I think I might build a mining rig next year.
I have so much money IDK what to do with it.....
I have so much money omfg.
I have spoken to the support line twice and they say that they need to add it as an enhancement.
I have Steam.
I have such a large amount of cash.
I have such an infectious personality.
I have the COP already.
I have the Custom One Pros, but the Custom Studios look better.
I have the full report.
I have them.
I have the same actually.
I have the same problem.
I have three magnetic dust filters which can be placed against the fans.
I have three regular savers.
I have to actually go off and eat my lunch.
I have to buy my wife's flight ticket too ffs.
I have to buy them for like £190 now.
I have to call my mobile provider and go through their fucking menu options.
I have to disable laggy algorithms even when not at home because my wife might want to use the PC :(.
I have to get a 06:00 train tomorrow :(.
I have to go see an audiologist to get moulds made for my ears though.
I have to go to dentist now.
I have to hold his hand a lot to do really simple things with our business systems.
I have to if she makes me.....
I have to open the mouse up, unplug the old cable, heatshrink the new cable, and plug it in.
I have to pay 100% because my gf is staying with me atm.
I have to pay £7.30 fee for selling my DT770 omg.
I have to plan ahead for when I need the heat.
I have to save my money for new phones, new CPUs, SSDs, monitors, etc.
I have to send my monitor back tomorrow.
I have to sit up straight and look up slightly.
I have to take my holiday too.
I have to time my application to get the most benefits.
I have to use Lync, but I'm sat between IT and housing which are always so noisy.
I have to use Windoze just for Overwatch!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
I have to wait for the box.
I have used it now.
I have videogames to playt.
I have waited like 5 years for it, what's 1 year more?
I have way better IT equipment at home.
I have way more hashpower than you.
I have xmrig working in Awesome Miner.
I heard founders have good VRAM.
I heard girls like sweaty men anyway.
I heard good things about that show.
I heard it's better than Awesome Miner.
I heard it's good.
I heard that helps on Facebook which permanently stores all your content.
I heard that in the 80s cocaine used to be legal in the workplace and people did it like they do coffee.
I heard that the M50s are uncomfortable on-ears and uncomfortable with glasses.
I heard that tumblr has one of the worse communities on the internet.
I heard that working in Japan is a good way to meet fit grills.
I heard The Expanse is good.
I helped him tidy it up and he gave me a Tango.
I hope Bitcoin doesn't take off.
I hope Corbyn gets elected again so he can bring in Universal Credit and I can quit my job.
I hope I can afford my rent after I retire.
I hope I described my item condition accurately.
I hope I don't have a fucking chest infection too.
I hope I don't win.
I hope I don't win this photo competition now.
I hope I get my Moneyfarm and Nutmeg cashback from Quidco too.
I hope I get the cashback, because I lost money on it.
I hope I get the job.
I hope I lose.
I hope I lose my £300 arb at Tommy French.
I hope I lose some bets on Bet365 so I can get the cash out.
I hope I lose this £200 bet then it'll free up all the cash for me :).
I hope I'm 24.
I hope I'm not dying ffs.
I hope inheritance tax is as low in Korea as it is in the UK.
I hope it bounces back before the winter. I want free heating for my flat.
I hope it gets approved, because I would like a free £150.
I hope it is successful.
I hope it meets the hype.
I hope it's a pirated copy?
I hope it's not permanent.
I hope it's temp.
I hope it still works properly.
I hope it will get rid of all the noise.
I hope Linux isn't vulnerable.
I hope Monero takes its place.
I hope my 3.5mm to 2.5mm adapter arrives tomorrow.
I hope my £520 ComeOn withdrawal gets authorised too.
I hope my adapter arrives today.
I hope my company ends up giving us all £500 to spend on computer equipment like the IT manager told me they're currently considering. I can then buy a GTX 1080TI.
I hope my co-worker is sacked because she's a bit loud and obnoxious.
I hope my Fidelio X2 comes in the same condition as my Beyers did.
I hope my gf isn't pregnant..
I hope my Lastpass account never gets hacked.
I hope my Overwatch arrives today.
I hope not.
I hope not but I'll have buildings and contents insurance just in case.
I hope one day I can afford a GTX 1080TI.
I hope people vote leave and then we remain anyway.
I hope she doesn't make intraracial marriage illegal too.
I hope she doesn't talk about bible stuff.
I hope so.
I hope that never happens.
I hope that's not true.
I HOPE THE CCTV EVIDENCE HASN'T BEEN DELETED YET, SO I CAN USE IT FOR SMALL CLAIMS COURT.
I hope the Custom One Pros actually have decent isolation though.
I hope the £ goes high because I like to buy lots of foreign expensive shit.
I hope they answer before they close ffs.
I hope they are okay though, because I want to use these headphones.
I hope they hurry up and call me.
I hope this desk-mounted monitor arm won't be too much of a pain to install tonight.
I hope this doesn't cause the headphone jack to be lost.
I hope Vodafone are okay though.
I hope Waze caches a lot.
I hope you get 3k soon man.
I HOPE YOU GET BETTER AND NOT BE SICK ANY MORE.
I hope you get it.
I hope you got in on this offer.
I hope you have a really good time in Amsterdam.
I hope you lose.
I hope you meet a nice Asian girl.
I hope you're right that it's just delayued by stress.
I hope your masternode works out well for you.
I hope you understand cuz I’m a girl.
I hope Zen is competitive, because I want to see CPUs twice as powerful as they currently are.
I hve PIA.
I ignored it and made my £120 on Bet365.
I ignored that comment and solved their problem.
I ignore the 'standard journeys' and just calculate the number of miles myself.
I increased the clockspeed to 4.5GHz.
I installed a new cooler on my 1080 TI yesterday.
I installed lots of software I shouldn't have.
I installed Microsoft Office 2010 on Ubuntu last night.
I installed my new ML120 fans last night and they're really quiet. The only problem I have now is that the AIO pump noise is super noticeable now :(.
I intended to use them as a portable pair.
IIRC he was lucky the German police got to him first. If he went to USA and got prosecuted there he'd still be in jail now.
IIRC I had to reinstlal.
IIRC the main thing I disliked about Keepass was the inability to add passwords into apps on Android.
IITS 4:20.
I jsut went for a poo in the new office.
I just answered the questions honestly.
I just applied for an M&S current account for £185 M&S gift card.
I just applied for a Sainsbury's credit card to buy petrol with.
I just assumed they all came to the south.
I just ate a chorizo.
I just bookmark the sites I have left cash on so I know where to get it if I run into liquidity problems.
I just bought £300 handbag insurance.
I just bought a £80 sofa and a £430 washing mascheen.
I JUST BOUGHT A DISPLAY ARM.
I just bought a flat.
I just bought a fridge for £20, freezer for £20, and washing machine for £100. I looked them up on Currys and it would have cost ~£650 for them brand new.
I just bought a new gaming mouse, hopefully I can rank up from Diamond now.
I just bought it because I'm obsessed with cramming as much performance as possible into as small a case as possible.
I just bring my coat to work every day.
I just build a new PC. I got a pre-binned delidded 7700K and 3200mhz DDR4, but I didn't upgrade my GTX 970....
I just buy shit when I need it.
I just calculated that all my items in my Dota and CS inventories are worth over £450.
I just can't find IEMs which have the comfort, isolation and sound quality I'm after. I think I'll just save up for some CIEMs.
I just can't take this subreddit seriously.
I just CBA to convert every to LTC later on.
I just CBA to go back to piracy at this point.
I just CBA to go to work.
I just checked my mileage form, and I put £61.38 in there.They fucked up and paid me £125.10 wtf.
I just compared the unlimited data S7 contract to the standalone S7 + SIM and the standalone is still cheaper.
I justcouldn't be arsed to ask.
I just couldn't wait any longer for Dota 2.
I just created a ProtonMail account, but it doesn't support IMAP and I hate using a web browser for email.
I just deleted Telegram.
I just delete films after I've watched them.
I just deposit the money and don't have to do anything for my free £140.
I just did.
I just did 40 mins of cardio.
I just did a big tender for a three year mobile contract for my company.
I just did my drugs.
I just didn't buy anything.
I just did what ebay suggested.
I just do cardio once a week.
I just don't get 200+.
I just don't know my wattage.
I just don't need to use optical discs any more.
I just don't want to touch these funds if I can help it.
I just don't want to use my work laptop because my desk is cramped enough as it is.
I just do stuff like 4+3 in the calculator app.
I just found out about credit cards.
I just found out I can claim 55p a mile because I had two passengers.
I just generate random passwords with lastpass.
I just get heat from mining rigs.
I just get paid less because they ran out of budget money.
I just got £144 Moneyfarm cashback from Quidco.
I just got £25 off my washing masheen.
I just got £30.88 from 5 free spins.
I just got a £100 free bet with Coral.
I just got a letter from First Direct.
I just got an email from Novatech about global graphics cards shortages.
I just got an openmailbox account.
I just got another smart plug.
I just got a vaccination, am I going to get autism?
I just got back from KFC.
I just got insurance for my mining rig so if anyone steals it whilst I'm in Korea then I get £3,500.
I just got my benefits signed off once a week.
I just got my car back from the garage, hopefully it's actually fixed now.
I just got my manager to help me with my CV for a job at another company.
I just got quoted £160.
I just got tested for obesity and am obesity negative.
I just got two debit cards.
I just had a really good idea for a new crypto.
I just hang them up on the headphone stands on the sides of my monitors.
I just have £1000 cycling between each account.
I just have a can of supermarket-brand chicken soup.
I just have my IEMs in.
I just have to email them telling them my estimated usage is only 1500kwh instead of 3000kwh I guess.
I just hope I still have a job in 10 years.
I just hope the cable is standard and not the usual proprietary trash.
I just invested £1000 for a year and I'll get £100 cashback.
I just invested with Ratesetter.
I just learnt that Prime95 is overkill for Haswell.
I just leave it for 10 mins and it's cold as fuck.
I just like clarity more.
I just logged into their site twice a week, clicked on a couple of random links, and created a fake table showing 40 hours of "job seeking".
I just looked at one of the nicer ones and can't see any brand or model information.
I JUST LOST THE FIRST ONE AFTER FAILING TO SWALLOW THE FUCKING THING.
I just made £100 profit on my qualifying spins yay.
I just made £100 profit on my qualifying spins yya.
I just made a complaint to the data protection people.
I just manage my playlist library.
I just measured my PC at 270 watts whilst mining.
I just need more cash because I spent so much on GPUs.....
I just need more CPU performance.
I just need some CIEMs for listening to music outside the house now.
I just need the house to function properly, and I'll make it look nice when I have to or can afford to.
I just need the shit to work.
I just need to buy lots of GTX 1070s now.
I just need to eat less.
I just need to figure out how to sell Monero.
I just need to keep track of my savings.
I just need to mine enough so I can afford my own GTX 1080TI.
I just need to put about £700 in one and £1200 in the other to get my cashback.
I just need to save up enough for 6 GTX 1080 TIs then I'll quit.
I just need to scale up the mining I think.
I just need your email address, first name, surname, and date of birth.
I just need your name, email, and date of birth.
I just never get to use them :(.
I just OCed my CPU to 4.7GHz.
I just opened an openmailbox email account.
I just ordered a display arm.
I just ordered Fibre.
I just ordered one for the bedroom.
I just paid £49.84 for my Co-Op home insurance.
I just paid the entire balance off.
I just placed a £270 arb on Betway.
I just placed a big arb on Tommy French, I hope they don't cancel the bet.
I just placed a sweet acca on Coral.
I just PMed you with my bank details m9.
I just put £50 in a slot machine and got £84.50 back + £5 free sports bet.
I just put "kind regards" in my signature because I CBA to type it.
I just put Leeds in, sorted by cheapest, and found a few ~£100.
I just put the stock M50X pads back on, and I can confirm that the isolation is still shit compared to my COPs.
I just ran around, nowhere sells Isopropyl.
I just realised I can control my PCs from my phone.
I just received £150 "gesture of goodwill" from the contractor who scratched up my Citreon.
I just removed the locking mechanism which limits me to using only proprietary cables.
I just renewed my Spotify student subscription for another 12 months ^^.
I just said I wanted it there in case I needed it.
I just selected "all day event" in Outlook but she wants me to change it and I CBA.
I just sent my DT770s with MyHermes, I hope they don't fuck it up.
I just set my CPU to 4.3GHz and 1.95v.
I just set my desktop background on my new work laptop.
I just signed up for TPS and Silentguard.
I just sit closer to it.
I just slept and played Dota.
I just sold £20 of Dota items so I can buy stuff if I want to.
I just solved my money problem.
I just spend all day on IRC and Reddit.
I just spend most of my day on IRC and Reddit and talking to my gf on WhatsApp.
I just spent like £21k on a house.
I just spoke to a guy in the live chat who solved my Quidco cashback problem.
I just spoke to a man at Royal Mail who says that he puts letters and parcels through a drug-detecting machine and then calls the police so that they arrest you for buying illegal drugs and interrogate you to find out who you bought them from.
I just spoke to Amazon support for ages and kept telling them the same problem and all I got was "sorry".
I just started a rollover. I hope I lose....
I just started my Bet At Home rollover.
I just started using NiceHash Legacy.
I just switched to legacy and now my profits are up ^^.
I just told him that.
I just told him that he's in breach of contract law.
I just told my manager to download Lastpass.
I just told them my car is in the garage.
I just treat them how they treat me.
I just tried on my old Corsair Vengeance 1500 to see how much of a difference my AMPDAC+headphones make. The difference was massive.
I just turned a £5 free bet into a guaranteed profit of £5.39 or £5.50.
I just turned on "Limit mobile data usage".
I just ungimped my GTX 970. I flashed a new BIOS and removed the power limit.
I just upgraded to a 5.1GHz 7700K and Z270i Strix.
I just upgraded to Fibre.
I just used Betdaq for my Coral bet club bet.
I just use mining because people understand it.
I just use my 24" 144hz monitor.
I just use my computer monitors as TVs.
I just use my phone to select a playlist then let it play.
I just use my work SIM now.
I just use Nicehack and Coinbase and gdax like a pleb.
I just use PIA VPN.
I just use S&S ISAs for the cashback. It's not recommended to use them for <5 years and I can't afford to invest for that long.
I just use the bass boost on my E10K.
I just use the work-supplied shitty headset for Lync :(.
I just use Whatsapp now.
I just use WhatsApp nowadays.
I just use Windoze because Overwatch runs on it.
I just want a 7-15 litres incredibly powerful rig.
I just want a job that pays well enough to buy a house without taking out a massive fucking mortgage.
I just want a phone not a contract.
I just want a toggle.
I just wanted a quick explanation of the physics of a machine I have no idea about.
I just wanted some tips to reduce the damp in my car.
I just wanted the gold badge.
I just wanted the switching bonus.
I just want free muscle growth.
I just want it to run unobtrusively in the background.
I just want it to stop.
I just want my money back so I can withdraw it and fuck off.
I just want something which has the features I need.
I just want the cashback.
I just want to boost my framerate.
I just want to browse reddit.
I just want to find a pair of headphones with DT770-like pads but also fold up for portable use!
I just want to inherit 40k then quit my job.
I just want to put my headphones on and be left alone omg.
I just watched 10 Cloverfield Lane and Arrival.
I just watched asian porn without any problems.
I just watched Crouching Tiger Hidden Dragon and it has a really nice grill in it.
I just watch them on Stremio.
I just wear whatever I get given for my birthdays and Christmases.
I just went and won games and didn't whine about my team mates like most people who are stuck at low mmr.
I just went to KFC.
I just wish I had the money to buy a graphics card, SSD and monitor to complement the other great parts.
I just wish my Custom One Pros would fold up into a tiny shape like my M50X.
I just wish the HTC had some fucking waterproofing omg!!!!!!!!!!1.
I just withdraw £100 to my bank account via BACs.
I just withdrew £372 from Bwin.
I just withdrew £800 from Matchbook and £800 from Betfair. If it doesn't arrive by Tuesday I'll just ask my dad for the money. Failing that, I'll withdraw from my savings account. I have a lot of money coming in from Coral and some other bookies, and my Help to Buy ISA soon anyway..
I JUST WON £100 ON A 25p spin.
I just won £38 on virtual horses lmao.
I keep accidentally holding a key pressed on my keyboard without noticing omg.
I keep accidentally holding the spacebar down without realising.
I keep all my headphones in very good condition now.
I keep asking rory to buy me a GTX 1080TI but he hasn't yet.
I keep betting on non-high profile events so I am worried I will get gubbed.
I keep betting on shit like Mexico leagues and Russian under 18.
I keep calling it eye-bee-za because of that fucking song.
I keep creating empty Tesco accounts to get the switching bonus lmao.
I keep forgetting all your fetishes.
I keep getting asked to close the file so that someone else can edit it wtf.
I keep getting sap all over the windshield.
I keep getting told to find a workaround.
I keep going back and forth.
I keep having conversations with people at work whose names I don't know.
I keep hearing "not a leader" and "unelectable" but no actual facts behind it.
I keep losing money on slot masheens.
I keep making little mistakes like betting on the same event more than once when I need to bet on 3 seperate events.
I keep raising.
I killed everyone in School last night.
I kinda doubt I'm going to last another 10 years.
I kinda just send it randomly.
I kinda want to buy Beats just to hear what they sound like. I've heard a lot about them.
I kinda want to know which option is going to lose me the least amount of money over 5 or 10 years.
I kinda want to see a successful betting industry.
I kinda wish I bought this E10K for second-hand for cheap now.
I kinda wish I could just disable the option to leave voicemails.
I kinda wish I got a Nationwide Help To Buy for dat £1000 bonus though.
I knew he was old.
I knew you were baiting me and CBA to skirt around it.
I know 4 lions.
I know about port forwarding because I play video games.
I know a cold doesn'tr.
I know a lot about which mice are good and which are not.
I know approximately how much utilities and contents insurance and mortgage will cost.
I know how much council tax and rent and service charges are.
I know how much protein powder costs.
I know I am not attracted to them.
I know if I bought one she would be so angry for spending so much money.
I know, I go to the gym in my lunch hour most days.
I know it's really fucking dangerous to smoke and drive.
I know it's technically the same.
I know korean.
I know more about what games require than servers.
I know my parents switch between BT and Sky a lot and use whatever they get sent.
I know not to make those mistakes again.
I KNOW OMG I WISH PEOPLE WOULD JUST FUCKING LEAVE ME ALONE.
I know people have refused to play with me when my mic wasn't working.
I know rory quite well because I've been stalking him for years now..
I know rory's name and address and birthday.
I know so little about that topic that I don't really have an opinion.
I know someone at work who plays games but he's a filthy casual so I unfriended him on Steam.
I know some people with custom watercooling loops but it just seems like overkill to me.
I know that mortgage interest and house prices are not linked at all.
I know that my total fees will be 0.9% + 0.2% + 0.1%.
I know there's alternatives but I CBA to switch temporarily.
I know there's still a lot of businesses running 15 year old machines with Windoze XP *shudder*.
I know they pay interest if my account has a positive balance, but it's probably a measly amount.
I know what a chicken is omg.
I know what a fucking homeless person looks like.
I know what a fucking spreadsheet is.
I know what "elite" means.
I know what evaporation is.
I know what free trade is, but not Freetrade..
I know where you live.
I know who to call if the flat is on fire.
I know you can get rid of the poo and bleeding, but it requires setup.
I know you can order it in Amsterdam.
I know you get your free flagship phone, but I get a 17% pension and a £5 gym with personal trainer.
I know you have a GTX 1080 TI, so I'm proud of you for investing in that.
I know you're trying to make a joke but I don't understand the joke you are trying to make.
I know your pain. I bought some milk and forgot to bring it to work.
I later asked my wife about her and she told me her cousin is 13.
I learnt recently that the most important part of your audio chain is your ears.
I leave it on at night though.
I leave it sorry man.
I leave my PC on all night and turn it off during the day.
I leave the cable permanently plugged in and just plug different headphones into it.
I left a lot of money in there.
I left my PC on all night to mine and only made £0.35 worth of Bitcoin....
I lent at a low rate of like 3%, so return hasn't been great. It's gone into the rolling market at 3.7%.
I lift 4 times a week and do cardio on top of that.
I lift heavy and never warm up.
I like £££.
I like 0% fee.
I like a cold bedroom.
I like Ana more because I don't have to wait for the snipper to charge.
I like Asians.
I like bacon.
I like Chinese girls.
I like Chinese too.
I like coins I can mine too.
I like CS:GO NiP and Dota 2 Liquid and OG.
I like desks which curve inwards at the middle like yours so you can sit closer to the desk though.
I like dinner and drinks too.
I like Dominoes Pizza.
I liked the episode about kpop though.
I liked the first one.
I liked to play BF2142 too.
I liked your one because it seemed to think for itself IIRC.
I liked your one more.
I like EC1-A.
I like food so much.
I like free money.
I like getting.
I like girls.
I like grils.
I like gyms.
I like haivng home/insert/page up/page down too.
I like having a massive disposable income and having my laundry done for me.
I like having arrow keys.
I like having money too.
I like how I can keep track of all my bank accounts from one website rather than logging into all my banks individually and entering all the fucking login information each time.
I like how if Youtube says the video isn't available in my country then I can just change country.
I like how I get a brand new warranty if I get a replacement from Amazon too.
I like how it opens the window-switcher as soon as I press the super button.
I like how it's expandable/shrinkable. I'd probably get the larger module to get some aggressive CPU overclocking, but I have the option to scale down in the future to make the build smaller if I don't need as much CPU cooling.
I like how my DT770s are solid pieces of metal covering my ears.
I like how on OKC you can filter by race.
I like how that white slut got rekt.
I like how the BBC is pushing the agenda that gamers are sexist now.
I like how with the M50s you can rotate the cups to press against your chest so they're really comfy to wear around your neck.
I like how you use really detailed open headphones for home listening too.
I like hummus.
I like Iota today, he's actually being really cool.
I lik eit.
I like it because it works better with Android apps than Lastpass.
I like it when mothers put "none" under religion for their baby.
I like it when my Korean gf cooks for me.
I like it when she works from home because then I don't have to worry about how long it takes me to take a dump.
I like jam.
I like Jeb Bush the most.
I like Jolin Tsai.
I like KFC because I have a 15% student discount.
I like Korean grils too much to go to Mars.
I like kpop.
I like Lastpass because it's the most simple and convenient to use.
I like LTC for the low transaction fees.
I like meat.
I like micro DP because it means I can fit more connectors on my graphics card.
I like milk.
I like money too much.
I like mushrooms with my breakfast.
I like my AKG K702 + Boompro.
I like my auto switching done for me.
I like my Korean gf's skin.
I like noob friendly.
I like Openhardwaremonitor but I doubt it'd get recommended here.
I like oriental.
I like paying by credit card because then I don't have to pay any money for a while.
I like pineapple.
I like playlists.
I like Relentless, it's good shit.
I like that feature in spotify.
I like the Beyer Custom One Pros. I sold my DT770s and found a pair of COPs for £76.
I like the bike so I can use my phone more.
I like the case though, I was looking at that case for my own build for a while.
I like the HTC 10 for it's built-in Hi-Fi DAC.
I like the isolation and comfort, sound quality and isolation of my DT770 Pro 80Ohm headphones, but hate the cable and want a removable cable so I can use my V-Moda Boompro. Can I buy DT770s with a removable cable, or is there another pair of headphones that would be ideal for me?
I like the nerd equivalent of football and page 3 girls.
I like the "people near me" feature in Wechat.
I like the platform though.
I like the racing chairs for ergonomics.
I like these people; they give me lots of food.
I like to come into the office so I can use the gym anyway.
I like to do roullette because it's easy to understand how it works.
I like to fit high-end hardware into tiny cases.
I like to fit massive amounts of performance into tiny cases.
I like to get a good arms, shoulders, back and legs stretch every couple of hours.
I like to go use the toilet in the other corner of the office because it is less busy which is nice when I want to poo and Reddit.
I like to hoard it for emegencies.
I like to lift heavy.
I like to listen to it whilst downing a Sugar Free Relentless.
I like to pet dogs.
I like to use them on Wednesdays so I only have 2 day working weeks.
I like Transmission because it lets me set the upload limit to 0.
I like using comments if text is required for a cell.
I like when there's a tour group of cute Chinese girls visiting my local area.
I like Yi Ti.
I like you too.
I listed 1.08008135 GRLC at slightly different prices.
I listed all the main factors above.
I literally don't understand anything you just said.
I literally never answer my phone.
I lived in Swansea for 4 years.
I live in the country :(.
I live in the middle of nowhere and get over ten times your speed, and I just have shitty internet.
I live in the south.
I live near the M4.
I live with my parents.
I’ll act calm, as if it’s nothing.
I'll apply for sure.
I'll be 25 in like a week.
I'll be exchanging it today definitely.
I'll be flying to Korea tomorrow and won't be around to talk much at all for three weeks.
I'll be getting a new bed and sofa first.
I'll be going to Korea before April.
I'll be in debt by over £100k soon.
I'll believe it when I see it.
I'll be lord of the land.
I'll be pissed if it doesn't.
I'll be selling my Fiio E10K soon.
I'll be so happy if they work properly.
I'll be up by the time I withdraw.
I'll book a holiday to Korea or something instead.
I'll build it for you if you want.
I'll buy a 1080TI on a 0% credit card, then use it to heat my flat and pay off the credit card payments.
I'll buy a 240hz monitor with the cash instead, if you want?
I'll buy a new case and CPU cooler to get a decent OC out of it.
I'll buy it when it's a decent monitor-replacement.
I'll buy you a beer though.
I'll call my manager, explain the problem, and ask what she'd like me to do I guess.
I'll carry you pretty hard once I get my GTX 2080.
I'll cash out now.
I'll check again.
I'll check every new account guide I've gone through and make sure it's all added to Ultimatcher.
I'll check in a min.
I'll check later.
I'll check the benchmarkjs.
I'll check with rory first.
I'll complain about it this afternoon.
I'll consider selling my Fiio E10K for £30+P&P.
I'll do it later.
I'll do it this weekend.
I'll do it tonight.
I'll donate 1% to you instead.
ILLEGAL.
I'll either crack it out install Linux.
I'll enjoy it all for free.
I'll enjoy the interest in the mean time.
I'll find out when I look at the voicemail.
I'll get 3200mhz RAM and I don't think I'll benefit from paying a premium for faster than that.
I'll get a 240hz gsync monitor, but I'd prefer a 480hz.
I'll get a mortgage within 6 months which will boost my score a shitload.
I'll get back from Seoul, build another couple of mining profits, then quit my job and play video games all day.
I'll get either the S7, G6 or V30.
I'll get ethernet when I move into my new flat.
I'll get on matched betting when I have a bit more time.
I'll get some.
I'll get that 240hz 1080p monitor probably.
I'll get them to repair it then sell it on ebay or trade it in for some £££.
I'll get the PSU brand new because it's the same one I use and I don't want to sell it.
I'll get to it tonight.
I'll get Vive I think.
I'll give it another go at setting it up this evening. I wanna get it all set up by Friday because I will be working from home that day yay.
I'll give you £500 for it.
I'll give you £50 and a blowjob if you port the WIndows driver to Linux.
I'll give you a blowjob if you buy me a 1080TI.
I'll give you a handjob if you give me an S8.
I'll give you a message.
I'll give you mates rates.
I'll google it for you later, just need to finish this spreadsheet.
I'll go on thepiratebay or something.
I'll go to Five Guys with you if you want.
I'll go with coinmarketcap.
I'll guess the P&P price, build my next PC, and if the cost is over what I guessed then I'll just pay the difference myself. I doubt I'll be more than £10-£20 off the mark anyway.
I'll have a look at k8 this week.
I'll have my item tomorrow.
I'll have the last laugh with my 20% pension whilst you're paying 20% on credit card debt.
I'll have to accept my grandparents' bridging loan which makes me feel bad taking money from them.
I'll have to look for it tonight, I think I'm missing lots of new releases because I don't have time to check them out unless I am on my desktop.
I'll have to sell my home.
I'll have to take measurements at the viewing then I guess.
I'll help you reach 3k, if you like?
I'll include those with the peripherals.
I'll invite you.
I'll just allocate the revenue towards a two bedroom house so I have a dedicated mining room.
I'll just borrow the cashback from my stepdad and then repay him once I get it.
I'll just buy petrol with my credit card every month.
I'll just drink crowtine or fightmilk instead.
I'll just find a rich Chinese wife to support me.
I'll just get the expense policy changed to facilitate my cashback.
I'll just give them the neighbourhood officer's new number.
I'll just go into the office every day unless I know they won't be there.
I'll just have to wait between 9th - 31st May to use them.....
I'll just not drink tea or eat toast until then.
I'll just replace the card probably.
I'll just save up for a 1080TI or something after I buy my house.
I'll just stay at 3k because it won't decay further than that.
I'll just stick with my SE215 until I can afford some Custom Art Music Ones.
I'll just try to save a bit more and withdraw a bit from my bookies.
I'll just use them whenever I'm out of the house I think.
I'll keep letting my mum pay for it until she stops.
I'll keep them until I switch them to another bank account.
I'll leave my money on the site so the ydon't gubb me.
I'll let you know.
I'll look at the EE website. Are the S8 contracts available to pre-purchase?
I'll look into it more this weekend.
I'll look it up.
I'll look it up tonight.
I'll make sure to find you a mouse worthy of being used for 5+ years.
I'll make the transfer now.
I'll mine and sell directly to you each day if you want to keep buying.
I'll moan only if we end up leaving by 1 vote.
I'll move on to a more advanced one later.
I'll move to Korea.
I'll pay off the overdraft and leave it.
I'll pay you back in full.
I'll pick you up if you're close.
I'll play competitive.
I'll PM you later.
I'll probably buy a house first, then save up for CIEMs.
I'll probably buy another 5 in 6 months too.
I'll probably die of heart disease or car crash before I'm 50.
I'll probably dump her if she does.
I'll probably get a 4k TV at some point in the next few years.
I'll probably get a 6700K from siliconlottery.com next.
I'll probably get a Zowie or maybe the Finalmouse Scream One if it is any good.
I'll probably get thwe Acer or Asus one with G-Sync.
I'll probably go home after my workout.
I'll probably have to pay interest on my balance this month of like £28.
I'll probably have to walk the dog too because my mum will ask me to.
I'll probably have to withdraw from Tommy French at some point.
I'll probably just use my gaming PC.
I'll probably keep it in instant access current accounts for safety.
I'll probably lower the graphics to minimum.
I'll probably never cash this Lloyds check.
I'll probably play later, got to walk the dog and stuff now.
I'll probably retire later this year as long as mining doesn't crash.
I'll probably run it undervolted half of the year too.
I'll probably sell to you for 0.007.
I'll probably send my Fiio E10K in its original packaging in one of those bubble envelopes like I sent the Modmic to you. Do you think that'll be okay?
I'll probably still auto exchange my XMR for LTC, but I'll wait until just before I'm about to withdraw.
I'll probably switch to Nicehack when I go to Korea.
I'll probably upgrade to a 240hz with gsync next year though.
I'll probably use it as a spare.
I'll probably use my M50X for home listening now, just because cable management is so much simpler.
I'll probably wait until I buy a new phone before sending my HTC One M9 back to HTC to repair it.
I'll probably withdraw £300 from 888sport because I rarely get offers from them.
I'll probably withdraw from Coral and leave only about £100 on there.
I'll put £500 a month into the Nationwide regular saver.
I'll put these on my gf....
I'll put up half the capital so you won't need as much.
I'll quit my job tomorrow and become a full time miner, and you become a full time trader.
I'll read reviews to find something that's quiet at idle.
I'll rek you at Connect 4 m9.
I'll replace the cooler.
I'll run it again brb.
I'll save you as a contact then.
I'll sell below the sell order.
I'll sell for 30p each or I'll put it on the exchange.
I'll sell it to you for ~£2k.
I'll sell on an exchange like I usually do.
I'll sell them both for £110+P&P.
I'll sell to you at CryptoBridge prices.
I'll sell to you later.
I'll sell you a M50X cable.
I'll sell you more 8 weeks later.
I'll sell you more GRLC when you get home this evening.
I'll sell you my M50X.
I'll sell your a M50X cable.
I'll sell your my GRLC.
I'll sell you RVN for some other crypto.
I'll send it from gdax and tell you the tx ID.
I'll send it to you this weekend if I have time.
I'll send you some BTC and you can send me some fiatcoin.
I'll send you some money then take you to small claims court.
I'll send you some pics tonight and then I can mail it tomorrow or Tuesday.
I'll share the profits 50% with you if you get on board.
I'll show you later, busy now.
I'll slowly change all my emails over the next couple of years.
I'll stick with my muddy Shure SE215s until I am ready for CIEMs.
I'll stick with my Philips Fidelio X2.
I'll still be struggling just as much to pay off a mortgage on a one bedroom flat.
I'll still be using my Fidelio X2s in 10 years.
I'll swap my HTC One M9 for your HTC 10 once you've bought it.
I'll take BCH or LTC.
I'll take BTC, BCH, ETH and LTC.
I'll take the cheapest that can do that.
I'll take your word for it, I haven't seen him in anything before.
I'll tell her I'll pay her £500 to get an implant or something.
I'll try and do it as fast as I can.
I'll try anyway.
I'll try it on my DAC at home just to be sure.
I'll try that app.
I'll try to bet to sooner events then.
I'll try to get ebay and my credit card company involved.
I'll use mine when I upgrade my phone, which I don't know when it'll be.
I'll use MSI Afterburner to create a 2D profile with less voltage and clock speeds.
I'll use the original case packaging and put some extra paper inside the case to do the best I possibly can to ensure nothing is damaged in transit.
I'll wait 2 hours and let you know if it never comes through.
I'll wait for the real deal.
I'll wait until it's legalised.
I'll watch Archer because I'm a real man.
I'll withdraw my LTC once I reach 1.
I'll withdraw to Coinbase then transfer to your wallet.
I locked myself into m-itx because I thought I'd never want to go SLI but it's actually really useful for mining.
I look at it and it makes me confused.
I looked at Google Home but IDK what I'd actually use it for.
I looked at my friends on Spotify.
I looked at tarriffs and assumed 0% night usage and the Economy 7 Iresa tariff is still cheapest as long as I use more than 1.5kwh annualy.
I looked at that flat today, it is so nice!
I looked at the breakdown and it was £28 for communal cleaning wtf.
I looked for that message but none of my contacts have updated WhatsApp yet.
I looked under my bed.
I look so shit on this team skills matrix.
I loosoned it up quite a lot.
I lost £200 worth of bitcoin FML.
I lost about £200.
I lost a lot of time trying to get the job I had an interview for last week, and now I wish I didn't bother.
I lost a lot of time trying to get the job I had an interview for last week, and now I wish I didn't other.
I lost like 70% of my qualifying spins, still >£100 up lmao.
I lost my benefits because the bus company fucked up.
I lost my Coral accumulator but got the acca insurance for it.
I love £££.
I love a big drag of the finest kush every once in a while.
I love Asians.
I love being paid to heat my home.
I love buffets.
I love docks.
I LOVE DOMINOS.
I love Firefox Quantum.
I love flexing in the mirror right after a workout; makes me look ripped as fuck..
I love food.
I love free money.
I love having money.
I love her.
I love how Amazon said they had "minor cosmetic wear" but they seem good as new lmao.
I love how badly you try to justify it.
I love how Beats headphones are called beats even though they don't beat other headphone manufacturers and only get beaten.
I love how evil women are taking over Western politics. Hillary Clinton, Teresa May, Angela Eagle lmao.
I love how "get on with it" has become a catchphrase.
I love how he wants to set a new price by himself two weeks later and after I deliver my part.
I love how I bet £100 before I find out the promotion has ended.
I love how I can pay rent, service charges, mortgage, energy and water bills for less than my mother is charging me for a room in her house.
I love how it's all about protecting the children.
I love how it's an alternative to going to prison.
I love how my M50X folds up, it's so cool.
I love how my mum has no hobbies and gets wasted every evening but still calls me a loser for playing video games.
I love how suddenly he's so concerned with privacy.
I love how the IT team is currently having a discussion behind me about how some people are shirking and not resolving enough helpdesk tickets.
I love how the National Crime Records Bureau records that.
I love how there's lots of great options for Linux!
I love how the symbols for TOXIC and VERY TOXIC are identical.
I love how the two choices to be USA president 2016 are a racist bigot and a criminal lmao.
I love how they all assume eating meat is "wrong" and I go in there and say "morality is subjective" and get hit by a torrent of downvotes.
I love how USA gets the choice of of just two shitheads.
I love how with the G403 you can map all the buttons and change all the LED settings and DPI and everything, and it'll store on the mouse itself so it'll work on any PC you plug it into.
I love how you eat healthy.
I love how you have really similar but shitty versions of my headphones.
I love how you think everyone is mouthbreathers.
I love how you try and justify your racism lmao.
I love it.
I love it when my PC boots up before I turn on the monitors.
I love it when someone admits they're wrong.
I love looking in the mirror after a workout; I always look ripped ass fuck.
I love MMOs where trading uses commodities because the main currency is not valuable enough.
I love money.
I love mukbang.
I love my AKG K702s.
I love my German headphones.
I love my GTX 1080 TI now I've got my custom cooler on it though.
I love my office gym, I'd hate to lose it if I get another job.
I love my X2s, I wish my wife was out of the house more often so I could use them more.
I love openmailbox, it's so much better than gmail and hotmail.
I love Quake.
I love Stremio and Spotify now.
I love Stremio with the RARBG addon.
I love taking my 1 litre energy drinks to meetings.
I love the Dota short film contest because the prize money incentivises many high production value videos.
I love the feel of the G403 clicks, it's like going from a membrane keyboard to a mechanical.
I love the free money.
I love them.
I love these frequent payments of 0.1 garlic to my wallet.
I love these headphones.
I love the stock pads.
I love the student discount, I just have to show them my student ID in the store.
I love the sweet taste and cool refreshment.
I love this config.
I love watching really pretty Korean girls eating food.
I'm 24.
I'm 24 and I think it might be a better investment if I get a gf 10 years younger.
I'm 25 and still get all the student discounts.
I'm 3k.
I'm 5k.
I'm 5k in Dota, 3k in OW and 4k in CS:GO.
I'm 5k mmr in Dota so you're all scrubs to me.
I'm 76kg I weighed myself a couple of days ago.
I'm 90% certain I'm making more mining income than you.
I'm 90% sure I did it right.
I'm abandoning garlic.
I'm a big fan of SFF builds.
I'm a bit lazy to change my email address on every website I have an account for.
I'm a bit scared about withdrawing from Coral.
I'm a bit worried, I keep depositing to ComeOn because they keep asking me to in order to get my free bets.
I'm a bit worried I'll accidentally hit it again after a couple of big purchases.
I'm a bit worried that every season of Robot Wars the robots will continue to evolve and eventually they'll become the ultimate killing machines.
I'm about to sell 51 GRLC on Trade Satoshi.
I'm about to spend most of it.
I'm actually 5k mmr.
I'm actually earning more outside of work than I am in work.
I'm actually jealous.
I'm actually mining for heat, the coins are just a bonus.
I'm actually pretty surprised I haven't been fired yet.
I'm actually quite impressed with the COPs, they aren't as bad as people said they are.
I'm actually thinking of upgrading to a build with RAID0 M.2 SSDs.
I'm actually very tempted to just quit my job and not work any more.
I'm addicted to kpop and esports.
I made £120 guaranteed profit.
I made £141.50 in like 10 minutes on Sunday night.
I made ~£36 profit + upcoming >=5 free spins on a slot machine last night on Betfair.
I made $66 selling garlic today.
I made £700 last month.
I made £700 this month from betting.
I made 9001% on an investment on a CS:GO skin.
I made a £18.30 loss yesterday....
I made a £24.12 loss on the 14th of June.
I made about 100 bets yesterday.
I made an offer for a flat.
I made an offer on a flat this morning.
I made it up.
I made like £30 profit.
I made my own packed lunch this morning!
I made over £100 from a 20p spin on a slot masheen.
I made over £100 profit on a slot masheen last night.
I made over £7k gambling profit.
I made sure to get a motherboard that supports m.2 drives so that I can downsize to a 4L case in the future if I want.
I made that mistake back when I opened it.
I'm adhering to their T&C.
I'm a fan of high resolution textures.
Imagine buying one of those every day and eating it all.
Imagine doing spreadsheets on an IMAX sized screen omfg.
IMAGINED PEOPLE DONT EXIST OMG.
Imagine if I brought in MX Blues lmao.
Imagine if MS Windoze never had a monopoly.
Imagine if the game wasn't in alpha and didn't have a £30 price tag.
Imagine if you had something pushing against you constantly.
imagine spreadsheets on a 300" IMAX sized 21:9 screen.
Imagine the bass response of your DT770s but with the soundstage and detail of your HD6XX.
Imagine the reduction in crime rates, increased tax revenue, and decrease in illness and deaths.
Imagine your GPU and my CPU combined.
I'm ahead of you then.
I mainly just care about the money though.
I mainly just check specific subreddits nowadays.
I mainly just stream video now, so I don't need a large drive to store it.
I mainly just use Waze and WhatsApp.
I mainly just wanted a delidded one because the 7700K stock TIM is awful.
I make £600 a month.
I make a lot with my 7700K, 1080 TI and 970 too.
I make an assessment of how much time/effort each offer will require.
I make around £1,000 a month gambling.
I make my own ice.
I make over 8% AER every day.
I'm allergic to constant radiation too.
I'm almost at 27k cash now.
I'm a lot richer than I was a year ago.
I'm also a bit worried about taxes though.
I'm also being pressured to get married because my brother and sister are getting married.
I'm also selling my Beyer DT770 80ohms which are an amazing pairing with my Fiio E10K.
I'm also speaking to a mortgage advisor on Wednesday.
I'm also wondering, would 1000hz and 1000FPS get rid of tearing entirely?
I'm also worried that Mars missions will be a failure and it'll prevent future missions.
I'm always checking it in case a cheap GTX 1080 or i7 6700k comes up.
I'm always considering building a multi-GPU mining rig, but the up-front capital is just so expensive and it's a bit risky.
I'm always going to contact both the retailer and the manufacturer from now on. One of them always has better service than the other.
I'm always in favour of a little bit of initial setup with long-term payoffs.
I'm always so fucking thirsty.
I'm always thinking about Dota too.
I'm a Master Guardian Elite, so I'm pretty fucking socially-able, thank you very much m9.
I'm a miner, not a speculator.
I managed to accumulate over £2k balance on smarkets.
I'm an esports athlete m9.
I'm a Nicehack man now.
I'm applying for that.
I'm applying for Universal Credit today.
I married my wife so she can cook and clean for me, I'm not too bothered about sex really.
I'm assuming 15 GRLC per day at 0.09 and I have more hashing power than you.
I'm assuming 4%.
I'm at 1.34/day.
I'm at 745.
I'm at 75.6kg, but I still need to lose some fat and build some muscle.
I'm at a big company.
I'm at about £8.50.
I'm at a good weight right now, I just need to lose a little fat and gain a little muscle.
I'm a terrible player, but at least I'm not limited by a shitty mouse.
I'm at work.
I'm at work....
I'm at work still, so I haven't tested it properly yet.
I'm at work to work not to discuss politics ffs.
I may end up just subscribing to PIA.
I'm back.
I'm back on Equihash.
I'm basically a full time call center / tech support person even though my line managers think it's only a small thing I should be doing as part of my 'main job'.
I'm being asked to get rid of the green triangles.
I'm being given way more work than anyone else in the team.
I'm being interviewed for a better job for 24k tomorrow....
I'm being serious ffs.
I'm betting the minimum necessary, do you think that's a mistake?
I'm blacklisted from a couple of bookies.
I'm bored and unhappy with my job now, should I quit it?
I'm buying a flat but it's taking so long.
I'm buying lots of LTC.
I'm calculating I'm earning 9.79% interest on my savings ATM.
I'm calling Diamond.
I'm chasing framerate.
I'm checking to see that my Co-Op and Halifax bonuses are being paid.
I'm claiming all my cashback and all the cash I can ready for this flat purchase.
I'm collecting chicken stamps.
I'm completing on Friday.
I'm confused.
I'm confused, Betway just sent me a promotion by email.
I'm confused now.
I'm confused what you're talking about now.
I'm CPU benchmarking but I CBA to shut down other programs.
I'm creating an ebay listing for my DT770s.
I'm currently predicting it at $22,643,767.
I'm deaf and have tinnitus now just because people come into the office when they are ill.
I'm deaf in one ear now.
I'm definitely applying for that M&S card.
I'm definitely not. Almost anything is safer than alcohol, so it's not really anything to brag about. Cannabis isn't safer than kpop..
I'm definitely not ready to be a father.
I'm depositing £5 extra.
I'm doing Dr Pepper right now.
I'm doing the 5X5 in-play ladbrokes offer.
I'm doing the M&S one now.
I'm done with games which are designed around grinding.
I'm Dota and CS:GO and Overwatch addict.
I'm downloading Crysis to see if my PC can run it.
I'm dreading a letter from the government telling me I need to repay my benefits.
I'm driving them from my HTC One M9 right now.
I mean.
I mean 10 years younger than my gf, not me.
I mean 888poker.
I mean a douche.
I mean casual CS:GO.
I mean core gamers.
I mean I can liquidate stuff easily.
I mean if I download the torrent using Stremio on my PC and then stream to Chromecast or something.
I mean if it wasn't FPTP too ofc.
I mean if I work from home.
I mean if you go into a brothel and pay them for a service, then they've got to fulfil their part.
I mean if you have the choice to either put funds in a lifetime ISA or your company pension, your company pension is a better option.
I mean if you're assuming you're investing for the long-run then ofc you're gonna make a return.
I mean I guess there's worse things they can get to on the drives if they're compromised.
I mean, I need details of the products themselves.
I mean intense exercise.
I mean I technically could buy it, but then I wouldn't have £700 earning 6% any more.
I mean it was a few seasons ago.
I mean I wouldn't rm -rf / or anything retarded like thaty.
I mean my gf is older than me, she's 31 this year.
I mean of tournaments.
I mean on consumer machines.
I mean the headband does.
I meant I won thrice when statically I should have only one once, thereby defying odds and getting lucky.
I meant later.
I meant shallow then.
I mean, who is the target market for a device like that?
I mean will it get me fired and arrested and fined and possibly jailed?
I mean without losing my job.
I'm earning 3.5% on my H2B ISA atm.
I'm earning more than HansProleman.
I measured my flat ambient at 26.7C.
I measured my rig at around 250 watts.
I'm eating LoL crisps.
I'm eating so much advent calendar chocolate today omg.
I meet a lot of Chinese girls on weechat.
I meet a lot of cute Chinese grills on Weechat.
I meet lots of cute Chinese girls on weechat.
I meet so many azn grills on weechat.
I'm effectively changing 3 cables for just one! It'll make cable management wayyyyyyyyyy easier.
I'm either gonna sell my DT770s for £46 or for £75+.
I'm envious of people who never went to uni and just got housing benefit at 18.
I met a man who worked at Sainsbury's who had a mortgage wtf.
I met her on the internet.
I met mine on okc too.
I met my gf from the internet.
I met my gf on okcupid.
I met the new starter.
I'm expecting a 5.85% return after fees.
I'm expecting a letter from Customs....
I'm fairly certain my 7700K is overkill for my GTX 970 and I can't afford to upgrade it.....
I'm faster than most others Bulwark.
I'm filling up my credit cards and my current account balance isn't growing at all.
I'm finding my DT770s headband adjustment is not a tactile click.
I'm fine with 2GB.
I'm forced to take all my holiday days before June :(.
I'm freezing my balls off every day m9.
I'm from EU West m9.
I'm Fulla Schitt.
I'm generally more interested in audio quality than value-added-features.
I'm generally put off by sponsored products though.
I'm getting 10.7% atm.
I'm getting 150+ now.
I'm getting 1MH/s.
I'm getting 21MH/s.
I'm getting 670 here.
I'm getting 6% from my savings account.
I'm getting 800 sols in Equihash and 90 in Nist5.
I'm getting a big shipment of Biltong from my co-worker soon!
I'm getting a house when my parents die and probably another 1-2 houses when my parents die.
I'm getting as good as I can get whilst keeping it 100% liquid.
I'm getting asked for ID a lot less than when I was 17 though.
I'm getting bored of being called an anime weeb.
I'm getting cold in my flat.
I'm getting confused.
I'm getting Fidelio X2.
I'm getting fucked, but rory and Iota are doing okay.
I'm getting lots of arbing alerts but I can't respond because I'm at work :(.
I'm getting mine tonight.
I'm getting more and more pissed off with Spotify.
I'm getting my power meter tomorrow.
I'm getting over £200 cashback IIRC.
I'm getting quotes for about £35 for the part.
I'm getting so sweaty playing video games now.
I'm getting tested for diabetes next week.
I'm ginger?
I'm glad I don't live in Rhodesia.
I'm glad I opted for the 600W PSU instead of the 450.
I'm glad I spent $225 on the Ncase M1 before the referendum.
I'm glad it's confirmed now, because it'll probably be paid fairly soon like the 888casino was.
I'm glad my manager is super chill and doesn't give a fuck about my hours.
I'm glad she's gone though, she was so obnoxious.
I'm going back to xmrig.
I'm going home at 14:00.
I'm going there tomorrow and was wondering if you wanted to smoke a doobie or something.
I'm going to Asia before you.
I'm going to ask my manager to give me desk display arms, so I can move my displays around, save space on the desk, and rotate them when I need to. My request will probably get denied, because they don't want to spend money on basic IT equipment :(.
I'm going to auto convert all coins to LTC now.
I'm going to auto exchange for Litecoin I think.
I'm going to be careful with my Bet365 account now.
I'm going to be perpetually in debt my entire life at this rate.
I'm going to be so fucking rich in September.
I'm going to be so rich.
I'm going to be so screwed if they announce me as the winner today.
I'm going to be working full-time, matched betting, AND working another job.
I'm going to build my new headset on Thursday!
I'm going to build some mining rigs that will make me more money than you earn.
I'm going to buy a 240hz monitor.
I'm going to buy a 240hz monitor soon.
I'm going to buy a GTX 1080TI.
I'm going to buy a sweet GTX 1080TI.
I'm going to buy ATH-M50X and perform a couple of mods on them.
I'm going to buy it so I can stream torrents to my TV.
I'm going to buy one.
I'm going to buy the Mei one if I don't find it.
I'm going to call them today and see if I can get my 0% promotional rate back.
I'm going to cash out to Coinbase automatically.
I'm going to check with Shure whether my SE215s are real and not fake.
I'm going to create a macro to type bang for me.
I'm going to create two MPM scripts. One for laggy and one for non-laggy.
I'm going to do the same when I go to Seoul.
I'm going to downsize it all to my phone one day.
I'm going to end up earning 10% AER on it or something.
I'm going to get 12 GPUs delivered to my mum's house and she'll probably end up taking them to the dump to make more space for IKEA furniture or some shit.
I'm going to get a 240hz monitor soon.
I'm going to get a cheap space heater for sure.
I'm going to get a disciplinary for costing the company £100 or somehting which is way above my printing quota.
I'm going to get a free space heater for sure.
I'm going to get a new mouse within a year I think.
I'm going to get a TV but just stream torrents on it.
I'm going to get some legally prescribed drugs today called antibiotics.
I'm going to get some really fast RAM because for some reason Overwatch is the only game in the world that needs really fast RAM.
I'm going to get some work done first.
I'm going to go home after the gym.
I'm going to go to the gym today for the first time in about a month.
I'm going to have to take it apart and reinstall it.
I'm going to hell?
I'm going to Ibiza that day.
I'm going to inherit my grandparents' house.
I'm going to just buy headphones with removeable cables from now on I think.
I'm going to keep my monitors until the latency comes right down though.
I'm going to keep using mine until it stops working, then ask one of my Phillippines friends to pay for my Spotify for me.
I'm going to Korea soon, are you?
I'm going to leave my V-Moda Boompro cable permanently connected and just plug different headphones into the cable.
I'm going to lunch now.
I'm going to mine so much ethereum this winter for free heating.
I'm going to need to order some more soon; you just robbed me of £10.
I'm going to OC my CPU so hard.
I'm going to play PUBG with HansProleman_.
I'm going to plug it into my TV and watch stuff on it.
I'm going to put a 240mm rad inside it because I really need the CPU performance ATM.
I'm going to save up for a year or two and get a Skylake 6700K and GTX980TI.
I'm going to see all the sexy Koreans.
I'm going to see money advice people on Thursday.
I'm going to sell all my shit I make from the quests and use it to buy some games on Steam.
I'm going to Seoul.
I'm going to slap a massive heatsink on my GTX 1080Ti when I get it.
I'm going to start IRCing from my mining rig.
I'm going to start mining.
I'm going to stop buying headphones now.
I'm going to stop buying random shit I don't need now.
I'm going to stop working next week.
I'm going to take some days off to farm all the new OW event skins.
I'm going to take the capsule apart, dissolve the powder into some water, then drink the nasty shit.
I'm going to tell Game that they need to compensate me for the days I've taken off work to play the game.
I'm going to tell Game that they're stupid retarded cunts and that I'll be buying from G2A from now on.
I'm going to the gym now, let me know when I get back.
I'm going to try a different miner.
I'm going to try mining LUX.
I'm going to try MultiPoolMiner.
I'm going to try putting my antibiotics in fruit juice.
I'm going to try them with the stock pads before deciding whether to keep them or not, so I won't be able to tell you my initial impressions of them with the DT770 pads, even though I intend to buy them.
I'm going to try to get another 0% credit card soon. My Sainsburys one is only for about another 12 months and only has a £1,600 limit.
I'm going to try to return my GTX 970.
I'm going to upgrade to 240hz next year.
I'm going to use my DT770s for the conference call this morning instead of the shitty headset they gave me.
I'm going to use photoshop to uncensor your image and dox you.
I'm going to use this power meter to prove to my gf that she doesn't have to switch off all the sockets all the fucking time.
I'm going to visit my Korean gf today :).
I'm going to visit my Korean gf tomorrow.
I'm going to wait for 2nd gen. Reviews of 1st gen say it's way too laggy for serious gaming.
I'm going to wait for NiceHash and Overwatch to get ported.
I'm going to wait for Samsung S8 so I can get USB-C.
I'm going to wait until I have at least £80 before I withdraw to minimise fees withdrawing from my NiceHash wallet.
I'm going to wait until the last day and buy them all at once, so I don't drop duplicates.
I'm going to watch that film soon too.
I'm going to WFH now I think.
I'm going to withdraw some money from my bookies, I don't feel comfortable having this little cash.
I'm going to work a 3 day week for the next 3 weeks.
I'm going to work long hours Monday to Friday then she's going to be desperate for my attention when I get home when she's done nothing all day.
I'm going to work out how much I need to withdraw, and then check which bookies have a high balance and low profit. I'll then find out how much I've wagered before on them and try to withdraw everything but leave enough for two bets. I'll then try to withdraw enough to buy my house without harming my bookie accounts' standings.
I'm going with Vodafone.
I'm gold nova elite.
I'm gonna add that to my Amazon wishlist.
I'm gonna be fully kitted out for working from home tomorrow.
I'm gonna delay selling my DT770s for a while and make sure the COPs are for me.
I'm gonna do a BACS payout for £126.
I'm gonna do some lifting I think#.
I'm gonna get an odac or schitt stack too eventually.
I'm gonna get dat Barclaycard.
I'm gonna get some too.
I'm gonna have a shitload of cash by December.
I'm gonna look for a few other items to build up some feedback and clear some space in my room.
I'm gonna need to upgrade to a 6700K at some point I think.
I'm gonna skip the firstgen.
I'm gonna skip the first gen.
IM GONNA TELL MY GIRLFRIEND.
I'm gonna wait to see what the system requirements are for Source 2 and Overwatch before doing any upgrades.
I'm happy AMD is doing well ATM.
I'm happy as long as I can stream 1080p video.
I'm happy as long as the phone provides as much amplification as my HTC One M9, and has a great DAC.
I'm happy just to have a roof over my head, electricity, and an internet connection.
I'm happy that my workphone finally has Android now.
I'm happy to save some £££ and just play on low graphics.
I'm happy with $0.993798 which is the coinmarketcap price.
I'm having a hard time because my gf is pushing me to buy a house really soon.
I'm HODLing.
I'm holding down the power button.
I'm holding the cash until GPUs come into stock.
I'm hoping  for some news on Ryzen.
I'm hoping it doesn't go above £24m because I bet on it being between 23-24m.
I'm horribly underpaid too.
I might actually be interested.
I might actually go on holiday one day.
I might actually smoke weed?
I might apply for that.
I might ask if I can borrow some money from her to fund it.
I might ask my dad if I can borrow a couple of hundred pounds.
I might ask my grandparents if I can borrow some money to help me until September.
I might ask my grandparents to lend/give me some money.
I might ask my grandparents to pay for it.
I might ask my parents for a loan.
I might be able to do you a better deal without the PSU. I'm still using this PSU and there isn't any real upgrade to it, so I'm reluctant to sell it for cheap..
I might be able to make lots of hotel bookings too soon.
I might be a landlord soon omfg.
I might be interested in selling it.
I might be interested in that.
I might be selling my GTX 970.
I might book the next 20 Wednesdays off work.
I might build a 4L SFF gaming PC with built-in PSU one day.
I might build a mining rig to hear my house and pay my mortgage.
I might buy a 2 bedroom house next year.
I might buy a GTX 2080 from scan using the mined bitcoins from my 970!
I might buy an m.2 SSD just so I can get rid of all the extra cables from the 2 2.5" drives in my build.
I might buy an Xbox to act as a decoy.
I might buy my 7700K from siliconlottery.com.
I might buy my next CPU from siliconlottery.com.
I might buy one for when I am travelling, but it's hard to justify the cost for a good one when it is so hard to be productive with a single small screen.
I might buy some more.
I might buy the M10 if the DAC is better than the S7's.
I might buy them to replace my M50X which I am really dissatisfied with because of the poor isolation.
I might buy the new Street Fighter.
I might buy the Samsung Galaxy S7 if the DAC is good.
I might check with my ebay buyer that Hermes hasn't fucked it up somehow.
I might create some more S&S ISAs. I think I can still get about £500 more cashback pretty easily.
I might deposit another £50, wager it all, then withdraw.
I might do.
I might do an M50X isolation mod.
I might do, not sure.
I might do RAID0 m.2 SSDs + a 2.5" HDD.
I might download Winminer.
I might dump my gf just because I don't like to wake up early on Sundays.
I might dump some cash on Ratesetter for a bit until GPUs come into stock.
I might end up leaving my DT770 at the office as my office pair though.
I might end up losing a lot of money because they're so shit.
I might end up scaling back my overclock from 5.1GHz to 5GHz.
I might end up using my G403 for 3+ years if nothing else decent comes along.
I might even OC it up to like 190hz.
I might even upgrade to a 200hz monitor later this year/next year.
I might get a cheap S7 then. The S7 is a pretty good phone.
I might get a helmet-arm-type-thingy.
I might get a hybrid card later on, which are a good compromise between reference and aftermarket coolers.
I might get a loan.
I might get a loan to give me some more liquidity.
I might get an S7 instead if the price difference is significant.
I might get an unlimited data SIM at some point.
I might get a Philips Fidelio X2 and a new mouse though.
I might get a second pair of DT770s with a removable cable for home use.
I might get a V-Moda Boompro for work, connect it to my phone, then answer Lync calls on my phone instead of using the fucking shitty headset that I get provided at work.
I might get away with claiming my headphones are accessories of my PC instead of my PC.
I might get away with claiming my headphones are accessories of my TV instead of my TV.
I might get it anyway and eat my colleagues' leftovers too as a possible bonus.
I might get my eyes tested too.
I might get my phone taken off me.
I might get some ML120s because they're really quiet fans.
I might get some more portable cans.
I might get the HTC M10 if it has a great DAC, camera, capacitive buttons, and batery life.
I might get the Korean G6 when I go over there, or the V30.
I might get YNAB.
I might give dumbell squats a try.
I might give it to my brother for Christmas if I haven't broken it.
I might go home early to watch it.
I might go there this weekend.
I might go to China.
I might go to Thorpe Park one day.
I might have all the parts tomorrow, so I can swap them with the parts in my PC and build yours.
I might have missed some good shit :(.
I might have to borrow from myself at like 5% :(.
I might have to hang up and go do things I need to do.
I might HODL some of it.
I might hold off buying the 1080 and wait for Polaris and 1080TI.
I might, I need to order some more protein powder soon.
I might install a Windows 10 virtual machine inside Ubuntu to play certain games.
I might just be getting unlucky with some bad batches.
I might just borrow a couple of grand from my rich stepdad.
I might just build a dedicated mining rig one day.
I might just buy a bigger house.
I might just buy all my groceries from LIDL.
I might just buy one 100% then.
I might just do some work today instead.
I might just hold onto my HTC One M9 until the S7 and S8 are cheaper.
I might just leave it and wait until the next flat if I can't afford to compete with the other bidders.
I might just pirate 2016.
I might just quit my job and become a full-time gambler.
I might just randomly generate one in Lastpass and take my phone out to look at it.
I might just retire.
I might just spend it on a new gaming PC instead.
I might just stick with GRLC.
I might just stick with Unity.
I might just tell her I'm not visiting her any more.
I might just use Lastpass for my work Windoze password.
I might just use up the training budget then apply for another job.
I might just wait for the next generation.
I might keep buying different beyers, switching the pads, then selling them for profit.
I might leave some protein at work and some at home so I don't have to transport it every day.
I might look at the new account offers and do some more.
I might look into the Lifetime S&S ISA when I'm in my 40s and want to do a quick boost to my pension.
I might lose money on crypto mining.
I might make a manual claim next week.
I might mine LUXCoin.
I might need more cash.
I might need to buy a bigger house.
I might need to open a new bank account.
I might need to open a new bank account to store all my extra money soon.
I might not be able to buy this flat :(.
I might not be able to get the Ladbrokes new customer offer because I did the cashback on topcashback....
I might not even buy any for quite some time.
I might not ever paid it back entirely.
I might owe tax.
I might plug it in and see what it sounds like now.
I might put some into stocks. I've been advised not to do it for under 5 years, but if I have enough different high-risk asset classes it might be okay even in the short-run.
I might relocate to Seoul.
I might return them after I've used them hahahahaha.
I might sell it and buy a 1TB m.2 drive.
I might sell my 970 to my friend when Pascall is released later this year.
I might sell my DT770s now.
I might sell my Fiio E10K if I can't get the ground loop problem solved.
I might sell my GTX 970 to a miner and buy a 1080TI.
I might sell my M50X too.
I might sell my M50X too.
I might sell my M50X too if you're interested?
I might sell my M50X too, since they aren't quite up to the spec I wanted them to be.
I might start answering the phone more now that I know who is calling me.
I might start doing adderall.
I might start drinking energy drinks again.
I might start mining it again.
I might start trading later. I don't have the capital to start doing that right now.
I might start using my IEMs more since my M50X's isolation is so terrible..
I might start using Protonmail.
I might start using them then.
I might start working from home soon.
I might stop mining garlic today.
I might stop working from home, they're such a pain about it.
I might switch to LUX.
I might switch to mining Raven Coin anyway.
I might switch to M&S bank account tonight.
I might switch to using a secure passphrase and use a fingerprint to unlock my phone instead.
I might take a random week out in November or February or something.
I might take a Wednesday and go to Thorpe Park.
I might treat myself to a Kronenburg tonight.
I might try out NiceHash when my fibre comes back online.
I might unadopt the SD card on my HTC One M9. My phone feels a bit sluggish for some reason.....
I might unfriend him.
I might unsubscribe to omgubuntu.
I might upgrade my case and CPU cooler so I can OC my CPU and get more FPS.
I might upgrade to a 200hz monitor later this year.
I might use Paypal to buy an Ncase M1 at some point.
I might use that last image as my Steam avatar.
I might vote remain because I don't want emigration to go down.
I might vote remain because I don't want emmigration to go down.
I might want a better exchange rate than that, gotta get some work done then figure out what I'm willing to accept.
I might watch Marco Polo instead.
I might withdraw another 1k.
I might withdraw from some of my bookies with big balances.
I'm in a t-shirt.
I'm in favour of that.
I'm in the office today.
I'm intrigued.
I'm in trouble.
I misread it as "might put that in my ass".
I missed it at first too.
I miss it, it kept my GPU so cool and quiet.
I miss my 3.5% Halifax Help to Buy ISA.
I miss my First Direct and TSB regular savers.
I miss NiceHash.
I miss /r/fatpeoplehate.
I'm just a bit concerned about my decreasing bankroll.
I'm just going to end up exchanging the LTC for fiat anyway.
I'm just going to have this H105 sitting on my desk for 2-3 weeks now....
I'm just going to have to clean up after them once a week....
I'm just going to keep diversifying and improving my income until I'm sure I can survive on my own.
I'm just going to mine on Nicehack for now.
i'm just gonna work until 26 jan ughhh.
I'm just hanging around reading shitty reddit posts.
I'm just ignoring it all because I want my cashback.
I'm just investing gambling profits.
I'm just missing Roadhog, Zenyetta, Ana, Bastion and Pharah.
I'm just not a professional.
I'm just not interested in on-ears.
I'm just playing Dota and CS:GO atm.
I'm just stupid.
I'm just using my student email address.
I'm just waiting for the Samsung Galaxy S8 to come down in price or for a better phone to be released.
I'm just waiting until I can get some GPUs.
I'm just withdrawing it from MPH now.
I'm just wondering if a city car could work if you swap the batteries instead of relying on the engine charging it.
I'm just wondering what a 220kg girl looks like.
I’m just worried I’ll get hurt.
I'm just worried this will look bad during my mortgage application.
I'm keeping an eye on it.
I'm keeping an eye on Sennheiser's new portable cans.
I'm kinda lazy though.
I'm kinda skint too.
I'm leaning towards Stremio because I'm familiar with it.
I'm leaving £50 in these bookies.
I'm leaving my job.
I'm leaving the UK to go to asia too.
I'm leaving tonight.
I'm limited to depositing £200 a month.
I'm liquidating my Nutmeg account at the moment. I'm going to have like £21.5k cash soon.
I'm literally never getting HD800.
I'm literally never going to pay First Direct back.
I'm looking at 110k-120k properties with a 12k deposit atm.
I'm looking at a minimum of a 1070.
I'm looking at CIEMs too..
I'm looking at getting some Beyer Custom Studios.
I'm looking at IE80.
I'm looking at the Samsung S7 Exygonos because my HTC One M9 got fucked up by water.
I'm looking at the temp graph and it slowly climbs up, then plateaus, then goes down.
I'm looking at the Zowie ZA11, Zowie EC1A and the Finalmouse Scream One atm.
I'm looking forward to the drama.
I'm looking forward to the dramqa.
I'm looking into this too.
I'm looking to buy in UK.
I'm losing faith in Unity and I think I might embrace MATE or Gnome or KDE.
I'm losing interest.
I'm losing profit, that's the same as losing money.
I'm low on £££.
I'm mainly doing cryptonight and equihash.
I'm making >5% interest on £10,000 atm.
I'm making a lot from arbing PP.
I'm making like 200 garlics a day.
I'm making more from my LTC growth than actual mining.
I'm making more money from betting than I'm being paid at work.
I'm making more than I was with NiceHash.
I'm making over 100 a day atm.
I'm making over 8% just with savings accounts.
I'm master now btw.
I'm mining more coins than you for some reason?
I'm mining on winminer now.
I'm mining some ATM.
I'm mining to it but IDK what the password is.
I'm mining zcoin instead of monero now.
I'm mining zcoin on my CPU again.
I'm more bothered about my Philips Fidelio X2 because I need it right now.
I'm more interested about a permanent base than just stepping foot anyway.
I'm more interested in a 4C/8T version than 8C/16T.
I'm more interested in GPU performance than RAM.
I'm more interested in passing my probation than getting a promotion right now.
I'm more interested in the virtual desktop mode because it works for everything.
Immortals III and Slitbreaker Act 2 still to come.
I'm mostly just living at home for the free laundry atm.
I'm mostly just using it to monitor my savings progress spread across many accounts.
I'm moving into my own flat soon.
I'm naked.
I'm near my endgame already I think.
I'm never going to get it at this rate.
I'm never too bothered by headphones having too much of something, it's what they lack that bothers me.
I'm never using Hermes again.
I'M NEVER USING THESE STUPID INCOMPOTENT TWATS AGAIN OMFG.
I'm no facebooktard.
I'm not a fan of ANC, CBA with the inferior sound quality and batteries.
I'm not afraid of losing my job any more, because it's less than half my income.
I'm not allowed to apply conditional formatting in case anything ever gets changed to the wrong colour by mistake.....
I'm not allowed to cheat on my gf anyway.
I'm not allowed to install software on my work PC.
I'm not always going to be sitting right in front of the speakers.
I'm not a NEET like you.
I'm not an idiot.
I'm not an OW shill.
I'm not a racist like you because my gf is another race.
I'm not at work today.
I'm not a weeb.
I'm not because I'm not a criminal like you.
I'm not bothered, I have a VPN.
I'm not clicking on that.
I'm not even going to bother with bookmarks any more.
I'm not even going to try this season.
I'm not even involved with the catering, I just offered to help slightly with cleaning up after the lunch break.
I'm not even paying off the interest.
I'm not even paying rent atm.
I'm not even registered on the forum.
im not gay omg.
I'm not going.
I'm not going all out, I'm just spending more on the parts that matter.
I'm not going all the way to Brighton just for that.
I'm not going to achieve my goal.
I'm not going to buy ANYTHING from now on.
I'm not going to click on that.
I'm not going to get them, but I've seen the Fidelio.
I'm not going to mention the £12.50 they gave me. If they're giving me free bets by mistake I'm going to milk that.
I'm not going to mine it until I need more heat in my flat.
I'm not going to take him to small claims court or anything, just telling him he's being a dick and wouldn't get away with it if it was a larger amount.
I'm not going to withdraw until I have >£100 LTC.
I'm not gonna spend it all, because I'm saving for a house or something.
I'm not gubbed from Bet 365 like you are haha.
I'm not in charge of development of Overwatch.
I'm not interested in HODLing garlic.
I'm not interested in playing the lottery game.
I'm not into Mid-Fi than Summit-Fi.
I'm not into skinny white dudes lmfao.
I'm not into windowed cases.
I'm not laughing.
I'm not normally even awake at this time.
I'm not omg.
I'm not paid enough for that, if they aren't happy they'll just sack me and replace me with another minimum wage worker.
I'm not profit switching to it, so I'm not losing the benefit of spikes in price.
I'm not really bothered about the money, I'm pissed off that he's calling me a greedy jew.
I'm not rich like you.
I'm not satisfied with my Shure SE215s because they sound way too muddy and undetailed and get uncomfy after a while. I looked at Etymotic ER4P but read that they sound great but can be really uncomfy. I'm now looking at CIEMs specifically Custom Art Music Ones. Should I buy CIEMs? I want comfort, sound quality and isolation.
I'm not satisfied with my Shure SE215s because they sway too muddy and undetailed and get uncomfy after a while. I looked at Etymotic ER4P but read that they sound great but can be really uncomfy. I'm now looking at CIEMs specifically Custom Art Music Ones. Should I buy CIEMs? I want comfort, sound quality and isolation.
I'm not stalking you.
I'm not stupid enough to sell when the price is up.
I'm not sure.
I'm not sure everything in that article is true.
I'm not sure how I want to factor in deposit bonuses and free bet retention.
I'm not sure if flat panels have caught up with input lag of CRTs yet even.
I'm not sure if I can post it until Monday. I am at work today and tomorrow, then I'm with my gf over the weekend. I took the day off on Monday so I can go to the Post Office..
I'm not sure if I'll use gsync.
I'm not sure if I really need a YT account.
I'm not sure if it's going to be better than a SIPP?
I'm not sure if smart TVs are a good idea, you can't upgrade/modify it like you can with a standard TV with USB ports.
I'm not sure what I'll do then.
I'm not sure what it would be used for, I think it's probably quite niche.
I'm not sure what's the point of optical.
I'm not too bothered though, I don't do video editing and cinebench on my phone.
I'm not too familiar with all the old motherboard names.
I'm not tracking everything.
I'm not using any of my annual leave, but I still get 10 consecutive days.
I'm not worried about it.
I modded them.
I'm on £0 a month atm.
I'm on £19k.
I'm on a boat.
I'm on about 50 sites right now.
I'm on a low sugar diet now.
I'm on a similar amount, but less than half of it is from my salary.
I'm one man working with like 10 girls.
I'm on episode 9, wtf did you get me into.
im on hold.
I'm only getting like 7MB/s.
I'm only going to be in London tomorrow.
I'm only hearing one side of the story.
I'm only really interested in the very low end and very high end though.
I'm on minimum wage at the bottom of the organisational heirarchy, so I get no say over whether or not I can do it.
I'm on /r/pizzagate and I still can't figure out what this is about.
I'm on season 10 atm.
I'm on work internet, it's shit.
I mostly don't do drugs because I'm trying to save money and look after my health.
I mostly just do the easy ones.
I mostly just drive to work too.
I mostly just IRC when I'm bored at work.
I mostly just talk to my manager about gym stuff and headphones.
I mostly just use my HTC phone's built in DAC for portable listening.
I mostly mine at night on E7 electricity.
I mostly use my own gear for work now lmao.
I moved furniture for my grandparents.
I'm overextending a bit.
I'm owed so much now.
I'm packing as much performance as I can into this tiny little case.
I'm paraphrasing very badly.
I'm paying £420.
I'm paying £5 a month for 500MB atm and I just about have enough.
I'm paying like £1k in bills every month.
I'm paying like $2 a month forever.
I'm paying negative tax this month.
I'm pissed off that I spent £1,000 on my PC and can only run CS:GO at 400FPS.
I'm planning on doing it tonight.
I'm planning to move to Korea.
I'm playing a dangerous game.
I'm poor.
important?
Impossible to optimise, especially if I'll be out of the country for 3 weeks.
Impossible to say because I can't predict currency prices.
impossible to speed up something that doesnt exist.
I'm pretty busy atm, can you research it yourself?
I'm pretty busy in the evening, and the best way to contact me is Steam or Whatsapp or Weechat.
I'm pretty critical of Blizzard in general really. I think they cater to the lowest common denominator.
I'm pretty demotivated for doing work today.
I'm pretty disappointed with my M50X.
I'm pretty good as CS:GO.
I'm pretty good with Ana, Tracer, Pudge, Zarya, Winston, Reaper and Soldier 76.
I'm pretty happy I just have a job ATM.
I'm pretty happy with £100-£200 headphones.
I'm pretty happy with Firefox 55 so far.
I'm pretty happy with my mouse now I think.
I'm pretty in favour of getting rid of tariffs globally. I don't want to pay super marked up prices to import cheap shit.
I'm pretty jealous of your GPU.
I'm pretty much going to be working whenever I'm not sleeping.
I'm pretty pissed by all this men-hating in the media lately.
I'm pretty satisfied with my home connection; it's fast enough to stream HD video.
I'm pretty satisfied with my X2s though.
I'm pretty sure I could hold 5k only playing drunk one game a week.
I'm pretty sure I got banned there.
I'm pretty sure I understand Wikipedia and referencing better than old man steve.
I'm pretty sure my gf loves being protected and provided for. She told me that she doesn't want to work and be my housewife.
I'm pretty sure rory discussed being room mates before.
I'm pretty sure rory's PC is going to be faster.
I'm pretty sure the homicide rate per capita is higher in USA than Swedne.
I'm pretty sure the software is still available and still functions fine.
I'm pretty sure we could store everyone's emails at my company on just one hard drive.
I'm pretty sure you can buy "boosters" for in-game currency. It's the tactic used by p2w developers to make people think they aren't spending real money.
I'm pretty sure you do.
I'm pretty surprised that the racists won actually.
I'm pretty well known on most GRLC channels now.
I'm probably a higher rank in Dota, CS and OW than anyone else here.
I'm probably going to do it next year.
I'm probably going to do this as an auction.
I'm probably going to get some CIEMs and sell my M50X.
I'm probably going to go back to Moneyfarm if I get some more money.
I'm probably going to mod my G403 before deciding whether to buy the wireless one.
I'm probably going to put my GTX 970 on ebay, I still have the original box.
I'm probably going to put my M50X back together and then sell it.
I'm probably going to sell mine and upgrade to Pascal.
I'm probably going to start spending a lot more time on Reddit and talking to people whose names I don't know soon.
I'm probably going to upgrade to a 480hz monitor later this year.
I'm probably going to withdraw most of my Coral balance.
I'm probably not going to sell for less than current buy orders though.
I'm probably okauy.
I'm probably the best at competitive video games out of anyone in this channel.
I'm pushing my hardware to its limits though.
I'm pushing this GPU to the absolute limit and can't get any more out of it.
I'm put off buying any AMPDAC without a mic input.
I'm putting all this money into gambling sites, but I'm buying a house atm.
I'm racking up credit card debt at an alarming rate.
I'm reading Arctic Accellero Xtreme III and Philips Diamondcare instruction manuals.
I'm ready to invest £3k into a mining rig.
I'm ready to take my company on a wild and lucrative hotel-booking ride.
I'm really disappointed with the gaming performance from my 1080 TI.
I'm really enjoying mine.
I'm really enjoying PIA, it gives me peace of mind that the BPI and MFAA and GCHQ and Teresa May aren't all watching everything I'm doing.
I'm really enjoying them now.
I'm really fat, but it's so weird when my colleagues tell me I'm skinny wtf.
I'm really happy I sold my DT770s for these.
I'm really happy with how this mod turned out.
I'm really interested in what is wrong with your Brian which makes you think obesity is an attractive trait.
I'm really not a fan of SLI.
I'm really worried about taking sick leave because I don't want to get in trouble.
I'm reliant on crypto and betting and other shit to get my money.
I'm rich as fuck.
I'm richer than HansProleman but not richer than you.
I'm running +315 core on my GTX 970.
I'm running CryptoNight on my CPU and Equihash on my GPU. I've got algo-switching enabled but it's Equihash most of the time.
I'm running out of accounts to store all my money :(.
I'm running out of cash, my wife has £9k but she doesn't want to share any of it with me.
I'm running out of shit to buy.
I'm saving over £10,000 by staying with my parents.
I'm saving them up for a trip to Korea.
I'm saving up.
I'm saving up for a mining rig.
I'm saving up for my Fidelo X2s, then I'll do a swap with rory's HD600s for a few weeks.
I'm selling a pristine pair of M50X headphones.
I'm selling for BCH on the exchange.
I'm selling for fiat.
I'm selling my GRLC for BCH, then withdrawing to gdax and exchanging for euros and withdrawing to Revolut.
I'm selling on the exchange.
I'm sick of them asking me to reset it constantly.
I'm so confused.
I'm so confused now.
I'm so excited. I'm gonna get a shitload more CPU performance.
I'm so fed up with this ISP, why can't they just give me a usable fucking connection.
I'm so fucked.
I'm so fucking glad I got the Halifax Help to Buy ISA before they halved the interest rate.
I'm so fucking hot.
I'm so fucking hungry.
I'm so glad I didn't take the day off tomorrow.
I'm so glad I ordered the Ncase M1 before the referendum.
I'm so happy I'm not gubbed.
I'm so jealous omg.
I'm so lucky to have such a smoking hot gf.
I'm sometimes looking for a really specific little widget.
I'm so much busier than I was a few years ago.
I'm so pissed.
I'm so pissed because I've been stuck with 5mbps for a month and a half now.
I'm so pissed off.
I'm so ripped now.
I'm so shaky.
I'm so stressed now. I'm buying my first home, applying for a new job, worrying about my grandparents' health, and now my gf is scaring me about pregnancy. As if I don't have enough shit to worry about already!!!!!
I'm so surprised they haven't gubbed me yet.
I'm so surprised they haven't gubbed me yuet.
I'm so tempted to build a mining rig just because I can.
I'm so tilted.
I'm so upset.
I'm stalking him on Reddit.
I'm starting to think that buying my SE215s was a mistake and I could have got something better.
I'm sticking with Nicehack for now.
I'm still calculating GRLC as most profitable.
I'm still learning.
I'm still looking forward to the return of football season though.
I'm still making >$400 a month revenue and >$300 a month profit from mining.
I'm still pissed about it thoguh.
I'm still pissed about that.
I'm still pissed off my friend unfriended me because he wants to save £5 after agreeing 29p a mile with me.
I'm still pissed off with my dumbass friend for calling me a greedy jew for asking him to pay me 1/3 of the £50 we agreed for the 170 mile trip.
I'm still really upset that Amazon cancelled my Fidelio X2s.
I'm still running CryptoNight on the CPU though.
I'm still struggling to find time for both Dota 2 and CS:GO :(.
I'm still waiting on my Nutmeg claim from last year.
I'm still waiting to hear from the police how much they're going to fine me.
I'm struggling to get on with my Shure SE215s, so I might upgrade to much more expensive IEMs for better comfort and sound quality, but I'm worried about wasting more money on a type of headphones I can't get on with.
I'm struggling to remember.
I'm subscribed to nicehash.
I'm supposed to be saving money, but I'm not saving very much living here.
I'm supposed to have paid them £172 but the payment failed.
I'm supposed to swallow it.
I'm sure an ebay GTX 980 will get you a shitload bang for your buck.
I'm sure David Cameron knows that current voting system is unrepresentative.
I'm sure his Beats have lots of bass, but I reckon it's at the loss of soundstage, mids and high detail and comfort.
I'm sure Royal Mail can do it for under £3.
I'm sure this 7700K GTX 1080 you want me to build for you will handle Runescape just fine lmao.
I'm sure you can get it cheaper elsewhere.
I'm surprised I'm not gubbed after arbing their rollover completely.
I'm surprised it's not at least 10X that.
I'm surprised Microsoft hasn't forced an auto update to IE10.
I'm surprised that my employer trains us to do illegal things.
I'm switching from Origin.
I'm switching from Tesco to Co-Op today, I hope Tesco doesn't fuck it up.
I'm switching over to mining LUX.
I'm switching to Vodafone.
I'm taking 28th of October and 31st of October off to make it a 4 day weekend to go to my sister's wedding and see my gf.
I'm taking a small profitability hit for it probably.
I'm taking her to meet my father on the 15th.
I'm taking them to the ombudsman.
I'm talking about consumer choice, not macroeconomics.
I'm talking about consumer gear.
I'm talking about DT770s anyway.
I'm talking about my personal phone.
I'm terrified of using it as a seller.
I'm the #1 rogue in my house.
I'm thinking 40hz-2.5khz.
I'm thinking about adding data validation to this spreadsheet, but I might not because people will just complain because they don't know how to use it.
I'm thinking about applying for a loan to fund my matched betting.
I'm thinking about building a rig with 4 ATI GPUs.
I'm thinking about buying a mini XLR to 3.5mm jack adaptor so I can use the V-Moda Boompro mic.
I'm thinking about buying some budget headphones just to remind myself how good my audiophile phones are.
I'm thinking about getting a Saturday job.
I'm thinking about making an offer on a flat.
I'm thinking about subscribing to PIA.
I'm thinking maybe some CIEMs will solve it.
I'm thinking of applying for a travel credit card so I can get cheap foreign currency.
I'm thinking of building a dedicated multi-GPU mining rig.
I'm thinking of buying an Ncase M1.
I'm thinking of buying Ncase M1 and a Corsair H100.
I'm thinking of buying Philips Fidelio X2.
I'm thinking of buying the Ncase M1, I really need better cooling for my PC.
I'm thinking of holding off buying a GTX 1080TI until after I've bought a house.
I'm thinking of installing Stremio on a Raspberry PI and connecting it to a TV.
I'm thinking of ordering EE broadband.
I'm thinking of selling my GTX 970 to a miner and buying a 1080TI.
I'm thinking of selling my Sound Blaster E5.
I'm thinking of things like dehumidifiers and cryptocurrency mining.
I'm thinking of trying anti-depressants.
I'm thinking of upgrading my Fiio E10K to an AMPDAC with a mic input so I solve the ground loop problem.
I'm thinking of upgrading to a higher data tariff.
I'm thinking of using my Nicehack profits to buy hashing power on Nicehack.
I'm thinking of withdrawing my investment now I've done the minimum 30 days, but I'm worried that'll influence their decision on whether to pay me.
I'm too afraid to take it apart now.
I'm too scared.
I'm trying.
I'm trying for 5.2 but it's so difficult.
I'm trying not to.
I'm trying on these earbuds which came with my Vodafone lmao.
I'm trying out DEs atm.
I'm trying out Gnome Shell right now. The more I use it the more I like it.
I'm trying out mining RVN right now.
I'm trying to buy a house.
I'm trying to claim working tax credits at the moment, but they want me to prove my capital which is such a pain that I just CBA.
I'm trying to figure out which 240mm radiator I will put in my Ncase M1.
I'm trying to find a no-compromise solution.
I'm trying to remember the name of a woman.
I'm trying to return an item on ebay atm.
I'm trying to save up for a house.
I'm trying to undercut the big walls.
I'm tuned in, hopefully it's a success.
I'm unsure whether to keep mining garlic.
I'm up for swapping headphones.
I'm upgrading my Fiio E10K today ^^.
I'm upset that I still don't own a pair of Fidelio X2s :(.
I'm used to really large and comfy velour earpads like on my DT770s and K702s..
I'm using Enhancer for Youtube.
I'm using my old Steelseries mousepad for my work PC.
I'm using NiceHash, so I'm holding my withdrawal to minimise the fees, so I can't prove to her that there's money coming into my bank account.
I'm using Open HW monitor to see whether my CPU usage or GPU usage is causing the bottleneck.
I'm using that with my K702s and M50X.
I'm using the DT770 pads on my Beyer Custom One Pro.
I'm using the same settings as on my phone.
I'm using webchat, so I have no logs sorry.
I'm very critical of the game actually and I think it's very overhyped.
I'm viewing it on Saturday afternoon, so I'll let you know.
I'm waiting for 16.04 to release before installing it.
I'm waiting for GTX 1180.
I'm waiting for reviews.
I'm withdrawing £451 from ComeOn.
I'm withdrawing BCH from Trade Satoshi for basically free.
I'm worried.
I'm worried about HMRC though.
I'm worried about how this'll affect my NiceHash withdrawal fees though.
I'm worried about putting too much into my pension because IDK if I'll live long enough to retire.
I'm worried about the big farms.
I'm worried I'll get a tax bill next month.
I'm worried I'm going to ruin them by wearing them in the summer.
I'm worried I might have diabetes. I'm getting checked next week..
I'm worried I might have underpaid income tax.
I'm worried I will inherit a huge amount from my parents but only when I'm like 65 and by that time I won't need the money anyway.
I'm worried I won't get them before I go to Korea or they'll arrive when I'm not at home.
I'm worried my manager will think I'm lazy for coming in at 09:00 now.
I'm worried neither of those will be an option for me.
I'm worried that in a year or two I'm going to run out of space in my accounts to store my money.
I’m worried that you’ll get tired.
I'm worried they're going to arrive whilst I'm in Korea.
I'm worried this problem is only going to get worse and worse as GPUs keep getting better and CPUs haven't advanced much in like 5 years.
In 16 years time I could be dating a girl the same age as I currently am..
In 5 hours.
In 6 months my First Direct account will expire leaving me with around £3,700 to spend.
in a couple of years.
In a few years I'll probably be using Linux.
In a meeting, talk later.
In a spreadsheet.
inb4 Blizzard shuts it down.
In case bookies steal my money and because I'm losing interest.
In case I need to sell any of my old shit.
In case I want to transport it with me and don't have room for my external AMPDAC.
Incentivising unhealthy lifestyles has a number of health implications including joint problems, cancer, heart disease and diabetes. Racial diversity is not an unhealthy thing to promote..
In China they give money for the new year.
Including bills and shit.
Income inequality is a factor in that.
Income inequality is a really serious problem in USA.
Income tax.
Incoming her for bills seems a bit silly.
Increased by about 20%?
Increased tax for the poor, less public spending.
increase power by 1%.
Increase the power limit.
Increasing the limit worsens the experience?
Incredibly.
India has more people than Sweden, does that make it a better country?
In Dota 2 and OW I only get about 200.
In Dota, everyone gets it for free.
In Dota, it's the other way around.
I need $$$.
I need £££.
I need £110,000 to £125,000 for a 1-2 bedroom house.
I need a >100% efficient space heater.
I need a 1080TI.
I need a 5.1GHz i7 ffs.
I need a big bar with lots of weight.
I need advice, I'm not ready to be a father.
I need a free bar to do squats.
I need a funnel or something.
I need a good accumulator offer on Bet365 I think.
I need a GTX 1080TI.
I need a GTX 1080TI.....
I need a GTX 1080TI ffs.
I need a half-year loan I think.
I need a headphone jack because I use headphones ffs.
I need a heavily overclocked 7700K.
I need all the major credit agencies to be sure it's all right.
I need all the money I can get.
I need a longer ethernet cable though.
I need a new card anyway because my GTX970 is bottlenecking my 4.5GHz 4690K.
I need a new credit card anyway.
I need a new mouse and 240hz monitor.
I need an i7.
I need another CC.
I need a receipt so I can submit it to my health plan to get the cashback.
I need a second bedroom so I can concentrate and exhaust the heat out in the summer.
I need a seperate room really.
I need as much aim precision as possible.
I need as much money as I can get, since my first monthly saver doesn't close until September, and I have my MoT+tax+insurance in July.
I need a UK one.
I need a VPN fast.
I need cash.
I need cash!
I need cash to pay my electricity bill though.
I need dat BCH actually.
I need dat cash for buying GPUs.
I need decent isolation.
I needed really good CPU cooling to OC my graphics card so I can get 1000FPS in CS:GO.
I needed the cash for car insurance, MoT and service too.
I need fiat.
I need founders so I can add a custom cooler.
I need higher FPS in OW so I can keep consistent muscle memory with CS:GO.
I need him.
I need it.
I need it for winter heat, mining, and gaming.
I need liquidity right now.
I need money to pay my rent/electricity so I can carry on gaming.
I need more 1070 TIs.
I need more cash before I start day trading too.
I need more credit now I am a homeowner though.
I need my £73.50 Betfair cashback too.
I need my salary.
I need Noddle though.
I need one too for PIA.
I need Outlook 2016.
I need performance.
I need some Excel help.
I need some really sticky thermal tape.
I need supplementary income.
I need tape and bubble wrap!!!!!
I need that £10,000.
I need that £100 back to live on.
I need that matchfunding.
I need the £££.
I need the cash very soon. The estate agent says we'll probably exchange contracts next week.
I need the heat ffs.
I need the money.
I need the money for my flat.
I need the money so I can keep putting £750 into monthly savers.
I need the specs for Panasonic TX-32LXD60 too.
I need to add it.
I need to be careful not to take my gf there.
I need to be more aggressive with my investments, so I still need the money.
I need to be more careful with my money now.
I need to bring a big battery into work and charge it each day.
I need to buy adapter for it and I'm not even sure if it'll work yet.
I need to buy a house ASAP so I can live with my Korean gf.
I need to buy a new mattress.
I need £ to buy GPUs.
I need to buy my own house so I can put my gaming PC in the living room or something.
I need to buy some compressed air.
I need to call a meeting to stop people using travelodge/premier then.
I need to claim the money back.
I need to close that shit because it slows down my gaming.
I need to decide what mouse to buy.
I need to do that.
I need to download the new Quake.
I need to figure out how to install it on my PC at home.
I need to find a crack before I work from home again.
I need to find some higher-interest accounts.
I need to get a bigger salary so that a mortgage supplier will lend me one 4X my salary.
I need to get a copy of the guest list ASAP because if she invited my stepbrother's gf I'm going to be so pissed off and not going to turn up.
I need to get all hotel bookings to go through me and also to be big cashback bookings.
I need to get an ultra wide monitor for this gamew.
I need to get a oven with a hob and place it where the washing machine is.
I need to get as much money as possible before September.
I need to get a switch. I have an ethernet cable but it only plugs into one PC.
I need to get better at this shit.
I need to get into shape.
I need to get richer because by the time I'm 50 there probably won't be any social security left to claim.
I need to get the previous cashback I'm owed.
I need to get this done.
I need to get to the gym, have a shower, then go home and watch GoT.
I need to give IT my laptop before I go.
I need to go get my drugs ffs.
I need to go home to see the hashrates, but it's  ~£1.30 income as BTC a day.
I need to go on Reddit on the toilet though.
I need to go to the gym.
I need to hurry up and spend the training budget and then leave this company.
I need to keep at least £3k to offset my CC debt.
I need to know whether you did the Ladbrokes offer.
I need to liquidate before I go broke.
I need to lose my Betway balance.
I need to lose some lbs.
I need to lose some weight.
I need to make 0.1.
I need to not act like a matched bettor.
I need to OC higher.
I need to open a new Tesco account to put all my money into.
I need to order some new parts, swap them out with my current PC, and put the parts I'm replacing into your build. Some of the parts of your build are parts I'm not using any more but some are parts I am replacing.
I need to practice my aim.
I need to prepare for that.
I need to reassess whether it's still profitable over Nicehack.
I need to return my grandfather's screwdrivers which I've been borrowing for half a year.
I need to save my sick days for when I get REALLY ill.
I need to save up £48,240 or get a bigger salary.....
I need to save up for a bigger house.
I need to save up for a mining rig.
I need to set up auto login, auto mining and RDP on my gaming PC now.
I need to split it.
I need to start saving for retirement.
I need to stay ahead.
I need to stop winning my back bets.
I need to upgrade my CPU really badly.
I need to wager £300 and I'm doing 10p stakes.
I need white light to help me wake up properly.
I need you.
In EU you get treated equally as German citizens.
I never answer my phone anyway.
I never answer the door.
I never answer the phone.
I never answer the phone nowadays.
I never answer the phone though?
I never bothered applying for jobs because I hate the application process so much.
I never bought my M50Xs intended not to mod them.
I never clean with alcohol.
I never dwell on what could have been, all that matters is making the best decision at the time.
I never even saw it.
I never fill out any annual voting forms?
I never get cashback :(.
I never got any letters.
I never have any urgent need to rapidly download massive games.
I never intended to use unmodded M50s.
I never liked IEMs, bought my SE215s, still don't like them.
I never mine VTC.
I never need to change them.
I never pay attention to accuracy stats.
I never play with him anyway; he's a filthy casual.
I never play with vsync or AA.
I never read them.
I never realised how reliant I am on imgur until today.
I never really plan it out or strongly consider it though.
I never said anything about vaping m9.
I never saw the point in tablets.
I never spend cash.
I never stretch.
I never understood all the hype for them.
I never understood why debt is bad anyway.
I never used it.
I never used the numberpad anyway.
I never use it.
I never use self service.
I never use the bathroom other than the toilet anyway.
I never went to those shops.
I never whine about piracy.
In fact, genetic diversity is very good for the health of offspring.
In fact, it can make me feel very uncomfortable because it's making me way too hot.
In fact, I think they went up from £46 to £75 in about 10 seconds.
In fact, it's so dumbed down that they removed the requirement to know anything by removing the questions.
In fact, my Chinese friend probably paid the majority of it for me.
In fact, they're so good I might even replace my M50X with them.
Inflation has been fairly low until recently.
Inflation is craaaazy atm.
Inflation is high ATM and interest rates are low.
Information is bought and sold all the time.
inform you when this is to happen and the reasons for it. Company considers that.
In-game spectating is too confusing.
In Germany is another matter.
In how long?
In HWMonitor.
Initial thoughts, seems good, isolation seems good.
In Keepass you have to copy and paste your password, whereas in Lastpass it comes up as an overlay.
In L4D2 the survivors are too OP.
In like a year lmao.
In London?
In most countries in the world living with your parents is not shameful.
In my experience, products are only good if they're at least 4 stars.
Innovative finance ISA.
I notice the difference between my Fiio and Sound Blaster because my Fiio didn't drive my K702s properly and even had bass clipping on my DT770s.
I notice the difference between my HTC smartphone and my Sound Blaster E5.
I notice the latency in OW at like 30ms. Sometimes I see my rocket being fired on my screen before I die, but it never gets registered on the server.
In pcmastterrace there are sometimes people who enjoy consoles.
input lag=bad.
Input latency.
In real life or in CS?
In Samoa you are considered attractive if you're fat because it means you're successful enough to buy lots of food.
In September my First Direct monthly saver will close, giving me £3,700.
Insider threats like Edward Snowden?
Installing a new wallet and miner and make a bat file is all such a pain though.
Installing Ubuntu using a USB drive is fucking easy anyone can do it.
Install Unity.
Instant and free withdrawals.
Instead of 10, 20, 30, 40.
Instead of building a 50GHz CPU, we could just make 12 core 4GHz CPUs.
Instead of external wallet.
Instead of getting them modded.
Instead of it being done automatically.
Instead of just the fingertips.
Instead of just the weeks?
Instead of some stupid generic statement.
Instead of the other way around?
In-store ftw.
In Stremio?
Insurance for what?
Insurance sounds like a good idea.
Intake fans push air through a thick 240mm rad, then exhaust fans pull air through another 240mm rad.
Integrated graphics are fine for media centres nowadays.
Integrating a mining rig with your home heating system would be cool.
intel?
Intel CPUs cost quite a lot.
Intel CPUs hold their value.
Intel hasn't made a decent CPU since Sandy Bridge.
Intel make very good CPUs and AMD make very good APUs.
Intel need to get their shit together and deliver some actual significant performance improvements.
Intel replace chipsets every year.
Interesting.
Interesting..
Interesting that Intel are scrapping 4C8T CPUs, our 7700Ks could be the best gaming CPU for years.
Interest is paid annually.
Interest rate going up.
Interest rate rise in 1 hour?
Interior panels stripped off.
In terms of increased property value?
In terms of relative and not absolute.
Internal is better if you can hold off withdrawing for longer.
Internet.
Internet through work. You may do this during working hours as long as it.
Internment, final solutions, etc.
Interrupted my gym sesh :(.
Interviews are weird.
In that case I'll ask if I can borrow some money from my parents.
In that case why was he ever released?!?!?!?
In the bank.
In the context of CPUs, "binned" means to select a sample of CPUs which can reach higher clock speeds.
In the future we could all be using VR to do office work.
In the mean time, I'm going to bin and delid and overclock the shit out of Intel's latest quadcore.
In the mean time, I will return this one.
In these games, everyone has all the heroes and items as soon as they install.
In the show.
In the summer I can lower TDP to 60%, spread the rigs out, and open windows.
In the time it's taken Hermes to bring my parcel from the depot to my office, my other parcel arrived all the way from Taiwan.
In the video.
In the winter you want to keep the heat in the house ofc.
In this FUCKING HEATWAVE.
In this situation you will be able to apply to us for a refund of the repayments you have made in that year. However, we will not make a refund unless you ask for one..
Into a fund, or specific shares?
Investing £20,000 in a RateSetter Innovative Finance ISA could yield you £1,002 a year**.
Investing is gambling but you have the house advantage.
Investment/low living cost.
Investments, current accounts, savings accounts, bookies, exchanges, crypto wallets, etc.
Investor properties.
Invest the money now and you'll have even more later.
Invisible IEMs.
Invite someone else then.
Involved with what? Why are you being so cryptic omg.
In weight.
In which case I'm recommend just getting the cheapest 1080p monitor he can find until he can afford something decent.
In which case, your money would be better spent on your PC components than your monitor.
I OCed my CPU to 4.5GHz last night.
I OCed my CPU to 5.1GHz.
I often get 4 gold medals when I play her.
I once got a double payout on a random bet because it was eligible for a promotion I didn't know about.
I only buy Linux-friendly hardware.
I only buy open headphones which are good for gaming.
I only do easy offers.
I only do protein and caffeine.
I only download shows I'm going to watch nowadays.
I only earn £14,760.
I only found out about Tab Tree yesterday :(.
I only found out when I asked where my £5 free bet was.
I only get £120.
I only get 1.5%.
I only get ~1.80 :(.
I only get 1GB with openmailbox :(.
I only get 2 screens :(.
I only get 400 in CS:GO.
I only get a room though.
I only got £105 from 888poker.
I only got 1/4 of my bets correct yesterday :(.
I only got 90k.
I only had enough money to build a seriously good machine last year when I sold my old one.
I only had the stock pads on for 10 mins before I got fed up with them.
I only had what was given to me.
I only have 5 idiots on my team whereas the enemy has 6. That means that 16.666% of my games are free wins, which assuming I am at 50% winrate, I should win 66.666% of my games.
I only have a 12L mitx case.
I only have a 30% chance of acceptance according to MSE, should I apply for it?
I only have a 4690K and GTX970 right now :(.
I only have a £500 overdraft, £1,200 credit card and £91,000 mortgage :(.
I only have about a hundred tabs open atm.
I only have a year of no claims.
I only have electricity :(.
I only have one because I was just given one.
I only have until the end of the month to claim my £150.
I only know about the Fidelio X2, IDK what else they make.
I only know the muscle memory required to enter it on a QWERTY keyboard.
I only like Korean girls.
I only listen to kpop, not shit like that.
I only make £1.20 a day with my GTX 970 and 7700K :(.
I only mine Monero on my CPUs.
I only need 1-2 drives.
I only pay like £25 in petrol a month.
I only pay using my bank account for contactless and the ocassional BACs.
I only play CS:GO, Dota 2 and Overwatch online.
I only play Dota 2, CS:GO and pub gee.
I only play esports.
I only play esports now.
I only play serious esports games.
I only protected one sheet.
I only really know the HR director at my work because I asked him some questions about pensions and he's the only one I ever see at the office.
I only respect Asian women.
I only use randomly generated passwords for every account now.
I only vote for kpop girls.
I only want dates in these cells, comments can go in the "Notes" column or added as a comment.
I only wear Hi-Fi.
I open all mine because it's fucking hot in here.
I opened a Bank of Scotland account last night.
I opened up a Tesco account just so I could switch it.
I ordered a black Ncase M1 last night omg.
I ordered a brand new Fidelio X2, but I have to wait up to a month for it :(.
I ordered a Chromecast last night.
I ordered a new mouse cable for my Logitech G403 from a German.
I ordered another 6  1070 TIs last night.
I ordered a paracord for my Logitech G403 from a German.
I ordered a switch to replace my Powerline adapter so hopefully my mining rig will be more stable.
I ordered it a week ago.
I ordered it brand new for £157.
I ordered it on Monday and still haven't heard anything.
I ordered lots of stuff from myprotein.com.
I ordered M50X last night.
I ordered one on ebay for half the cost of the one on Currys, Argos, Tesco, etc.
I ordered the Creative E5.
I organised the event and drove them there and back whilst they were getting wasted, got them super cheap tickets, and they think I'm somehow profiting from it..
Iota.
Iota doesn't understand that my PC is faster than his.
Iota is an ass and we won't be working with him again.
Iota is a race traitor too.
Iota Madbradess200 pub gee?
Iota reported for ability abuse.
Iota was being mean to me.
Iota-work:Does that mean that our work PCs will be W10 soon?
Iota-work:I mainly just use it for traffic in google maps, and WhatsApp.
Iota-work is a fucking troll.
Iota-work:lmao.
Iota-work:lmao so it's basically a f2p microtransaction model?
Iota-work:No but they make headphones and put weights inside them.
Iota-work:So Windows 7 and 8.1 users get it for free automatically?
Iota-work:The one in town.
Iota-work:The sensible people will be edited out ofc.
Iota-work:what?
Iota-work:Why?
Iota-work:wtf?
Iota-work:wtf no, the crime was done before the video was even uploaded.
Iota would be stewie.
Iota:wtf why.
I overclocked it.
I overclocked my i5 4690K to 4.7GHz inside this case.
I overdose regularly.
I overheard people in IT talking about it.
I overtook you.
I owe my wife £3,000.
I own a car.
I own a flat now.
I own my own flat.
I paid about £175 once and then nothing since.
I paid a shitload of tax on my last paycheck too.
I paid below the annual threshold last year because I took all my holiday in one big go.
I paid by debit card....
I paid for an annual subscription, but I probably won't renew it now.
I paid line rental up front.
I paid the fee to send to you and now I'm paying the fee to receive it.
I paid using my credit card, is that going to be a problem?
I partied with a girl in Overwatch for 12 hours last night who only played Mercy.
I pay 0 fees to send my BTC to you.
I pay £0 for my heating bill.
I pay £0 for my phone.
I pay 0% to withdraw to Coinbase.
I pay 11.214p per kwh during the day.
I pay £5 a month for Spotify.
I pay £5 a month on my contract and £300 for my phone.
I pay 7% into mine and my employer pays 10%.
I pay back like £12 a month, probably less than it increases in interest.
I pay for her food most of the time.
I pay for Spotify which has cut down my music piracy by a large chunk.
I pay for the complete package. I'd pay just as much even if sex wasn't included..
I pay like £5 a month for my mobile lmao.
I pay more rent to my parents than I would if I rented some places.
I pay my mum £350 atm, but that includes food, ironing, laundry, sometimes even clothes and shampoo.
I pay no fees.
I pay very little tax.
I personally like D.va the most because she's a sexy Korean, but I play Widowmaker the most because she's OP as fuck.
I phoned up Universal Credit and they told me I would get paid.
I pick black so I can tell the lady to give me more blacks.
I picked a bad day to go to Thorpe Park.
I placed a £300 arb on Tommy French last night.
I plan to get a big mortgage and do a shitload of stoozing over the next 5 years.
I play CS:Go, Dota 2 and OW.
I play Dota.
I play Dota, CS, Street Fighter, and Overwatch.
I played a lot of very old shooters for a long time.
I played at home.
I played it a lot when I was younger.
I played it briefly.
I played some ranked last night.
I play loud music in my office.
I play Quake.
I PMed you.
I posted your mic and ordered my new one. I'm loving my K702s without the modmic cable right now. The modmic really got in the way of how frequently I would change my headphones at my desk for different purposes..
I prefer 5v5.
I prefer AKG, Fidelio, and Beyer.
I prefer AKG K702s for open headphones in that price bracket though.
I prefer display arms.
I prefer Dota.
I prefer girls with strong asian features.
I prefer just to pick them off the ground to the side of me.
I prefer Lastpass.
I prefer light mice.
I prefer my Beyers even though they don't fold up.
I prefer not dying when a van drives into me.
I prefer nVidia atm.
I prefer Stremio.
I prefer Stremio because I can subscribe to Youtube Channels and TV Shows and it alerts me when a new video is out.
I prefer Stremio, it makes everything so easy.
I prefer tenkeyless for gaming.
I prefer the graphics cards PCI.
I prefer the ODAC because it's a single unit.
I prefer to do spreadsheets in 188hz.
I prefer to email people sitting next to me so I don't have to take my headphones off.
I prefer to have a few sets of mid-fi cans than one pair of summit-fi.
I prefer to spend more on the CPU because I play CS:GO.
I prefer to use WhatsApp and Reddit and stuff.
I prefer to work in the office when I'm busy.
I prefer Tree Tab Style over Tab Tree, but Tab Tree seems more stable so I use it.
I prefer whatsapp because it's encrypted.
I pre-ordered Overwatch last night.
I pretty much gave up on the MMO genre in 2012 when I got into Dota 2 and GW2 was a big disappointment.
I pretty much just run my system off a single 2.5" SSD.
I pretty much only have £100 a month to live off after rent, savings and fuel :(.
I probably can, but it's just as cheap to get them individually, and it makes it easier to manage.
I probably can't output more than 500W in my Ncase.
I probably CBA to sell the motherboard and RAM seperately.
I probably could have placed 4X£50 bets actually.
I probably have more high-end equipment than rory.
I probably only save around £1,100 a month.
I probably placed a lot of bad bets :(.
I probably said something like "I don't want to work with anyone else but one person is not too bad" but I can't really remember.
I probably spend just as much on gaming as you spend on drugs.
I probably still won't ever spend more than £200 on an AMPDAC or £300 on a pair of headphones tthough.
I probably won't get it because I just bought a house :(.
I probably won't put more than 12-18 1070 TIs in this flat.
I probably won't see much gains in Dota 2 or CS:GO though.
I probably won't spend £3.6k on a gaming PC, I just need a faster CPU, CPU cooler and GPU.
I probably won't use it until I move into my flat though.
I probably would have mined coins directly.
I probably wouldn't be ready to move out yet either if I didn't have a gf. I'm going to move out soon so that I am allowed to have girls round.
I probably wouldn't be so fucking frustrated with Windows's stacking window manager if there was just a fucking "always on top" button on the window bar.
I probably wouldn't bother working if it didn't give me an income.
I probably wouldn't risk carrying that much expensive equipment around with me.
I promise I won't spend it on drugs.
I prove my existence by eating other animals.
I pushed it in and bent them somehow.
I put £200 into my help to buy ISA, £300 into my First Direct monthly saver, and £250 into my TSB monthly saver.
I put £300 into my First Direct account every month at 6%, £250 into TSB at 5%, and £500 into Nationwide at 5%.
I put £500 a month into the Nationwide 5% regular saver.
I put all the parts on PC Part Picker then multiplied it by 0.78.
I put in £700 and now I have £699.87.
I put in 7% of my salary into my pension, and my employer puts 10% in.
I put it in the channel last night omg.
I put it on my Amazon wishlist.
I put it on my reference 1080 TI.
I put it under a tap to get all the chocolate off it.
I put my Beyers on.
I put my Dota and CS:GO mmrs on my CV.
I put my DT770 pads on them.
I put my DT770s on my company's internal classifieds.
I put my DT770s pads on my COPs.
I put my IEMs on just so she will stop telling me to turn my music volume down so I can hear her.
I put my Lync to "do not disturb" and put an out of office on my Outlook to stop people from harassing me.
I put my money in every bank account I can get 3% or more though.
I put Spotify on my CC.
I put the condition as "Seller refurbished" and mentioned that I added brand new earpads.
I put the parts in pcpartpicker and it came to over £600 so £500 seems about right.
I queued 20 seconds.
I quit coke because I don't want diabetes.
I quit drinking Dr Pepper so that I don't get diabeetus.
I quite like being able to barely afford rent.
I quite like it actually, because it's like a quiet white noise machine.
I quite like my AKG K702 earpads too, but DT770 pads are amazing for isolation considering their comfort.
I rarely get paid, and when I do I pay a shitload of tax on it.
I rarely have my desktop background visible anyway; I've got windows in the way most of the time.
I rarely play MM too, but I'm still an eagle.
I read about it but didn't watch the video.
I read about sexuality on wikipedia and I found that I am either heterosexual or asexual.
I read that MPM takes the profitability information straight from MPH and not from whattomine.
I read that she has to fully descope before scoping now.
I read the government announcement months ago.
I read the Oddsmonkey casino guide last night. They said that Blackjack is the best game to play because it's very simple and has the smallest house advantage..
I realised it years before I started paying tax.
I really CBA, but I CBA talking to Origin much any more, so IDK.
I really CBA to get a landline phone.
I really CBA with other games any more.
I really dislike him for his racism though. The bastard didn't even recognise how racially superior Korean girls are.
I REALLY hope MyHermes doesn't do the final bit of the delivery.
I really hope they fix it and don't charge me for it.
I really hope you get the chance to try the Philips Fidelio X2 one day.
I really like how they fold up though.
I really like it when I don't have to send the product back to get a replacement.
I really like my M50X, I just wish the isolation didn't suck balls.
I really like them.
I really like this keyboard.
I really love the portability of my IEMs, but the sound is just nowhere near as good as my K702s or DT770s.
I really need a 1080TI and 240hz monitor though.
I really need a 6700K.
I really need a new GPU.
I really need a new graphics card.
I really need cash right now.
I really need Overwatch to run better.
I really need to build up a few thousand £ in savings.
I really need to figure out how the config woul dwork.
I really need to get a thermal container; my coffee always goes cold every morning and I have to keep remaking it :(.
I really need to get a VPN before making these anti-government comments.
I really need to get round to curing my obesity sometime.
I really need to get some mortgage arrangements.
I really need to look up the definition of 'selfish'. People are using it in contexts which I did not think are appropriate.
I really need to OC it.
I really need to replace my GPU because it's noisy as fuck.
I really need to stop parking under trees.
I really need to stop spending all my money.
I really need to stop spending so much money on headphones.
I really need to up my salary so I can borrow more mortgage.
I really need to wait until September before spending any money though.....
I really prefer over-ears to IEMs though.
I really really doubt it's a problem with the PSU. It's Silverstone which is the top-tier PSU brand.
I really really like my new Beyers.
I really should start using more encryption.
I really think my DT770s are the perfect office headphones.
I really think these can replace my COPs.
I really want an Ncase M1 now.
I really want one.
I really want to get some one day.
I really wish they had better isolation.
I realy want a 250-300 FPS in Overwatch.
I reckon I'll use 1500kwh or more in a year, so Iresa is probably still going to be cheaper than Powershop.
I recommend 16GB if you have more to spend because it's so cheap and why not.
I recommend against that CPU for gaming.
I recommend bulgogi bibimbap.
I recommend buying the Ceesa cable and a Zowie G-TFX.
I recommend COPs for consumers.
I recommended you for Nationwide. They'll send me an email soon which I'll forward to your address.
I recommend Fiio E10K.
I recommend it.
I recommend Logitech G403 paired with a Corsair K65.
I recommend Moneyfarm if it's under £10k.
I recommend open.
I recommend Quake Live or Overwatch.
I recommend some ML120 fans though.
I recommend UAG.
I recommend you buy them.
I recommend you use Firefox.
I recorded my CPU at 80C and my GPU at 89C last night.
I reduced it to 144hz and still frameskipping.
I reduced my First Direct monthly saver amount from £300 to £25.
I relaly need the cash right now.
I relisted the graphics card and put it on as fixed price.
I rely on my hearing so much.
I remember a couple of years ago the Job Centre lady asked me my DoB on my birthday.
I remember back in 2011 I paid £30 for a beta key for a f2p game lmao.
I remember I did their bet club every week.
I remember I requested a £5,000 overdraft from them and they were really interrogating me trying to find out what I wanted it for.
I remember I sold £40 of Steam credit for CoD Ghosts to a uni friend.
I remember last time I got the Chargrilled Chicken breast smothered in BBQ sauce,.
I remember one time I took a years worth of holiday pay in one go and paid hundreds of £ off my student loan that I shouldn't have.
I remember that.
I remember when I got my m-itx board and I was amazed how small it is.
I remember when I had to do a telephone interview at my desk at work lmao.
I remember when my co-worker got sacked.
I remember years ago when my console peasant friends would talk about their CoD KD:R like it was their skill rank.
I removed everything from my Outlook calendar and now I look like I don't do anything.
IRESA ANSWER THE FUCKING PHONE.
IRESA Flex 4 12 month Fixed Direct Debit (Economy7 ELECTRICITY).
I respect Asian women.
I responded late to one of his emails which had the word "urgent" in the content yesterday because I was dealing with other stuff and wouldn't know it was urgent unless I read it.
I rewrote my sentence and forgot a word, I do it all the time.
Irrationality always is.
I run CS:GO at 1080p with 4xAA at 400FPS.
Is £10 withdrawal fee from an exchange to my bank account normal?
Is 12 a day within moderation?
Is 401k like a pension?
Is 500W enough heat for the winter?
Is 8GB of RAM enough to stop my machine from flipping out.
Is a 1% pay increase low?
I said "could" not "would" omg.
I said it was working fine then it stopped.
I said NiceHack in Discord and got so many likes.
I said PERSON.
I said "thank you" but do I have to tell her to have a nice weekend too?
I said "usually".
Is an English degree good?
Is anyone else here a higher rank than silver?
Is anyone else using nVidia fast sync?
Is anyone else worried that the government will try to push LISAs to replace employer pensions?
Is anyone going to open a Lifetime ISA?
Is anyone having a minute's silence for the Portugal fire victims?
Is anyone here unemployed?
Is Argos good?
is a transphobe someone who doesn't like Transformers?
I saved a shitload of money by taking out a £250 overdraft and cancelling my valentines trip.
I save my gold for seasonal skins.
I saw a couple of their posts made it to the top of /r/all.
I saw a monitor that can do it before, so I know it's possible to do it.
I saw another video where some gril told a man "privileged white men don't get assaulted like women do" then he said "men can be victims of assault too" then she assaulted him.
I saw a Reddit thread about Redditors' parters' fetishes at the weekend. One girl said that her bf wanted her to gain weight, and all the replies were telling her how bad of an idea it is because it's so bad for her health.
I saw a setup which was like £50k.
I saw Batman vs Superman and it was awful.
I saw Deadpool with my gf.
I saw him in that video.
I saw it.
I saw it on Man vs Food.
I saw my CEO's penis today and it's smaller than mine.
I saw Nerve.
I saw that and it's a fucking stupid article.
I saw the guide.
Is Bitcoin subject to deflation like money in my bank account earning 0% interest?
Is Bittylicious good for selling BTC?
IS CHICAGO IN SWEDEN?
Is congress like the House of Parliament?
Is CPU mining profitable?
Is DPD going downhill?
I searched Google Images for my favourite kpop group with the exact resolution of my monitor.
I see Brewdog at the local Sainsbury's.
I see him online at ridiculous times like 4AM wtf.
I see horrible jerky movement especially when doing a wide camera pan on 24hz.
I see no reason to ever get a phone on contract.
I see nothing.
I see that on a lot of salaries.
I see through your ploy.
I see you have a tube amp now?
I sell my GRLC for BTC then sell my BTC for BCH so I can withdraw it really cheaply.
I sell my GRLC for BTC then sell my BTC for LTC and withdraw to gdax.
I sell skins to buy more skins and sell them to get more.
I send you a referral link.
I sent an ebay message to return it.
I sent them all my identification documents and everything.
I sent to the exchange then went to bed.
I sent you PM.
Is Excercise good for the immune system? I have not been ill since I started exercising.
Is Facebook trying to take over the web or something?
Is Gabe Newell friends with Elon Musk?
Is god real?
Is Gordan Brown still alive?
ish.
I share all my crypto with you.
I shared a pic of my gf with the channel.
Is he being dishonest?
Is he black?
Is he related to Miley Cyrus?
Is he the really old one who is always with the queen?
I shit you not m9.
I shot the duck before you befriended it.
I should avoid buying a new car for as long as possible.
I should be able to get it so that all I have to do is input the stake, back odds, lay odds and then everything else is calculated.
I should be paying more tax.
I should be working, not watching Youtube videos lmao.
I should do something with all this cash.
I should fill up my Tesco 3% accounts.
I should get £144 Moneyfarm cashback and £126 from Nutmeg soon.
I should get ~£26 into my bank account every day.
I should get a 2 bedroom flat and rent out a room so someone is paying my mortgage haha.
I should get a job in the automation industry.
I should get a job where you work.
I should go there with my gf.
I should go to the gym.
I should have applied for the job. The potential salary he just told me is higher than was advertised.
I should have applied for the role which does less work than me in the same team but for much higher pay.
I should have asked for his dog as a deposit.
I should have asked for the Hermes man's direct phone number.
I should have bought a 780TI when I was at uni and mined all the bitcoin using my free uni electricity and then held onto it for a couple of years.
I should have bought the 145x145mm one.
I should have cashed out my previous cashback to Amazon before I bought my new PC.
I should have disabled PIA Mace and Ublock when I signed up.
I should have done it before buying lots of shit on Amazon.
I should have done that.
I should have held onto it.
I should have invested.
I should have it by now.
I should have sold to you.
I should have something really good to share with you, but I'm going to chip away working on it for a couple more days.
I should have taken the £85 offer. I only got £73 from the auction :(.
I should just go home and do it on my 4.7GHz 4690K.
I should just set up an IRC client at home.
I should liquidate it and buy a 1070 TI.
I should note them all down for future reference.
I shouldn't have bought my DT770 and Modmic......
I shouldn't have cheaped out on an i5.
I shouldn't have deposited an extra £200 into my Bet365 account so I could make all these high-profile bets.
I shouldn't have told my friend who has 1000MH/s.
I shouldn't have upgraded my CPU and RAM and motherboard until I could afford to upgrade my GPU too.
I should probably move my car. I'm just concerned I'll kill the battery.
I should probably vacuum my room some time though.
I should throw away my 4690K and buy a 7700K I think.
I should try working from home some time.
I should wait to see what gets announced this month.
I should withdraw it all and buy a GTX 1080TI and a 240hz monitor.
I should work with you.
I signed up to the closed beta for the new one.
Is Intel Extreme Tuning Utility a good stress tester?
ISIS is ruining my betting now!
Is it?
Is it 1080p 24" or larger?
Is it a 0% purchase card?
Is it a bad idea to hold lots of money in banks gaining 5% interest instead of investing in equity?
Is it abnormal to sometimes think about suicide?
Is it actually illegal, or is it just frowned upon?
Is it a Deathadder?
Is it a good idea to buy a house and pay the minimum monthly repayments just to get dat sweet house price inflation?
Is it an AMPDAC or just an AMP?
Is it anime?
Is it a school for the smart kids?
Is it bad if I get a cable without shielding?
Is it because I never give money to charity?
Is it because of all the racism?
Is it because of leavers, trolls, noobs, etc?
Is it because of that bank robbery you commited 5 years ago?
Is it because women become less beautiful as they get older?
Is it better than SE215?
Is it big?
Is it bigger than mine?
Is it cheaper to get a dual sim phone and get one sim for phone calls and one for data?
Is it delidded?
Is it esports?
Is it family friendly?
Is it fast enough to stream HD video?
Is it going to be a "hard Brexit" or "soft Brexit"?
Is it good?
Is it hard to register with the exchange? Do I need to give them my driving license etc?
Is it illegal to tell banks you earn more than you actually do?
Is it illegal to use the toilets of the opposite sex?
Is it just me, or are DT770 earpads relaly fucking good?
Is it just me, or does Spotify's random play feature always play the same 50 songs in a playlist?
Is it just me, or is the idea just so stupid?
Is it just Tomb Raider, or other games too?
Is it Kryonaut?
Is it legal to link to torrent sites?
Is it like a dancer?
Is it like a white russian?
Is it like Malcolm in the Middle?
Is it like Watergate or Gamergate?
Is it matx?
Is it near Spain?
Is it nigger or cunt?
Is it not dodgy to order headphones second-hand off ebay though?
Is it NSFW?
Is it okay?
Is it okay if I put some paper inside the case to stop parts from moving around as much?
Is it okay to leave 5 minutes early from work if I get to work 5 minutes early every day?
Is it open beta now? I haven't been invited to the closed beta :(.
Is it or isn't it?
Is it or not?
Is it over £100k?
Is it passively cooled?
Is it possible I'm not even using the correct server?
Is it possible to prevent users from editing contents of cells without preventing them from using sort and filter?
Is it possible to split the Windoze taskbar into two and have the notification tray and the time/date on a seperate bar? Having the taskbar and the notification tray/time/date on the same panel doesn't work for me.
Is it possible to split the Windoze taskbar into two and have the notification tray and the time/date on a seperate bar? rory.
Is it possible to use my phone as my laptop's DAC through USB?
Is it real Korean cuisine if my Korean gf makes it for me?
Is it rude to ignore someone talking to me when I've just answered the phone a second before they started talking? I was told I'm very rude today.
Is it Rupert Murdoch?
Is it safe to buy CPUs and GPUs on ebay? What do you do if they don't work? Just lose hundreds of £££?
Is it safe to drive without working indicators?
Is it socially acceptable for me to date my Korean gf even though she is a different species than me because I am white?
Is it still worth using speakers if I won't be directly in front of them most of the time?
Is it super duper high capacity or something?
Is it the final solution?
Is it to compete with the Fiio E10K?
Is it true?
Is it unreasonable for me to ask my gf to pay half the council tax, water, electricity, broadband, and gas bills?
Is it us?
Is it weird that I'm satisfied with having slow broadband?
Is it weird that lots of girls at my office flirt with me?
Is Kabylake going to be much of an improvement over Skylake?
I skip a lot of offers.
Is Kodi good for torrenting to my TV?
Is K-on about kpop?
Is Lawbreakers any good?
Is low energy lighting a con? It just means you need to turn your heating up more, right?
Is matched betting just what we do on cashback sites?
I smoked some cheese.
Is my CPU the bottleneck?
Is my custom-build gaming PC bespoke?
Is my Firefox bespoke?
Is my listing okay?
Is my pension really good or something wtf.
Is NEST going to replace the state pension?
Is Nigel Farage a liberal?
I sniped my Philips Fidelio X2.
Isn't 23 a legal requirement or something?
Isn't anti-virus redundant nowadays? Windoze has its own built in AV.
Isn't a virtual machine just as good?
Isn't Azure that Bittorrent client?
Isn't bitrate more important than resolution anyway?
Isn't /b/ the famous one for some reason?
Isn't Deal or No Deal that really really dumbed down quiz show?
Isn't doctor-prescribed exercise the best thing?
Isn't Edge just the new IE?
Isn't everything on the blockchain on LTC?
Isn't Expedia one of the top comparison sites though?
Isn't it just common sense?
Isn't it kinda legal grey area?
Isn't it potentially lethal though?
Isn't L4D2 better?
Isn't McAffe really bad?
Isn't Mr Robot for mouthbreathers?
Isn't not kpop you fucking ignoramus.
Isn't Pascal and Polaris due to be released in a couple of months?
Isn't Reddit unsafe?
Isn't saying "sort by date/chronologically" just as easy as saying "sort in a different way"?
Isn't she a really vile person?
Isn't she basically talking about Ripple?
Isn't that £2,420 worth of Garlic?
Isn't that a bit old fashioned?
Isn't that an argument for nuclear?
Isn't that bad?
Isn't that card in USA?
Isn't that common knowledge?
Isn't that exactly the same as Bitconnect?
Isn't that illegal?
Isn't that ridiculously overkill though?
Isn't that subjective?
Isn't that the same as openmailbox?
Isn't that the same slander that the media gave Corbyn though?
Isn't the Pi3 quite powerful?
Isn't the right to life more important than the right to not be injured when conducting criminal activities?
Isn't Trump that crazy racist billionaire?
Isn't TSB only 5% up to 2k?
Isn't USB-C going to replace all these USB standards anyway?
Isn't WoW just a big Skinner's Rat experiment?
Is Ocado good? Should I get it?
Isolates the sound, sound quality is amazing, and it's super fucking comfy.
Isolate the problem component.
Isolation+comfy=office attributes.
I sold 1,250 garlic earlier.
I sold a lot.
I sold an item I found watching a CS:GO tournament for ~£200.
I sold during the dip.
I sold it all.
I sold it on ebay.
I sold like 700 on Coin Falcon.
I sold my DT770s for COPs, and now I'm thinking of selling my COPs for the Custom Studios.
I sold my Fiio E10K for £41.50 on ebay ^^.
I sold one I found for like £200.
I sold rory a PC for about £500 recently, we can compare it to the new Xbox.
I sold some GRLC for BCH.
I sometimes autocomplete the wrong person by accident and it's always some random person who is long-term idle and really confused about why I'm typing his name.
I sometimes bet on events a week from now.
I sometimes drive to where Iota lives.
I sometimes play videogames instead of working.
I sometimes schedule them for like 8AM so people think I started work at 8AM.
I sometimes see emails going to everyone which gives a number plate and tells the driver to contact reception.
I sometimes take a monday off if I'm visiting my gf on a weekend.
I sometimes use PIA when bookies tell me I'm not in the UK lmao.
I sometimes use SOCKS proxies on my Firefox.
Is Openhardwaremonitor accurate? That's what I've been using.
I sorted it by chronological, since it seems the most likely way.
I sped there and sped home lmao.
I spend £40-£50 a month on drugs.
I spend a lot on gaming though.
I spend a shitload on PC components.
I spend it on upgrading my PC.
I spend less than I get back.
I spend more than that on PC gaming in a month.
I spend some of it on rent, some on PC upgrades, and some on my gf, but IDK what to do with the restr.
I spend way too much time during my daily commute trying to turn right at a roundabout that's completely blocked by traffic going straight across.
I spent £20 at a wedding venue last month, and it thinks I'll do it again this month.
I spent £250 on legal fees.
I spent £320 on this phone when it cost £400 elsewhere.
I spent £460 on this fucking CPU.
I spent a fuckload on PC components.
I spent a lot of money on an efficient cooling system for my gaming PC that I wouldn't do for a mining rig.
I spent a shitload of £££ over the past couple of weeks.
I spent over £1000 on my PC.
I spent that much just on a pair of headphones.
Is Pizzagate a hoax?
Is Pokemon Go like the Gameboy Pokemon games?
I spoke to an Amazon representative today, his name was LakSHIT.
I spoke to the supplier, I have to wait 3-4 weeks for the GPUs to come into stock.
Is RDP encrypted?
Is regular broadband fast enough?
Is revenge porn actually illegal, or do they just try to claim it is another form of harassment?
Is Ryan Seacrest a candidate?
Is salt healthy? It's a really good seasoning so I want to use more of it, but don't want to kill myself.
Is Sausage Party any good?
Is she Asian?
Is She Asian?
Is she calling you?
Is she Chinese?
Is she white?
Is so long.
Is Suicide Squad any good?
Is sync even useful at high FPS and refreshrate?
I start at 09:00 every day.
I started mining it to help you to diversify your crypto portfolio.
I started watching it because of your recommendation.
Is that 14 kwhs?
Is that a bad thing?
Is that a copypasta?
Is that actually your address?
Is that a euphamism?
Is that a euphemism?
Is that a good idea, rory?
Is that a good thing?
Is that a lot?
Is that an OW question?
Is that a question or a suggestion?
Is that a reboot of Peep Show?
Is that a sex thing?
Is that Australian guy still pretending to be the creator of Bitcoin?
Is that a viable business model?
Is that bad?
Is that even enough for one dose?
Is that from automated in-game tournaments too?
Is that game quite realistic?
Is that going to be a problem when Bitcoin is worth £100,000?
Is that good?
Is that just client to satellite and back? Or is it client to satellite to server and back?
Is that just fuel?
Is that legal?
Is that like Roller Coaster Tycoon?
Is that like TI?
Is that man that got captured and didn't get saved by his friend going to die?
is that megabits or megabytes?
Is thatm ore profitbale?
Is that near New York?
Is that not illegal because it's age discrimination?
Is that okay now?
Is that possible?
Is that Poundland?
Is that real?
Is that sexual harassment?
Is that some kind of euphamism?
Is that supposed to be impressive?
Is that tax evasion?
Is that the new blizzard moba?
Is that the only dead person you've seen?
Is that the only reason to get one then?
Is that the same as the £30 chromecast at Currys and Tesco and everywhere?
Is that where you don't have step parents and step siblings?
Is that why I'm banned on freenode too?
is that why it's so expensive then?
Is that why you have anxiety then?
Is that you?
is that your gf?
Is the government giving grants to replace electric heaters with air conditioners then?
Is the max auction length 7 days?
Is the maximum commute length you would do?
Is the only advantage of bitcoin that it was the first and most widely adopted?
Is there 0 fee to withdraw my ETH?
Is there a Firefox addon to change user agent just for a specific tab?
Is there an IRC channel dedicated to trading headphones?
Is there any actual evidence of Outlook slowing down, or is it just a 'common sense' thing?
Is there any disadvantage to being paid regularly?
Is there any loss of performance though?
Is there any reason why I shouldn't use the same 3.5mm cable for multiple pairs of headphones?
is there any way to be 100% certain I will never become homeless?
is there any way to continue getting my salary without actually working?
Is there any way to find out the speed before I move in?
Is there a service like Spotify but ignores copyright restrictions?
Is there a service like spotify but ignores copyright restrictions? I don't mind if it costs a bit more.
Is the reason why my dad is so homophobic because he is from Portsmouth?
Is there a spreadsheet I can input these values into?
Is there a UK/EU one?
Is there a way to close the terminal window of the miner?
Is there a way to keep my gf permanently in days 1-7?
Is there a way to not pay VAT on it?
Is there a way to write Excel formula that's easier than just writing it like it's just one line?
Is there space to put a desk?
Is there still a live feed of the car?
Is there such a thing as mental domestic abuse?
Is the salary high enough to afford a GTX Titan X?
Is the UK government's Help To Buy scheme a good or bad deal?
Is the UK not going to have any more astronauts post-brexit?
Is this a good price? "1 X 250GB XBOX £50.00 FOR CONSOLE AND CONTROLLER ".
Is this a prediction like "Brexit will lead to WW3"?
Is this game popular with autistic people?
Is this good? FUNDS YOU ARE INVESTED IN.
Is this some sort of competition?
Is this the end of cryptocurrency?
Is this the first time you've experience >60hz or something?
I still don't have my Nutmeg cashback from 1 year ago lmao.
I still got undertaxed though.
I still have £3.5k in my exchanges though.
I still have an account, but I haven't change my email address to my openmailbox on amazon yet.
I still have a student email address.
I still love my beyers, but they're pretty useless for gaming now I've sold my modmic.
I still play OW.
I still struggle to log into my banking apps though.
I still think it's ridiculous I got banned for saying "wtf".
I still use 50 others.
I still use a lot of my degree just to make simple decisions.
I still want the pay though.
I still want to own a Fidelio X2 by the end of the year though.
Is T May like T Rex?
Is Topcashback loading for you?
I stopped adding them.
I stopped mining garlic.
I stream.
I stream torrents mostly. I don't download torrents very often nowadays..
I stream torrents on stremio during the day.....
I strongly disagree that Windoze is easier and looks nicer than Ubuntu.
I struggle to IRC on my phone.
I stuck with Firefox all these years and now they're proving me right.
I submitted a claim for Ladbrokes.
I substance abuse caffeine.
I suck at CS:GO too, but that doesn't stop me from playing.
I suggested electronic payment but they want cash.
Is UKIP just BNP but not racist?
Is utopia like Games of Thrones or Westworld?
I swear even when I listen to a playlist of 3.5k songs, some get played way more than others.
I swear I've seen the term "liberal elite" more in the past 3 months than I have in the past 30 years.
I swear the 500mb Tunnelbear free trial wasn't actually 500mb.
Is weed edible?
Is what.cd a good source for music? I'm trying to find a better source.
Is what good?
Is what new?
Is Widow still good?
I switch bank accounts all the time.
I switch between them sometimes.
I switched to a low sugar diet last year as a pre-emptive measure.
I switched to a low sugar diet so that I won't get lots of diabetes.
I switched to TSB and FD.
is your 888casino cashback confirmed yet?
Is your 888poker cashback confirmed?
Is your chirotheorapy prescribed by your GP?
Is your dad on chemo or something?
Is your family Chinese then?
Is your HD600 "high-end"?
Is your masternode up and running yet?
Is your NiceHash showing a static hashspeed for CryptoNight too?
Is yours confirmed too?
Is yours unlimited then?
I tag them as current account transfers.
I take my gf there on dates sometimes.
I take really long showers when I'm not paying for the water.
I talk to a lot of cute Chinese grills on Wechat.
It also doesn't make my PC all laggy.
It also has an EQ and some other DSP features.
It also makes a lot of people uncomfortable when they are smoking passively and smelling all that smelly shit.
It also takes up space on the desk.
It always makes me laugh when I see an obese person running because I know their knees are getting fucked up.
It amazes me how many of our customers don't have the internet.
It applies to renting too.
It assumes 2.5% annual salary increase.
It automatically inputs retailer codes for you, tries each one, and finds the biggest discount code.
It benefits the economy to use public funds to help people get better so they can be productive again.
It bugged out.
It can be more effective than blocking them completely, as people are less likely to circumvent using VPNs.
It can easily fit a GTX 1080 and Intel 6700K inside it.
It can probably remove all the additional processing that consumer devices do nowadays.
It can run at 4.7GHz if you give it a 240mm rad.
It captures lots of dust in the intakes, so it's pretty much an air purifier, right?
It caused Intel to become a monopoly as AMD bet on more cores instead of higher IPC.
It changes nominally.
It comes up to £665.83 in total.
IT complained about my keyboard's noise.
It cost more than my CPU.
It costs me £24.17133 a month to run my PC in mining 24/7, but I make like £100 revenue.
it costs more.
It could be 3-2 and still no FB.
It could become worthless!!!
It could be even bigger if you bundle it with 4k uncompressed textures.
It could be my DT770s with removable cable.
It could be worthless in the winter.
It could crash.
It could go down to 5k and still hit 100k next year.
It could just be the game being shitty.
It couldn't drive my K702s very well.
It could overtake Dota's playerbase by the end of the year at this rate.
It creates heat and has fans?
It cuts down on cable management slightly.
It'd be nice to be closer to my gf.
It defeats the fucking point of even having a password.
It definitely didn't look like a 30 zone.
It definitely isn't small any more.
It definitely pays more than it costs.
it depends!
It depends on lots of factors.
It depends on who she will be presenting to I guess.
It detects when my PC is idle and only uses background resources.
It didn't grow over time.
It displays 120hz when not in a 3D game.
It doesn't?
It doesn't have a limit.
It doesn't have a plot and doesn't teach you anything interesting AFAIK.
It doesn't include my £800 Help to Buy ISA bonus when I buy.
It doesn't look ideal for playing games on both Linux and virtual machine.
It doesn't make sense.
It doesn't matter how little the advantage is.
It doesn't matter if you try or not.
It doesn't matter too much for office use.
It doesn't seem as much of a team game as CS:GO.
It doesn't seem like a very democratic system.
It doesn't take me 10 minutes, it takes the fucking computer 10 minutes.
It doesn't work most of the time.
It does the job for gaming.
It dropped watching a tournament.
It'd solve pretty much all my problems.
Item condition:Used.
I tend to avoid Nicehack algorithm coins.
It especially makes a difference if you wear glasses, because it doesn't push the frames of your glasses against your temples.
It even had Bluetooth and Wi-Fi.
It feels a lot safer in the UK where most people don't have guns and most police don't either.
It feels like it's built like a tank.
It feels like summer.
It feels more durable than my DT770s since it has a removeable cable instead of a really long one.
It feels soooooo nice.
It felt so forced.
It finds system stability so I can increase voltage if necessary.
It freaks me out.
It fucking freezes up as if it's running out of RAM.
It generally decreases over time.
It generates a shitload of heat and then blows it out into my room.
It gets hot as fuck in my bag with no ventilation.
It gets me a lot of vag though.
It gets outperformed by dual core Intels.
It gets too expensive for rapidly diminishing returns.
It gives more control over fan curves and voltages and stuff though.
It gives you some crazy £ estimate.
It goes against everything in /r/pcmasterrace and /r/linuxmasterrace.
It goes up and down.
It got to the point where having a spreadsheet will actually save me time.
It had better fucking arrive tomorrow.
It had the typical Hollywood unrealistic Space physics.
It handles 3000 tabs perfectly.
It happens every day.
It has?
It has a built-in battery too.
It has a double bed, so I just need a double mattress, then I can invite my gf over for sex!
It has a female lead.
It has a good reputation for finding system instability without raising temperatures to unrealistic levels.
It has big implications on my everyday life.
It has decentish resolution and gsync.
It has hyperthreading.
It has no plot any more.
It has notches, I think I always go for the 4th/5th one, but because it seems a bit worn out, it doesn't always stick.
It hasn't been months anyway.
It has orange stripes"!
It has the best headphone output ATM.
It has the best specs of any mouse on the market.
It has the soundstage of IEMs and the isolation of open backs.
It has three built-in mics which I can use until I figure out how to reverse-engineer drivers for it I guess.
It helps a lot with CPU mining.
It helps with my anxiety.
I think.
I think 14 or 15.
I think 3TB 3.5" HDDs are like £40 nowadays?
I think 99% of people leave at 17:00.
I think about 26.
I think about £27.
I think about £300.
I think adderral is good for gaming.
I think all the factory refurbished ones are off the market now, so you can't get a cheap one any more.
I think Amazon and my credit card company should protect me, and even if not, I'll only lose £8.
I think around $23-$24m.
I think a tiny bit of motherboard bend doesn't usually cause a problem, right?
I think at the time I built my new PC, I bought one of the last remaining IDE motherboards.
I think Awesome Miner overestimates profit.
I think because I am in a household with only one earner on minimum wage, I should probably have a negative disposable income number.
I think because they're made out of metal instead of plastic.
I think broadband is fine for that.
I think Coral just gubbed me :(.
I think Corsair launched a new keyboard recently which is really good value.
I think CPU cooling could do with a revolution.
I think Dr Pepper is the best cola though.
I think Equihash uses less power than other algorithms for me.
I think everyone believes in electoral reform unless they're uneducated on it.
I think FIFA are probably the worst ATM.
I think girls in the office might be flirting with me quite often.
I think HansProleman might want it + my beyers.
I think having both DT770s and M50X is probably a waste since they're relatively similar headphones?
I think he has mental problems from doing too many drugs.
I think he means anything from him and his team is high importance.
I think he might be talking about drugs.
I think Hermes probably made a mistake.
I think he's comparing Keepass to Lastpass.
I think he's pretty pissed off with me now, thinking I am overcharging him.
I think HR knows our plates, but HR doesn't share information with anyone.
I think I can cashout my money now.
I think I can do it myself since it doesn't matter if it gets damaged at all.
I think I can stabalise this CPU at 5.1GHz.
I think I could get better with a CLI instead of GUI.
I think I deleted my Facebook account so couldn't actually log into Spotify or something.
I think I disabled pushbullet because it got annoying and caused random FPS drops.
I think I downloaded like 100k of my uni emails one time.
I think I'd rather buy a bigger desk.
I think I'd rather save my money.
I think I finally got a fully functional pair, but I need to check the earpads for glue.
I think I get 20ms-50ms depending on the game and server.
I think I get 24 + bank holidays + usually around 3 at Christmas time.
I think I get a shitload of other benefits too which I haven't really looked into.
I think I got a good deal at £550.
I think I got my phone from Hong Kong without having to pay VAT on it somehow.
I think I got one in the box with my Creative E5.
I think I have £120 left over now.
I think I have £2,500 in my Nationwide current account earning 5% and like £3,500 in my regular saver earning 5%.
I think I have a landline, but I don't have a phone.
I think I have an average-sized head.
I think I have an ear infection or some shit.
I think I have a problem because I wanna buy Sennheiser IE80s and Philips Fidelio X2 now......
I think I have Pulsatile Tinnitus.
I think I have to identify before I join. I did it the other way around and I was muted.
I think I just saw some dude vote for himself.
I think I keep getting chest pain because I do chest too much.
I think I'll be fine.
I think I'll buy my next CPU from siliconlottery.com.
I think I’ll fall you for even more.
I think I'll get a Corsair H105 for my Ncase M1.
I think I'll keep my E10K for a while yet.
I think I'll keep the PSU. It's worth more than £65 to me, but I'll still sell the case and CPU cooler because I'm not using them any more.
I think I'll need more than three.
I think I'll pass on upgrading my audio gear this year, and get a Pascall GPU instead.
I think I'll set my Auto Exchange to Eth.
I think I'll stick with it for now because I want to build up my wealth.
I think I'll switch from W10 to Ubuntu 16.04.
I think I'll throw them out.
I think I'll try using ebay.
I think I'll wait here until 13:00 to see if the directors have any leftovers from their lunch, and then I will go home..
I think I'm deaf above 17khz.
I think I'm dying.
I think I'm going to aim to keep a constant 5-6k emergency savings after I have my house.
I think I'm going to apply for HSBC current account again today.
I think I'm going to complete all the new customer offers then start doing the repeatable ones.
I think I'm going to end up either leaving my DT770s in the office, or selling/swapping them.
I think I'm going to upgrade my mouse later this year.
I think I'm going to use this mouse for a long time.
I think I might actually get 50% off Deliveroo or free Deliveroo or something from student discount.
I think I might be allergic to coffee.
I think I might be so used to good sound quality that I take it for granted and I've forgotten what shit sounds like.
I think I might buy the Etymotic e4rs.
I think I might just get it paid into my bank account.
I think I might know why.
I think I might miss the entire thing.
I think I might spend £30 to get a removeable cable added to my DT770.
I think I might wait for a GTX 1180.
I think I'm like top 1% or something, but I don't really care, I play for fun not for epeen.
I think I'm only getting £120 :(.
I think I'm paying about £2 a month for my VPN.
I think I'm still mining zcoin.
I think I'm using Swiftkey or something. I make constant typos but it corrects for touch typing.
I think I'm winning.
I think I'm working using 21" displays right now.
I think I need a 5GHz 7700K.
I think I need either an Exynos Samsung phone, or preferably an LG phone with a good DAC.
I think I need to find a gf who will share the rent and not complain about all the videogames I play.
I think I need to just let it charge up before I use it.
I think I need to upgrade my GTX 970. It's outputting so much heat it's making the room uncomfortable..
I think in general, but feel free to pick at straws in your vein attempt to prove me wrong.
I think Iota was saying something earlier about making some sort of asian gf crew.
I think I overanalyse things.
I think I overpaid for a new exhaust yesterday.
I think I prefer Gnome/GTK programs.
I think I probably do. How else would I have done the topcashback cashback?
I think I probably miss the entire thing.
I think I ran that program on / before.
I think I saw one of my accounts was updated in the middle of the night.
I think isolation is an important features of closed-back cans, otherwise why not just go open?
I think I started up one of them but the love FoV turned me off within 10 minutes..
I think I started up one of them but the low FoV turned me off within 10 minutes..
I think it funds social security?
I think it just lacks impact resistance? You can compensate for that with a good case.
I think it'll be about 24m.
I think it'll be fine if I use 1.5 kwh or more a year.
I think it'll do okay, probably a C.
I think it'll probably go up another couple of mil.
I think it peaked around halfway through for me.
I think it's a bit less bent.
I think it's a pretty good little headphone.
I think it's a working visa or something.
I think it's better if a display is just a display.
I think it's going to be another record breaker.
I think it's going to be around £35 postage + insurance, but "fragile" and "delicate" items are prohibited so I don't know if that counts PCs?
I think it's going to end up around $23.5m.
I think it's insulated well, it just has the limitations of electric heating.
I think it's insulated well, it just has the limitations of electric insulation.
I think it's just everything over a fixed period.
I think it's LoL and CS:GO.
I think it's possible to get a USB2 adapter for the front ports, but I never use front ports so I never bothered to fix it.
I think it's probably a legal restriction. It's the same limit and excuse for the 10,000 download limit.
I think it's wireless charging.
I think it was only 12m.
I think it was some nVidia driver issue.
I think it will flop hard.
I think it would be a lot harder to prove than physical though?
I think it would be a really good investment opportunity for us, and we'll stay at the forefront of crypto.
I think it would probably be fine without the paper, but I just want to be sure.
I think I've made about £540 so far this month.
I think I've taken it at 16:00 before.
I think I walked past your flat with my gf a couple of weeks ago.
I think I was going to buy it a couple of years ago but it used GFWL instead of Steam.....
I think I will just use Ubuntu home directory encryption.
I think I would have been fine if I opted for 8GB instead of 16GB.
I think KDE is overclutterd?
I think later this year I'm going to have a problem where I have more money than I'm able to generate interest on.
I think LoL is just expanding into developing countries.
I think M50X are the most stylish.
I think Marlin might be a codename.
I think most pubs do now, but a few still don't.
I think my 3.5mm to 2.5mm adapter will arrive today, so I can finally use my M50X headphones ^^.
I think my AKG K702s sound a lot better than my DT770s actually.
I think my AKG K702s were made in Austria or something.
I think my BSODs are caused by my CPU and my black screens are caused by my GPU.
I think my Chromecast might be fake.
I think my cores aren't fast enough?
I think my CPU and monitor are the main culprits though.
I think my credit card company or Amazon will protect me though.
I think my DT770s don't fill a niche I'm not filling with my other headphones.
I think my eardrum may have perfurated or something.
I think my GPU miner keeps stopping whenever my wife logs into the computer.
I think my headphones are made out of neodymums.
I think my hearing has mostly come back now.
I think my K65 uses micro, but I haven't really checked.
I think my K702s sound better than DT770s, and DT770s are bassy and K702s are bright.
I think my M50X I have it set around 3.
I think my mum is a alcohol addict.
I think my mum just got a pay cut of like £10k.
I think my next headphones are going to be Custom Art Music One.
I think my next pair will be the Beyerdynamic Custom One Pro.
I think my next upgrade will be to buy a well-binned 7700K.
I think my parents resent how much I've costed them. Even though I'm >18 and they don't take me on holidays and stuff any more, I'm always asking them for money.
I think my RAM is /probably/ fine.
I think my shared clipboard works.
I think my shitty work laptop really struggles to run Firefox with so many open tabs.
I think my temps are too high still, so I will try to reapply thermal paste and adjust FAN RPM and do some cable management.
I think my tinnitus is causing me depression.
I think my Waze is more accurate though.
I think my wife might be a weeb.
I think next year I'll have even more because there'll be more bank holidays?
I think NiceHash is too successful as a business for them to exit scam any time soon. The only thing I worry about is that governments will want to shut it down.
I think NiceHash Legacy is more profitable for me. CryptoNight seems to run better.
I think nVidia and ATI have improved a lot over the years.
I think nVidia may have fixed it with the GTX 10 series, because the GTX 9 series doesn't idle properly if your monitor is running above 120hz.
I think nVidia put the limit in there to stop people OCing cheap GTX 970s instead of buying the GTX 980.
I think once my Ncase and 240mm rad arrive I won't have much reason to upgrade my PC itself for a while.
I think once my probation ends I'll talk to my manager and try to bring my mechanical keyboard into work again.
I think only bible stuff.
I think other than that you should be fine.
I think our company allows social media anyway.
I think overclockers might test the chips a little more thoroughly, but that one you linked is still a great deal I think.
I think paying it back might be good if you have too much savings to claim benefits, or if you want to take out another student loan.
I think people just think of me as the office bitch. I'll just do everything that needs doing.
I think people were just lying.
I think pub gee is about to smash its record yet again.
I think Q2 2016.
I think resting my arm on the desk is probably better for accuracy anyway.
I think rory might be gay too, he plays League of Legends and doesn't have a gf.
I think Royalmail is similar, like 10-20p more.
I think /r/vegan is probably the biggest circlejerk on Reddit.
I think she's just attention seeking.
I think she's just trying to be sassy.
I think she thought that hard drives cost a fuckload more than they actually do.
I think she wants to hold onto it because she has no income and doesn't know when she will get one.
I think Skybet is heavily restricting my stakes now.
I think so.
I think so. Check out ebay or massdrop or mouse spec spreadsheets or buying guides.
I think so, I'm not an expert on German law though.
I think some displays have hardware support for it now.
I think spending £2-£4k on an ASIC is most profitable, but probably most risky.
I think spotify keeps removing songs.
I think Stremio is probably better.
I think that could lead to some NSFW results.
I think that's fake.
I think that's how it works.
I think that's probably what I'll do then.
I think that was my fault....
I think the 1080TI is relatively untouched by miners.
I think the bad reputation Beyer Custom One Pros has is undeserved.
I think the built-up fluid stuck behind my ear drum is starting to cum out.
I think the climate control in my room is the bottleneck because I always have cold-as-fuck hands.
I think the coffee had laxative effects on me.
I think the council is going to take it away.
I think the drivers might be mismatched but I'm not sure.
I think the fit is good.
I think the latter is probably more likely?
I think the M50X is a bit more portable and the DT770s have a bit larger soundstage and sub bass.
I think the main problem I have is that my female partner probably doesn't want an unsightly box in the house.
I think the main problem is that living with my parents isn't good value.
I think the open beta has started now, or starting today.
I think the Philips Fidelo looks like it might have deeper.
I think the problem is that it's a thick braided cable. My G400s was a standard plastic cable which was much more flexible.
I think the problem is that Spotify has a licensing restriction where it's not licensed to store more than 3,000 tracks on a machine at a time.
I think the PSU fan shuts down if the load is light enough. The other fans will probably be very quiet at low RPM but will get a bit louder during load.
I think the real motivation behind regulating crypto is to keep the regime in power.
I think there are some credit cards which can do it cheaply.
I think there might be a silent d in there too.
I think there's a CMOS reset on the board.
I think there's email lists which send out offers.
I think there's going to be at least one big extermination event in our lifetime.
I think there's laws against sexual services though.
I think there's only 1X hard drive daisy chain cable I'm not using.
I think the same price it is now.
I think these could replace my DT770s if I replace the pads with DT770s.
I think the V30 is the phone with most of the features I need, but it's fucking expensive.
I think the Wi-Fi repeaters stations we're using use powerline too, so it's the worse of both worlds.
I think they gave me the wrong username and password.
I think they have an api.
I think they just want to give up now.
I think they're both IMAP.
I think they're endgame for me.
I think they're going to take it back to Scan who will send it with DPD insteaed.
I think they rejected me last time.
I think they're just tired of trying to fix it. They've done so many tests and asked me to change router settings and all sorts.
I think they're only ~21" screens too.
I think they're overpaying us just to make sure we don't get bored and leave..
I think they're paying them with credit card.
I think they're trying to scam people.
I think they've given me a fibre line but their billing department thinks I am on ADSL.
I think they've gone up in price recently.
I think this guy doesn't know how to use Outlook.
I think this is the only channel I haven't been banned yet for some reason.
I think this piece of shit computer would crash constantly if I had a slideshow.
I think those games run on Linux now, but you should check.
I think today I will do some cardio or legs.
I think Top Gear cannot recover from its loss and won't be as large of a show any more.
I think UK society has a body dysmorphia disorder.
I think universal basic income will probably exist before I retire.
I think usually the afternoons and evenings.
I think we'll have 4k VR within 5 years.
I think we might be at the point that mining on Nicehack is more profitable than mining garlic.
I think we're gonna go >$20m this year.
I think we should leave the EU and join China instead.
I think we use RDP?
I think we've been using the points on nachos mostly.
I think Windoze 7 PCs with a shared networked drive and a recent version of Microsoft Excel.
I think WoW ruined them really. WoW came along and they realised they could get more £££ with more and more customers. Then they rejected Ice Frog and declined to make Dota 2.
I think you can as the seller.
I think you can easily OC it to 2000/C9 too.
I think you can watch all the videos without an account.
I think you can withdraw and overdeposit to it too.
I think you'd like it because it will have an amazing DAC inside it.
I think you have to pay the landline tax with anyone you buy from.
I think you know a lot more about nutrition than me.
I think you mean HansProleman.
I think you might win an auction today.
I think you misunderstood.
I think your CPU runs at 4.2GHz at stock?
I think you're forgetting that my gf is Korean.
I think you're overspending on the RAM a bit?
I think you're talking out of your ass m9.
I think your pastebin crashed my firefox.
I thought 51% was all that was needed, so things could keep changing constantly.
I thought about accumulating vertcoin, but then I'd just need to exchange for LTC/BTC/ETH to convert to fiat anyway.
I thought about asking my stepdad that question.
I thought about auto exchanging just before withdrawing.
I thought about buying it when it was on sale, but I'm way too busy with Dota 2, CS:GO and Overwatch to play other games right now.
I thought about doing it at uni because I wasn't on metered electricity.
I thought about doing that.
I thought about doing that earlier this summer.
I thought about going wireless.
I thought about not auto converting at all.
I thought albums were a limitation of physical media?
I thought all the big ISPs banned it.
I thought Amsterdam made weed illegal for tourists?
I thought Apple just released an iphone?
I thought BBC used HTML5 now?
I thought Bitcoin supported up to 8 decimal places?
I thought booking.com has cashback?
I thought cuck was a porn category.
I thought DOGE was Reddit's own meme coin?
I thought DPD were supposed to be good.
I thought everyone that worked in HR was a female.
I thought Excel had really amazing functionality built into it?
I thought Facebook was a really evil company dedicated on spying on everyone, now I'm not so sure.
I thought Frank is for people who are feeling suicidal?
I thought gas would be cheaper.
I thought guests couldn't be killed, but they get beaten and knocked out a lot it seems.
I thought he was morpheus.
I thought i5 would be enough because Dota 2 and CS:GO didn't benefit from HT.
I thought I could be a landlord without renting out the property.
I thought I couldn't do shit compared to everyone else.
I thought I could withdraw a precise amount straight from MPH to you.
I thought I'd buy from them to AVOID getting shafted.
I thought I'd have bought by now so I didn't bother.
I thought I'd have more, has your mining income decreased too?
I thought I did.....
I thought I did, but maybe not.
I thought I didn't have much time to gamble this month, but it's looking like my profit will be over £500.
I thought I disabled content control.
I thought if I ever buy a GTX 1080TI then I want to be sure my CPU won't bottleneck it.
I thought I had 200 minutes.
I thought I had a lot at 550.
I thought I opted out when I set up the router.
I thought it already was 68.
I thought it happened some time between the big wars.
I thought it meant they were doing cocaine or something.
I thought it might be something interesting you would like to discuss.
I thought it needed to press against the CPU really tight to spread all the paste out.
I thought it streamed from the Chromecast itself?
I thought it was about pizza.
I thought it was a minimum of 12 months.
I thought it was going to be silent.
I thought it was just a deleting program.
I thought it was nonsense.
I thought it was okay because the office is so noisy that you can't hear it over the noise sometimes.
I thought it was pending for ages.
I thought it was really common a few years ago.
I thought it was the pedo board.
I thought it was the subreddits.
I thought I was 24, but maybe rory knows better.
I thought I was getting £40 in free bets, but only £10 :(.
I thought I was going to die.
I thought I was going to die from sleep deprivation.
I thought I was really bad at only 2 years.
I thought I wouldn't get it until Monday, so after the Overwatch beta.
I thought JSA was paid by NI and not tax?
I thought macOS is what it was called in the 90s.
I thought MPs smoked weed.
I thought only 14 year olds make those sort of jokes.
I thought Telegram was never secure?
I thought that's how marriage works?
I thought that the secret to good-sounding audio was to just add more bass.
I thought that they were Nuw Labour?
I thought that was 5 weeks away.
I thought the box would be way bigger.
I thought the machine was for gaming.
I thought the point of a bonus was that it wasn't guaranteed?
I thought they had servers all around the globe though?
I thought they were called bi elections because it's open to bi people?
I thought they were close than they were.
I thought the zone was at least 40, since I didn't know the speed limit but the area didn't seem very built-up.
I thought we were >2% now?
I thought we were friends and going to play Overwatch together?!?!?
I thought you bought a shit stack?
I thought you didn't bet on events more than 24 hours in the future?
I thought you had >2000?
I thought you had a gf.
I thought you had already watched the film.
I thought you had a wife?
I thought you left EE?
I thought you liked tab treess????
I thought you meant a bicycle lmao.
I thought you moved to London?
I thought you sold your DT770s?
I thought you wanted to know what I think of the Philips Fidelio X2?
I thought you were gaining weight and hitting the gym?
I thought you were going to say something like "15".
I thought you were going to switch to internal too?
I thought you were interested in them?
I thought you were making a joke.
I thought you weren't going to order the Massdrop one?
I thought you were referring to Titanfall.
I thought you were silver.
I thought you were talking about graphics cards.
I thought you were top 20?
I thought you were trying to get to 3k?
I thought you worked at EE lmao.
I thought you would be.
I threw them out.
It hurt so fucking much.
It is.
It is?
It is a gift.
It is a maisonette not a house!!!
IT is a pretty broad term.
IT is behind me.
It is braided.
It is embarassing when my co-workers ask me why I am taking 20 minute shits!!!!
It is for me.
IT is helping her now.
It is if you plan on spending it all soon and need low risk.
It is illegal to sneak into the cinema, right?
It is? I set it to 1.8v and it crashed.
It is more profitable.
It is possible.
It is profitable ffs.
It is relevant.
It is time for Firefox to reclaim its place as king of the web browsers.
It is time for Firefox to retake its place as king of browsers.
It is unrepresentative, I'm sure David Cameron and David Milliband are aware of that.
It is yes.
I titled my listing "Beyerdynamic DT 770 PRO 80Ohms headphones with new EDT 770 SG earpads".
It just arrived.
It just changed though.
It just doesn't seem right that running a stress test on my PC is an efficient way to heat my flat.
It just keeps IFing until it gets it right!!!!
It just looks messy.
It just occured to me that I could have made hundreds of £ more if I used topcashback when doing new customer offers.
It just routes the audio back out.....
It just works.
It keeps crashing.
It keeps going down?
It keeps going up and up.
It launched.
It limits to like 50-60.
It'll be FIFA and CoD and possibly LoL.
It'll be the same laptop but with a silver top instead of black according to the IT man.
It'll be the same laptop but with a silver top instead of grey according to the IT man.
It'll eat more battery too.
It'll give you liver cancer though?
It'll have to go in the lounge.
It'll only take me 14 years to save up for it.
It'll probably get to me within a couple of weeks.
It'll probably stay at 45p I think.
It'll probably switch back to 90% Equihash soon.
It'll renew next year for $29.
It'll reset in April.
It'll run Crysis lmao.
It'll still be 10X higher than any other game.
It'll stop mould growth and keep my pipes from breaking.
It'll stop your card from going above 80C.
It'll suck because I'll have to sell the flat I just bought.
It'll take a while before it's capable of outperforming a pro team.
It'll take longer to reach 1LTC to withdraw.
It loads so fast with 1000 tabs open now omg.
It looked so much more blurry when I looked around.
It looks 10X as big as mine.
It looks a lot nicer.
It looks awesome.
It looks good.
It looks like Canonical is trying to make Unity easy for Windoze users and touchscreen users and not making it a great desktop DE.
It looks like gdax have low trading fees and good prices.
It looks like I'm going to have to delay buying my GTX 1080TI for a while :(.
It looks like I need one with flexible tubing.
It looks like it's a 2.5mm twist-lock though....
It looks like NeoScrypt just had a temporary high order.
It looks like one of our offices.
It looks like Overwatch is going to use a fairer Dota/CS-esque business model instead of the greedy p2w model that Riot uses.
It looks like the best scaling fan you can buy right now..
It looks like the film might be bad.
It looks like there's lots of ugly girls in Spaced but lots of cute girls in Marco Polo.
It looks like the single-thread performance is about the same or slightly lower than the 7700K, but it has two more cores.
It looks like you input so much data, I CBA to do that.
It looks nice.
It looks super easy.
It made me think of you.
It makes formula and conditional formatting and data validation and everything impossible.
It makes my office quieter.
It makes no sense to buy until the last day of the event.
It makes people respond faster.
It makes the 25% flat twice as expensive lmao.
It makes the bass nicer without ruining the other frequencies at all.
It makes you a criminal though.
It may be difficult for you to understand if you're so used to 60hz.
It means completely different things in every context.
It means I have to go to bed 20 minutes earlier.
It means I only get 400FPS instead of 420.
It means Reddit is part of PRISM now.
It means that it increases by multiplication each time instead of increasing a linear amount.
It means that one of my CPU cores running at 4GHz is faster than one of your CPU cores running at 4GHz.
It means weed.
It means you are really good at something.
It measures player activity not the total number of players.
It might be a bit higher, who knows.
It might mean the same number of people are playing but playing less.
It might not arrive until Wednesday, and I'm going to a conference then.
It might not be the best, but it seems to work okay for me.
It might not be the GPU.
It might still be better than powershop.
It mostly just deletes cache and temp files.
It moves so fast.
It must sound like crap.
It needs the bots to constantly learn like real players do.
It needs to be 10 seconds.
It needs to reach $3,527,000 by the end of today.
It never expired.
I told her I love gambling.
I told her it was an internal job.
I told her not to.
I told her not to talk about bible stuff.
I told her she can fuck off if she wants to ask to borrow money from me again.
I told her that she can live with me if she pays rent.
I told her to fuck off with her peasantry.
I told him he can have the trip for free.
I told him he can just have the day for free. If he pays me £33 (what he wants to pay me, not the £39 we agreed) then I will just send it back. I won't accept part-payment.
I told him he should have said something two weeks ago and he tells me "I trusted you to set a reasonable price".
I told him I don't want the fake product and I want a full refund.
I told him I'm not going to bother taking him to court, it would just be nice if he'd pay what he agreed to not what he thinks it costs me.
I told him to copy and paste it lmao.
I told him to just look at the fucking calendar when he sets up a meeting.
I told my co-worker that his headphones are missing a lot of the audio because of the lack of mids.
I told my father to send me the 37p first but he's going to send £2,000 in one go.
I told my gf I was gambling last night and now she's angry with me.
I told my gf to stop sending me pics so that my colleagues stop seeing them on my monitor.
I told my wife I'm only making £200 a month from gambling.
I told my wife to tell her government to stop fucking up our crypto.
I told someone at work I got lucky and she thought I meant I banged a girl wtf.
I told them definitely not.
I told them I've given up trying to get them to deliver my parcel to me.
I told them I wanted to transfer £1.
I told them I was in work a few times, but they didn't care.
I told them that my employer pays me 45p per mile for fuel, wear and tear and depreciation, and that I'm charging them a lot less than that divided between the three of us, and they're still saying they won't pay it and that I'm profiting from them.
I told them they sent it to my home address and then they sent one to my uni address too.
I told them yesterday.
I told you.
I told you I am not a troll because we have a strict anti-trolling policy at my job!!!!!
I told you I have a VPN.
I told you to buy litecoin.
I told you to tell me if you find any good cashback deals omg.
I told you to use Quantum + Tree Style Tabs ffs.
I told you you were rich.
It only failed a couple of times.
It only has to cache once, right?
It only looks bad because Twitter limits characters so everything comes off as passive aggressive.
I took like £1,000 in holiday pay one week and paid off a shitload of my student loan.
I took like 20 days of holiday as cash and it got taxed so hard.
I took my COPs out with me for a walk and the right cup stopped working.
I took my gf for a Burrito and bought her a Margarita and her face went so red.
I took my gf there.
I took my gf to London Zoo and London Dungeon.
I took my gf to Pizza Express too.
I took my gf to the asian supermarket once.
I took my trousers off because it was restricting my bladder, and then the staff got cross with me for running to the toilets without trousers on.
I took my wife, found out she doesn't handle gambling well.
I took off all my clothes.
It operates on a Robin Hood scheme.
It pays more money.
It pisses me off.
It probably has the most functionality of any browser.
It probably is actually. It can be used for compost and fertiliser.
It produces too much heat for my bedroom.
It puts me off getting the HTC 10 and it's non-waterproof speakers and getting the Samsung S7 instead.
It puts the university's reputation into disrepute!!!!!!!1.
I trade GRLC for BTC then BTC for BCH.
It really triggers me when people don't know the difference between downloading and uploading.
I treat it as money that I am not allowed to spend.
I treat it like a non-E7 tariff.
It reboots itself and starts up Nicehack, but I have to remote in and change it to garlic.
It reduces my framerate by 1-10%.
It requires two software licenses for everything.
I tried adjusting the fan curve so it's less than 20% under 60C, but it just goes up to 60C anyway.....
I tried adjusting the fan curve so the GPU fan doesn't spin until it reaches 60C, but it reaches 60C even at idle.
I tried a standing desk, but it's not much better than sitting really.
I tried out their shitty VR.
I tried Protonmail but it limits the amount of emails you can send, you have to use it inside a browser, and has a really low storage limit.
I tried Samsung's headset and it was shit.
I tried that, but I just broke it off.....
I tried the legacy one but the fucking CPU benchmark doesn't work.
I tried to do it but I get the error "You are not a channel operator on #cryptocurrency.".
I tried to download 10,000 songs and Spotify told me to go fuck myself.
I tried to get a better job and I failed the interview.
I tried to login but it didn't work.
I tried to set it up on my work laptop earlier but stupid anti-malware blocked it :(.
I tried to stop and I got crazy withdrawal symptoms.
I tried watching some TV with a Chinese girl in my room on my monitor's speakers and they were fucking awful, we could barely hear the sound.
I tried Winminer.
It runs like shit on Windoze and doesn't run at all on Linux.
I tryed to test it my self hearing music and using SineGen,also i give to my freand,but can't spot any thing wrong.How ever since there was a complain and i feel that he is  honest person i must sell it as foulty..
I try to.
I try to bring the volume down as low as possible, so I bought a 12.60L case.
I try to do something nice for people and they just throw it back in my face omfg!
I try to get her attention to tell her I know how to fix it, but she tells me she's too busy trying to fix the problem to talk to me right now lmao.
I try to look after my expensive electronics.
It's 0.9% APR lmao.
It's 100% of my income sometimes.
It's 12.6L.
It's 14% returns.
It's £16500.00 - £17500.00 per annum.
It's 1% EVERY YEAR.
It's 2007 so that counts as a new build, right?
It's 2016 and we have 8TB hard drives.
It's 2016 for fuck sake.
It's £25 for a year.
It's ~£2,700 a month.
It's 3,333 per device.
It's 3 days and 9 hours to go, I'm more interested in attracting people for the upcoming last-minute bidding war.
It's £3 for only a small packet, but beef jerkey is amazing!!!!!!
ITS 420.
IT'S 4:20!!!!!!!!!1.
It's 4:20 omg.
IT'S 420 OMG.
ITS 420 OMG.
It's 4/5 efficiency on walls and windows.
It's £55 cheaper than the similar product I bought from overclockers.
It's 5kg.
It's 5% on the balance.
It's 60hz though....
It's a 0% purchase card for 28 months btw.
It's a 970.
It's a better justification to leave the EU than anything Boris Johnson can come up with.
It's a big one.
It's a bit creepy and perverted, isn't it?
It's a bit far from me.
It's a bit less "crashy".
It's a bit of a waste of high-end headphones if you're not even going to listen to kpop on them.
It's a boring office day today :(.
It's about 124.
It's about a Russian girl.
It's about the same as pre-TI last year.
It's a breach of my human rights.
It's a CoC.
It's a combined line/mic/optical in port.
It's a common problem with this model.
It's a competitive team-based game.
It's a con.
It's a costly way of doing it.
It's actually a decent screwdriver set and compliments my ifixitkit well.
It's actually powerful enough for me atm.
It's actually very lucrative.
It's a DAC.
It's a day, I don't take hours leave.
It's a delidded and binned 7700K so it's guaranteed to hit 5.2GHz.
It's a desk mount.
It's a dictatorship.
It's a different office.
It's a distribution?
It's a dogshit PC and definitely not budget.
It's AER.
It's affordable rent.
It's a Fiio E17K, right?
It's a film about music.
It's a fine balance for me right now.
It's a front to ban political dissent.
It's a fucking alpha.
It's a fucking beast.
It's a fucking gimmick masheen.
It's a fucking mess right now, but I can't put it together until the problem is fixed.
It's a fucking nice case though.
It's a fucking public good once they've paid for it, what do they expect me to do, just wait outside for them instead of coming in too?
It's a fun gaming headset because it has emphasised bass, but AKGs and Audio Technicas have more detail and soundstage.
It's a G440 and a 7700K.
It's against the IT policy to install software without permission.
It's a gen 2 Google Chromecast though.
It's a good <=5 year investment choice.
It's a good card, just don't overpay for it.
It's a good film..
It's a good monitor for pub gee.
It's a good OCer.
It's a good suggestion though.....
It's a household appliance retailer similar to Currys.
It said I was going 50 when the speed camera said I was only going 40.
It said I will be prosecuted because I went 40 in a 30 zone.
It's all about clock speed.
It's all about pivoting really.
It's all electric.
It's all just a different form of currency.
It's all Microsoft's fault, they did some shady stuff to get a monopoly on web browsers, then they didn't give people auto updates.
It's all my fault.
It's all there.
It's almost a deal breaker.
It's a long-term lazy solution.
It's a long way to go just for a concert.
It's a lot of effort and scary to try it myself.....
It's a lot of money, so it's worth it.
It's already gone up to 26C in my flat.
It's alright because TI6 is in Seattle.
It's also +ev.
It's also interesting how the Conservative campaign is very much about how Theresa May is so great and Corbyn is so evil, whereas the Labour campaign is about the policies.
It's also like WhatsApp.
It's always worked.
It's always worth switching for the cashback.
It's a major.
It's a massive mess ATM because it's all opened up to make it easier to work on.
It's amazing how a country with such fit girls can fuck up esport event organisation so badly.
It's amazing how evil Apple is because people love them for dicking them over.
It's amazing how many people are addicted to sugar and alcohol but nobody thinks it's a problem and it's killing hundreds of thousands of people in the UK every year.
It's amazing how many people are addicting to sugar and alcohol but nobody thinks it's a problem and it's killing hundreds of thousands of people in the UK every year.
It's amazing how many requests I get to reset the password of the same people every week.
It's amazing how much extra you have to pay to get stuff added to a Toyota Aygo that you can just do with a Smartphone lmao.
It's a modern flat.
It's a monitor of humidity and usually temperature too.
It's an absolutely fucking brilliant mouse.
It's an AMAZING fucking coincidence that a son of a president also became a president, and his younger brother might become one too!!!!!!
It's an auction.
It's a new build, so it probably has some insulation between the first and ground floor?
It's an i3-3120M.
It's an i5, which means it doesn't have HT.
It's a nice-have, but IDK if I'll be using it.
It's an idiotic idea.
It's an illusion of the photo I think.
It's an incredible film.
It's annoying.
It's annoying as fuck because they're blocking a lane of traffic just because they're afraid of anyone turning left.
It's annoying how much pressure I'm getting to buy a bigger house immediately after I've just bought a flat.
It's annoying though, because I can't get my TSB 5% contactless cashback with my credit card.
It's annoying when you can hear other peoples' music.
It's an old card.
It's a one of a kind.
It's a pain in the fucking ass omfg.
It's a pretty shitty replica then.
It's a pretty small tank already.
It's a private matter.
It's a pro mouse.
It's a really fucking good account.
It's a really good film.
It's a really impressive case.
It's a really nice keyboard though.
It's a really really good case.
It's a really really nice keyboard.
It's a really small sexy-looking case, but it can fit some of the highest-end components inside it.
It's a really well-designed case.
It's a real shame that the website you linked me aren't able to add a 3.5mm jack for me.
It's a reference blower cooler, right?
It's a reference card, right?
It's a refurbished model, so I don't want to put it under unnecessary stress.
It's a regressive tax.
It's a religious ceremony.
It's a ridiculously powerful GPU yeah.
It's a shame she can't ult herself.
It's a shame that it'll never sell as well as Beats.
It's a shame that my 4690K @ 4.5GHz bottlenecks my GTX 970.
It's a shithole.
It's a short walk from my desk.
It's ASIC and AMD resistant too.
It's a Silverstone too so it has a good warranty IIRC.
It's as much as you'll need for a while, and it's not too expensive.
It's a spin-off?
It's a S&S ISA.
It's a sub that makes fun of TV shows with unrealistic examples of computer hacking.
It's a tax not a loan, so it's always worth claiming refunds.
It's a tax that hits poor people harder than rich people.
It's a total clusterfuck.
It's a trade-off of convenience and security.
It's a tricky mod for the DT770s.
It's a venue specifically for weddings.
It saves me having to plug in parts before testing it's all working okay.
It's a weird way of heating your flat too.
It's a well documented problem on the forum.
It's a well-insulated new-build, but it has electric storage heaters and no gas.
It's a work SIM.
It says 1154L Cumulative on my tax code.
It says "Fast Cast" on it and has no Google logo.
It says "up to date".
It says you're 13,128 in EU West.
It's bad for your gaming skill and driving too.
It's bad for your guts too.
It's barely any different than a large table to these people.
It's basically just a bunch of sounds.
It's because in the 80s the sugar industry funded studies to show that fat is the problem and not sugar.
It's becoming a problem.
It's been £30 since 1051 days ago.
It's been a downwards trend over the past 24 hours.
It's been a few days now and my BGO cashback still hasn't tracked.
It's been a month since Hermes got my scan.co.uk parcel.
It's been confirmed as a haox.
It's been declining since the start of the 20th century.
It's been making a comeback recently, I'm not sure if it's still trending.
It's been on my wishlist for a while.
It's been over an hour.
It's been over three months and my connection is still shit.
It's been really well received by pros and casuals and everyone.
It's been so long.
It's been up for 72 hours without a problem before.
It's being delivered to my house.
It's better.
It's better than any GPU under £40.
It's better to change the in-game sensitivity for that.
It's big.
It's big and bulky and needs a battery.
It's big news.
It's bottlenecking my GTX970.
It's bottlenecking my GTX970 @ 1080p.
It's BS.
It's BS how can they have a promotion page on their site if it's not even valid any more?
It's buggy cutting edge hardware.
It's called an analogy omg.
It's called free2play business model.
It's called having skill.
It's called jealousy, look it up m9.
It's called "programming" for a reason otherwise it would be "applicationing"!!!!!
It's called skill.
It's called snake oil.
It's called stoozing.
It's cancer.
It's changed.
It's cheaper than Origin too.
It's cheaper to buy handset and contract seperately.
It's cheap now.
It's cheap there.
It's CLI and not a GUI.
It's close to my current workplace and close to Nationwide HQ.
It's coming.
It's coming in the next few days.
It's confirmed ransomware.
It's confusing only because people won't use consistent terminology.
It's considered cheating.
It's consumer electronic.
It's corruption though.
It's craaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaazy popular there.
It's crazy.
It's crazy addictive.
It's creepy.
It's cruel.
It's Currys.
It's dead now though.
It's definitely 1154L on my pay slip.
It's definitely not my 'main game'.
It's definitely possible to hear the difference up to 320kbps.
It's definitely risky.
It's definitely worth the price to a lot of well-off people.
It's delayed slightly, I have to withdraw it out of my pool's internal wallet before I can send to you. Shouldn't be more than 10 minutes.
It's designed to be misleading to anyone who doesn't look at the numbers.
It's devious.
It's done pre-boot.
It's dumb how the party decides the candidate like that.
It's dusty as fuck.
It's easier for Germans to learn English than it is for Korean.
It's easier to just be lazy.
It's easier to use my home PC.
It seemed like the world was a more peaceful place when Vengaboys was in their prime.
It seems even worse than what we have in the UK.
It seems I am getting the free bets by staking £50 that normally requires staking £100.
It seems like a lot of hassle and lost interest just to get a slight reduction off the cost of bottled water and energy drinks.
It seems like Mozilla was being restrictive with their licensing?
It seems like one of the best ones, but I've heard good things about Cyberghost which is only £15 atm.
It seems like they have too many guns.
It seems pretty good because it adds vsync without capping the framerate and adding latency.
It seems so strange, and tabloids always make stuff up.
It seems too good to be true.
It's effectively a new power treadmill every few months.
It's effort to take all the photos and create all the listings and everything.
It's enough.
It's Exchange server yeah.
It's external.
It's factually correct, it happened a couple of years ago.
It's fairly small.
It's fake news.
It's faster and easier.
It's fine.
It's fine, the price was correct at the time of transaction.
It's fine though, I'll just do it from my remote connection to my home PC.
It's food that's the big deal.
It's for 18 year olds who will buy in their 20s.
It's fractured though, lots of people on consoles.
It's FREE.
It's free AFAIK.
It's Friday....
It's from an exchange, wait 10 mins.
It's fucked up.
It's fucking easy to enter a wrong digit on bank details and lost £2,000.
It's fucking expensive.
It's fucking funny how many people think video games cause more violence than football.
It's fucking good value.
ITS FUCKING HORRIBLWE.
It's fucking ridiculous how my 4690K is bottlenecking my framerate in CS:GO.
It's fucking spelt Ibiza too.
It's fucking stupid.
It's fucking weird and creepy and unnatural too.
It's fucking weird how effortlessly DPD deliver to me, whereas Hermes makes it seem like a really fucking difficult challenge.
It's full of filthy casuals and fat people and no hot grills.
It's full of weirdos too.
It's funny how I am in massive debt but trying to save up for a mortgage deposit to put myself in massive debt to another organisation.
It's funny how shit little countries like Belarus get amazing LANs, but the UK gets fuck all esports events.
It's funny how you try to justify using derogatory terms against innocent people when you play League of Legends and fund Riot and Tencent.
It's funny watching my gf try to get into my encrypted phone.
It's futureproof.
It's getting too high.
It's going down.
It's going to be a massive problem soon, especially when more heroes are added and people can switch heroes at random.
It's going to be a right pain trying to find accounts to put it in.
It's going to be fucking expensive though I bet.
It's going to cost me £17,000 + ~ £1.5k legal fees.
It's going to crash the price of GRLC for no reason.
It's going to make my life so much easier, since I have like 420 bank accounts now.
It's going to require lots of formula writing which I really CBA to do.
It's going to sell for a lot more than £10,000.
It's gonna be either mortgage fraud, inability to pay, or inability to get off the SVR.
It's gonna be juicy.
It's gonna have shit mobility though.
It's good.
It's good because it will make the rockets re-usable which will bring down the cost of space travel?
It's good customer servicew.
It's good enough for lowest graphics.
It's good for testing system stability.
It's good if I win because I didn't lay it.
It's good once it's got going, but small files still takes ages.
It's good that you don't have to pay the Windoze tax.
It's good to have a small kit and a big kit.
It's good to take disabled people to theme parks.
It's got 5ms response time.
It's got a battery and it's portable like your Fiio E17K, but I'll probably just use my HTC One M9 as a source because it's more convenient.
It's got a bit more depth to it than Overwatch.
It's got a fuckload of features.
It's got algo-switching too.
It's got a lot of detail in it.
It's got a lot of features on the hardware itself and Creative don't supply drivers for Linux.
It's got a lot of negative reviews from misgonists.
It's got a lot of problems.
It's got a shitload of servers, lets you use up to 5 devices per subscription, and has a killswitch.
It's got Huge Jackman in it.
It's got lower input lag and a lower response time than my other 60hz monitor.
It's got Morpheus and that evil old man guy.
It's got my Beyer's bass, and my AKG's soundstage and detail.
It's got so many nutrients even though it's a tasty meat-tasting high protein food.
It's got some really good reviews.
It's got soooooooooo many features man.
It's gotten out of hand.
It's gotten slower lmao.
It's got that LoL-faggot called Thorin.
It's got the best CPU?
It's got the most amazing headphone output ever.
It's got to be either the PSU or the GPU surely.
It's got up a lot.
It's hard enough going to the gym and I'm only working 37 hours.
It's hard enough just asking them for a fucking £1 mouse.
It's harder to move the mouse.
It's harder to ship a built PC than it is to ship the components..
It's hard to judge my own attractiveness though.
It's hard to prioritise my inbox because all the emails I get are from white people I hate.
It's hard to say too.
It's hard to stay at the top ranks unless you play every day.
It's hard to stop her when I'm tired as fuck and she won't let me sleep until she's satisfied.
It's harming my Reddit productivity!
It's helpful to get a second opinion.
It's Hemes's fault!!!
It's Hermes that's fucking up though. They haven't delivered my scan.co.uk parcel either.
It's high enough already.
It's higher specs than my Nokia Lumina I think.
It's higher than my Speedometer, so it's probably more accurate.
It's highly rated on Headfi and /r/headphones.
It's high noon.
It's High Noon.
It's his crazy racist beliefs that do.
It's horrible because it comes unplugged with a slight tug....
It should accept that.
It should be banned.
It should be instant if it was active.
It should be renamed Minute of Reddit.
It shouldn't be financially possible for me to live.
It's illegal for a speedomeeter to be overtweaked by more than 10% IIRC.
It's illegal to take photographs of destroyed buildings now?
It's important to maintain my anus and my mouth because I depend on them every day.
It's important to maintain my car and my PC because I depend on them every day.
It's impossible.
It's in 1080p resolution so it's made for desktop backgrounds.
It's in a league of its own.
It's in a S&S ISA.
It's increasing pretty fast.
It's in my Bitcoin savings wallet, I'll need to withdraw to a spending wallet and then exchange it for £££.
It's in my company classifieds.
It's insured anyway in case it never turns up.
It's interesting how police don't say what something is, just that it isn't related to terrorism.
It's interesting the difference in comments between BBC and Guardian articles. The BBC comments are overwhelmingly in favour of Conservatives, whereas Guardian is generally favourable to Labour.
It's interesting to see your racist ideology unrepressed.
It's interesting to watch my co-worker guess development time.
It's in the box.
It's in the future.
It's in the options somewhere, but I think mining pool hub is the default.
It's IPS?
It's it's 51% leave, we'll stay?
It's just a better use of my lunch hour than going on Reddit.
It's just about wide enough to fit the monitor, but not lots of bubble-wrap.
It's just a dull pain in the centre of my chest and stretching slightly over my left peck.
It's just a much more powerful computer than yours.
It's just an exaggerated example.
It's just a standard AUX cable IIRC.
It's just a virtual screen.
It's just a way to avoid getting arrested for prostitution.
It's just designed to force you into a grind until you get fed up and pay them.
It's just for speculation now.
It's just N2O.
It's just not good.
It's just not worth the money.
It's just one demographic looking down at another in a cycle.
It's just really well designed.
It's just so fucking retarded, the mouse and keyboard support is non-existant even for the menu.
It's just so much more convenient this way.
It's just that in this day and age the stand-in for not giving consent is either regretting that you did later, or realizing that saying you didn't after the fact -- sometimes years later -- might get you money and fame..
It's just the 1GB limit that I dislike.
It's just the nature of crypto.
It's just the OW engine is really weird.
It's just the same instructions as on most food.
It's just the Sky box. I think we only get Freeview channels.
It's kinda a lot of meat to eat in one go.
It's kinda deep for a tenkeyless....
It's kinda like PoS where you get money just for holding 1000 coins.
It's kinda putting me off buying a GTX 1080TI because that would put my PC and accessories over £2,000 for sure.
It's laggy.
It's less buggy than Tree Tab Styles I think.
It's less convenient to put IEMs in and take the moff.
It's less profitable than Nicehack now.
It's like 5%?
It's like a 1% minimum match though.
It's like a 300% efficient space heater.
It's like a fake laugh.
It's like comparing the average American to a highly trained special forces military personal.
It's like Firefox addons for your DE!?!?!?
It's like gsync but in reverse.
It's like having a cleaner and chef except you pay them with time rather than money.
It's like her only selling point is "not Jeremy Corbyn".
It's like living in Nazi Germany.
It's like LoL but less shit.
It's like Popcorn Time but better.
It's like Popcorn Time but with plugins.
It's like Steam market then.
It's like the weight of a piece of furniture compressed into a box.
It's like they made it for a fucking iphone or something.
It's like they're all pretending to be as retarded as possible or something.
It's like those films where the hacker solves their security problem.
It's like triple my net salary.
It's like when I bought my flat. I offered £108k and then they came crawling back to me 2 months later asking me to offer more. I stuck with £108k and they eventually accepted it..
It's literally bankrupting me.
Its literally going to be him and a bunch of 13 year olds..
It's literally spiking right now.
It's looking like it will probably be the biggest esports prize pool ever though.
It's LOUD AS FUCK MAN.
It's lower decibels than a lot of the others which are 79db.
It's lower than when it started.....
It's mad how an EA £30 game has this many players.
It's managed by someone else.
It's mandatory I take them ALL.
It's masternodes.
It's meant to be derogatory to the voters because it's a porn category?
It's mini TOSLINK I think.
It's missing a lot of important features.
It's modular, but the hard drive power cable is a long daisy chain cable.
It's Moneyfarm which has no fees on the first £10k.
It's more about how many whales you have.
It's more a problem of my phone being heavy and falling out of my pocket though. I can route the cable under my shirt and back of head.
It's more a sound card than a headphone amp.
It's more comfortable and probably better for your hand IMO.
It's more comfortable on the eyes too.
It's more for streamers and youtubers.
It's more of a side game I play when I want some casual fun.
It's more of a worst case scenario.
It's more real than others.
It's more scure.
It's more the cable around my ears too.
It's mostly just patience.
It's mostly to reduce friction and mouse feet degrading when playing FPS games.
It's much cooler and quieter now.
It's much much less likly with an m-itx build.
It's much smaller than a standard office keyboard, but much heavier.
It's my air purifier, white noise machine and gaming PC.
It's my graphics card that goes to 85C and is noisy ass fuck.
It's MY milk.
It's my money not hers.
It's my only complaint with these headphones.
It's neutral and doesn't have a lot of bass, but I don't think my SE215s which are bass-heavy IEMs sound very good anyway. I'm not sure if I'm really actually a basshead.
It's never going to happen.
It's newer than LoL and CS:GO.
It's nice a huge improvement over the S7.
It's niceeeeeeee.
It's nice to live in a western country where we don't have these problems.
It's no Dota 2.
It's no good.
It's no more risky than you holding onto 420k garlic anyway.
It's not 5GHz unless you set it to be 5GHz.
It's not a 100% circlejerk and the mods try to prevent that.
It's not about individual skill, but teamwork.
It's not about quality, it's about compression.
It's not a good measurement of development.
It's not a high-end mic, it's only £25.
It's not a mirror of the live system.
It's not a moba omg.
It's not an arena FPS.
It's not a paid product.
It's not April Fools day though?
It's not a Roonscape specific problem.
It's not as close to your mouth, so it picks up noisy mechanical keyboards.
It's not as if being unemployed or poor or dating a foreigner or playing video games is shameful or anything.
It's not a super hard concept to grasp.
It's not a very good analogy, chess and checkers aren't even videogames.
It's not a well optimised game, but your PC is a beast.
It's not balanced for esports though.
It's not black and white which is best.
It's not blockchain.
It's not chinese you racist omg.
It's not complete. It's just the motherboard, case, smallish CPU cooler and PSU.
It's not even as good as Topcashback.
It's not even OCed yet and it's making over £3 a day.
It's not "free finance" as he says.
It's not free if I have to pay for it....
It's not free if you're paying for it.
It's not fucking complicated.
It's not funny to joke about peoples' health.
It's not good nutrition.
It's not hard since they don't seem too concerned with software bloat.
It's not hugely lucrative unless you scale it up. It's just a good way of getting free/cheap heating.
It's not ideal for online gaming because it increases latency.
It's not just an SMS app.
It's not just a phone.
It's not just coke, it's all the American foods.
It's not just Mars though. Having a permanent base on Mars will open up Jupiter's moons and the rest of the solar system.
It's not just mining any more.
It's not like gaming mice where they know they need a good sensor and light mouse with comfortable shape, or a keyboard where it's cherry MX red, or a monitor where it's high refresh rate and low response time.
It's not like I'm wasting it on drugs.
It's not me omg.
It's not mining 24/7 though.
It's not much harder if you have an SFX modular PSU, ITX mobo, m.2 drive, no ODD.
It's not my spreadsheet, I'm just trying to make it less shit.
It's not normal.
It's not normally laggy, but that doesn't necessarily mean your internet connection is bad.,.
It's not OSX any more?
It's not proper cardio then.
It's not proportional at all.
It's not quite £0.03 yet.
It's not random, it only happens from a cold boot.
It's not really unhealthy unless you're losing more than ~4lbs a week.
It's not related to the language.
it's not severe.
It's not sudden.
It's not the easiest case to just casually open up and tweak.
It's not the infertile period, but it's not right in the middle.
It's not the same if I don't deserve it.
It's not too far from Bath.
It's not true for the Motorolla Droid Turbo 2.
It's not unfixable lmao.
It's not urgent right now.
It's not urgent work.
It's not very old and I've looked after the PSU very well, so I don't think there's any safety or performance issue with it..
It's not worth all the effort and risk for such tiny gains.
It's not worth it unless your a streamer.
It's not worth spending a lot on running shoes.
It's not worth their time.
It's not your PSU.
It's no where near as fast as a 1080TI.
It's nowhere near halfway done.
It's okay I reported rory to network ops.
It's okay, it's a tiny amount.
It's okay, just WFH a bit.
It's okay, you can return the product to Amazon within 30 days.
It's on another exchange now.
It's one of the reasons I switched to the Ncase.
It's on its way to Coinbase.
It's only 5% now.
It's only a 15 minute drive from my home.
It's only a matter of time before CS:GO gets Vulkan and Source 2 too.
It's only an office gym, so it's not very big.
It's only a problem if the players make it a problem.
It's only been 5 months too.
It's only gone and bloody done it.
It's only half way to Christmas.
It's only just big enough for 2 24" monitors and a massive mousepad.
It's only like a decade old.
It's only scored lower because the accessories are ranked low.
It's only slighty more setup.
It's on my to-do list.
It's on silent 24/7.
It's on the card.
It's on the CPU.
It's open source.
It's open source though?
It sounds like the problem he has is that the graphics card draws all the hot air directly into the case instead of blowing it out the back, and his case doesn't have the airflow to deal with it.
It sounds off-centre.
It sounds really similar.
It's over 6 miles.
It's P2P lending.
It spins so fast it creates lift.
Its player base is as big as CS:GO's right now.
It's possible to build a bomb so powerful that it'll kill everyone in England.
It's possible to build a nuclear bomb so powerful that it can cause a mini ice age.
It's possible to go even smaller though.
It's possible to make £11.3k a year if you put enough time into it.
It's pre-installed bloatware.
It's pretty accurate despite the horrendous fucking input lag this game has.
It's pretty bad that people are still using old versions of IE.
It's pretty brief and it's mostly about not using systems without authorisation and keeping stuff secure.
It's pretty creepy actually.
It's pretty easy to argue the sky isn't blue.
It's pretty fucking pathetic if I've just lost a friend over £6.
It's pretty funny.
It's pretty good, they added a co-op story mode.
It's pretty much just a desktop PC at that point though.
It's pretty nice.
It's pretty niche and expensive.
It's pretty self explanatory, you just fill out the fields with your information.
It's pretty sweet.
It's preventing me from OCing my GPU to its limits.
It's proabably more like 10)%.
It's probable that a combination of your bad skill and lack of versatility as well as your shit gear is the reason you're stuck at low mmr and not because of your team mates.
It's probably also assuming no periods of being out of work.
It's probably a significant factor in most of their other problems.
It's probably easier just to go for a pre-built.
It's probably going to be between $20m-$23m.
It's probably going to cost like 25% of the value of the item just to post it.....
It's probably just filler words like err and umm.
It's probably mean on all exchanges.
It's probably one of my addons which is crashing it.
It's probably someone I don't want to talk to.
It's probably the next thing I'll get.
It's probably the only new release in 2016 that I'm excited about.
It's profitable.
It's proven to be reliably profitabler.
It's quick.
It's quieter than 6 GPUs.
It's quite similar to the Deathadder.
It's really become a shithole since Mugabe seized power.
It's really good.
It's really good for discoverability and going straight into a film/TV show without doing any work.
It's really hard to calculate whether mining GRLC or mining Nicehack is more profitable.
It's really hard to tell if you're being sarcastic or not.
It's really similar to the DT770 except it has a removeable cable.
It's really strange.
It's retarded because if you go 30 days without a payslip, you still get universal credit payments.
It's reversible.
It's ridiculous how badly it runs on my PC.
It's rory that is fucked because he buys headphones with proprietary cables and non-removable cables..
It's sad that the Conversative party is becoming the only relevant UK party though.
It's Scan too, so a respectable retailer.
It's selling for £40 brand new, so I think it should sell for £25.
It's set up more like poker where you pay an entrance fee and collect the winnings from the other players.
It's SFW.
It's shaped for your hand to wrap around it.
It's shit.
It's shit though because it disconnects constantly.
It's showing as 3.5% for me.
It's similar to TF2 though.
It's simple physics.
It's so ambigious.
It's so annoying.
It's so bad to just stick fucking everything in a web browser.
It's so convenient.
It's so cool and quiet.
It's so disorganised and chaotic.
It's so easy to upgrade.
It's so far away.
It's so fast, cool and quiet.
It's so flawed.
It's so fucking expensive.
It's so fucking responsive.
Its so fucking slow.
It's so fucking slow whenever my gf watches a Youtube video.
It's so fucking weird.
it's so good.
It's so good.
It's so good, I love the sealions.
It's so hard to do 50 items a minute or whatever the ridiculous target is.
It's so horrible.
It's some sort of VPN thingy.
It's something like 0.75p to enter and £5 if you win.
It's something like Crucial BX200 480GB.
It's something like everyone pays 75p to enter and the winners get £5 each.
It's so much better than 60hz srsly.
It's so much better than the Chinese fake one.
It's so much easier to rank up when you're in a party.
It's so nice.
It's so offputting when there are other people there.
It's so one-sided because they can cancel the bet for free but you can't cancel your bet.
It's sooooooo good.
It's sooooooooooo good.
It's so pretty!
It's so rigged.
It's so slow.
It's so small!
It's so weird when you're trying to kill someone and you accidentally heal someone instead.
It's still a great account, but you're not gonna get £150 interest from it.
It's still almost 4X the size of my case though.
It's still cheaper than paying a maid/prostitute/chef.
It's still early in consultation, so I don't know exactly what's going to happen yet.
ITS STILL  FUCKING GOING UP.
It's still less than half way through my 20s.
It's still one of the best cards you can buy.
It's still showing as >10k to me.
It's strength is more the result of its monopoly than any actual merit of its own.
It's stupid how the main character is attracted to only ugly women.
It's such a large amount.
It's such a pain maintaining it on Spotify.
It's such a volatile asset.
It's super efficient cooling.
It's superior to the Razer Deathadder and Zowie EC1A which are their flagship ergonomic FPS mice.
It's super profitable again?
It's suppressed by the loominati.
It's tax-free.
It's technocratic isn't it?
It's the 21st century and I'm still shitting like I'm in the fucking nomadic era.
It's the algorithm.
It's the bestest.
It's the best resource for esports results AFAIK.
It's the burglar's choice to put themselves in danger.
It's the cheapest waterproof phone with a decent DAC right now.
It's the easiest fucking place to find and there's always someone at reception.
It's the farms ordering GPUs directly from the factories that are the problem.
It's the "freemium" business model.
It's the full thing.
It's the HD remake, right?
It's the highest production value of any music in the world.
It's the Korean team every time.
It's the last place I'd want to go lmao.
It's the middle of the day.
It's the most crucial component omg.
It's the name of the service.
It's the next thing I'm going to do.
It's the noisiest part in my case for sure.
It's the RAM I'm using now, but I need to get some new RAM for my new motherboard.
It's the rank above silver.
It's the same business model for Dota.
It's the same friend who thinks global warming isn't real lmao.
It's the same housing association I work at....
It's the same reason 0.2 is 1/5.
It's the same reason 0.333 recurring is the same as 1/3 of 1.
It's the Signal Protocol by OWS.
It's the stuff siliconlottery uses, and it's really highly rated on Amazon.
It's the trickle down effect. Poor people bet their wages away and I swoop in to claim them.
It's the two console windows I don't need to look at.
It's the winter, so I think I'll be okay.
It still is I guess.
It's to get high I think.
It's too expensive to use for such stupid tasks.
It's too good at the pricepoint.
It's too hot, then it's optimum, then it's too cold.
It's too labour intensive to build playlists with Bittorrent.
It's too much and the rules are stupid!!!
It's too much hassle.
It's too much manual work.
It's too predictive based on the past.....
It's too risky.
It's too soon.
It's too time-consuming to learn a language.
It's too useful for peeing whilst standing.
It's trash compared to masterpieces such as TWICE.
It's true though.
It sucks.
It sucks being poor.
It sucks having savings, it just all goes to rent and fixing my car.
It sucks that you have to pay £30 for it now :(.
It's unfair to sellers.
It's unhealthy.
It's unhealthy too.
It's up 99.9% of the time, but if it goes down whilst I'm asleep or whilst I'm at work then I might not be able to fix it quickly.
It's USB.
It's used by politicians to boast how great they are.
It's useful for me because I only have a 144hz monitor but I run CS:GO at 420fps.
it's usually a delivery fee.
It's very effective.
It's very expensive for such a bad gaming PC.
It's very hard to compete with big energy.
It's very mushy when trying to adjust them to a specific notch.
It's very unlikely both your houses will burn down at the same time.
It's way better than any pre-built build's CPU.
It's way better than McDonalds.
It's way lighter.
It's wayyyyy down.
It's weird.
It's weird and unhealthy.
It's weird because it goes up to 77C then down to 55C wtf?
It's weird how my work forces my personal phone to use an insecure PIN instead of my more-secure pattern.
It's weird how the website sometimes say I can't return an item, then I call them and they process the return.
It's weird that they're so desperate to keep an autistic person.
It's what happens when young people get very rich very fast.
It's what I'm paid to do I guess.
It's where my dad lives with his big house.
It's where you rest part of your palm on the mouse.
It's why I like ergonomic mice.
It's why I use Spotify.
It's why I want to change my job.
It swings up and down wildly and IDK why.
It's worked for every previous president.
It's working very well.
It's worse than a 4770K lmao.
It's worth checking.
It's worth it.
It's worth it for the £170.
It's worth it though.
It's worth what someone is willing to pay for it.
It's your shitty CPU.
It's your sort of thing.
It's YOUR washing machine.
It takes 1000s of hours to understand these things, and you have 0.
It takes about 10X the time it'd take just to read a text.
It takes me three hours to earn £20.
It takes time to save up lots of money.
It thinks I'm going to withdraw some money from the wedding venue last month....
It thinks the row is 46 but the other one is 46 too.
It took me ages, and I still haven't installed the hard drives or CPU cooler.
It tries to be lego and dungeonquest.
It turns out that my GTX 970 didn't scale down to 135hz because I was running my display at 144hz. I changed it to 120hz and now my GPU downclocks properly.
I turned a £5 bonus into £40 last night.
I turned it down anyway, because rural internet sucks ass.
It uses a lot of bandwidth.
It uses the super efficient CryptoNight algorithm.
It usually sells for around £250.
It was 1104L last year.
It was 1.18 and now it's 1.195.
It was 19.5k.
It was 26.1C last month at one point.
It was 32bit before I think?
It was 460, but I just applied for a credit card.
It was £60 when she bought it on 26th November.
It was a 1 year loan before.
It was a bitch to install though.
It was a bit windy last night.
It was a cheap OEM-supplied one though.
It was a good 300 years.
It was a hybrid between sugar and sugar-free?
It was a little higher yesterday. I was going to notify you but you weren't on steam.
It was all agreed almost two weeks ago.
It was a month ago since I last saw her though.
It was announced yesterday that Dota is getting a $1m tournament EVERY MONTH yesterday.
It was a particularly nasty poo though.
It was a rhetorical question.
It was a shitty OEM cooler and couldn't survive all the abuse I gave it.
It was a shitty OEM PSU and couldn't survive all the abuse I gave it.
It was a steal.
It was a work-funded health screening.
It was bad to begin with.
It was dead?
It was deposit £50 bet £100.
It was designed to be for people not for profit.
It was driving me crazy.
It was free shipping.
It was good but not great.
It was good even without the government bonus. It was like a regular saver which can keep going beyond 12 months.
It was important?
It was innacurate for GRLC but it's okay for RVN it seems.
It was in such bad condition.
It was just a guess, IDK how they know.
It was just so bizzare.
It was me!
It was my drink hahahahaaha.
It was never.
It was nice to actually speak to someone from hermes though. I think he will fix it for me.
It wasn't faster payments?
It wasn't just the job centre who told me, it was the housing association too.
It was on an unrecorded Skype call, and not a photograph.
It was on a really steep hill too.
It was one I sent.
It was probably my favourite gun.
It was shit.
It was so funny omfg.
It was such a wtf moment.
It was supposed to arrive either yesterday or today.
It wastes a shitload of your time.
It was the big site before Reddit came along and killed it.
It was the CPU cooler that bent it.
It was the first one I found on the Radio 1 website.
It was very nice, but Dominoes is just as good and you don't even need to leave your house.
It was weird though, because it was a UK website.
It was you who convinced me to use NiceHash, so don't blame me for telling you about the internal wallet.
It weighs like TWICE what my GTX 970 does.
It went down so fucking fast, then I tweeted for 1GB free, and it's going down really slowly.
It will be even more in 7 days.
It will be if you're really fucking fat.
It will be written off in like 23 years.
it will happen eventually.
It will make a lot more when your PC is idle.
It will replace the Help to Buy ISA, but I'll probably be buying sooner than I'll be eligible for the Lifetime ISA funds.
It won't be higher than state pension anyway.
It won't go down until new cards are released.
It won't work in a m-itx case if it's not m-itx.
It works best on reference PCBs.
It works in the same way as the general shared ownership scheme, but you can only buy up to 75% of your home. Once you own 75% you won’t have to pay rent on the remaining share..
It would be a brilliant business strategy to take out a huge loan and wager it on Russian Roulette.
It would be an easy pay rise.
It would be annoying as fuck.
It would be awesome to mine using my work's electricity....
It would be better if they made it free.
It would be called Dave Coin.
It would be good if it's accurate.
It would be good to go now rather than later.
It would be great for the winter though, because you're basically being paid to heat your home.
It would be like I'm not even using VR!!!
It would be more affordable than buying a one bedroom flat for myself.
It would be more likely that I started early and wrote the email than deferred it until the morning.
It would be nice if 4k video streams would take off.
It would be nice if it was a Valentine's present from a cute Japanese gilr.
It would be noisy though.
It would cost me a lot more because I need to pay for everything myself.
It would cost more than buying two faulty ones.
It would fly upwards if it wasn't screwed into the case.
It would have sold instantly.
It would help with liquidity but if I lost the income then I couldn't afford to keep running my house, car and gf.
It would probably be lower-risk higher-reward to just buy a masternode.
It would probably last me 2 nights, at least.
It would probably require a level of voltage I'm not comfortable with.
It would put me instantly into negative equity!!!!!
It would really suck if they accidentally chopped off something.
It would solve extreme poverty for sure.
I upgraded from ADSL and atm not paying anything.
I upgraded my Fiio E10K to Creative E5.
I use a pattern.
I use a proper client at home, but I mostly IRC to kill time at work.
I use a proper headset for Lync from home.
I use a randomly generated password for every site, which probably helps protect me against these dumps.
I use a single cable because it's so convenient to have one cable for three pairs of headphones.
I use a single cable for multiple different headphones.
I use a Sound Blaster E5.
I used a can of compressed air.
I used a modified version of your config and now it starts instantly and less laggy.
I used it to buy alcohol.
I used Keepass for a bit.
I used my email address as the username.
I used my profits from matched betting to fund my mining rigs.
I used Spotify support to get rid of Facebook before.
I used the legit Blizzard partner.
I used the PSU from a pre-built from PCworld, then upgraded the graphics card, never dusted it for years, then it caught fire.....
I used to be.
I used to be really fucking good at L4D2.
I used to buy them all the time.
I used to do that for free steam games, but they couldn't stop me from having no friends.
I used to do that years ago when I had a shit case.
I used to do that years ago when I had a shit face.
I used to get that. I found out the door to the attic was slightly open and they were flying out of it.
I used to have offline media collections, but it is less convenient.
I used to just buy games for people at uni and they'd give me cash.
I used to leave my sides off because the cooling was so bad.
I used to live in Lincolnshire. Where does your dad live exactly?
I used to live near there.
I used to play PUBG with him when he was still alive.
I used to post on Digg and think reddit was terrible.
I used to start at 00:00 AM.
I used to think my DT770s and K702s could cover everything too.
I used to wake up 10 hours earlier than that.
I used to wake up a lot earlier than you lmao.
I used to when I was younger.
I used to work in service charges and people always called us and told us how much they hated us.
I use dust filters.
I use high priority all the time.
I use it all the time.
I use it np.
I use it on my PC and it's pretty good, so I want to put it on my TV too.
I use it to get student discounts.
I use it to skype my gf.
I use kiwi IRC at work.
I use Lastpass.
I use Lastpass because it's more convenient than Keepass.
I use Lastpass for everything.
I use Libreoffice Calc normally, so I don't know how to use Excel very well.
I use LTS on desktops.
I use my .ac.uk email to get £5 Spotify.
I use my body as a weight.
I use my COPs at work.
I use my DT770s at home and at work.
I use my HTC One M9 for that atm.
I use my HTC phone as my portable source.
I use my HTC phone as my source.
I use my ifixitkit on my electronics and PC and stuff, but the other screwdriver set was good for building flatpack furniture and stuff.
I use my parents'.
I use my personal PC.
I use openmailbox.org.
I use PIA.
I use Reddit front page as the root of the tree, then the subpages, then the pages, then click on the content of the reddit pages under the reddit posts!!!!
I use RES and Pushbullet yeah, but they aren't essential.
I use Spotify nowadays.
I use Stremio.
I use Stremio to stream and only have a small cache.
I use Stremio to stream and only have a small penis.
I use Tab Tree.
I use the back of my PC like the front.
I use them like bookmarks.
I use the new moneysavingsexpert credit site.
I use the plugin which tells me the info on the amazon pages.
I use the same login info.
I use the Vmoda Boompro and switch headphones which is super convenient.
I use Thunderbird.
I use Thunderbird with openmailbox.
I use TSB current account because it's 5% interest up to £2k and has 5% cashback too.
I use V-Moda Boompro.
I use Wi-Fi at work and home.
I usually get all the cashbacks.
I usually get like 100.
I usually get the sugar-free drink.
I usually get woken up by my mum because she is noisy in the morning, then I snooze until my alarm goes off.
I usually give out my landline number. I never answer it anyway.
I usually go down around 13:30-14:30.
I usually go into Coral and Ladbrokes on the weekend, withdraw £20 from my account into the masheen, play £20 of spins, then cash out the rest.
I usually just add exception whenever that happens in Firefox.
I usually just do a couple of warm up sets with lighter weights.
I usually just do a reverse image search on it to try and find it.
I usually just have soup and a crusty roll.
I usually just ignore people unless they ask me a question or say something that requires a response.
I usually just leave the DPI at default, no reason to change it.
I usually just pick and choose songs from multiple albums.
I value the cooking and cleaning far more than the sex.
I've actually been considering getting a 4k monitor and using it like 4X1080p.
I've almost got another 10 garlics to sell you.
I've already done it, but I'll help you out.
I've already eaten my lunch.
I've also found that benchmarking isn't failing any more either.
I've always been told "DONT store passwords in plaintext files".
I've always ignored them.
I've apparently been a member since October but never paid anything?
I've barely used them because I prefer my beyers.
I've been £750 overdrawn for months.
I've been asked just to put the data into a graph.
I've been busy.
I've been called a race traitor a lot.
I've been carrying around an expired card with me everywhere for the past 6 years lmfao.
I've been considering doing all my browsing on my home PC anyway, it's more private than my work laptop.
I've been considering getting some V-Moda M100s too.
I've been doing some arbitrage trading.
I've been exactly £750 in debt for about a year now.
I've been getting way too many of these phishing emails recently.
I've been looking at the DT990s but I think I might get the Fidelo X2s instead.
I've been losing a lot on slots :(.
I've been on #ubuntu on freenode since 2016 IIRC.
I've been owed my Nutmeg money for like 6 months now.
I've been playing it over the last couple of days with my friend.
I've been so lucky with slots the last few days.
I've been stuck on 60hz for decades now.
I've been there a few times.
I've been there a lot. It's full of homeless people and gays.
I've been there with my gf.
I've been thinking about looking for a job in Leeds and becoming room mates with rory actually.
I've been thinking of getting a 4k tv to use both as one large display for films, and also as 4X 1080 for productivity.
I've been to Brighton.
I've been transporting garden waste for my mum.
I've been using a 500MB data contract for almost a year now.
I've been using Mozilla browsers since before Firefox, and I've never seen a compelling reason to switch.
I've been using Pidgin mostly.
I've been waiting for this for fucking years.
I've been waiting over a month for one of them.
I've been watching the price because it's the best first time quadcoptor for noobs.
I've been working with this guy for ages.
I've been worried lately that I'll get sacked for underperforming.
I've blown the dust off of it, but that's about it.
I've booked a 4 day weekend to get as many OW skins as possible.
I've considered building a multi-GPU mining rig.
I've considered that too.
I've decided on my next headphones.
I've definitely played it at least a couple of times.
I've done LCD.
I've done Lemsip.
I've dropped my phone a shitload of tmes, but I bought a really good case.
I've eaten wayyyyyyyyyyy too much sugar.
I've even been gaming on this VPN.
I've fallen for that before.
I've found that I don't really need 3TB HDDs any more now that I use Spotify and Stremio.
I've fully embraced the cloud for media now.
I've given myself lots of options for upgrades.
I've given up trying to get through my backlog.
I've got >0.1LTC.
I've got 10 garlics, give me 0.1LTC.
I've got £11k right now plus an additional £6.5k in gambling sites, £1k in Ratesetter, and 100 euros.
I've got £13.5k.
I've got 22 garlics.
I've got 25 garlics.
I've got 273.35854835 RVN for sale and some GRLC.
I've got £4,300 in my H2B ISA.
I've got 	73.74066058 in there.
I've got a couple of ML120 fans running underneath it to give it some airflow so it's okay.
I've got more hashing power than you.
I've got my Nicehack -> Coinbase -> GDAX -> EUR -> Revolut -> GBP -> Bank account payout path all set up and working now.
I've got over £10k on gambling sites now.
I've got pretty low standards for a burger.
I've got some of the best equipment you can buy.
I've got the original box which is the best thing for protecting the contents.
I've got to go now.
I've got to go out for a bit now.
I've got too much money on bookies.
I've had a couple of offers so far, one for £30 and another for £31.50.
I've had more bad experience with wireless cards not working out of the box with Windoze than with Linux.
I've had that happen to me.
I've had this phone for almost two years now.
I've had unprotected sexual intercourse too, should I get myself tested?
I've heard Bioshock is good, though I've never played it..
I've heard good things about them, but I probably wouldn't spend that much on a single pair.
I've heard people say that they make the DT770s "obsolete".
I've imported Chinese and Korean holidays.
I've installed Waze now, so it shouldn't happen again.
I've just added Iota to my list of creeps.
I've just been put on top of the list for a new W10 laptop because my W7 laptop is "shit".
I've just got my third one, so hopefully it works fine now.
I've just lost so much fucking money.
I've listed my DT770s.
I've literally actually googled excel stuff for people before.
I've literally never answered the phone.
I've literally never bought my own clothes in my life.
I've looked at all the NiceHash alternatives, MiningPoolHub is probably the best at least until WinMiner sorts out their shit.
I've looked on ebay for DT770s with removeable cables but can't find what I'm looking for.
I've lost 14kg this year.
I've lost interest in most Blizzard games.
I've lost money on my moneyfarm investment.
I've made £1,200 betting profits this month.
I've made £1.59 now.
I've made £178 since Thursday.
I've made £256.66 profit since Thursday.
I've made 25p on my Nutmeg investment.
I've made 44p so far from a £500 investment with Nutmeg.
I've made £500 from gambling in the past week or so.
I've made £516 since 15th June.
I've made about £1,000.
I've made about £10,000 matched betting now.
I've made a lot of mistakes in betting that has lost me hundreds.
I've made hundreds of £££ spinning slots thousands of times this month.
I've made like £10k from gambling.
I've made over £1,000 selling CS and Dota items.
I've made over £600 profit this month.
I've made over £6k profit from gambling now.
I've made so much from my H2B ISA.
I've met a couple of pretty good 10 year old CS players.
I've mined 10 garlic now.
I've never actually had ATX. The largest I've used it mATX.
I've never been a fan of oreos.
I've never considered purchasing a pair of Sennheiser headphones.
I've never done it before, but I will need to on the 23rd.
I've never had a Japanese gf.
I've never had a problem other than sometimes lagspikes due to my Powerline.
I've never had problems doing any calculations inside Excel.
I've never killed a GPU from overclocking.
I've never met a girl stronger than me.
I've never mined that coin.
I've never NOT had a problem with MyHermes.
I've never owned a credit card, is that a bad thing?
I've never paid for a Microsoft license.
I've never put much thought into my IRC nicks.
I've never read a book.
I've never seen a contract phone cheaper than a SIM+phone bought individually.
I've never seen a dead person.
I've never seen so many jews in my life.
I've never seen them priced so low before.
I've never seen this before.
I've never sent you naked pics.
I've never sold an item on ebay before, this is so exciting!
I've never used Google. I used Hotmail and now I use Openmailbox.
I've never worn headphones more comfy than Fidelio X2 before.
I've not got much atm, but check back with me next week.
I've not had a problem with Amaozn.
I've not had that problem with Lync.
I've not heard of the dark net before.
I've noticed that Spotify's kpop library has improved a lot recently.
I've noticed that they've changed their wording from "unelectable" to "not a leader" I wonder why that is.
I've not really researched GPU coolers except for the Arctic Accellero Xtreme III.
I've not seen a single game which performs better on the 6800k than the 6700k.
I've not seen the latest 10.
I've OCed my GPU so hard it gets up to 89C and 4000RPM sometimes.
I've ODed on caffeine before and it's not nice.
I've only been using them a few minutes so far.
I've only gone and done it.
I've only had casino too.
I've only had it since February.
I've only used it for 1 day delivery so far.
I've opened like 4 accounts with them so far.
I've overclocked in the past.
I've placed my bets :).
I've played CoD4 Promod.
I've played CS since CS:GO.
I've played Left 4 Dead and Killing Floor so I think when the zombie apocalypse happens I'll be fine.
I've probably played it more times before the release of Steam than you've played it in total.
I've probably played it outside of Steam or offline.
I've put money in both platforms because they do good cashback.
I've put multiple FD, TSB, Nationwide, Halifax, Co-Op, Tesco, etc.
I've quit many games with sunk cost fallacy.
I've read in /r/android that deleting cache files does more harm than good.
I've read reviews saying that the Boompro and Modmic have similar sound quality.
I've read that the 80Ohms sounds a lot nicer than the 32ohms. I've only used the 80ohms so I can't compare.
I've read that the DT770s have better comfort and sound quality, but no removeable cable :(.
I've read that the Snapdragon S7 DACs are really bad.
I've recently acquired the financial ability to go on holiday, but now I need to save for a house ffs.
I've rented at uni before.
I've resorted to using my phone's mic for gaming.
I've seen a lot of 7700Ks running at 5.2GHz and it's possible to even run it at 5.3GHz.
I've seen a pic of your gf but I can't remember what she looks like.
I've seen London Has Fallen though.
I've seen much better.
I've seen pics.
I've seen similar products but nothing specific to the M50.
I've seen them all. I don't remember them all so well.
I've seen Zoolander.
I've sent two transactions >100 each.
I've set and forget the auto withdrawal too.
I've set my MPH to auto payout to my Coinbase LTC wallet when it reaches 1LTC.
I've skipped a whole bunch of offers too because my time is too scarce.
I've sold stuff on here with bank transfer without problems before.
I've spent more on Dota than any other game.
I've started resting my arms on my desk and taken the arms off my chair.
I've started stoozing now. I am £250 overdrawn and £306 on my credit card giving me £556 debt at 0%.
I've started tracking some of it.
I've started working 09:00 to 17:30 and holy shit does the office get quiet after 17:00.
I've still got to compare it to my motherboard audio.
I've stopped landing on the roof.
I've stopped mining garlic coin.
I've tested it, it makes no difference.
I've thought about doing that for weightlifting, but definitely not cardio.
I've thought about leaving my job and then reapplying for it.
I've thought about paying half my mortgage off in one big chunk, but I can get better returns from investing.
I've told it to only turn on when my PC is idle.
I've tweaked my CryptoNight so my PC runs well even when mining it.
I've used it once so far.
I've viewed it.
I'VE WASTED TWO OF THEM NOW.
I've yet to find a decent pair of over-ear portable cans.
I visited Brighton a week ago.
I visited my grandparents and they said they hate "niggers" and they don't want "that Corbyn" to win because he likes terrorists.
I voted for bernie.
I voted no, but everyone voted yes, so I have to do it.
I vote the UK leaves London.
I waited 90 minutes for a bus to get to the job centre once.
I waited a few weeks then gave into the temptation.
I wake up at 08:20.
I walked out in front of a car because I didn't hear it coming.
I walked past your flat a few months ago.
I wanna bring an MX Blue into the office and write a big letter or something hahahahhaha.
I wanna get rid of my 2.5" drives and go RAID0 m.2.
I wanna get them so I can OC my CPU and get much better performance.
I wanna OC soon.
I want.
I want 0.00131137 LTC.
I want £0.031785 per GRLC.
I want £0.2732 per RVN.
I want 3.1p per GRLC.
I want 40k pa too.
I want £500k savings and 15% interest.
I want 8 hours to pass already so my Creative E5 is fully charged so I can go use it.
I want 999 fps.
I want a £5k 0% purchase card.
I want a burrito.
I want a cheap contract.
I want a full refund for this shit.
I want a GTX 1080TI please.
I want a GTX 1080TI though.
I want a house.
I want a job with more money and less talking to people.
I want a large Sugar Free energy drink, a meat sandwich, and a pck of beef jerkey.
I want all gameplay content available immediately.
I want a pair.
I want a pair which fold up nicely like my M50X but have good isolation and a removeable cable.
I want a pay as you go for calls and free data pls.
I want a present.
I want a removable cable and good isolation with great comfort and sound quality.
I want AT LEAST $13 a day.
I want a Toyota Aygo.
I want a Vive.
I want a VR Chinese gf.
I want a waterproof one so it doesn't get damaged.
I want a wired one that feels like wireless.
I want Brendan Fraser back.
I want BTC dominance to drop to 0.
I want cashback.
I want celta to win.
I want CIEMs and Samsung Galaxy S7 and a 240hz monitor.
I want consistent high profits.
I want dat £££.
I wanted something from you earlier but I can't remember what it was.
I wanted the best soundstage for gaming.
I wanted to get the cheaper 4.9GHz one, but it's out of stock :(.
I wanted to mod them so I could use them with my V-Moda Boompro, but it's too expensive.
I wanted to run a fan on last night when I was sleeping because it's fucking hot, but my gf told me to turn it off so we won't die.
I want electronics too.
I want Fidelo X2s now.
I want free VR too.
I want her to put it in high-interest accounts and put some in P2P lending or something so the money doesn't lose value to inflation at least.
I want it for £530.
I want it to happen to me right now.
I want lots of £££ and a quiet PC.
I want lots of heavy rain so I can check if they've fixed my leaking car.
I want lots of money.
I want lower RPM at idle and higher RPM for stress testing.
I want managers who don't want to control me so much.
I want Mccree, Windowmaker, Genji and Orisa.
I want more £££.
I want more CPU performance omg!
I want my benefits omg.
I want my broadband up and running ASAP.
I want my cash back.
I want my fucking benefits omg.
I want my fucking product key.
I want my mining motherboard.
I want my money back.
I want my shit omg.
I want my student loan overpayments refunded.
I want one.
I want one but I am poor :(.
I want one too.
I want petrol to be cheap ffs.
I want Philips Fidelio X2.
I want robots to take my job but not my income.
I want that free £100.
I want that game so hard.
I want that monitor.....
I want the HuD to tell me what emotion my gf is currently experiencing.
I want them but I am too poor :(.
I want the money.
I want them to give me my shit already.
I want the notifications on the desktop client!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!1.
I want the stupid windows out of my way.
I want the webcam, DT770 pads, headphone case, and PC case fans.
I want to44.
I want to add a removable cable to my DT770s, not buy a new pair.
I want to add the lay stake in there so it's one less thing to input each time.
I want to backup to my Mega.
I want to be able to check historic notifications for the past few weeks too.
I want to be a Dota esports athlete and go to Shanghai and meet lots of beautiful grills.
I want to be paid for being inconvenienced.
I want to be PM of China.
I want to be rich.
I want to be rory's friends and family.
I want to bring total fees down to at least 3%.
I want to buy 6 GPUs and mine on them.
I want to buy a 7700K and dual m.2 SSDs in Raid0.
I want to buy a GTX 1080 but I can't justify the cost.
I want to buy a GTX 1080TI.
I want to buy a house, but I don't want to wait until I'm in my 30s before moving out of my parents' house.
I want to buy an Ncase M1 + Corsair H100i but I am saving for a house.......
I want to buy my gf train tickets AND save up for a house.
I want to buy new headphones and a GTX 1080TI.
I want to buy one, but they have gone up in price a lot this year....
I want to buy Philips Fidelio X2.
I want to buy Samsung Galaxy S8 and GTX 1080TI and 240hz monitor.
I want to create mega formulas easily.
I want to cut down the number of cables I have at home.
I want to do 2 day working weeks hahahahha.
I want to find Fidelio X2 on sale.
I want to gain a fat salary.
I want to get a 1080TI at some point too.
I want to get a 1080TI, but I should probably focus on making sure I can pay for my car and house first.
I want to get a 240hz gsync monitor for pub gee.
I want to get a 3360 sensor mouse, but there aren't many available atm.
I want to get a 7700K next year.
I want to get a laptop for Seoul, any suggestions?
I want to get a new phone with a good DAC like my HTC, but waterproof.
I want to get an HTC Vive but I don't want to pay a lot of money for it.
I want to get an HTV Vive but I don't want to pay a lot of money for it.
I want to get an i7 6700k but I can't afford one :(.
I want to get an i7 at some point; Overwatch performs so much better with i7s.
I want to get high on Dr Pepper but I don't do that stuff any more because it's so addictive and unhealthy.
I want to get more 0% credit.
I want to get more GPUs, but I'm worried that the next-gen will come soon and I'm also worried about how hot my flat will be in the summer.
I want to get my fees down to at least 3% before I think about withdrawing.
I want to get my hands on Overwatch so I can see what part of my PC I need to upgrade next.
I want to get my money out of all the betting sites and onto the exchanges.
I want to get rid of shitty Skype.
I want to get some custom IEMs, but I can't afford to buy more headphones right now :(.
I want to get some new magnetic levitation high pressure radiator fans for my PC.
I want to get the Custom Art Music One.
I want to get the formatting to somewhere I'm happy with.
I want to get the new case and cooler so that I will be able to OC my next CPU whatever that will be in the future.
I want to get to Global Elite in CS:GO before I die.
I want to go for a job interview where the interviewer is an azn grill.
I want to go for a poo but my manager is with me today and it will look bad if I poo for too long.
I want to go make a coffee but IDK if I have time.
I want to go to Shanghai.
I want to go to this resteraunt in America called Heart Attack Grill.
I want to go work for Nationwide.
I want to hoard my holiday days for when I need them, but I have a limited time to take them.............
I want to IF(X1=1) then give me the value of A3 but in a single cell in spreadsheet 5.
I want to improve my motor skill and reaction times.
I want to increase my wage and reduce my hours.
I want to input as little as possible.
I want to invest half that into a mining rig.
I want to invest in more property, crypto, P2P, stock market, etc.
I want to keep it below 1.3v.
I want to keep my IRC window on top of others.
I want to know my NiceHash wallet balance and historic profitability.
I want to know the make and model omfg.
I want to know what he thinks of that video.
I want to leave my PC running when I'm at work but it might annoy my gf who is at home all day.
I want to listen to my Fidelio X2s more but my gf gets annoyed.
I want to live in a country where the only girls are Asian.
I want to make money for a GTX 1080TI and 240hz monitor though.
I want to make so much money that I can quit my job and play video games all day.
I want to OC my 4690K.
I want to pay 1/4 of that.
I want to play a game on a 240hz adaptive sync monitor with 240FPS.
I want to play CS:GO 2.
I want to play CS:GO at 1000FPS.
I want to play OW at 300FPS on high graphics.
I want to play Pokemon Go in Socal.
I want to present the most important calculations nicely on a single page.
I want to put a sofa where the storage heater is.
I want to put my car back together.
I want to quit my job and become a millionaire and meet lots of Asian girls.
I want to replace both with a single 1TB m.2 SSD.
I want to save up and upgrade my PC.
I want to see how the MPs react when Corbyn gets voted in again.
I want to see some accurate simulation of human behaviour.
I want to see the frequency of your payments.
I want to see them become a competitive high-end choice for gaming though.
I want to see them go bigger.
I want to see where it's at now.
I want to sell.
I want to sell a bundle of stuff because then I don't have to create lots of ebay listings.
I want to sell Audio Technica M50X and Beyer DT770 80Ohms.
I want to sell my 4690K and buy a 6700K.
I want to sell some LTC.
I want to sell them and get Custom One Pros instead.
I want to spend £3k on a mining rig soon.
I want to start using ebay so I can sell other shit when I upgrade it.
I want to start with 2-3 6 GPU rigs.
I want to stay in bed for 25 minutes longer.
I want to stooze really hard.
I want to support ATI's open efforts, but nVidia still works better.
I want to swap my DT770 for something else.
I want to try it before buying.
I want to type on it.
I want to volunteer at the Korean embassy.
I want to watch films on a display bigger than my parents will ever own.
I want to watch pro dota whilst doing a cardio workout.
I want to when I am older.
I want unlimited data for £10 a month.
I was £3700 up last night.
I was 75.4kg in November and now I'm 76.2kg.
I was 85 but now I'm not.
I was a bit worried he was going to knife me or something, it is London after all!
I was a bit worried that my parents will think I'm gay for buying it.
I was a fan up until that point.
I was a little anxious about sending a pre-built.
I was all sweaty.
I was almost 90kg at my max!!!
I was always told just to litter my calendar with lots of random stuff.
I was a VIP at an air show one time.
I was being sarcastic omfg.
I was but it's sold now. I am selling a graphics card though.
I was celibate when I was younger.
I was considering going with the 25% ownership and paying the housing association £182 rent+SC on the remaining 75%.
I was crazy addicted to that drug.
I was definitely sent a faulty 3.5mm to 2.5mm adapter; the original cable with the headphones works fine.
I was destroying my teeth, my heart, my bones, giving myself diabetes and obesity etc.
I was doing goblin squats yesterday because I read that smith machine squats are bad and I don't have a free bar.
I was doing the Coral in-store slots promo.
I was driving for like 7 hours yesterday.
I was due a refund last year.
I was enjoying other FPS games more.
I was fat as fuck m9.
I was feeling down today but Katie Hopkins's tweet perked me up.
I was getting 180 FPS last night.
I was getting shit hashrate in Awesome Miner too.
I was going to buy drugs FOR him as a present though!
I was going to get Betfair and go all on blck.
I was going to have 100 GRLC by the time I finished work.
I was going to put £15,000 in RBS accounts as an emergency fund and to also earn a bit of interest, but I might have to change my plan now.....
I was going to see my brand new nephew tonight but there are too many good offers.
I was going to sell to HansProleman, but he decided he'd rather stay a low-fi pleb.
I was going to upgrade to DDR4 + i7, but that old case and CPU cooler aren't being used ATM.
I was going to upgrade to DDR4 + i7, but that old case and CPU cooler cooler aren't being used ATM.
I was going to use it to pay my mortgage.
I was going to watch a film or something.
I was going to watch Warcraft last night but the audio quality was too bad.
I wash my hair before every time I wear my headphones.
I was hoping to at least get a counter offer.
I was hoping to find a GTX 1080TI or something.
I was inbetween jobs for a month.
I was installing a new GPU cooler on my 1080TI on Saturday.
I was just given a new laptop. It has a Skylake CPU but now only 2.3GHz.
I was just using an example.
I was looking at cashback but it was cheaper just to book Travelodge in London at £36 without any cashback.
I was looking at DSR because 1000 coins is only like £1900.
I was mining for heat, the BTC was just an extra bonus.
I wasn't.
I wasn't even paying anything for the first 10 months.
I wasn't really impressed with my E10K.
I wasn't sneezing, I just had a really fucked up ear.
I wasn't sure because I got the impression you're a bit irresponsible with money.
I was ofc wtf.
I was on my probationary period so I was worried they'd sack me if I didn't.
I was out all day so I closed all my windows since I'm on the ground floor. I came home and it was 28.1C I opened all the windows and lost 6C in about 20 minutes.
I was paying my parents £450 in rent and then paying for hotel rooms on top of that.
I was planning to buy a 1080TI anyway.
I was planning to renew mine in December.
I was playing some OW this weekend.
I was pretty clear with the price two weeks ago.
I was probably going to kill myself if I didn't quit.
I was probably just parodying what people say to me whenever they learn I have a Korean gf.
I was really good friends with a lot of them.
I was referring more to modern western pop.
I was rejected last time :(.
I was sacked on 24th December last year, then get offered a job a couple of weeks later.
I was seriously ill, I bled all over my pillow, was in extreme pain, and completely lost my hearing in one of my ears, but I still went to work. What is your excuse?
I was sleep deprived ass fuck.
I was so financially fucked at uni. I got the minimum student loan amount because I lived with my rich step parent..
I was speaking to this Chinese man who said he didn't like Korean girls because their faces were made out of plastic.
I was stoozing money to put into high interest regular savers.
I was struggling at uni too because I got the minimum loan because of my parents' income.
I was stuck behind a lorry during the whole journey though.
I was talking to my Korean gf on Skype last night.
I was there with my gf.
I was thinking 1LTC, but price changes might force me to re-evaluate.
I was thinking about buying my pizza with it last night, but my bank account didn't confirm my direct debit was set up, so I played it safe.
I was thinking about getting some 970s, but I'd prefer 1070 TIs.
I was thinking about getting some ER4Ps, but I think I'll get fed up with the comfort eventually and just end up saving for CIEMs anyway.
I was thinking about prostitution.
I was thinking Chromecast could be used just to receive video from my PC.
I was thinking "how the fuck is there a wasp in my room every day".
I was thinking of tournaments, but I think some people earn a living creating skins and trading.
I was thinking of tournaments, but I think some people earn a living creative skins and trading.
I was told I was late because I arrived at 9am.
I was told she sent a confidential email from a director's inbox to a co-worker.
I was told walking is the best thing for me.
I was too exhausted of 10 hour nightshifts and barely any sleep in the day to continue after 3 months.
I was too sexually attracted to this case not to buy it.
I was trading with Hans, between the time we agreed a price and the time we traded, the price went up so muich.
I was trolling my gf last night on Skype by playing kpop through my mic.
I was trying to figure out why I couldn't control the fan speed properly.
I was typing and watching during work too!!!!
I was unemployed and I never watched shit like that.
I was unemployed for over a month, but because I received my final paycheck at the start of January and my next paycheck at the end of February, I am in effect going two months without pay without any social security.
I was up pretty late though.
I was using it last night on a virtual desktop.
I was watching Star Wars and had to hold in my piss.
I was working from home too when I felt like aids a couple of weeks ago.
I was working with a Russian girl today.
I was worried about the lack of Linux support, but they have an Android app which is a decent workaround.
I was worried because last time she fell she broke her hip.
I was worried where this was going.
I was you I would request a free one from work.
I was your mmr once.
I watched a mini documentary on them from /r/videos.
I watched Angry Birds last night.
I watched Grimsby last night.
I watched it last night.
I watched Life last night.
I watched Monsters vs Aliens last night.
I watched Planet of the Apes too.
I watched Rogue One because I was with my gf.
I watched Westworld at the weekend.
I watched Zoolander 2 last night.
I watch TI still.
I water damaged the speaker, and I would buy an HTC 10, but I want something waterproof for my next phone.
I wear clothes even when I am alone.
I wear my DT770s without them plugged into my source sometimes.
I went a bit overkill on my CPU I think.
I went from 0 jews in 24 years of my life to suddenly being surrounded by thousands..
I went from DT770 to M50 and regretted it.
I went off to get my own room yay.
I went on a rampage and took the whole school over.
I went onto their Discord, pinged all of the devs and congratulated them on scamming the community and stealing 40k of our funds.
I went outside yesterday and I got sunburnt.
I went over my credit limit.
I went there at the weekenbd.
I went to a religious school when I was younger, but I wasn't old enough to have an informed opinion on the probability of existence of a divine being.
I went to a religious school when I was younger, but I wasn't old enough to make an informed opinion on the probability of existence of a divine being.
I went to a speed awareness course last night.
I went to a theme park a few months ago and there were jews everywhere wtf.
I went to Devil's Dyke and Wagamama.
I went to Morrisons and paid like £12.50.
I went to Pizza Express yesterday.
I went to Smash Burger.
I went up to like £1,202.
I will?!?!??!
I will auto convert all my coins except for Monero.
I will be a First-Time-Buyer soon probably.
I will be more careful next time.
I will be on £25k.
I will be paying £200 a month into it for the next 4 years, then I will look into buying a house.
I will be soon if I get the job I'm applying for.
I will be told just to live off my savings.
I will, but won't the tx fees be expensive for you?
I will buy a GTX 1080TI.
I will buy Fidelio X2s after I buy a flat.
I will buy you half a pint of Fosters if you fix that bug for me.
I will buy your internet too.
I will cancel it.
I will come.
I will do all my torrenting through my VPN so I don't get harassed by ISP, police, media companies, etc.
I will do anything.
I will do it right next time.
I will download game.
I will get heat when I don't need it and not get heat when I need it.
I will get my Ncase M1 tracking number soon.
I will get my UC payment and first month's salary in one go.
I will get the keys to my flat tomorrow.
I will have a problem if I need to withdraw from my Help to Buy ISA or First Direct Monthly Saver, but I'm safe as long as I don't need to spend more than £1000 within the next 7 days.
I will hear the X2 once Hermes delivers to me rory.
I will invite asians back to my flat.
I will leave my DT770s at my desk if I get a Custom One Pro for home.
I will make my introductory short as I know your busy.".
I will mine for you.
I will mine my way out of poverty.
I will overtake you so hard once I upgrade my GPU.
I will own my own.
I will own them one day.
I will see if I can stream HD youtube.
I will sell every day.
I will sell you 0.11298273 LTC for £27.72 + 0.001 LTC TX fee.
I will sell you my RVN.
I will send 594 for 3.5p each, okay?
I will settle for £20+postage. The adhesive is used so it probably won't stick to your headphones unless you get some adhesive. I don't recommend using superglue unless you're certain you never want to remove the clasp..
I will start working from home in a few weeks hopefully.
I will take them on my probation.....
I will take you up on that offer one day.
I will try to save some RVN for you.
I will use my Mr Green £50 free bet tonight.
I will use that money to MoT and tax and insure my car for another year.
I will wait until after I've paid my car insurance and MoT and service first.
I will when I get the time.
I win.
I wish.
I wish all headphones were designed so well.
I wish all keyboards were mechanical.
I wish all my cables *clicked*.
I wish beef jerkey was cheaper.
I wish Blizzard would port OW to Linux.
I wish Blizzard would seperate party and solo mmr.
I wish Blizzard would support Linux.
I wish clocks would stop going forwards and backwards it's so confusing and unnccersary omg!!!!!!
I wish crypto transfers were as fast as bank transfers.
I wish everyone would just ignore me when I am in their proximity.
I wish everyone would stfu.
I wish gaming headsets were less shit.
I wish good beds and good chairs were cheaper.
I wish GoT was broadcast in 48hz, 60hz, 120hz or 144hz.
I wish GPUs were cheaper so I could build a mining rig cheaply, but then cheaper GPUs would probably crash the price of Ethereum and I'd be back to square 1.
I wish Hitler was alive today to gas 9001million LoL players.
I wish I bought £20k of bitcoin instead of a house.
I wish I bought from that supplier you linked, that's a very good price.
I wish I bought it on Amazon when it was only £580.
I wish I claimed that instead of the £144 I claimed.
I wish I could afford to fly to Vietnam for 2 weeks.
I wish I could afford to go too.
I wish I could do mortgage payments on CC.
I wish I could eat Dominos every day.
I wish I could find something similar that folded.
I wish I could get Lync working on my home PC so I don't need to use my work laptop.
I wish I could just stay at home and play Dota and do drugs all day.
I wish I could specify NiceHash to only use equihash when PC is in use and to choose from all algorithms when PC is idle.
I wish I could use lastpass to log into my work laptop.
I wish I could use my desktop PC for work instead of this slow laptop.
I wish I could watch youtube videos on the crosstrainer.....
I wish I didn't eat any leftovers pre-workout.
I wish I didn't have a job, so I could watch more TV.
I wish I earnt £43k so I could get 40% tax relief in a SIPP.
I wish I got a bonus at all.
I wish I got a bonus so I could buy a GTX 1080TI.
I wish I had £100+ a month to put into the stock market.
I wish I had £500 though, since I can't afford rent this month.
I wish I had a female Korean boss.
I wish I had a pair of DT770s with a removable 3.5mm cable.
I wish I had a spare room so I could put a mining rig in it.
I wish I had enough money to buy a small house.
I wish I had it.
I wish I had more money.
I wish I had my BTC from NiceHack back.
I wish I had some DDs.
I wish I had that.
I wish I invested a million into bitcoin 3 years ago.
I wish I just bought the "Like New" ones for ~£111.
I wish I knew trhat.
I wish I lived with my gf.
I wish I never had to work or sleep.
I wish I spent a bit more on my CPU, it's bottlenecking my framerate.
I wish I spent more on my CPU now.
I wish it could stream to VLC though.
I wish it had more stuff in 4K though.
I wish it was 1.
I wish I was allowed holiday.
I wish I was my aunt. She never worked a day in her life but inherited a £200k+ house.
I wish I wasn't saving for a house.
I wish I was paid 10 times as I am am.
I wish I was paid 10 times as much as I currently am.
I wish I was working from home so I could work using my 189hz monitor.
I wish I would qualify for a job.
I wish mine would break.
I wish more companies would do silent hold.
I wish my company would send me to Seoul.
I wish my document would rotate so I could work on portrait documents.
I wish my flat was as big as yours.
I wish my gaming PC produced more heat in the winter and less in the summer.
I wish my gf had as much money as me, we'd get such a good mortgage.
I wish my GPU was as profitable as yours.
I wish my mum would have given me the £1,000 she said she would when I bought my car.
I wish people had a better understanding of economics and costs, so they don't ask me for money I don't owe them or don't pay money that they owe me.
I wish people would stop asking me about it.
I wish people would stop doing it.
I wish plan 1 would go to £25k.
I wish she was my gf.
I wish she won and then got arrested.
I wish someone would offer me a credit limit that matches the amount in my savings account. My credit limit is too fucking small.
I wish someone would take over the maintenance of my kpop playlist for me.
I wish Spotify had a better duplicates-detector for playlists.
I wish Spotify was just an API.
I wish Spotify was open source.
I wish steroids didn't have any dangerous side-effects.
I wish Stremio had higher quality torrents. I'm finding myself searching for films manually just to find higher quality than what's on Stremio and Popcorn Time.
I wish Stremio used higher quality torrents.
I wish terrorist attacks and aeroplane accidents would stop happening.
I wish the cable wasn't so fucking long.
I wish the formula editor was a bit better.
I wish the government taxed you more too.
I wish the HTC 10 was waterproof so I could buy it.
I wish they'd give me a Samsung Galaxy S7 or HTC 10 though.
I wish they'd just port Overwatch to Vulkan already like Valve did with Dota 2.
I wish they'd pay me for standing in queue for 10 minutes just to buy some milk omg.
I wish they'd send me a cheque too.
I wish we'd stop electing shit people to run the country.
I wish we lived in a cable-less world.
I withdrew a few hundred £ last night.
I withdrew everything from Betdaq and Matchbook. I use smarkets 78% of the time and Betfair 20% of the time, so I rarely use Matchbook and Betdaq. They are exchanges so they won't get angry if I withdraw regularly, and I need the money to help with my cashflow.
I won 5 free spins, and then I won £30.88 from them.
I won a bet with really high odds and I now have £165 on 138.com.
I wondered that.
I wonder how it'll compare to a £450 gaming PC.
I wonder how much FPS I will get in CS:GO with my 1080 TI.
I wonder how much Microsoft paid them to make that film.
I wonder how much rory weighs now.
I wonder how my pension compares to everyones' as well.
I wonder how powerful my gaming PC will be in 16 year's time.
I wonder how well they'll cope when I'm in Korea for 3 weeks.
I wonder if at some point Tesco will stop letting me open them.
I wonder if Donald Trump would have lost if Bernie Sanders had been the candidate.
I wonder if Google will take the video down for criminal.
I wonder if he knows I still have them.
I wonder if I can kill the process that is requesting it.
I wonder if I could build a custom loop to transfer heat to my water tank to heat water using a mining rig.
I wonder if I could buy clay bricks to store the heat I'm generating from mining ethereum during Economy 7 hours.
I wonder if I'm annoying people near me.
I wonder if it'll actually arrive, I can keep it and the money?
I wonder if it's Awesome Miner.
I wonder if I've forgotten about any other bookies.
I wonder if people at work think it's weird that I put my drink down so quickly.
I wonder if the guy who leaked Jennifer Lawrence's nudes was waterboarded by the FBI. The FBI considers cybercrimes and copyright infringement to be equal to terrorism and they call it digital terrorism and JL called him a sex criminal lmao.
I wonder if there are any olympic atheletes who smoke.
I wonder if there'll even be a UK in 5 years.
I wonder if there's any people who live in London and commute to work outside of London.
I wonder if the USA will try to shut down WhatsApp.
I wonder if they'll ever put a living thing on the press.
I wonder if they'll get arrested for committing a crime and posting the evidence on Youtube.
I wonder if they're bassier than my COP's on max bass slider.
I wonder if USA only elected donald because they didn't want to be outdone in stupidity by the UK.
I wonder what a 220lbs girl looks like.
I wonder what his framerate is in CS:GO.
I wonder what I'll do with all my fiat.
I wonder what it's storing in there.
I wonder what my hearing is like. I've listened to a lot of loud music.....
I wonder what they'll come up with next.
I wonder what they look like.
I wonder when I will get my water bill.
I wonder who coined it.
I wonder who is the most muscly in the channel.
I won my arb on Paddy Power :(.
I won't be able to afford it until at least 2017 anyway.
I won't believe it until I see reviews.
I won't be renewing until next July.
I won't buy it the HTC 10 because I fucked up my HTC 9 with water.
I won't get there until really late tomorrow night.
I won't know whether it's fixed until there's lots of heavy rain.
I won't store anything on there I can't afford to lose ofc.
I won't use the reference cooler next time.
I wore my DT770s in the gym once before buying my SE215s.
I work 10 seconds away from a 12-hour gym.
I work 1 month in arrears.
I work 37 hours but I go to the gym an hour each day so it's 42.
I work 8 hours a day, and even that seems too much.
I work at a pretty big company.
I worked from home yesterday and did lots of betting.
I work in an office.
I would.
I would abuse her if I wasn't worried about losing my account.
I would appreciate a donation if anyone wants to give me one.
I would ask for your Reddit username, but it's probably full of pleb shit like /r/leagueoflegends and /r/vegan and /r/whitepeoplemusic.
I would beat both of them in Street Fighter.
I would be fine if it wasn't fucking Valentine's Day in 2 weeks.
I would be so happy with all my possessions.
I would be so rich if I earnt as much as you.
I would, but I don't want to go without my X2s.
I would buy an HTC 10 if it had decent waterproofing.
I would buy a Samsung Galaxy S7, but the DAC isn't all that great and it doesn't have USB-C or stock Android.
I would buy one of those fucking luxury islands in Dubai.
I would buy so many things.
I would buy the X2, but I have too many other commitments :(.
I would come if I wasn't buying a flat.
I would come with you if Leeds wasn't so far away.
I would commit suicide if I didn't have so much to live for.
I would do more new account offers if I wasn't so worried about my cashflow post house purchase.
I would get 370 with NiceHash.
I would get 420FPS.
I would get a 4k monitor, but I wanna get a 240hz one first.
I would get arms for my displays, but I wanna get an ultrawide at some point.
I would get two X61 Krakens and OC my CPU to 5GHz+ but I don't know how to do that.
I would hate to play OW on that mouse.
I would have agreed a lower amount if he said something a couple of weeks ago.
I would have bought one but I was going through a house purchase.
I would have done it already but I asked for the tape measure from my mum and then she got drunk and fell asleep.
I would have given you one of my beta keys, but I only had 2.
I would have got the cheaper 4.9GHz pre-bin but it was out of stock.
I would have got them if I didn't already have my heart set on the Fidelio X2s.
I would have liked more than £5 really.
I would have paid up to £1000 for it.
I would have to buy a stick, post it to her, then write a note telling her to use it and send it back to me..
I would highly recommend you order these headphones now if you have any interest in them at all; you are very unlikely to find them this cheap any time soon.
I would if my company paid for it.
I would invite my gf too.
I would just downsample them from 4k, but my 970 isn't quite fast enough.
I would just put the locking mechanism back in, but that means I have to open them up twice more.
I would just use my COP at work, but sometimes it's very noisy at home.
I would keep them, but I'm not satisfied with the isolation, and prefer the sound of my Beyer Custom One Pros a lot more.
I would leave my DT770s at work, but I would be worried about them being stolen.
I would like to live in Germany.
I would like to smoke weed too.
I would love to have first-pickings, but I'm not on the board :(.
I would mod it to work with V-Moda Boom Pro.
I would move in with her if she'd just agree to pay half the rent, but she never will.
I would move to Germany, but I can't speak German.
I would mute the phone but then I don't know when someone starts talking.
I would never date a fat girl.
I would NEVER let someone else build my PC.
I wouldn't abuse my >£1,000 gaming PC like that.
I wouldn't buy a flat with service charges that high.
I wouldn't call it "harmless".
I wouldn't class anything below 300DPI as true HD.
I wouldn't class either as games though.
I wouldn't class that as small form factor.
I wouldn't do it incrementally, I'd do it 25% to 100% probably.
I wouldn't go to work if I had enough money.
I wouldn't like getting a 5 bedroom house and finding 4 other people.
I wouldn't mind getting fucked on days off if I worked for a Korean company.
I wouldn't mind it if I could log in using Lastpass or osmething.
I wouldn't mind losing the majority of a billionnaire's income, sounds fun!
I wouldn't mind open plan so much if the headset they gave me didn't have zero isolation.
I wouldn't mind paying for Netflix if it was actually good.
I wouldn't need to pivot if there weren't any walls or ceilings.
I wouldn't really recommend Razer mice or any Razer products. For mice, I generally recommend Logitech.
I wouldn't recommedn the Qck nowadays, it's popular because it was super popular years ago.
I wouldn't recommend anything less than a Fiio E10K.
I wouldn't recommend buying Razer mice because Razer products are built cheaply.
I wouldn't recommend it to most people.
I wouldn't recommend it unless you get insurance on the shipping or something.
I wouldn't recommend overclocking it in that case though.
I wouldn't sell to CeX.
I wouldn't trust anyone less than 3k.
I wouldn't trust you with a S&S ISA.
I wouldn't want a gf any taller though.
I would pay more for that than for Spotify.
I would prefer a VR headset over a laptop screen.
I would prefer to deliberately underpay and put the money in a high interest current account.
I would probably pay for Netflix if it had all the content I want.
I would put £3k into my Tesco account but my wife has filled it up already.
I would put my rigs in the garden, but I am worried about keeping them dry and preventing theft.
I would quite like to have that money.
I would rather have it and not need it than need it and not have it.
I would rather spend shitloads on a mortgage.
I would rather use the money to buy a GTX 1080TI.
I would recommend not checking on its value every week.
I would recommend the Fidelio X2s to anyone.
I would say no it's not.
I would spend more than £10 on headphones.
I would suggest the f2p model to sell skins and cosmetics, but WhatsApp has a nice minimalist client and it would be a shame to ruin it..
I would take long showers at work, but I only have an hour :(.
I would upgrade my PC every week if I had 30k net salary.
I would use a VPN, but I don't want to ruin my ping for gaming ffs.
I would use a VPN, but it ruins my gaming experience on my desktop, and prevents me from using Adguard on my mobile.
I would use mine more but it doesn't support IMAP yet :(.
I would wear the same pair of shoes indefinitely if they didn't have so much wear and tea.
I would wfh if my gf wasn't there.
I wreck scrubs.
Japan is fucking weird.
Japchae.
japchae and bulgogi baguette.
Jason".
Jeans restrict movement though.
Jeremy Clarkson is from Yorkshire isn't he?
Jesus.
jesus christ.
Jesus Christ.
Jesus Christ dude, do you not have any social skills?
jesus christ the queue is long.
jesus christ you should be a dystopian novel writer.
Jesus doesn't exist you dumbass.
Jews would be extinct today if the Daily Mail was popular.
JFK.
jinjja.
Jinjja?
Job creation isn't necessarily a good thing.
Jobs aren't given out like candy like when our parents were around.
join a table and start playing.
Joining NAFTA is unlikely because Donald Trump is very protectionist.
Jokes on you, I'll be moving soon.
Jokes on you, I will forget that by the time I watch it.
Jotenheim and HD800, don't you think you're spending a bit too much on your hobby?
jowa jinjja jinjja!
Jumper EZBook 3 Pro V4?
June I think.
Junkies like you.
Junkrat.
Just 2 more and I'll be rich.
Just £5.
Just 6 months ago I was almost bankrupt and homeless.
Just add CPU and GPU.
just admin atm.
Just a GTX 970.
Just arb them.
Just a really solid no-gimmicks phone.
Just as a treat.
Just as I fucking massage you.
Just as I want it to be.
Just attach it all together.
Just a way to get me on a list I guess.
Just barely.
Just because I am a victim of crime doesn't mean I should become a criminal too.
Just because I can, doesn't mean I should.
Just because I CBA to queue.
Just because it's good risk doesn't mean it's not risk by definition.
Just because it's not simple to put a monetary value on something doesn't mean it's worthless.
Just because she's from a different culture doesn't make her weird omg.
Just because something costs a lot doesn't mean it's worth a lot to you.
Just because the characters have abilities you think it's a fucking moba wtf.
Just because you can't hear in stereo doesn't mean you can't benefit from good headphones.
Just because you play LoL don't think it makes you at all knowledgeable of Dota.
Just bought.
Just bought a flat.
Just bought a new gaming mouse yay.
Just bought Philips Fidelio X2 on ebay for £127.
Just build a mining rig and mine on that.
Just Bulwark being casually racist.
Just buy 20 1070 TIs to mine crypto and not work.
just buy Beats if you care about fashion so much.
Just buy protein and headphones instead.
Just buy the game you cheapskate.
Just buy the hash power on Nicehack.
Just calculated a £13.42 profit on the £72 arb I made on Tommy French.
Just came out, and it's really really nice.
Just change the in-game sensitivity and leave the DPI alone.
Just confirmed the system boots up. Can you let me know how many SATA cables I need to include for your hard drives?
Just contact ebay or paypal if you have a problem with the item.
Just did an AI game and found CPU usage was hovering at 90% and GPU usage at 60% in MSI Afterburner.
Just different skinsd.
Just doing it in my spare time.
Just do it at the weekend instead?
Just don't buy a fucking Qck.
Just don't buy the SE215s like I did.
Just don't do anything hasty.
Just don't get g2a shield, it's a scam.
Just do something illegal that I haven't suggested yet.
Just do that then, seems like the easy thing to do.
Just do the full wagering requirement then.
Just do what Germany does with censorship and turn everyone into robots.
Just eat until you've had enough.
Just explain to them you made a mistake, and they'll refund the fees.
Just explain you're trying to get good value for money for the business or some shit?
Just focus on RTP.
Just for a few months to boost my income.
Just for the heat.
Just gave them a quick listen.
Just get a chromecast and a TV and a smartphone.
Just get a HTC 10, then you don't need an AMPDAC.
Just get a Z270 board.
Just get Custom Studios, open all the bass ports, and enjoy more bass + more sound quality over M50.
just get it together.
Just get some credit cards.
Just give me 0.075 LTC for my 10 GRLC.
Just give me a fucking unit rate and tariff comparison not these fake £ values.
Just goes to show that contract costs more even with high-end SIMS.
Just goes to show you get what you pay for!!!!!!!1.
Just gonna hold it in instead....
Just gonna mine and convert straight to fiat and buy more rigs.
Just gonna put petrol on it every month and pay it off.
Just go silent ffs.
Just got be unemployed for a week and it'll bve free.
Just got invited to beta test Protonmail mobile too.
Just got my new ISP, pings are less than half of what they were before.
Just got some free bowls for my house.
Just gotta get past the fucking autolocking door and the staircase.
Just got this email "Whats good.
Just great sound quality and comfort.
Just had a team day.
Just had horrible shits.
Just have to be super careful I guess.
Just have to let her get on with it.
Just imagine the interviewers are fat and naked.
Just imagine what Futurama could have been if Matt Groening kept it running as long as The Simpsons.
Just in Canada?
Just in case.
just in general.
Justin Trudeaus is ugly.
Just let it run its course.
Just let me know when you're ready. I'll hold onto the system for now..
Just logged in with IE no problem.
Just lots of lines of whining.
Just lower voltage until it crashes and then up voltage until it stops.
Just made £9.20 profit from doing £10 on slots.
Just make a 24" virtual monitor.
Just make it a secured loan using 1080TI as security.
Just make the best decisions you can for the future.
Just make them smaller for small transactions.
Just mine to external wallet then.
Just need another £10k and I can buy a one bedroom flat.
Just need to supplement my income as much as possible until September!!!!!
Just never realised.
Just never shut down your PC if you don't have an SSD.
Just not pre-game ones.
just office admin.
Just open a Tesco account or something and switch that for the bonus £££.
Just opt in.
Just order them and wait patiently.
Just over 21"?
Just over the tip.
Just pay my withdrawal fee and I'll withdraw it directly to your wallet.
Just premium metal design.
Just pretend SLI doesn't exist, like nVidia now does.
Just put a shirt on.
Just put the PC in the lounge.
just report and mute him.
Just sell the currency to offset the cost of heating your flat.
Just send me the full EPC report.
Just set it to autospin then go have sex.
Just set the sentivity the same.
Just snagged one for £135.54.
Just some cheap place.
Just spoke to my manager and I have bad news.
Just spoke to Scan.
Just stop being stupid.
Just switch a bank account if you need £100.
Just switch one with two dummy tesco direct debits.
Just switch to winminer.
Just tell him to buy a gaming laptop.
Just test it yourself, sit next to people with your DT770s and M50Xs, play music, and ask them which pair they can hear sound from.
Just the one.
Just the one..
Just the one what?
Just the windshield.
Just to last me until I can live off my investments.
Just trickle it.
Just tried Gnome Shell.
Just trying to use semi-realistic values to get a rough guess right now.
Just turn automatic updates off? I find they kill my framerate if I have them done automatically.
Just two buttons instead of one.
Just upload your moneys, set your rate, then kick back and wait for your free money in the future.
Just use the lowest risk profile for a couple of months.
Just use the minimum risk profile.
Just use Ubuntu and configure it to your weird niche interest.
Just VPN.
Just waiting for my miniXLR to 3.5mm adapter to arrive.
Just waiting for my ridiculously expensive motherboard and PSU now.
Just wanna get some Fiio X2s now.....
Just wasted £100 on accas that didn't qualify.
Just watch Archer instead, it's basically the same thing.
Just watched it with my wife.
Just watch Twitch?
Just went from under 7k to over 8k in about 20 minutes.
Just wondering.
Just wondering if you browse Reddit like I do.
Just wondering what you track.
Just won over £60 from a single spin.
k.
k 1 min.
k65.
K65 has play/pause.
K65 is a good keyboard.
K65 is good.
K702s are the BEST gaming headphones.
Kakau Talk.
Kappa.
Katy Perry isn't real either.
kawaii is a Japanese word.
kd doesn't mean shit.
KD ratio isn't an important statistic.
kebab*.
Keepass is a pain to use.
Keeping it in case you need it too.
Keep me updated.
Keeps crashing.
Keeps my flat warm.
keep walking until you find someone?
Keep winning on Coral.
Kept crashing.
Kept crashing in Dota...
Keven".
Keyboard is actually a better experience than gamepad.
KFC 15% discount + chicken stamps.
KFC delivery omfg wtf.
KFC does absolutely no damage.
KFC is amazing.
KFC TOMORROW OMG.
Kicked off all the ASICs and botnets.
k I guess I'm not voting then.
KILLING SPREE.
Kill it before it metatiscises.
k I'll look tonight.
kinda.
Kinda.
Kinda a weird question really, I'm not sure what you're asking me.
Kinda busy betting and building a new PC atm.
Kinda, but OW has a big upfront cost.
Kinda confused.
Kinda creepy really lmao.
Kinda hard to palm with my big hands....
Kinda just skimmed over it.
Kinda like betting.
Kinda like "go back where you came from".
Kinda like how Tic Tac Toe has a "proper meta" and Chess is a "free-for-all".
Kinda like LoL and Dota 2 I guess.
Kinda like TF2, but with more classes.
Kinda like the employee-matched pension schemes in UK but run by the government or something?
Kinda. Overwatch has way too much latency for how fast-paced it is.
Kinda sucks how I spent £40 on this Modmic which is pissing me the fuck off though.
Kinda weird.
Knew it..
KOBERN-GONDORF, RP, DE.
Kodi is so hard to navigate.
Korean.
Korean Academy of Tuberculosis and Respiratory Diseases?
Korean alphabet is actually very simple.
Korean building.
Korean girls.
Korean girls are physically and intellectually superior to Aryans.
Korean girls are physically and intellectually superior to whites.
Korean girls are racially superior.
KOREAN GIRLS ARE RACIALLY SUPERIOR.
Korean girls are very different from white both physically and mentally.
Korean grils are genetically less stinky than white.
Korean grils have a gene that prevents them from creating BO.
Korean is illegal too.
Korea would be fun.
KPIs for the outsourcing contract.
K-pop artists are now gaining more international exposure through social media networks such as YouTube, Facebook, and Twitter, making it easier for them to reach a wider audience.[80].
kpop but other genres too.
Kpop daebak.
kpop is better.
kpop is catchier.
kpop is more addicting than any drug anyway.
kpop is the best genre because it has the highest production value of any music in the world.
Kpop is the best genre of music in the world because it has the highest production value..
Kraken X61 would be good.
k then I'm telling the police you buy, handle and consume illegal drugs.
L4D is dying.
Labour are communists.
Labour are the second most likely to win.
Laggy and low resolution.
Landlord sounds cooler.
Landlords vote more.
Laptops are expensive, expensive to upgrade, noisy, underpowered.
Large screen to body ratio.
Largest soundstage and most detailed mid-fi cans.
Laser AK/autosniper are ridiculously OP.
Laser pointers with explosives implanted in the androids?
Last bid was yesterday morning.
Last chance to buy my DT770s for cheap, you want them?
Last Matched Rates.
last night I was using my phone's mic to play CS.
Last night I went to Subway and bought two footlongs and a six inch sub.
last night my fucking GPU went up to 90C and the fan went up to 4035RPM.
Last one is tomorrow.
Lastpass?
LastPass is easier.
Lastpass is just really simple to use.
Lastpass is more convenient.
Last time I tried, they didn't accept me.
Lately I've just been working through it.
Later, I'm in CS:GO now.
Later this year my First Direct monthly saver will close leaving me with about £3,700 to allocate somewhere.
Launch is tonight.
LawBreakers looks shit.
LbGMLsHhZPdFEgLwRrF7Aiw21hL8FPUZYU.
League is for losers.
League of Legends.
League of Legends fan music wtf.
League of Legends reminds me of Scientology, it's such a fucking cult omg.
Learning German is hard....
Leatherette then whatever.
Leave at 10AM then.
Leave EU, join China.
Leave is probably more vocal.
Leave it for 3-5 weeks please, my mum still does all the grocery shopping.
Leave will reduce emigration which is bad.
Leaving your cash in your bank account has the risk of inflation and opportunity cost.
Leeds is pretty far away, but I'll let you know if I'm ever in the area.
Legal highs.
legal highs are blanket drugs?
Lemme give it a try tonight and this weekend.
lemme know if you want to buy my E10K for £30+P&P.
lemme know when you want to enter the world of Hi-Fi.
Less comfortable and lower sound quality.
Less douchey companies backing it.
Less exchanges with like $5 a day liquidity.
Less fatigueing too.
Less hardware than I've got in my Ncase M1 right now.
Less heat and noise, but still good hashrate.
Less risk of breast cancer, less risk of back problems, etc.
Less than a year.
Less than half the cost of yours.
Less traffic, easier to wake up at the same time on weekends.
Less work, more moneuy.
Let me do it for you.
let me do the cable mod and give you more information to make the best decision possible.
Let me know before you do that.
Let me know if it's profitable, I like free money..
Let me know if you ever want more, I'm always selling.
Let me know if you find any good cashback offers pls.
let me know if you find any more lucrative shitcoins though.
Let me know if you find one.
Let me know if you need a referral link for a free £100 if you want to switch to Nationwide.
Let me know if you notice any difference over your Fiio.
Let me know if you want another photo.
Let me know if you want to RMA any of the stuff I sold you, I can provide original invoices.
Let me know what voltage you settle your overclock at.
Let me know when GRLC switches algo.
Let me know when you're back.
Let me know when you've bought it pls.
Let me know your overclocking process.
Let me know your overclocking progress.
Let's be work buddies.
Let's face it, the EU might not exist in 10 years!
Let's hope there's a memer in the MPC.
Let's ride the hype train choo choo.
LG G5 with the B&O DAC would be good.
LG V20 should be good.
Lib Dems wanted to change it, they got to be a big party, and they failed.
Lifetime ISA?
Light and large with a great sensor is what I want.
Lightning network isn't real crypto.
Like £££.
Like £10.
Like £55 maybe.
Like 6 miles to work each day.
like 6X the size of my Ncase.
Like a benevolent dictator.
Like Adolf Hitler, Donald Trump, and Teresa May.
Like a god.
Like a GTX 1080TI.
Like a Lannister.
Like an extra £7k.
Like a pleb.
Like a premium business keyboard.
Like as a list.
Like Beats.
Like buying a house and upgrading my PC.
Like Charlie and Frank.
Like conditional formatting.
Like cooking.
Like Dota.
Like entertainment and security and relationships.
Like every day.
Like go to war with Iraq or some shit.
Like GoT then?
Like GTX 1080 TIs.
Like headphones and video games.
Like heroes, runes, masteries, etc.
Like his friends?
Like his lovers?
Like I am a Master Guardian Elite.
Like if I said John Snow comes back to life, that would be a spoiler.
Like I'm looking at them through a blur-filter.
Like in China.
Like in Dota and CS:GO you need to communicate.
Like in the office.
Like in Trainspotters?
Like it costs them more if I wait inside than outside it.
Like LoL is in Korea.
Like McDonalds or KFC.
Like Michael Macentire.
Like most Europeans then?
Like most SJW sympathisers do.
Like my 4690K or something.
Like my mum judges me for playing video games and living with my parents?
Like old PC parts.
Like Quake and UT.
Like removing duplicates from playlists, and downloading more than 3,333 songs.
like rory.
likes anime now and he's a full-grown man!
Like some sort of formula writer tool.
Like switching bonuses.
Like Tesco?
Like that!
Like that's going to help.
Like the conversation party do.
Like the difference between gaming in 4:3 and 16:9.
like the DT770s, and you get bass heavy for bassheads.
Like the ethernet plug?
Like the way I do it?
Like they aren't even comparable, my SE215s are dogshit.
Like they paid for my new car battery.
Like Tony Blair hahahahhahaa.
Like twice my age.
like wat?
Like wat?
Like weights and sniper buttons.
like what?
Like what?
like what the actual fuck.
Like who the fuck is listening to this.
Like why the fuck am I wasting my time asking people how long they want their temporary password to be so they can just immediately change it wtf.
like wtf.
like your favourite gun etc" - Bulwark.
Line/mic/optical in.
Line out.
line rental is such a fucking rip-off.
link.
Link?
Link a picture of you and your palm.
Linked it to you like 10 times.
Link him that display.
link it.
Link please.
link pls.
Link their website.
Link your build.
link yours.
link your Wickr profile.
Linux 64 Bit..
Linux gaming is rapidly chasing up to Linux atm thanks to Valve.
Linux in general is a lot safer.
Linux is supposed to be more secure than Windoze.
Linux>Windoze.
Liquid nitrogen cooling doesn't seem practical though.
LISA.
LISA is more at risk.
Listening to what?
Literally?
Literally 30 seconds before.
Literally nothing.
Live off mining and betting and shit.
Live with my mother, live with my brother, or live in this flat.
Live with parents for free brah.
Living wage?
Living with one other person would probably be okay.
Lloyds is going to give me 6 free cinema tickets soon.
ll the comments because she doesn't like using comments.
lmao.
lmao?
Lmao.
LMAO.
lmao 10%.
lmao 10% is great, I'm only getting 1%.
lmao £185?
lmao 18k.
lmao 2.7GHz non-overclockable.
lmao £30.
lmao 3GB so much.
LMAO £400 is is still double the increase of my net.
lmao £45/mo.
lmao 60FPS.
lmao £675.
LMAO 70.
lmao 7k you're so poor.
lmao 7% of Iceland's population protested yesterday and now the PM has resigned.
lmao a Korean team won an international Dota LAN last night.
lmao and Overwatch is for adults then?
lmao and people give me shit for playing video games and drinking energy drinks with B vitamins.
lmao another 5p.
lmao Apple Earbuds cost like $1.
lmao a pretty shitty foot rest and door stop.
lmao are you trolling me?
lmao are you watching the whole series?
lmao Barrack is only ranked one above Donald.
lmao been on Reddit all day and my manager just asked me if I'm being overworked.
lmao Bose.
lmao Bose you fucking plen.
lmao but how?
lmao but it's so funny how stupid some people can be.
lmao but pretty much everyone charges their phones with their PC's USB ports.
lmao but so much stuff I'm trying to find is missing.
lmao bwin keeps saying I am single.
lmao cartone.
LMAO Corbyn is on the ballot.
lmao daily mail doesn't give a fuck, I'm not their target demographic.
lmao Donald Trump is USA president 2016.
lmao don't play with  vsync.
lmao enjoy walking to Iota's house.
lmao everything is a social construct to an SJW.
lmao filthy casual.
lmao fuck off.
lmao Funding Circle is high risk.
lmao Google.
lmao have to book a dining time.
lmao have you ever clicked on the Dota 2 stream page on Twitch? Half the streamers are Russian grills now.
lmao HD800s.
lmao Hermes keeps failing to deliver to me because they're delivering outside the hours my office is open.
lmao HL3 you wish m9.
LMAO HOMEOPATHY IS COVERED.
lmao how?
lmao how bad do you think my vocabulary is?
lmao how do you tell they're "near death"?
lmao how high was he?
lmao how is it risky?
lmaoi.
lmao I discovered yesterday that I had plugged my pump into the CPU fan header and the radiator fans into the system fan header.
lmao IDK.
lmao I don't have a "good credit rating".
lmao I don't have friends.
lmao I do that all the time.
lmao I doubt it.
lmao if I was a complete moron? Isn't that what interviews are for?
lmao I get paid about £15 a month from Dota 2.
lmao I got a letter from the police at the weekend.
lmao I got a quote for £70 to add a 3.5mm jack to my DT770s..... I could just buy a new pair of headphones.
lmao I had 3 months off work and worked 2 day weeks.
lmao I have to wait like 2 months for my Ncase to arrive.
lmao I installed Tor Browser on my friend's computer and he got really upset and his friends freaked out and threatened to kill me.
lmao I just chose a random anime girl pic to make people rage in CS:GO.
lmao I just had a thought. If you got a student loan at 90, you'd probably never pay it back hahahhaha.
lmao I just saw fat women running in the gym.
lmao I just saw someone stack some crates of cans of drinks on the side of a one-legged table full of leaflets.
lmao I know what dogging is.
lmao I know you're joking but I've actually been thinking about how cool that would be.
lmao I love how the headlines try to mislead people into thinking it's the national team.
lmao I'm about to turn 26 and now there's a 26-30 rail card.
lmao I'm alone in the office.
lmao I'm cold every day m9.
lmao I misread "Forecebox gamer" as "Facebook gamer".
lmao I'm never going to have £75k in savings.
lmao I'm not going into the office once this week.
lmao I'm not gonna pay for a tv license.
lmao I'm not thermal throttling.
lmao I'm unbanned.
lmao im using Visio 2003.
lmao I'm watching CS:GO esports whilst working from home.
lmao ipads.
lmao I pay the fee both times/.
lmao I played Dota with my friend who had never played the game before. He had no clue what he was doing. He kept comparing it to LoL for some reason, despite me telling him it's nothing like LoL. Dota has just completely changed though, so he'll have to relearn everything again haha.
lmao I put money on black on 888casino and lost three times.
LMAO I said "you're legaly bound to pay me £39" and he said "you're just making excuses".
lmao I saw a number plate on a car yesterday that said "Big dick, down to fuck".
lmao is that you?
lmao I think I just saw my local MP voting for himself then.
lmao I think my mum just votes on whatever the Daily Mail tells her to.
lmao it looks completely different.
lmao it looks so funny watching them all looking down at their phones.
lmao I told my gf she's special and she thought it was a compliment.
lmao I told my parents that people over 80 shouldn't get a vote and they got so pissed off with me.
lmao I tried Netflix's free trial.
lmao it's a 2.5GHz CPU.
lmao it's fiat that's controlled by the establishment.
lmao it's not that simple.
lmao it's only 1?
Lmao it's Swansea, isn't it?
lmao it's terrible.
lmao it won't be 5%, it'll be 1% max.
Lmao I've bought so many parts to build this headset now.
lmao I've just been listening to someone say "hello, can you hear me, hello" on the phone for the past 10 minutes.
lmao I went to look at a shitty house amongst our social houses, then a massive mansion right after.
lmao I wish I switched away from them instead of using their regular saver.
lmao just got an email telling me that IT are migrating to a new email system and I need to click a link and give them my information by 20th September.
lmao just had to talk to health and safety.
lmao just plugged my Beyers in and srsly there's no comparison.
lmao just won 3v5.
lmao Katie Hopkins.
lmao laptops?
lmao last night I enabled 'fast boot' which disables my USB keyboard until the OS has booted. I can't decrypt my hard drive or get into my BIOS now.
lmao less qualified than Hitler.
lmao like what?
lmao me too.
lmao more like £2k.
lmao Mr Scruff is pre-installed on our work laptops.
lmao MtG.
lmao my co-just said that her university education makes her think she should vote for Brexit but she agrees with the Conservatives on economics.
lmao my colleague has been on the phone for the past 20 minutes trying to fix a problem I know the solution for.
lmao my colleague is listening to music on Youtube using her shitty headphone earpiece.
lmao my colleague just told me off for not deleting my emails and "costing the business money".
lmao my colleague just told me that I am a terrible person for supporting KFC.
lmao my colleague says I need to turn my music volume down so I can hear her, but I'm not even listening to music!
lmao my colleague was telling me about a story reported in the Daily Mail and said "it must be true otherwise the Daily Mail would get sued".
lmao my company is always trying to get my to claim less miles than I actually drove.
lmao my co-worker is asking around the office for an iPhone charger. If only she bought a normal phone.
lmao my co-worker just called me and told me "the temporary password you gave me is too long".
lmao my co-worker just got suspended for sharing a confidential email from a director.
lmao my friend turned vegetarian and now he's arguing that killing animals is morally wrong on Reddit.
lmao my gf got so angry with me when I asked her to pay for her own food the other day.
lmao my manager told me she won't buy me any display arms because they're too expensive and it'll set a president that other people may ask for them.
lmao my middle-aged co-worker is on the phone about steam gift cards.
lmao my mother celebrates pancake day but not the new year wtf.
lmao my new wallet has just arrived.
lmao my wife just asked me if illegal drugs are illegal in the UK.
lmao netflix is such a rip-off.
lmao nice one m9.
lmao no.
lmao no I don't do that.
lmao no it's not.
lmao no it's not £12k.
lmao no it wasn't.
lmao no laptop is as powerful as a high-end PC.
LMAO no not really.
lmao no, the house will be going to my stepmother's children.
lmao no they don't.
lmao no we shouldn't.
lmao ofc.
lmao okay buy a massive fucking case and still ahve shit CPU cooling then.
lmao old man steve just told me that Wikipedia is a bad source because anyone can edit it.
lmao one of the viewings I'm going to is surrounded by dozens of our social houses.
lmao only 4%?!?!??!
lmao only 989/1139 songs in my playlist are actually playable.
lmao Piers Morgan and Nigel Farage.
lmao PSY shows what you know m9.
lmao really?
lmao "really poor".
lmao rekt.
lmao rory does standup.
lmao same.
lmao same but with Tommy French.
lmao semi.
lmao she's still doing it.
lmao Skorpio.
lmao so £840 in total.
lmao so I have to go all the way to Leeds or Bristol?
lmao so many of our customers and contractors "don't do computers".
lmao so many people selling their 970/980.
lmao some 25 stone man threatened to kill me last night after I installed Tor Browser on his friend's computer.
lmao someone at my work has ransomware.
lmao someone at my work is advertising free horse manure.
lmao someone called me a bigot for saying Americans shouldn't have as many guns today.
lmao someone just phoned me and told me they "don't do computers".
Lmao someone took that photo as a joke.
lmao sounds like IT to me.
lmao so you have to keep entering your password all day.
lmao so you're going to spend £30 on a kebba?
lmao Steve Balmer at Microsoft called Linux "cancer".
lmao sure.
lmao sure m9.
lmao sure you did.
lmao sure you do.
lmao Terry Crews is just sitting on a GTX 1080.
lmao TF2 has a "hardcore fan base"?
lmao that can't be right.
lmao that joke is so old.
lmao that just leaves me even more confused.
lmao that's a bad CPU.
lmao thats a fucking joke.
lmao that site is so NSFW.
lmao that's not what I mean.
lmao that's so stupid.
lmao that's too funny m9.
lmao that talent-less hillbilly.
lmao the Barclays staff I just spoke to is named "Pooja Sinha".
lmao the Conservative party are advertising the leader but the Labour party is advertising their policies.
lmao "the eyes have it, the eyes have it".
lmao the interest is going up faster than I'm paying it off.
lmao the Korean girl?
lmao the motherboard is probably bigger than the case.
LMAO the new girl sitting next to me is listening to music using Ipod earphones.
lmao then they will just complain they can't do it and tell me to undo what I've done.
lmao the PM just admitted to tax dodging.
lmao the recruitment consultant told me there were lots of jobs and not many graduates atm.
lmao the state pension age is being changed to 70.
lmao the team who manages our internal website just made it so much worse.
lmao the vendor didn't desolder the VRAM.
lmao they actually said that?
lmao they say I am just showing off my 5GHz 7700K.
lmao this guy.
lmao this manager asking me about "the new functionality thing" IDK what he's talking about.
lmao this tiny box which feels weightless cost me £460.
lmao this tiny little XLR adapter cost me £20.
lmao Tom Cruise.
lmao trying to sell LTC and the price is going up and down whilst I'm trying to figure out how to do it.
lmao TSB blocked my card again and I had to talk to their fraud department for like 20 minutes.
lmao tumblr.
lmao was kidding.
lmao wat.
lmao wat?
lmao weighted mice are so dumb.
lmao what.
lmao what?
lmao what's the point?
lmao what's your salary then?
lmao when he said his mum died and he was double booked with another girl.
lmao who cares about single-thread performance nowadays?
lmao who would lie about having a gf?
lmao why?
lmao why are you talking so figuratively today?
lmao why did HR tell you to hire the grill?
lmao why did you live with Serotone?
lmao why do you think I would do something dodgy and get us banned?!??!
lmao why do you think North Korea still exists?
lmao why do you vote?
lmao why not?
lmao why would I be jealous of her? My gf is much more beautiful.
lmao wtf.
lmao wtf?
lmao wtf Donald Trump is promoting coal at a climate summit.
lmao wtf why does supporting 128GB make it future proof?
lmao yeah.
lmao yeah because they're bored of Countdown and Flog It.
lmao yeah I did the pivot table on the Excel online test thing, but IDK what it does.
lmao yeah it's good.
lmao yeah or a NUC or something.
lmao yeah wtf.
lmao yesterday I was watching MLG in the gym at work.
lmao yes they do.
lmao yes your such a nerd.
lmao you always could.
lmao you are the stinky one then.
lmao you can do that?
lmao you can't do that to a CPU.
lmao you can't get decent pre-builts.
lmao you don't have any savings for impulse purchases?
lmao you filthy casual.
lmao you look at Daily Mail front pages?
lmao you measure the cost in £ per mbit?
lmao you nerd.
lmao your a terrible human being.
lmao your on m9.
lmao your rent is TWICE my mortgage.
lmao your so poor.
lmao your such a druggie.
lmao your the weeb for playing LoL.
lmao your wife is married at 25? It's not 1950 any more.
lmao you sound gay.
lmao you spent thousands of pounds of other peoples' money on drugs?
lmao you still use scart?
lmao you think M50X are big.
lmao you used Facebook?
lmao you use facebook?
lmao "zero".
lmfao.
LMFAO.
lmfao £100k.
lmfao Anita Sarkeesian.
LMFAO a pro Dota player's car keys for his MASERATI were stolen by the event organisers.
lmfao are you calling me an idiot?
lmfao "brown and cream".
lmfao gmail?
lmfao he actually is.
lmfao he has a shit GPU. He'll be very pleased with the 1070.
lmfao how?
lmfao I accidentally bought a hex key set instead of torx key set. I tried to return it to Amazon and they said they'll refund it without me having to return it.
lmfao I am on lunch but I'm literally just sitting at my desk blasting my DT770s.
lmfao Investment Returns, All Time  £2.59 Fees, All Time  £1.10.
lmfao I thought you had a really low opinion of me or something.
lmfao I was in-store in Ladbrokes last night and some guy asked me if the game I was playting is good.
lmfao no.
LMFAO no they don't.
LMFAO OMG.
lmfao same.
lmfao srsly?
lmfao that's even worse.
lmfao that's what I thought.
lmfao that video.
lmfao "well-spoken"?
lmfao who uses antivirus in 2016.
lmfao why?
lmfao wtf.
LMFAO you play Sims?
lmfao you sound like my fucking mum..
LMFAO you weeb.
lmfao you work with idiots.
LMFQAO.
Locks the cable in place.
Lo-Fi?
Logarithmic is probably the best for values like these.
Logarithmic might just be best.
Logging into my bank accounts is a fucking pain though.
Logitech C920.
Logitech has low click latency, good sensors and good build quality.
Logitech mice are often very good too.
Logitech Prodigy G403.
lol but it's like £800 or something ridiculous, right?
LoL esports is just an advertisement for the game instead of trying to be something good itself.
lol girls don't know what IRC is.
lol have you not seen the SWATing videos?
lol how you get it so fast?
lol if anything it's more secure than $.
lol Iota just doesn't get it.
LoL is different because the prize money is so low.
LoL is inferior to Dota 2, but it's more popular because it had first mover advantage.
LoL is objectively inferior in almost every way.
LoL is such a bad game though.
lol I still watch kpop at work without a VPN.
lol it's not a big deal, and it's probably good news for me.
lol I was jk I don't expect you to buy me a private island.
lol never invest your credit card debt.
lol no.
lol no I don't shower, have breakfast or make lunch.
lol no I'm going to use it for gaming too.
lol no, I'm nowhere near good enough.
lol no I spent almost triple that just on my CPU.
lol no it doesn't.
lol no it's a CPU cooler.
lol no, they give me lots of chocolate too.
LoL playerbase is also super casual and can easily move onto the next big casual game.
lol since when are you an expert on asians?
LoL's prize money is really being left in the dust compared to Dota 2 and CS:GO.
LoL still does.
lol that's your gf?
lol these people have in house tech and are paying £1k/day for me.
lol this girl told me that she's blocking me on Steam because I'm too stingy for not giving her csgo items.
lol what.
lol what?
lol what when did I say that?
lol who gives a shit about what their drivers look like?
lol yeah M50X definitely aren't high-end.
LOL YES MEAT EATERS AREN'T AWARE THAT THEIR FOOD USED TO BE AN ANIMAL.
lol you earn 44k.
lol you sacrafice interest whenever you spend any money.
London has lot of asian girls though.
London people are weird.
Long battery life.
Longer loan=smaller APR?
Long-run it makes no difference.
Look at benchmarks.
Look at gaming benchmarks.
Look at Nicehack resistant coins.
look at that windoze fag at 0:55.
Look at the "Frequently bought together".
Look at the guide I sent you.
Look at the price history.
Look at the price history,it never went above £59.
Look at the pricer history,it never went above £59.
Look at the temps.
Look at the trees.
Look at this pleb who thinks his M50X are as good as our Beyers and X2/HD600.
Look harder.
Look how many people are shot in the USA every year.
Look how much desk space the arms save!".
Look how simultaneously expensive and shitty the train service is.
Looking at around 11th July.
Looks a little small though.
looks good.
Looks good.
Looks good?
Looks good if you want cheap storage.
Looks interesting, and I think I signed up to the beta.
Looks interesting, I'll give it a read when I have time.
Looks like a lot of hassle.
Looks like it could be a good competitor to my Sound Blaster E5.
Looks like it got pumped again.
Looks like it'll be Teresa May....
Looks like it's 1X£125, 1X£75, 2X£50, 4X£25 and 3X£10 each month.
Looks like it's going to smash the record again this year.
Looks like juice not water?
Looks like there was a problem with the payment. I hope this doesn't delay my broadband.
Looks like the RX 480 sucks compared to the GTX 970.
Looks like the same PSU.
Looks like they've shut down now.
Looks like this single add-on does what I was doing with like 5 addons.
Looks like we aren't going to get any heavy rain for a while, so I won't know for sure :(.
Looks like we're going to war in Syria.
Looks profitable ATM.
Looks really fun.
Looks similar to what I got.
Looks up to me.
Look up Eternal Envy.
Lose the keyboard and mouse and it's ~£210.
Losing weight is easy, all you have to do is regularly exercise and consume less calories.
Losing weight would be so much easier if my mum didn't put so much food in my lunchbox omg.
Lost a £50 acca.
Lost it all.
Lost my first game, won my second.
Lost sight after birth.
Lost so much weight.
lota is an angram for toal.
lota you should get AKG K702s, they're amazing headphones.
Lots more outside of China.
Lots of 60hz monitors.....
Lots of anime in it.
Lots of Asians though.
Lots of BJ and slot masheens.
Lots of Black Friday bookie offers.
Lots of buttons?
Lots of clouds about.
Lots of cool little things.
Lots of cool planes keep flying over.
Lots of cute Asian grils though.
Lots of gameplay-affecting stuff a new player doesn't have.
Lots of good shit in there.
Lots of GPUs and CPU cores aren't good for gaming because you need good single-thread performance. But they're great for mining.
Lots of homosexuality.
Lots of IF functions.
Lots of Koreans.
Lots of Linux ones?
Lots of men, lots of girls.
Lots of metal.
Lots of mouse movement.
Lots of negative recent reviews about returns.
Lots of people at my work give me food actually.
Lots of people at work keep giving me food.
Lots of people do.
Lots of people do it.
Lots of people don't know intermediate.
Lots of people have been complaining.
Lots of people in social housing.
Lots of phones don't have headphone jacks nowadays wtf.
Lots of pizza boxes in his room.
Lots of shit in there.
Lots of stores.
Lots of things are double taxed.
Lots of third-world countries too.
Lots of £££ though?
Lots of trading volume too.
Loud keyboards make typing so much more fun!
Love that film, it reminds me of myself.
Love the way it feels.
Low cost, low power-draw, high performance.
Lower fees for EUR?
Lower fees = more profit.
Lower is better because you have less inertia so it's easier to stop and change directions.
lower voltage, increse +core.
Low FoV sucks.
Low input lag, high refresh rate.
Low ping is way too important.
Low priority for 20 minutes.
Low risk / low reward.
Low risk roulette bets will not count towards wagering. These are defined as ANY bet spread combination on roulette games covering 25 or more (25-37 spots) of the 37 unique number spots on the table. For example, if you bet on Red and Black, you are covering 36 of the 37 possible outcomes, therefore this bet would not count to.
Low risk with decent reward.
LTC.
LTC is $128 right now.
LTC is fine.
LTC is going down.
LTC is going to overtake BTC.
LTC is the future of auto exchange.
LTC is undervalued.
LTC price is soaring this week.
LTC up 40%.
LTC will rise following the NiceHack hack.
LTC will win the cryptocurrency rate for legitimacy because transaction fees are low and history has always taught us that people value cheap over everything else.
LTS.
ltw.
Luckily I don't need it until my Ncase M1 arrives in like a month from now anyway.
Luckily it's just two of us using it and we sit next to each other.
Lucky.
Lucky, I have to wait until Monday.
LUX and GRLC at the top for me, although I haven't entered in hash rates for every algorithm.
ly.
lyra2.
Lyra2z.
Lyra2z or something.
m0e is a brainless twitch streamer.
m.2?
M416 and S686 are such good weapons.
M50?
M50 is shit that's why.
M50s are really well designed.
M50s, Sennheiser, Philips Fidelo X2, etc.
M50s with or without glasses? I need them to be comfortable with glasses!!!
M50X are definitely overhyped.
M50X doesn't have a custom bass slider.
M50X doesn't really have that much going for it other than being able to fold really nicely.
M50X have no soundstage.
M50X is massively overhyped IMO.
M50X sound like shit compared to my Beyers.
M50X's sound quality is vastly outperformed by most other mid-fi headphones in the studio and at home.
m9 are you actually autistic?
MacDonalds?
Macros can execute commands outside of the file/program sandbox?
Madbrad200 my gf makes me avacado and bacon and egg toast.
Made 44p.
Made in China crap.
Made me think of you.
Made them a big target.
Magic the Fathering?
Magic the Gathering?
Main Deck?
Mainly because I want to minimise the withdrawal fee.
Mainly the £25 interest-free amount in case I get into trouble I guess.
Major Depression?
Major League Gaming.
Major League Gaming..
Make a build with 0% donation pls.
Make a seperate Windoze session.
MAKE BRITAIN BRITISH AGAIN.
Make it 3 day weekends.
Make it higher than $500 and maybe someone will claim it.
Make it really quiet.
MAKE ME GO THROUGH 20 MINUTES OF MENU OPTIONSD.
Makes a big difference in Overwatch and CS:GO.
Makes cable management so easy!
Makes cable management way easier too.
Makes it such a pain trying to email them when they don't have an address and other stupid little things.
makes me think of faeces and semen.
Makes my life so much easier.
Makes password management a breeze.
Makes up for the low salary I guess.
Make sure Multiprocess is enabled and you don't have any addons stopping it from working.
Make sure RAM and CPU are stable.
Make sure you always have more money than you need.
Make sure you both have Blue Yetis.
Make sure you get a GTX 1080TI. You don't want your 5GHz 7700K to be bottlenecked by a shitty GTX 970 like mine is.
make sure you get good back support, it's important!!!!!!1.
Make sure you have a large well-ventilated case for that, otherwise it'll heat up your other components.
Make sure you're on Firefox 55 too.
Make sure you're online after work, I want to trade.
Make sure your PC is elevated off the ground, put it on your desk if you can.
Make sure your temps are below 80C to stop thermal throttling.
MAKE SURE you specify only 8 hour days though.
Make sure you wish all the women in your office a happy Women's Day.
Makes you rich.
Make the most of it and start playing now!
Make Wednesday your special gaming day.
Making a whole bunch more on the CPU too.
Making more and more accounts would get unwieldly.
Making the quality of life better in the UK will attract migrants.
Making the whole thing pointless.
Man 1940 was so fucking long ago.
Management fees.
Managing Director?
Managing Director and Prime Minister?
Mandu.
Man I bet you're jealous of my card.
man I can't tell if you're trolling me.
Man IDK if I don't want to have a conversation that awkward.
man sed.
Man you really need to keep more alert for the offers.
Many taxpayers are struggling?
March.
Marijuanna?
Market forces will shift purchasing decisions more than the ban will.
Marlebone.
Marlin and Dolphin?
Marriage + mortgage payment, etc.
Marrying a girl is just like building a mining rig. It is a risky investment and you could lose a lot of money, it is a hassle to build it and keep it running, it makes a lot of noise, but it has long-term pay offs that make it worth it..
Martingale is a recipe for bankruptcy.
Martin's money saving tips?
Marylebone.
masoganists.
masojonists?
Masternodes up and coming.
Master of Disaster?
Master's Degree?
Matchbook comission is only 1.5%.
Matchbook is 0% and Smarkets is 2%.
matched betting is non taxable.
Mates rates.
Matt Damon?
mature cheddar and smoked bacon, served with chips.
matx mobo?
Max 1 month UC.
Max out dat sacrafice.
maybe.
Maybe.
Maybe?
Maybe 1-2.
Maybe 24.
Maybe 40.
Maybe adjust the fan curve too.
Maybe a little bit of fraudulance?
Maybe a little less.
Maybe an Asus Xonar U7.
Maybe because I have a life?
Maybe because it takes less time?
Maybe because I was unemployed.
Maybe because there was a big tournament on in April.
maybe bind the camera, glypth, control groups, courier controls, and some other stuff to the keyboard.
Maybe, but I CBA.
Maybe, but I think it might be the CPU.
Maybe buy a car then?
Maybe buy a mining rig.
Maybe check the card and see if there's any buttons/switches on it to set OC settings? Maybe there's a clear profile button?
Maybe disabling hardware acceleration in Firefox will helpo.
Maybe Donald Trump thinks he's in Westeros and Mexico is where the White Walkers are.
Maybe don't do drug dealing like a criminal.
Maybe DPD aren't so great.
Maybe drug him.
Maybe even higher than 70....
Maybe even less, but 50k is the minimum I could set rightmove to without seeing stupid stuff under 1k.
Maybe even within 3.
Maybe find a gaming ISP that prioritises gaming.
Maybe for poor plebs like you.
Maybe for you.
Maybe for you normies.
Maybe get a gf so that she looks after your flat for you.
Maybe get a hobby or osmething.
Maybe get some CIEMs.
Maybe go for the Custom Art Music One if you can stretch your budget a bit.
Maybe go home.
Maybe go to the pet shop and pet some puppies.
Maybe he didn't spend much time on it.
Maybe he lives near me.
Maybe Hermes are okay at delivering to parcel drop-off shops?
Maybe he's using his phone to write code?
Maybe he voted for the Labour candidate as a laugh so he could laugh about it with all his rich friends.
Maybe his display driver is old as fuck.
Maybe I can get a cheap one in Korea.
Maybe I could even get 0% finance on my next phone?
Maybe I could get some display arms so I can put one of the displays above my mousepad instead.
Maybe IDK.
Maybe I do because I don't want to fuck up my back.
Maybe, I don't care about the scores.
Maybe if esports gets more popular then so will high-framerate gaming.
Maybe if I install Linux it'll use more of my RAM.
Maybe if they manufactured them in a country with stable weather like the UK then we wouldn't have this problem.
Maybe if they put a good DAC inside it and waterproof it.
Maybe if Vega is any good.
Maybe if we have a heatwave and I CBA to clean the dust filter.
Maybe if we kept occupying the country post WW2 then they would speak English like USA and India do today.
Maybe if you had a decent monitor you wouldn't suck so much.
Maybe I just had it set up from in Windoze.
Maybe I'll build some sort of closed mining rig.
Maybe I'll get the S7.
Maybe I'll just download Windows Office then.
Maybe I'll just get a hard case and leave a spare cable in the office.
Maybe I'll just leave them at the office full-time.
maybe I'll just skip the gym today.
maybe in 5+ years or if my E10K ever dies I'll get an ODAC or Schitt.
Maybe I need to invest in a larger case to get a 360mm CPU cooler.
Maybe I set something up wrong?
Maybe I should just get CIEMs and not bother with trying to find portable over-ears.
Maybe I should just give her a pair of headphones too.
Maybe I should mine on MPH and sell the LTC directly instead of dealing with Nicehack/Coinbase/gdax which leaves a nice audit trail for HMRC.
Maybe I shouldn't move into the manor.
Maybe I should save for Christmas.
Maybe I should take him to court.
Maybe it'll be a really cute Asian girl!
Maybe it'll keep the kids off crack, heroin and crystal meth.
Maybe it's because of work benefitws.
Maybe it's just a coincidence.
Maybe it's just a weird tax refund thing and I'll be paying the proper amount in future months.
Maybe it's just shitty all over then?
Maybe it's overheating?
Maybe it was Quidco.
Maybe it will relieve the pressure inside my head.
Maybe it wouldn't be pointless if you actually went to the gym.
Maybe I will upgrade my M9 to the M10.
Maybe just get some sort of typical open air cooler.
Maybe just wear headphones secretly?
Maybe look at blues/browns for typing.
Maybe look for a second hand GTX 980TI for the best bang for your buck.
Maybe more.
Maybe next time you're unemployed you should not buy anything.
Maybe next year.
Maybe not between two equally shitty ones.
Maybe not gubbed.
Maybe not in recent times, but Christianity is the most violent religion over all of history.
Maybe not to a poor person like me, but definitely worth it for rory.
Maybe OC your CPU.
Maybe people that stopped playing at 4k to protect their mmr.
Maybe plug it in before mounting the motherboard in the case.
Maybe she's Asian so she's not a whore.
Maybe someone will park close to my driver door's side and I won't be able to get in.
Maybe spend 1 hour on faking it a week.
Maybe stop doing drugs, you druggie.
Maybe stop playing such a shit game and play Dota instead then.
Maybe System Admin Kid is just pasting stuff from ubuntu forums.
Maybe that explains the short-periods of high ping and packet loss I sometimes get?
Maybe that's why I never get offered a job.
Maybe that will sway you.
Maybe the price:performance ratio is competitive with Intel at the low-mid range.
Maybe there will be fewer once the UK leaves the EU?
Maybe they're opposites.
Maybe they should focus on improving their service like Steam did instead of whining about piracy all the time.
Maybe they were important when K702 and X2 prices were higher.
Maybe they will in an hour or two.
Maybe they won't understand it, but a chart with values as high as 64m and low as  2000 are unreadable on the same axis.
Maybe Tony Blair is a double agent.
Maybe try a different exercise.
Maybe Turkey, I heard it's on offer atm.
Maybe upgrade your gaming PC?
Maybe wait for Zen ocotocores then if you care about multithreading so badly.
Maybe we should give out nuclear missiles to every country.
Maybe we should just use Linux instead?
Maybe when my 1070 TIs arrive.
Maybe with a 1180 I can have a silent gaming PC.
Maybe you eat slower and don't force overconsumption.
Maybe you have no aims in your life and need to look after another human being to gain any sense of self-worth?
Maybe you just use more energy than rory.
Maybe you never looked into what you're paying for exactly.
Maybe you're a bad team mate too?
Maybe you're thinking of someone else.
Maybe your just a cuck?
Maybe you should fuck her.
Maybe you should just answer the question.
MBing on a phone is too hard.
Mc Donalds?
McDonalds isn't necessarily bad though?
Me.
Meanwhile my £££ is no change.
Meanwhile the leader of the labour party is being deemed "a threat to national security" because he's generally anti-war.
Meat isn't really bad for you.
me bet you and me have a lot men common even though me despmese most thmengs you do.
Mechanical keyboard.
Mechanical keyboards are business keyboards.
Medical Doctor?
Meetings.
Meet me in brighton thisweekend.
Meet me in Korea next month.
Meet me there?
Meet someone in Korea and never leave.
Megabit or megabyte?!?!?!?
Me I guess.
ME LIKEY LIKEY LIKEY.
meme wtf?
memorised lmao wtf.
Men are physically stronger.
Men can buy perfume too.
Men drive faster.
me neither.
Me neither.
Me neither, but I buy expensive headphones anyway.
Me neither but it was on the front page of Reddit.
Men go to war.
Men have more dangerous jobs and hobbies.
Mental and physical health problems.
men with long hair are weird.
Met a couple of other grills too before her.
Met him when I started uni I think.
me too.
Me too.
Me too :(.
Me too....
ME TOO.
Me too because I have no friends :(.
Me too, but the Pascall equivalent.
Me too, easily.
me too haha.
Me too, if she was Korean.
Me too, I've had enough with work.
ME TOO OMG.
Me too rory.
Me too, so I just sold £50 worth of Dota items.
Me too, then I installed MPM.
Me too, there's one near my house and they gave me lots of 50% off vouchers.
mianhae.
Mianhae.
Mice are usually too small.
Mice can weigh anywhere between 80g and 200g.
Mice have gotten expensive.
mic input and 7.1 HRTF mode I guess.
Microing effectively with just a mouse sounds really hard.
Microsoft Word.
Microwaves are awesome.
Midranged would be 598s.
Might as well take some time off and earn some skins.
Might be <£500 by September.
Might be a bit innapropriate.
Might be her host family.
Might be tricky to build a list.
Might be YTS.
Might buy my next CPU from there.
Might even benefit me if I sell my DT770s now for a good price.
Might foil an attack.
Might get in trouble for it.
Might have to wait for the box to arrive.
Might help with my dashboard reflection problem.
Might just lower clockspeed.
Might order another one for my other monitor if I'm pleased with it.
Might still get a few £ for it though.
Might switch to GRLC on the CPU actually.
Might take longer than that.
Might try PLUS1 too.
Might try to sell my old digital camera too.
Might upgrade my mouse and bring my Logitech G400s in too.
Might upgrade to a GTX 1080TI or something.
Mighty Bucket for One.
Mighty Meateor.
Miley Cyrus or Hannah Montanna?
Military coup in Zimbabwe?
Mine comes to £13.02 a day....
Minecraft is on the casual spectrum, like LoL.
Mine Disposal?
Mine has a spoiler.
Mine has been blocked at least twice for fraud so far.
Mine how no screen either.
Mine is 11.214p.
Mine is 11.219.
Mine is 19C right now.
Mine is 40sq m but I have a private garden.
Mine is a little higher. I'd leave it mining now whilst I'm at work but my gf is home watching TV so she'd probably get annoyed by the noise.
Mine is confirmed now, is yours?
Mine is only £1.6k :(.
Mine is only £35 wtf.
Mine is only 40.
Mine is so cheap.
Mine is stuck on 468.233 H/s and I'm worried it's not working properly.
Mine is super quiet.
Mine is valid until the end of November. I might renew it for another year, but I'm not sure if I'll use it.
Mine just matured and I got my £80.
Mine lmao.
mine on them then.
Mine still works.
Mine too, I mine the shit out of it.
Mine too omfg.
Mine was only around £500 which is so poor :(.
Mine will arrive next month some time probably.
Mine will be arriving soon :D.
Mine work fine.
minimise to tray works.
minimum wage has been going up recently to offset the decrease in benefits. This is to try and make life as difficult and miserable as possible for people in poverty.
Minimum wage, maximum profit.
Minimum wage people are going to be screwed when they retire.
mining.
Mining coins, trading for LTC.
Mining isn't laggy with any algorithm any more.
MiningPoolHub is actually really good.
Mir was created for convergence.
misdgonysts.
Misdirection!
Missile Defence?
missogynists.
m-itx motherboards are unbelievably small.
m-itx rigs can be just as powerful as full-size ATX rigs.
Mixed it with honey.
m'lady.
MLG.
MLG is on this weekend.
MLG is starting in 8 mins!!!!
MLG starts today omfg.
MLP is for little girls lmao.
MMM wtf.
MMOs suck.
MM rank ofc.
mmr isn't really comparable if you don't know whether someone is playing solo or party.
Modded my new M50s that arrived today, then forgot I need a 2.5mm to 3.5mm adapter.
Modded them so they aren't shit like most M50Xs.
Mode maybe.
Modern browsers have shit default tab functionality IMO.
Momo and Sana look so good omg.
Monacoin 	0 	0 (0.00676617) 	0 	Manage Wallet.
Monero is the best cryptocurrency, right Iota?
Monero is the best IMO.
Monetise with hats.
Money Advice Service?
Money can't buy you a sexy Korean gf or good gaming skills m9.
Money Dashboard v4.1 is live!
Moneyfarm and Nutmeg are investment platforms.
Moneyfarm is even free for the first £10,000.
Moneyfarm is pretty good.
Moneyfarm is really good, there's no fees on the first £10,000.
Moneyfarm let me deposit a lump sum or set up a direct debit and forget about it.
Moneyfarm support is really good.
Money is pointless unless you spend it.
Money just facilitates trade and stores wealth.
Monitors are so shit really.
Monitor technology needs to catch the fuck up.
Monthly.
Monthly cost?
Monthly income.
months.
Moore's Law?
More Americans are addicted to alcohol than any other drug.
More coming soon.
More days without work pls.
More efficient.
More employers should adopt staggered working hours.
More features to cum.
More flexible, and probably cheaper.
More free money pls.
More Hillary voters would have voted Bernie than Bernie voters would have voted Hillary.
More important than keyboard for sure, and possibly even more important than mouse!!!!
More like >1000.
More like 20.
more like 3-4.
More like £3.70.
More like hellish.
More like Strong and Stable™.
More of a sidegrade.
More people have heard of Beats and M50X than your HD600. Popularity doesn't mean shit.
More people play LoL than Dota, but Dota is clearly the superior game.
More profitable at night.
More profitable than GRLC.
More responsive input.
More slow-running fans is better than one high-speed fan. You're probably going to have to test it to be sure.
More than half.
More than I need.
More time playing video games and less time doing work.
More type 2.
More wars.
More weight to carry, harder to keep both charged, etc.
MORMONS LMAO.
mortgage+rent+council tax+service charges+water+energy combined is cheaper than my mum charged me lmao.
Most accurate, detailed at the pricepoint, and largest soundstage of any headphones ever.
Most chemo patients lose weight IIRC.
Most English people are descendants of Germans AFAIK?
Most EQs I use usually ruin other frequencies when I turn the bass up.
Most gamers have desktops.
Most games aren't.
Most gaming headsets are shit.
Most GPUs won't go above 300W.
Most incompetent company I've ever dealt with.
Most likely answer.
Mostly fuel and catering for meetings.
Mostly I just want to disable autoplay.
Mostly just gaming yeah.
Mostly the event times and the amount I'm betting on.
Most monitors don't have speakers ffs.
Most multi-headphone users have non-modular headphones with multiple cables which is just inefficient when you can make them modular and only need a single cable.
Most new builds have 16GB because RAM is so cheap now.
Most newspapers don't link their sources.
Most of my bets settle tonight.
Most of my data is Reddit and Waze.
Most of my games were free giveaways.
Most of my money is just sitting in the bank.
Most of my Steam assets have appreciated in value.
Most of the cables get used, so being modular doesn't make much of a difference.
Most of the colonists will die of radiation.
Most of the functionality is the same, but Tab Tree seems faster and more stable.
Most of them.
Most of the noise will probably come from the GPU. GPU fans can go up to about 4.5k RPM.
Most of the time black people were doing the inslaving.
Most of the time I only do it because she makes me.
Most of the time I use Stremio though.
Most of the time you don't need to update the BIOS.
Most of the world probably doesn't eat pizza.
Most of those photos are from the DM?
Most open headphones, DT770s, etc are just so much better sounding.
Most other things I can do through my phone.
Most people are fucking retards.
Most people don't lmao.
Most people don't need more than 8GB atm.
Most people in shared houses don't have many direct debits because they aren't paying the bills directly.
Most people just refer to it as the G403.
Most people play at 300-400.
Most people who spend £100+ on headphones would probably prefer the better audio qualify from using a cable.
Most people who use Excel don't actually know how to use it other than typing in data it seems.....
Most people won't pay their student loans off.
Most people won't unless they go straight into a £50k job after graduating like rory.
Most players are under 18.
Most seem around £17-£18.
Most special person?
Most things aren't worth the effort of doing.
Most torrents are still only 1080p :(.
Most UK girls take pills AFAIK.
Most use aux.
Most video editors and CAD and photoshoppers are desktops too.
Most weekdays.
Most western countries would destroy NK if they attacked them.
Most young people from Western Europe know 2 languages nowadays.
motherboard and CPU have arrived.
Motherboard is ridiculously expensive wtf.
Motivational posters are so stupid.
motnhs.
Motor sports are pretty boring.
Mouse.
Mouse limits your skill ceiling though.
Move out of where?
Moving where?
Mozilla takes your privacy more srsly too.
MP3 isn't a good format.
MSI Afterburner?
MSI afterburner monitor has so many graphs.
Much better than 5/17.
much better than NiceHack's 2.2% - 4% fees.
Much easier than my 62ohm K702s.
Much easier to clean than a standard office keyboard haha.
Much easier to turn BTC into euros than it is to turn GRLC into euros.
Much less than I thought it would.
Much lower.
MUCH lower fees.
Much quicker break-even.
Multi-GPU is good.
Multi Pool Hub with LTC as payout is the future.
MultiPoolMiner.
Multitasking is productive.
Mummy is a film.
Mummy told me I can live at home for free until January, which will save me £3,000 on my rent.
Mummy went away to London and left me instructions on how to cook chicken and shit.
Muscle memory is important.
Must be nice to be rich right about now.
Must be nice to blame anything you want on drugs and get away scott free.
Must be shit because it's a romance.
Must have been a jew day out or something.
Must have switched algorithm.
MX Red.
MX Red?
My £1000 Smarkets withdrawal just completed.
My 1080 TI is pretty stable, but it's not on 24/7 because I game with it.
my 1080 TI is probably 20% more powerful than yours.
My 1080 TI is running at 2025Mhz on core and 5977Mhz on memory.
My 1080 TI is so quiet nolwl.
My 10 year old self recommends it.
My £127 Philips Fidelio X2 has been dispatched by ebay ^^.
My 3.5mm cable doesn't click into my HTC One M9.....
My 4.5GHz 4690K is bottlenecking my GTX 970 :(.
My 4690K goes up to 4.7GHz.
My 4690K is pretty fast, I just need to OC it.
My 4690K just isn't fast enough for Overwatch.
My 50p lunch is going to cost me like £3.40.
My 6850 was pretty slow compared to my GTX 970.
My £75 Beyers absolutely destroy them.
My 7700K from overclockers runs at 1.328v at 5GHz.
My 7700K is being bottlenecked by my GTX 970 so hard.
My 7700K is definitely not overrated.
My 7700K is making more than my 970 right now.
My 80ohm DT770s worked great with my HTC One M9.
My 888casino cashback is confirmed, what does this mean?
My 888poker still isn't confirmed.
My 970 is struggling to run the game a bit too much atm.
My 970, not my 1080 TI.
My AKG headphones are from Austria.
My AKG K702s are amazing.
My AKG K702s sell for as little as £130 now, which makes them a bargain.
My AKG K702s sound really nice.
My AKGs are made in Austria and my Beyers in Germany.
My AMPDAC costs more than my headphones too I think.
My asian wife's bottom is nice and small.
My aunt does heroin.
My aunt has never worked.
My aunty likes it.
My background isn't visible 99% of the time anyway.
My backups are pretty poor. I use Mega but it's probably not ideal....
My bad.
My balance is £940 now even though I've withdrawn so much.
My bank account has about £3,000 less in it than it did yesterday.
My bank reduced my student overdraft from £2,000 to £1,500 without telling me, and charged me a fee for being overdrawn, so I phoned them and told them to remove the fee.
My basic costs should be higher than my ingoings.
My basic costs should be higher than my revenues.
My basic outgoings should be higher than my ingoings.
My bedroom is terrible.
My best weapon is the Five Seven.
My Beyer Custom One Pros have been dispatched ^^.
My Beyer Custom One Pros would be perfect if only they folded up.
My Beyer Custom One Pros would be perfect if they could just fold up omg.
My Beyers say "Made in Germany" my AKG says "Made in Austria" and my M50X says "Made in China".
My Beyers were supposed to be imperfect, but they came in really great condition.
My biggest regret was not buying Apple shares in the 90s.
My BMI is fine.
My brother doesn't need a house, he already has one.
My brother has been giving me shit for living with my parents for fucking ages, then advised me against moving into this flat I just looked at lmao.
My brother has gained so much weight since he got married.
My brother just moved into his new house with his new wife and new cats.
My brother says that although I have a "good" credit score, I won't get a mortgage unless I have an "excellent" credit score..
My brother told me about a "jiffy bag".
My browser sexually identifies as an apache attack helicoptor.
My BTC value has gone up though.
My calendar is really sparsely populated now because I have so many tasks but not many meetings.
My car ftw.
My car has a fucking condensation problem which is fucking frustrating because I get water and ice on the inside of the glass every morning.
My car has a spoiler.
My car has made my life so much more convenient.
My car insurance is more than double this year what it was last year omg.
My car is expensive as fuck.
My car is getting covered in cobwebs.
my car is really low mileage for its age.
My car ride to work is 4 mins.
My car seems fine, but the other person's car has a ~2 inch crack on the bumper.
my car speedometer is undertweaked I think.
My car was damaged in the staff car park and my employer is refusing to give me the footage, what should I do?
My cashflow isn't great right now.
My cash is working so hard atm.
My Ceesa cable has just arrived ^^.
My Chinese friend's parents bought her a house a few months ago. She had to go back to Beijing just to sign the legal paperwork.
My Citreon C1 had 2000 miles a year for 7 years when I bought it.
My coffee table is nicer than yours.
My colleague asked me which side I was voting for, I told her I won't vote, and she said I am "childish" for not voting.
My colleague is playing Pokemon Go.
My colleague listened to my recording and said my voice is fine.
My colleague was playing it a few days ago.
My company is ripping off our employees.
My company just has one for each major office.
My company recently brought in Lync, but all the old people I work with just call me still.
My company uses all microshit products.
My computer keeps crashing when my wife is using my PC, it's so annoying.
My config now ccminer --algo=scrypt:10 -d 0 -o stratum+tcp://freshgarlicblocks.net:3032 -u Gcj1T1DZsT5LJPk3zDCWiwSBgJkUtzRwx3  -p x - --lookup-gap=3 --launch-config=T28x16.
My contract says I must have my own transport.
My Corsair H105 could have waited a couple more weeks.
My council tax and utility bills are more expensive because I'm paying her half too.
My cousin's parents do heroin.
My co-worker has a monthly reminder in her calendar to delete files in C:\Users\tanfin01\AppData\Local\Temp, will this actually speed up her PC at all, or cause Windoze to need to re-cache files, or what? She seems convinced that Windoze is unable to manage temporary files properly and she needs to delete them manually to keep her PC running proper.
My co-worker has been fired.
My co-worker is bringing his Beats to work for me to try on Tuesday.
my co-worker is doing jury duty soon.
My co-worker is losing her job because of a restructure. She's so pissed.
my co-worker just got suspended for breaking confidentiality.
My co-worker just set up his Plex server on my phone. Do you have a Plex I can connect to?
My co-worker just told me that she's been dealing with 24 hour clocks all her life, so she knows that the next day doesn't start until 00:01.
My co-worker said she's voting Conservative because they are good at managing the economy wtf.
my co-worker says she's "awful at Excel" so she asks me to do her work, but she's actually just awful at maths.
My co-workers don't give a fuck whenever I talk to them about crypto.
My co-worker used to work for Royal Mail and he told me that when I asked him if I could send weed by postr.
My co-worker was playing it at my office and walking up and down the corridoor.
My co-worker was sacked after an investigation lmao.
My co-worker who was suspended for one week has been suspended for one more week.
My CPU.
My CPU and GPU usage are both ~40% yet I'm still getting less than 300FPS in CS:GO.
My CPU cooler is so quiet now, but my graphics card is fucking loud.
My CPU cooler is way bigger than my motherboard.
My CPU has been running at stock speeds for almost a year.
My CPU has just done 68 loops of X264 without crashing, does this mean my OC is good and stable?
My CPU is 4.7GHz and my RAM is 2200mhz CAS 10.
My CPU is a fucking beast.
My CPU is better than yours.
My CPU is fucking powerful.
My CPU is running at 5.14GHz core and 4.84GHz cache.
My CPU just survived an 8 hour stress test, so hopefully it'll stop crashing now.
My CPU kept crashing so I've had to increase the voltage up to 1.260v now :(.
My CPU requires a lot of vcore to be stable at 4.5GHz, could this be caused by PSU ripple?
My CPU usage is hovering around 70% and my GPU usage around 40%, so what is my bottleneck?!?!?!
My CPU vcore is up to 1.284v now, and I might need to raise it higher if it keeps crashing in X264 :(.
My Creative E5 is pretty good.
My Creative E5 won't work with my work laptop because I can't install the driver, and I have to wait for it to charge before I can use it with my phone :(.
My Credit Card direct debit will go through soon and I'll have to pay for my Fidelio X2s :(.
My credit rating is pretty bad, I've got so many credit cards now.
My credit rating will be fine by the time I have a large enough deposit to buy 100% of a property any way.
My credit score has dived a lot recently. Credit scores are meaningless anyway, it's the credit record that matters.
My credit score is only 719 :(.
My CryptoNight profitability is way down now.
My current PC has 10X as much RAM as my first PC's hard drive space.
My current projections are that I won't retire until I'm 70.
My cursor speed is very high.
My Custom One Pros are my noisy home/noisy office/train/whatever headphones.
My Custom One Pros have a lot of bass, but they're still great headphones.
My dad gave me like £1k.
My dad just gives me £50 and I give him £50 back.
My dad visited yesterday, he commented how warm my flat is, I told him that I'm mining crypto for a constant 600W of heat.
MY DAY IS FUCKING RUINED.
My debts are 0%-2.34% interest and my investments have yields of 5% or more....
My deposit is 17k.
My desk feels twice as big.
My direct debit will probably be £0 every month because I won't use the phone.
My doctor and personal trainer maybe?
My dog has always had digestive troubles.
My drawers are full of energy drinks.
My drone never arrived, so Amazon are going to refund me.
My DT770s are really nice closed cans, so selling them and buying something else isn't ideal.
My DT770s are so much better than my M50X wtf.
My DT770s are wayyyyyyyy better.
My DT770s don't fit into my lineup any more.
My DT770s don't really fold up at all.
My DT770s replaced it for office use.
My DT770s used to have some bass rattle with E10K and my E5 fixed it.
My dual displays+mousepad take up pretty much the entire space on my desk.
My E10K is pretty good too.
My ear is occasionally popping though.
My ears are having orgasms.
My ebay seller is asking me wtf is going on.
My ebay seller might, I haven't received a response yet.
My ebay seller requested return to sender 2 weeks ago, and today they called me telling me they don't have the sender's address LMFAO.
My electricity is probably the cheapest of anyone here.
My electricity is switching to a 11.2p/kwh day and 8p/kwh night tariff today. Should I start ethereum mining?
My electricity supplier has put their prices up, luckily for me I've got mine fixed for 12 months.
My electricity supplier keeps asking me for meter readings, what will happen if I don't supply them?
My electronic appliances have provided me with enough heat so far.
My emergency funds are my TSB monthly saver and TSB current account.
My employer contributes 10% of my salary.
My employer gives me 3% more than I pay in, and my next employer will give me 9% more.
My employer says I must use MS Windoze.
My employment contract states I must own my own vehicle.
My endgame is to convert to fiat and buy 6 GPUs.
My endgame is to withdraw my BTC as GBP.
My English isn't very good either.
My entire car was only £270 and that was with 0 no claims.
My everything is in a veracrypt volume.
My Excel skillz still sucks ass.
My expenses will rise a lot soon because my gf wants me to buy/pay rent for her and get married.
My father retired at 52 and he goes on holidays all the time wtf.
My feet don't rest flat on the ground :(.
My Fidelio X2 is my endgame, I love these headphones so much.
My Fidelio X2s are arriving today, you jealous?
My Fidelio X2s are basically a combination of all the good parts of my Beyers and my AKGs.
My Fidelio X2s are my headphones if it's not too noisy at home.
My Fidelio X2s have arrived.
My Fiio E10K is great, it just doesn't have a mic input.
My Fiio E10K just sold for the asking price.
My final pay from my last role.
My finances are fairly simple.
My First Direct Monthly Saver Account closes in September, so I'll have a shitload of disposable income, but right now I'm poor as fuck.
My First Direct regular saver matured yesterday.
My first office job was such a shock to me; never before had to sat on my arse for so long and had such a big supply of cake and biscuits.
My first year of insurance was like £2,000.
My flat :(.
My flat got so hot today 26C.
My flat got to 28.1C yesterday.
My flat has storage heaters and I don't like them.
My flat is cold and LUX uses more power.
My flat is only 1 bedroom though.
My flat is only one bedroom :(.
My flat will be so warm even with nobody here!
My flexibility is pretty bad.
My FPS in CS:GO is pretty good now, but not so good in Overwatch.
My FPS is all over the place.
My friend asked me to leave his house because I was browsing for drugs on the dark web.
My friend at uni had a 100% Dominoes diet for a few weeks.
My friend became vegan and now he is losing his hair.
My friend goes every day without meat, the fucking weirdo.
My friend got £50 cashback on his because of the scandal and because he bought it on Amazon.
My friend got a £400 all-inclusive holiday to Tunisia for 2 last summer.
My friend got a £55 refund on his GTX 970 bought from Amazon, but Overclockers.co.uk won't give me any money :(.
My friend got angry with me for doing what your doing.
My friend got such good value tickets to Tunisia last year.
My friend invited me to Amsterdam.
My friend invited me to go to Amsterdam with him.
My friend is always trying to get me to take them.
My friend is Grand Master in Overwatch and uses the X2s, Sound Blaster E5 and Boompro mic.
My friend is why my mining profits are going down.
My friend just bought Fidelio X2 and Creative E5 and I am so jealous of his headphones!!!!
My friend just bought that headset and his mic sounds fucking awful when we Skype.
My friend just got bought a house by her parents.
My friend just told me he's top 500 in OW now.
My friend keeps asking me to play fortnite with him.
My friend kicked me out of his party because I offered to show him how to order drugs on the darknet lmao.
My friend loves IASIF but hates TBBT. I don't understand why, he must have no taste..
My friend needs a new GPU.
My friend plays LoL and he had the same keyboard as I do now, but he destroyed it by smashing it on his desk because he was raging.
My friend posts there a lot and he's such a circlejerker.
My friend said he dumped some garlic and he crashed the price instantly.
My friends and family discount is more important than your career advancement.
My friend says labour voters are stupid liberals.
My friend's parents bought her a house recently.
My friend thought it was real lmao.
My friend told me he won't play with me any more because my mmr is too low.
My friend told me that girls like men when they get all sweaty in the gym.
My friend was going on about pizzagate yesterday.
my fucking bank is retarded.
My fucking bedroom gets too hot in the summer because of my gaming PC :(.
My fucking bookie didn't authorise my £520 withdrawal yesterday.
My fucking email provider just put IMAP behind a a paywall.
My fucking internet died so I had to go into the office.
my fucking manager just asked me if I have a Samsung charger wtf.
My fucking nephew and dogs and parents wouldn't shut the fuck up in the day.
My fucking system keeps crashing because I'm OCing the RAM.
My fucking wife is using my PC atm, I can tell because my payments into my wallet has decreased.
My G403 is probably more expensive than most Razer mice.
My gaming PC at home is literally faster than any PC we have in the company.
My gaming PC is going to be my little space heater/money printing machine/air purifier/gaming PC.
My gaming PC only has one GPU.
My garlic isn't selling though :(.
My gf.
My gf always is.
My gf always seems to want it.
My gf always tells me she's fat wtf.
My gf always wants sex and tries to force herself on me.
My gf and I bought swimsuits just so we can use their pool.
My gf asks me to buy perfume for her.
My gf better not get pregnant.
my gf bleaches her bumhole.
My gf bought me some fucking LoL snacks.
My gf can make me pretty uncomfortable with some of the stuff she comes out with about marriage too.
My gf cleans my flat for me.
My gf does, and her opinion matters more than yours because she's Korean.
My gf doesn't let me gamble.
My gf doesn't let me have a beard :(.
My gf doesn't like it when I gamble.
My gf doesn't like using protection.
My gf doesn't want to split bills, what should I do?
My gf gave me a Korean 8GB credit-card-shaped USB drive.
My gf getting pregnant.
My gf gives me a Korean massage every day.
My gf got one yesterday.
My gf has a showbox with "Kappa" on it.
My gf has more savings than me omg.
My gf has so many redeeming features that her small boobies are not an issue.
My gf hates contraception.
My gf is.
My gf is 30.
My gf is 30 and I'm 24.
My gf is 30 and I'm 24.....
My gf is 30 lmao.
My gf is 31 today.
My gf is 32 this year.
My gf is angry with me because I haven't booked our wedding.
My gf is angry with me for gambling.
my gf is asian.
My gf is brown and sticky.
My gf is coming this weekend but I want to gamble....
My gf is fitter.
My gf is from Seoul.
My gf is from Seoul, where everyone has gigabit internet.
My gf is getting really angry with me for gambling and made me promise to her I won't do it again.....
My gf is going to cost me so much.
My gf is going to love it.
My gf is in her 30s.
My gf is Korean.
my gf is korean m9.
My gf is my wife.
My gf isn't though.
My gf is quite tall too.
My gf is so good at making yummy food though.
My gf is sooooooooooooo much prettier than HansProleman's.
My gf is the most attractive.
My gf is too fucking theist.
My gf just told me "If my period doesn't come in this week, i should do pregnant test next week" should I be worried?
my gf keeps asking me to have sex with her without using a condom wtf.
My gf keeps asking me to play with her but she won't tell me what game ffs.
My gf likes it.
My gf likes jesus things.
My gf likes the idea of living in Brighton.
My gf likes to bath/shower with me.
My gf looks like kpop.
My gf loved it.
My gf loves hotel sex.
My gf loves the Chromecast.
My gf made me an avacado and bacon sandwich for my lunch today.
My gf makes my lunch for me now.
My gf only works part time.
My gf says her period is 4 days overdue, should I be worried?
My gf says I can cum inside her on Friday because she finishes her period and can't get pregnant.
My gf says premarital sex is a sin but that doesn't stop her lmao.
My gf says she has to have marriage before sex but she doesn't.
my gf says that about my penis haha.
My gf says that humans could not have evolved from monkeys.
My gf says that we don't believe in evolution because we are Christian.
My gf set off my smoke alarm when she cooked fish yesterday.
My gf smells nice.
My gf told me I need to get a second job.
My gf told me she doesn't want to share the bills until we're married.
My gf told me that spending £100 on headphones is too much LMAO.
My gf wants an office job but her English is not very good.
My gf wants me to be religious with her wtf.
My gf wants me to go visit her tonight.
My gf wants me to meet her parents.
My gf wants me to spend a lot of money on her.
My gf wants to get married with me but I don't have the financial stability yet and still live with my parents.
My gf wants to know my username and password.
My gf wants to live with me.
My gf wants to live with me now.
My gf wants to make babies but I don't, should I marry her?
My gf wants to make babies with me lmao.
My gf wants to make our Korean daughter.
My gf wants to move in with me later this year, but I'm not sure if the cost would be worth it.
My gf wants to see all of my account details.
My gf was giving me shit because I already have a pair of headphones and I shouldn't buy more.
My gf wastes so much time at church that she could spend getting better at videogames or something.
My gf wastes so much time at work that she could spend getting better at videogames or something.
My gf will love it.
My gf will reach retirement age earlier than me and she's older and has no pension omg.
My gf won't like it.
My gf would be a good waifu.
My gf wouldn't accept that.
My goal is to retire on 30k and keep it growing above inflation.
My GPU goes up to 90C.
My GPU goes up to 91C.....
My GPU is not shit like yours.
My GPU is overclocked to 2GHz and I am using 2 low RPM 120mm fans.
My GPU is such a bottleneck now.
My GPU sounds like a helicoptor.
My grandfather bought his house for like £1,000 and now it's worth like £300k omg.
My grandfather likes Pink Floyd.
My grandfather's.
My grandfather says he's voting anti-EU. Fucking selfish though, because the consequences aren't even going to affect him since he's old as fuck.
My grandmother and mother has it, and now my brother too.
My grandmother had Alzheimers so we used her estate to fund her stay in a really good care home.
My grandmother is disabled.
My grandmother is in hospital.
My grandmother is too disabled to answer the door.
My grandmother left me nothing when she died because her estate was used to pay for her care.
My grandparents are going to vote to leave the EU, but IDK why they deserve to vote since they just sit in their house all day every day and probably won't even be alive before the UK actually finishes leaving.
My grandparents are old too.
My grandparents gave me £1,000 yesterday omg.
My grandparents have been retired for about 30 years now, it's crazy.
My grandparents offered me a "bridging loan".
My grandparents put me in their will because my parents are already rich enough.
My grandparents seem to think it's just a hoax though.
My grandparents seem to think it's just a hoxx though.
My grandparents sometimes give me money even if I don't need it.
My grandparents told me that JC supports terrorists.
My graphics are shit and my FPS are shit.
My great aunt gave my aunt a house. She's now a house owner without ever working a day in her life lmao.
My gross is 19k and my net is <£15k.
My GTX 1080TI is coming on Monday.
My GTX 970 is bottlenecked by my i5 @ 4.7GHz.
My GTX 970 is bottlenecking my 7700K so hard.
My GTX 970 is enough power for me though, it's my CPU that's the bottleneck.
My GTX 970 is holding my 7700K back so much.
My gut feeling tells me that's a bad idea.
My gym is at my office and I'm not always at the office :(.
My gym is definitely subsidised, and I can go during work.
My gym is downstairs from the building I'm in.
My hashrate has gone up.
My hashrates are top-notch.
My head feels heavy.
My headphones aren't.
My headphones themselves are perfected with my mods though ^^.
My headphones were made in Austria, where were yours?
My headphones were made in Germany and Austria.
My headphones were made in Germany, where were yours made?
My hearing came back, my tinnitus went, the pain went, and my ear stopped bleeding.
My hearing has come back and tinnitus has gone.
MyHermes is going to deliver my buyer's DT770s today. I think they don't fuck it up like they always do to my parcels.
Myhermes is only like 10-20p cheaper, CBA for one-offs.
My Hermes one took like a month.
MyHerpes are hands down the worst delivery firm I've had the mid pleasure of dealing with.
My high-end custom gaming PC.
My home insurance cost me something like £10 after cashback.
My house deposit is 17k it's so pathetic.
My household is kinda weird, they are all drug addicts but they say that I am the unhealthy one for playing video games.
My house is cold because my wife won't approve my investment into a mining rig :(.
My HTC One M10 + Beyer DT770s are brilliant for the office.
My HTC One M9 has a fantastic DAC.
My HTC One M9 has a really good DAC, but I will upgrade to the M10 if the DAC stays the same/improves but the camera is significantly better.
My HTC One M9 has a really nice headphone output.
My HTC One M9 is fucked now.
My idle power consumption is really low.
My income is going to nosedive.
My insurance covers me for business use too.
My insurance might go up by like £50.
My insurer is quite good at offering me a competitive quote though.
My internet banking was completely broken so they deleted my online account and made a new one.
My inventory is worth >£500 last time I checked.
My IT department gave me a USB to PS2 adapter which might do the trick, otherwise I will need to reset the CMOS.
My IT department is going to bring in Zscaler to replace the Citrix Virtual Desktops soon. Can I use Zscaler on my home PC?
My job doesn't pay enough.
My job doesn't pay shit.
My K702s are my gaming headphones.
My K702s are so lovely to listen to as long as there's nobody at home.
My K702s are way better than 598s.
My K702s at 62ohms are harder to drive than my DT770s at 80ohms.
My k702's comfort and soundstage are ridiculously good.
My K702s definitely need an amp though.
My kettle uses almost 3000.
My keyboard was easy to clean last night because it has an open brushed aluminium base ^^.
My kiwi IRC went unresponsive.
My knowledge on PC building is more specialised on gaming rigs.
My Korean gf likes to read the boble.
My Korean wife's are cup A too.
My Ladbrokes claim was confirmed yay.
My laptop isn't on, but I'm logged into Lync and Outlook.
My last chair fucked up my back because my mum bought me a cheap one.
My last job was so funny, my manager was like 21 and kept recruiting middle-aged people.
My left leg is stronger than my right.
My legs go really wide so I can fit my belly between my legs when I do squats.
My living room / kitchen is hard floors too.
My lowest account is 4%, my highest is 6%.
My LTC after withdrawal was 10% lower than it should be.
My M50X are in like-new condition.
My M50X aren't broken, they just suck compared to actual good headphones like Beyers and AKGs.
My M50X doesn't fit into my lineup as much as I would have liked :(.
My M50X doesn't have the isolation and soundstage and comfort and sound quality that my DT770s do.
My M50X has shit isolation compared to my DT770s.
My M50X headset is fantastic ^^.
My M50X isolates almost as badly as an open pair of headphones lmao.
My M50X is only any good for taking with me if I'm visitng somewhere I guess.
My M50X's isolation fucking sucks.
My M9 is a linux ultraportable.
My M9 is pretty shit tbh.
My manager almost saw that.
My manager can see I'm on Lync.
My manager doesn't ask me to do much.
My manager doesn't even work at my office.
My manager doesn't like to micromanage me at all.
My manager is going to be pissed when she sees all the Game of Thrones I've been watching.
My manager is pretty pleased with me so far.
My manager is really laid back and told me I can spend it on whatever the fuck I want, but I don't know what :(.
My manager makes me go to work in the snow.
My manager said she's happy for me to take them before the 31st of May.
My manager said so himself.
My manager said something about the computer usage policy which I've mostly forgotten about because it's mostly about Facebook and social media which I don't even use..
My manager says if I take the car there I can make up the hours on another day.
My manager told me off for emailing him at 3AM once.
My manager told me to go home and I told her I can't because social services are there.
My manager was hinting that my efforts would be recognised "when the time comes" in a previous 121.
My manager will hire a replacement.
My massage allowance ended on the 1st of May and I didn't use it :(.
My microphone stopped working. The card inside the box says "PLEASE DO NOT RETURN TO RETAILER" so I called Amazon for a replacement.
My mic sounds like absolute dogshit because of the ground noise right now.
My mining motherboard is on the way, I'm going to order the rest of the parts tonight.
My mining profits are up today, I think it's because so many miners have been deactivated by the NiceHash downtime.
My mining profits will be so high soon.
My modmic is fucking annoying.
My monero hashrate is so bad IDK why.
My monitor has stopped working.
My monitor is 189hz.
My mortgage is £352 a month which is ~27.7% of my net salary.
My mortgage is half that amount.
My mortgage isn't that high.
My mortgage is only 2.3% for 5 years.
My mortgage provider won't let me.
My mortgage rate is fixed for 5 years.
my mortgage will be <£300 a month.
My motherboard is m-itx which is tiny and my CPU cooler is H105 which is fucking huge.
My motherboard supports two m.2 SSDs too.
My mother, father, and brother all got married abroad.
My mouse is kinda outdated and the feet are worn out, so it might make a difference.
My mum always told me I'll never be able to hold my own job.
My mum arranged my insurance for me last year and put a black box in my car.
My mum buys them all.
My mum doesn't care where you work.
my mum does, she tells me I need to pay people for their stuff.
my mum flipped her shit when she found out I "wasted" 5p on buying a  supermarket bag instead of taking my own.
My mum gives me so shit for drinking a can of sugar-free energy drinks once a day, but she thinks drinking a bottle of wine every night is fine.
My mum got me one of those good Logitech webcams for my birthday.
My mum increased my rent too.
My mum is asking me what I want for my birthday, what should I tell her?
My mum is going to be pissed next time she gets a phone bill.
My mum is paying for cleaners to clean my flat before I move in.
My mum is telling me that I will struggle to pay for food and wash/iron my clothes and never be allowed back home if I move out.
My mum pays for my phone contract though.
My mum reads the Daily Mail and watches Eastenders.
My mum refuses to lend me anything.
My mum told me not to let anyone at work know I play video games otherwise they would fire me.
My mum told me that if I move out, I will never be allowed to move back in.
My mum was handing them my grandfather's rifle because she's concerned about his mental health.
My mum works in anti social behaviour for a housing association and always complains about tenants doing marijuanna and getting mental problems because of it, is it true?
My muscles have grown a lot in the last year, but I don't know if I've grown bone density.
My Nationwide 5% current account loses most of its interest rate today.
My Ncase M1 is only 12.6 litres.
My new 2.5mm to 3.5mm adapter works great too ^^.
My new ISP is working much better than Origin.
My new job will be just me and my co-worker.
My new job will be working with one other person.
My new mic has arrived, but my XLR adaptor hasn't yet.....
My new motherboard supports two m.2 SSDs.
My new Ncase M1 build doesn't have an optical drive, but I could put one in if I wanted.
My new parts are being delivered today. I will swap them out and build your PC this weekend.
My new RAM is C16 :(.
My next investment to mature is my Ratesetter in like 150 days.
My next purchase should be a proper desk tbh.
My next purchases will be the Beyer Custom One Pro, the Audio Technica M50x, and the Philips Fidelo X2.
My night rate is like 8p.
My Nutmeg portfolio has now been liquidated and I have an extra £902 cash.
My Nutmeg portfolio isn't doing as well.
My obesity has been cured too.
My OC keeps crashing.
My offer of 108k on a flat was accepted.
My offer was rejected.
my offer was rejected and it was sold to a cash buyer for 105k :(.
My office closes between Christmas and the New Year.
My office is literally the only place this address could possibly be.
My office is pretty noisy.
My office is selling chairs for £5 each, how do I tell which are good ones?
My office is super cold but my bedroom is super hot.
My office is the easiest fucking place to deliver to. It's the only large office in the area, the only building with this post code, and reception is always staffed.
My oldest temp files are from 25/01/2016 when I started my job.
My one.
My only worry is that my request for a full refund will backfire and I will get nothing.
My only worry with LTC increasing is that transaction fees will rise.
My orphan friend had a shitload of money and I was struggling to pay rent even though I had two rich parents.
My oven only goes up to about 250C. It's nowhere near as good as a 1000C furnace.
My own work PC is bad enough.
My pagefile usage is over 6000MB on 16GB of RAM, why is that?
My parents and the housing association will probably tell me most things I need to know.
My parents aren't religious either.
My parents are really angry with me for dating a foreigner.
My parents bought me one for Christmas and I never used it.
My parents do.
My parents don't let me have girls round.
My parents don't support my gaming.
My parents literally own FUCKLOADS of money worth of real estate.
My parents never taught me how to swallow pills.
My parents stopped taking me.
My part of the office is quite noisy because I'm between the housing team and the IT team, so all the sound would leak in and ruin my music.
My payday on Monday.
My PC and peripherals are worth thousands.
My PC case is black.
My PC costs over £1,000.
My PC did 150 loops of X264 so I think I've found the lowest possible vcore for my CPU at 4.7GHz ^^.
My PC doesn't boot from a cold boot so I am going to flash a new BIOS tonight which will hopefully fix it.
My PC generates fuckloads of heat.
My PC is a fan-assisted heater.
My PC is almost built.
My PC is better than yours.
My PC is drawing 480 watts of power right now.
My PC is FUCKING LOUD.
My PC is getting increasingly performance dense.
My PC is my hot air blower.
My PC is probably worth like £2k.
My PC is really really high-end.
My PC is so cool and quiet now.
My PC is so much better.
My PC is so quiet.
My PC is so quiet I can't tell it's on when it's idling too.
My PC just had a BSOD, how do I know whether this was caused by my CPU or my GPU overclock?
My PC responds very well when just mining cryptonight and equihash, but other algorithms make it lag hard.
My PC's radiator dust filters are completely clogged up with dust, why is my CPU still not going above 65C?
My PC will never get quite as hot as it does running X264.
My peasant friend was trying Dota last night. I told him to be careful of Zeus. He asked me who is Zeus? I told him he's a fictional god, but not as fictional as the god in the major religions..
My pension is 17% of my salary ^^.
My perfect desk is pretty much just a massive plain surface.
My phone and PC can do everything but better.
my phone contract is paid by my employer.
My phone cost me like £300.
My phone has a better DAC than yours.
My phone is slowly breaking apart :(.
My phone ringer is always on silent, phone on max, alarms on max though.
My plan is to become as rich as you.
My plan is to cool my GPU using exhaust only which will help my CPU temps even more and I can get an extra 0.1GHz out of it.
My plan is to get 12 1070 TIs.
My plan is to pay off the mortgage in 5 years, sell it, and use the deposit for 100% ownership.
My plan is to use my PC as a heater by mining cryptocurrency.
My portfolio increased by 0.26% yesterday.
My portfolio is 85.71% bonds, 9.59% equity and 4.70% cash. Is that okay?
My portfolio is mostly cash and bonds, so it's extremely unlikely I'll lose money from it.
My portfolio went up 0.19% yesterday.
My powerline died today.
My pre-binned de-lidded 5GHz 7700K is a fucking beast and I highly recommend that CPU to you.
My prediction is going up and down.
My priorities are not drugs right now.
My private pension only has like 4k in it :(.
My profitability has only gone up.....
My profitability is actually higher than that because for 7 hours at night my electricity goes really cheap.
My profitability is an upwards trend atm.
My profitability is down today.
My profitability will skyrocket tonight when I get my 1080 TI.
My profit has stagnated recently, gonna try to bring it up a bit.
My profit is going to be low this month becuase I am so busy :(.
My profit is going to be so bad this month.
My profit is probably down ATM because the stupid thermal pads came off and I have to underclock my VRAM until the new thermal tape arrives.
My profit this month is a measly £300 so far :(.
myprotein.com is 25% off too most of the time.
My PSU is probably more efficient at idle and load.
My qualifier is low stakes.....
My rates are pretty good.
My reasons for wanting to own AKG K702 were specific to that model.
My road tax is £20 I think.
My room is getting unbearably hot now and I have to game topless.....
My Sainsbury's 0% £1,600 card is still valid until ~July 2018, but I've maxed it out already.
My salary goes up but my total deductions goes down wtf?!?!?
My score for disposable income is the lowest number possible.
My score is 719 but Experian says it is a "poor" score :(.
My SE215s actually do a really fantastic job of isolation with the foam tips when I squeeze them tight and insert them in deep.
My SE215s aren't that bad when I squeeze the foam down really hard and insert into my ear as deep as I can.
My SE215s sound like shit.
My seller will be pissed.
My sensitivity is fucked up.
My Shure SE215s are better than your crappy Sennheisers.
My Shure Se215s are my IEMs for gym or whatever.
My Shure SE215 was made in China.
My sister's car has no road tax.
My Sound Blaster E5 is portable but I CBA to carry it with me.
My Sound Blaster E5 was a big upgrade over my E10K..
My sound card, headphones, mouse, keyboard, webcam, mic, monitors are all worth a lot.
My Steam games are backed up on Steam, and my TV shows/films are backed up on Stremio, and music on Spotify.
My Steam inventory is worth hundreds right now.
My stepfather is going to lend me £1,500.
Mystery gift.
My stupid GTX 970 had BIOS values which limited the amount of power the card could receive from the power cables. So my clock speed kept dropping and my framrate was dropping and I was getting stuttering.
My system uses over 250W with a GTX 970.
My team is so weirdf.
My throneroom would have lots of cute Asian girls.
My time is spent working and sleeping and commuting and doing adult stuff and playing videogames.
My time is too valuable now.
My time is too valuable to waste it on you.
My trainer yesterday and the day before uses Fedora.
My TSB 5% monthly saver has unlimited withdrawals I think?
My TSB regular saver will mature in December :(.
My type is Asian.
My voice sounds lovely in real life.
My VRAM can only do 5962MHz :(.
My wife has a Help 2 Buy ISA.
My wife is from east asia.
My wife is Korean.
My wife is loving all this heat my mining rig is outputting.
My wife is now saying that her cousin might be 12.
My wife isn't going to be in a good mood when I get home later.
My wife is on her period, which means she is not pregnant!
My wife is such a good girl. The new season of Westworld just started, so she's watching Season 1 now so she can understand Season 2 when she watches it with me.
My wife knows more animes than I do; she's more of a weeb than I am.
My wife looks like kpop.
My wife loves sushi and gimbap.
My wife maybe me an avocado, almonds, kiwi and maybe some other things smoothie to take to work.
My wife never lets me use open headphones any more.
My wife's cousin was at our wedding and was the prettiest girl there so I was perving on her the entire time..
My wife's parents are around 60 though.
My wife's parents just gave her £10,000.
My wife told me I'm not allowed to bet when I'm in Korea :(.
My wife wants me to buy a her a flight ticket to Seoul ffs.
My wife was given so much money.
My wife watches Korean TV.
My wife won't let me open the windows because she's scared someone will break into our flat.
My wife won't let me take headphones because she wants to talk to me during the 12 hour flight wtf.
My Windoze is broken.
My work did one.
My work got attacked by ransomware.
My work just gave me a £100 Love 2 Shop voucher, where shall I spend it?
My work just gave me a free fidget spinner.
My work laptop can't even run Firefox with 200 tabs open ffs.
My work laptop has two VGA ports what the fuck.
My work mobile is a pain in the ass to keep charged.
My work pays for my phone contract now.
My work pc has teamviewer.
My workplace has a strict no alcohol policy.
My workplace has shit microphones too.
n.
Na.
naaaa.
Na and I probably won't because I'm staying with family.
Na don't bother.
Na, drugs are for losers.
na fuck that.
Na, gotta save for a house now.
Na, HTC phones are still pushing the boundaries.
Na, I am not material like you.
Na, I don't have the time or commitment to become professional.
na I don't think so.
Na, I don't want to liquidate my investments right now.
Na I have no involvement with her misconduct at all.
Na, I just volunteered to do it.
Na I'll just play Dota and watch kpop instead.
Na, I lost all my confidence when I got rid of all my manly facial hair.
Na, I love them too much.
Na, I'm waiting for a DAC review.
Na I need some consistency, I want to cash out frequently.
Na, I need to save more to invest in a kick ass mining rig.
Na I should do some work now.
NA is so bad.
Na it'll be funny, you should do it.
Na, it's mostly just repetitous IF functions.
Na, just increase your sensitivity and pull down your mouse really hard.
Named after ScreaM a pro CS:GO player.
name one.
Na, mine was pretty straight forward. I asked them for help to get a job and nothing came of that.
Na, more like Dota.
Na, my case can get >90% of the performance as yours but at 1/5th the size.
Na not this time.
na nvm don't worry about it I'll just sell on the exchange.
NASA invented all sorts of cool shit when they were launching people to the Moon.
NA silver 1 I guess.
Na, streamers don't make more money, otherwise pros would stream more.
Na, the default terrain and weather doesn't put you at a disadvantage at all.
Na, the Nazis were pretty evil.
Na, these are worse than I thought they'd be.
Na they're on seperate sheets, which makes it a fucking pain.
National Insurnace.
Nationwide has a £500 a month 5% regular saver.
Nationwide is £200 for us plus 5% on £2,500.
Nationwide pay the best interest btw. I'm earning 5% on £6,500 with them right now.
nationwide regular saver standing order.
Nationwide regular saver would be perfect for you then.
Na was mostly English people IIRC.
Na you're not mining that much.
N B = New Build?
N.B. Please note that on this occasion we have not been able to verify any details with the previous owner.We therefore advise a prospective purchaser to make their own enquiries through their solicitor and surveyor. EPC and floor plan will follow. These are temporary photographs..
NB. We welcome both ladies & gentleman to our spa,our services do not include any of a exual nature.
Ncase has some competition now.
Ncase is a fucking pain though. You have to pay $185 for the case itself, then pay for shipping and import fees, then wait like 2 months to receive it, then you have to build in it which always takes longer because you have to install parts in a specific order otherwise you have to start all over again.
Ncase M1?
Ncase M1, H105 CPU cooler, Toyota Aygo, 240hz monitor.
Ncase M1 or NSG S0?
NC hiss, clunky design, artificial sounding, bass heavy..
Near Bath.
Near Brighton?
Near the bus stop.
Neat.
Need 10% first.
Need 240hz VR.
Need a good DAC.
Need a lift home?
Need an i7.
Need a second bedroom.
Need cash.
Need dat credit history.
Needed a noise-filtering cable, not a regular aux cable.
Need more cash to invest.
Need more CPU power.
Need more details.
Needs more processing power!!!!!
Need some glue.
Need tape too.
Need the money....
Need to buy shit.
Need to exercise to stay healthy.
Need to figure out how to remove most of them.
Need to get it to 800+.
Need to get to the gym before it's too late!!!!
Need to OC it a bit.
Need to put my 1080 TI in my rig fast.
Need to rent a new room.
Need to sell it.
Need to wait until October for my First Direct Regular Saver to mature too.
Need your address so I can get it sent to you this weekend.
Need your help.
Neither myself or rory are in any rush I think.
Neoscrypt?
NeoScrypt.
NeoScrypt is more profitable for me than CryptoNight now.
NeoScrypt is paying very well right now.
Net?
Netflix could probably get a lot of revenue from Stremio users if they just offered a better library.
Netflix is a fucking joke.
network design skills" I know some of that stuff!
Network through the electricity cableds.
Never..
Never been lower!
Never changes.
Never going to use them.
Never had a problem with DPD.
Never heard anyone complain about that before, HansProleman.
never heard of it.
Never met him before, why?
Never needed larger.
NEVER phone Iresa. ALWAYS send them a support ticket.
Never played this game before.
Never received another email.
Never rush something if you can make it better with more time.
Never seen one.
Never thought you were m9.
never used it before, should be fun.
Never won the jackpot.
New Account - VIP Casino.
New Blizzard FPS game.
NEW CSGO OPERATION.
New episode?
Newer cars have lower emissions and lower taxes.
New exhaust at Kwik Fit.
New flat?
New graphics cards and monitors?
Newish flagship phones.
New I think.
New job and stuff.
New Nicehack version is out.
New plugins!
new record.
New TWICE song.
New version of FF is out.
Next step Iota.
Next thing you know they'll say 420 blazing it doesn't conform to the company drug policy.
Next time I do a rollover I'm going to choose higher odds.
Next time I go to the cinema I'm taking a bottle to piss in.
Next time I'll do it properly.
Next time I'm withdrawing to gdax and then sending from there.
Next time I will get a blower GPU I think.
Next time you're in Bath.
Next time you're placing a bet, add a selection to your bet slip and your free bet will be there to use on any market. It's valid for 4 days..
Next Tuesday for me :(.
Next year.
Nexus phones are shit because they have bad DACs.
NFC too.
nice.
nice!
nice.....
Nice.
Nice!
Nice!!!!
Nice..
NICE.
NICE!!!!
Nice, add me.
Nice and warm in my flat.
Nice chicken salad yesterday.
nice copypasta.
nice cyberbullying m9.
Nice display arms, I have my displays sitting on top of two reams of paper each.
niceeeeeee.
niceeeeeeee.
niceeeeeeeee.
niceeeeeeeeee.
niceeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeee.
Nice, enjoy your ez £££.
Nice euphemism m9.
Nice exaggeration m9.
Nice false parallel m9.
nice focus.
Nice fucking analogy.
Nice, good for mining rigs.
Nicehack doesn't tell me why.
NiceHack has free and instant withdrawals though.
Nicehack is so much easier to cash out.
Nicehack just gave us another 10%.
Nicehack profitability is so low atm.
Nicehack to Coinbase withdrawals are literally instant.
Nicehack was vetted.
NiceHash.
NiceHash?
NiceHash automatically sets the most profitable algorithm for your CPU and GPU.
NiceHash fees have gone down.
NiceHash hacked, all internal wallets balances lost.
NiceHash had users with so much £££.
NiceHash has lowered their withdrawal fees a couple of times before, so they might do it again in the future.
NiceHash is huge.
NiceHash is selling your computing power mining altcoins for bitcoins.
NiceHash livestream.
Nice, I'll be going a month after you.
Nice, I might get some blackout blinds.
Nice, I'm looking at a place with those too.
Nice, I pretty much have that nailed down already.
Nice, I think I'll be stuck on 19k for at least 5 years.
Nice, I will be too soon!
Nice launch.
nice link m9.
nice m9.
nice, maybe you won't have shit-tier audio now.
Nice me too.
Nice, okay then.
nice one.
Nice one.
Nice one. Are you doing the Brit Method?
Nice one, hope you enjoy it.
nice racism m9.
Nice RAM.
Nice sarcasm m9.
Nice so once every 14 days then.
Nice sunken cost fallacy m9.
Nice, thankls.
nice thanks.
Nice thermal jug!!!!
nice timing.
Nice to know you have no conscience m9.
nice troll.
Nice trolling attempt m9.
Nice view m9.
Nintendo should just launch an official emulator with all the games included.
niope.
nmi ce.
no.
No.
No?
No..
NO?
No £100 free bet for me :(.
No 16GB DDR4.
No ads, can pause if I need a piss, no stupid people being annoying.
No, a lot of them don't have any added bezel.
No, and I can't find them on sale anywhere either.
No angry mob when the UK's economy goes down the toilet.
No, as long as it does what I need it to do..
No, because I'm a normal fucking person.
No, because she has no money.
No because your creepy.
No betting isn't a big thing.
No, Bitcoin is shit.
Nobody agreed to that.
Nobody at my company knows how to use Excel apart from in finance.
Nobody believes it nowadays.
Nobody bothers me in the gym.
Nobody can forward raise with 12.5kg.
Nobody can live off £12k a year.
Nobody can play at 999 though because CPUs aren't fast enough yet.
Nobody complains when a new PM comes along that the public isn't allowed to vote for.
Nobody else is here today except for everyone not in my team.
Nobody even knows hwat they do.
Nobody gives a fuck about esports in the UK.
Nobody gives a fuck about GCSEs they're so easy.
Nobody has said anything yet.
Nobody is bidding on my headphones :(.
Nobody is buying a 240hz monitor for non-gaming lmao.
Nobody is going to understand logarithmic scale.
Nobody is on the phone, yet it's still so noisy.
Nobody looks at the scores, they look at your credit history to determine if it matches their lending criteria.
Nobody picks Bastion any more.
Nobody reads the Daily Mail because it's a trash newspaper and nobody watches Eastenders because few people have no lives.
Nobody should be left out.
Nobody thinks you're funny.
Nobody who actually plays Dota has ever complained about that.
Nobody will be buying GTX 1080TIs as Christmas presents.
Nobody will know..
Nobody will know if you play videogames at home.
No, books are for nerds.
No buses here will accept card, it's cash only.
No but another forum post did.
No but I have Bittorrent.
No but I like Heart Shaker by TWICE.
No, but I may be at some point in my life.
No, but I'm starting to feel the hype.
No but I saw some guy was downvoted to shit on /r/ukpersonalfinance for promoting it.
No but I think Barclays has their call centre in the Philippines or something.
No, but it is polite to ask.
No, but I would like some please.
No cancellation fee.
No clever punchline?
Noctuas.
Noddle never worked for me.
Noddle won't accept me because they can't confirm my identity.
No debt for them.
No, do you think that's a good idea considering her current mental state?
No DVi, no HDMI no DP.
No EU.
No fees?
No foreigners allowed?
No, for other coins.
No, for switching TO TSB.
No fucking idea.
No fucking idea what I'm doing.
No fucking menus and 20 minutes holds and then finally speak to some fucking incomprehensible Scottish woman or Indian or some shit.
no fuck not that one.
no fuck you.
No gains no losses.
No GTX 970.
No, he didn't want to try mine.
no he didn't you tool.
No higher, no lower.
No, I am not as fat and autistic as HansProleman.
No I am not confrontational, just factual.
NO I AM PICKING IT UP AT THE PHARMACY.
No I CBA.
No idea.
No idea about standard clock, it's a reference card.
No idea, it's just the cheapest I could find on Amazon.
No idea sorry.
No I didn't sorry.
No I don't.
No, I don't have Facebook.
No I don't have herpes lmao.
No, I don't read books.
No I don't think so. You'd have to create a new plugin probably.
No I don't want to buy a GTX 970, but I want to sell a GTX 970 and buy a GTX 1080TI.
No, I don't want to count.
No, I don't watch standup.
No, I don't watch TV much.
No, I have a 970.
no I have a gf omg.
no I have a life.
No I have a work mobile.
No, I just don't want it literally all the time like she does.
No, I just get a week off for Christmas.
No I just want submissive asian wwaifu.
No, I like Korean girls.
No, I look at boys all the time.
No I'm 6k mmr in Dota.
No, I'm a eugenicist like you.
No, I'm co-operating with the DVLA to get my wife's passport back.
No I mean a month.
No I mean an email list.
No I mean I tense my boobies but that doesn't tell me if they're fat or muscle?
No I mean on betting sites.
No, I mean pull the data using macros and make calculations in Excel.
No I mean that's what it is RIGHT NOW.
No, I mean the worst parts of Chernobyl are less radioactive than a smoker's lungs.
No I meant it's weird how he doesn't have strong racial dating preferences.
No I meant stuff that Theresa May made illegal.
No I mean why do I need to get my ISAs ready?
No I mean with all the convenience of Spotify.
No, I'm going to a conference in Birmingham.
no, I might be on Tuesday night. Why?
No I'm just curious.
No, I'm just estimating right now.
No, I'm just lazy.
No, I'm just overweight.
No, I'm just very poor.
No I'm not an AMPDAC I am a HUMAN omg.
No I'm not cracking passwords.
No, I'm talking about gambling.
No, I'm talking about USA.
No, I need to pay off my mining rigs.
No intrusive logo or patterns or RGB lighting.
No, I only like good music, like kpop.
No, I really need to save my cash ATM.
No I shouldn't.
No, is it a good film?
No isolation, no soundstage, weak mids, etc etc.
No I suck, but I'd do it for that money.
Noisy or underpowered.
No, I think the world turned to shit because Vengaboys stopped producing music.
No I think they're gonna give "no safe haven" to imaginary abusers.
No, I think you should save the money.
No, it's a desktop PC at home.
No, it's all fiat.
No, it's an Intel chip....
no, it's a stock.
No, it's a work laptop and I have a personal desktop PC.
No, it's because it's where the Romans would go to have a bath.
No, it's because you don't have a steel frame to protect you, and you have a smaller visual footprint.
No, it's being shit every day.
No, it's called not having any income for two months and an increase in rent.
No it's eugenics that rory likes.
No it's genetic.
No, it's going to be an accident.
No, it's in a cup.
No, it's Intel.
No it's not.
No it's not fun if I do it alone.
No it's not lmao.
No it's some help towards buying a house.
No, it's stupid and annoying.
No, it's the most power efficient card.
No, it's "very poor".
no it was me omg.
No it wasn't me omg.
No, it was the phone shop.
No it won't, USB-C supports analogue audio.
No it works fine on the new version of NH.
No, I use a very long pseudo-random password.
No, I use my HTC One M9's built-in DAC.
No, I visit my gf and have Korean sex once a month.
No, I want the old ones.
No I want to buy more shit omg.
No, I want to go to South Korea.
No, I want you to do it accidentally.
No I was just letting you know I ignored you.
No I wasn't.
No, I was shelfstacking.
No I work in a different department.
No, jobs are for suckers.
No, just a simple spreadsheet with all my investments and savings.
No, just creating an RFQ.
No, just curiosity.
No laggy now.
No laptop is as powerful as my 12.6 litre Ncase M1 PC.
no laptop will ever have a screen large enough for me.
no lmao he's an american war hero.
No loft.
No logs, no throttling, lots of servers, good app.
no m9 I go in my lunch hour.
No Man Sky is shit.
No matter how much credit card debt I'm in.
No matter what I say, whether it's that I vote remain, vote leave, or say I'm not voting, someone will flame me.
No more asian dating websites whenever I disable ublock then.
No more being sniped with no clue where the shooter is.
No more dying to random people on the roof who've found a gun before me.
No more garlic for me.
No more random powerline crashes.
No more than 100 at a time.
No more war.
No, most CS:GO players chase high framerate too.
No music in my office :(.
No my stepbrother omg.
None?
Non-E7 then?
None because I have a life.
no \ needed?
No need for risers or a frame.
no need to be a dick.
No need to change DPI.
No need to close it.
No need to pay for more.
No need to run heaters or dehumidifier.
No need to switch, TSB is good too.
none of it is likely to result in serious injury.
Non-LED.
Non-OCed CPU.
No not really, there's a growing class of mega rich and they certainly don't want to lose the majority of their income.
No not Tuesday ffs.
noob.
No ofc not, I was just trying to understand the situation.
no ofc not wtf.
No of course not lmao.
no omfg get the Fidelio X2.
No omg.
No omg a spreadsheet is a spreadsheet, it's not fucking complicated.
no omg because she asked me.
No omg I'm sending you the PC with the RAM.
No omg my gf is in Brighton.
no omg wtf are you retarded.
NO OMG YOU USE THE EXACT SAME SENTIVITY.
No, outside is scary and dangeorus.
nope.
Nope.
Nope, and the PM won't resign either.
Nope, don't want it to align.
Nope it's IE11 installed.
Nope, just one VGA wtf.
Nope, just stalking you across IRC.
Nope, my parents don't do shit for me so why should I care what they want.
Nope, only ever rented rooms.
Nope, still growing.
Nope, that's why I haven't bought a 6700K yet.
Nope you can still do it!
Nope you have not.
No please, I have too much to live for.
No point getting a GTX 1080 if my CPU will just bottleneck it.
No point if I only play CS:GO and Dota 2.
No point in giving yoou a code then.
No point seeing tem.
No prize :(.
No problems since switching to Vodafone other than the weird DNS problem that I fixed by changing my DNS in the router.
No reason to delete them, and might cause a problem if I ever want to search my emails.
No reason to use the newest one unless you like bleeding edge.
No regulation.
No serious esport has a professional english player.
No she doesn't want me to do it because she thinks it's immoral.
No she has working holiday visa.
No, she is different physically and mentally.
No, she's hetero.
No, she works part-time at a supermarket.
NO SMOKING ON TRAINS OMFG.
No, some people earn more than 10 times what I currently am.
No sorry.
No sorry I don't have it.
No spolers please.
No stupid sponsored shit gear.
No stupid UI.
no sugar inside it.
Not a big deal.
Not a casual walk.
Not a drone on pre-defined questions and answers.
Not a fan of Facebook.
not all.
Not all my life obviously wtf.
Not all of it is hifi.
Not alwayts.
Not an attack helicopter?
Not an S8 though because it's fucking expensive.
Not any more.
Not as much rewards, but we won't be risking as much.
Not ATM because my room gets too hot. But in the winter I plan to.
Not bad.
Not bad, but I wouldn't recommend going much under that.
Not bad, right?
Not bad speed there.
Not been putting too much time into it.
Not bicycling?
Not big enough apparently.
not calandar months omg.
Not criminalised stuff.
not def yet.
Not done it before.
Not drugs?
Not enough space for my mousepad.
Not enough time!!!!
Not even 1 year m9.
Not even game is an even match, so you can expect different losses and wins.
Not even typical peak load really.
Not everyone speaks Spanish.
Not faster than Firefox 54!
not feet.
Not filthy casuals.
Not for a while then.
Not for me.
No thanks.
No thanks, not going to click on that.
No, that game is for filthy casuals.
No that's not my strategy, but some people have done it.
No that's not you lmao.
no that's weird.
No, that was my old gaming headset.
No, the monitor I have now isn't gsync.
No, the plasticised ones are generally better, it's the braided ones which are usually worse.
No they aren't all decent. The default Snapdragon DAC is awful.
No they don't care where the money comes from.
No they don't, I checked..
No they just gave up on convergence.
No they just tell me stupid things like there's no point running a game higher than 144FPS.
No, they said they'd definitely contact me today.
No, they've never won before.
Nothing about openmailbox on that page.
Nothing at all.
Nothing has been released in 2 years.
Nothing I'd personally want to use.
Nothing is wrong with it though.
Nothing to do with walls.
Nothing useful there.
Nothing why?
Nothing will ever reach Football levels though.
No, this isn't the channel for that kind of thing.
Not holiday, only annual leave.
no thx I don't want to be shot.
Notice periods, honeymoons, delays in getting my offer, etc.
Not if they're 15 retards.
Not if they're part of a 1,000 track playlist.
Not if you don't have a mortgage.
Not if you don't have much savings.
Not if you eat a shitload of it.
Not if you force them.
No time for gym!!!!!
No time to Reddit :(.
Not including interest.
Not in Education Entertainment Training or Security.
Not invited to what?
Not IRL.
Not just aiming, but movement too.
Not making a lot.
Not medically at least.
Not much, I spend all my time sleeping, working and gaming.
Not much space on desk?
Not much worse than a two party state.
Not necessarily.
Not necessarily. The rail network privitisation has been a disaster.
NOT NICE OMG.
Not on your ears.
No, took it at 14:30.
Not Prime Minister ofc silly me.
Not profitable yeah.
Not Quantum then?
Not quite.
Not quite the £50 a day I was expecting.
Not quite the £740 from the previous month.
No traffic shaping.
Not really.
Not really an investment.
Not really funny, people walk in the wrong direction and need to 180 sometimes.
Not really, I can't see the benefits for me.
Not really m9.
Not really much effort.
Not really, that's half the recommended dosage of caffeine.
Not really using the budgeting functionality.
No TSB support, which is my current account :(.
Not since yesterday.
Not smooth at all.
Not so many good deals on atm.
Not straight.
Not sure.
Not sure, been having some problems with my OC.
Not sure, have to look it up.
Not sure if it was because of what I bet on or because the exploit has been patched.
Not sure if I want to put a £185 case on the floor.....
Not sure if my boobies are fat boobies or muscle boobies.
Not sure if your trolling me....
Not sure I really need speed.
Not sure, I think the scales are shit.
Not sure on prices, but make sure you get one with a 3310 or 3360 sensor without any stupid gimmicks.
Not sure what it is, I'll look it up later.
Not sure which is most unhealthy out of obesity and alcoholism though.
Not sure yet, been so busy with Dota.
Not that GPS.
Not that old.
Not the ones I'm waiting for.
not to*.
Not tobacco industry revenues!!!!!!
Not to bring girls round, not to do my own cooking, etc.
Not to include a zoom sens slider lmao.
Not too bad.
Not too bad, only 42 litres.
Not too good for CPU cooling.
Not too much then.
Not true in /r/pcmasterrace.
Not usually, but I can make an exception for you.
not white.
Not working adults like us.
Not worth it IMO.
Not worth the effort.
Not yet.
Not yet, but I'll arrange a meeting with the interviewer to get some soon. I was told that my interview was really good but they chose to go with an external candidate who already does the job..
Novatech..
Novatech increased the price of my order....
November 2017.
Nowadays I barely even have time to watch Dota.
Nowadays, why don't we just have singles? We can download multiple singles easier than buying multiple CDs.
No wait.
No wait, a guest said he felt something.
No wait, I have the M9.
No wait, Nanex is paying more.
No wait, that doesn't spell boobies.
no wait wronbg link.
Now an extra £3.30 to return the parcel.
no way.
No way.
No way that's real.
No way the mean is 72.
No way the police have such advanced equipment.
no way there's 2 million accounts on that forum.
No, we'd have less.
No we had a moment of quietness for a random fire in London.
Now export the balance as GBP pls.
No, what is that?
No, what's that?
Nowhere near, but it might be faster than the speed of sound.
Now her system needs to cache everything again.
no whiteys etc.
Now how do I convince my wife it's a good idea?
no why?
No, why?
Now I can buy lots of headphones.
Now I can decouple my gaming PC from rig #2.
Now I can enjoy my Fidelio X2s.
Now I can go for a poo without coming back to "why were you away from your desk for so long?!?!??!??!".
Now I can listen to music again.
Now I can put £5,000 in there earning me 3%.
NOW I CAN SEND IT FOR CHEAPER.
Now I can send it to the Student Loans Company and claim back hundreds of £.
Now I can start trolling again.
Now I don't have to sell them.
Now I have £60.
Now I have Custom One Pros.
Now I have to label all my shit in the fridge.
Now I have to return the 50x50 one.
Now I just need to do it for SNR and SR and then make it decide which calculation to do.
Now I just wait a few weeks.
Now I'm going for a poo.
Now I'm hoping my employer still has the CCTV footage.
Now I'm in massive credit card debt and have no savings because I just spent £10k on graphics cards.
Now I'm just waiting for my Moneyfarm and Nutmeg cashback.
Now I'm keeping my credit utilisation low to make my credit history look good.
Now I'm pissed.
Now I'm speaking to a mortgage consultant to get an affordability assessment.
Now I'm told that instead of fixing it, I have to remove it all.
Now I only drink sugar free at weekends and coffee the rest of the week.
Now it'll be even easier to liquidate my GRLC.
Now it's a bit quieter at idle.
Now it's going to be hard to get the money out without withdrawing a shitload.....
Now it's like £700.
Now I've got to cancel the switch and go back to Powershop holy fuck.
Now Microsoft can't open my email folder and look at everything whenever they feel like.
Now my DT770 80Ohms headphone cable is much shorter.
Now my hearing has come back, I really want my headphones.
No wonder everyone takes so long to do anything.
No wonder you're fat.
Now people are buying more 120hz+ displays.
no wtf?
No wtf?
Now that I have my mortgage in place, I am going to do a huge 5 year stoozing massacre.
Now that I've installed Waze, I might need to get more data.
Now that Teresa May is PM, it might be a good time to buy a PIA subscription.
Now that TSB has stopped paying my cashback, I want to switch my main account to Tesco to earn 3% up to £3,000.
now the government is using memes?
Now the leader won't change.
Now the price has doubled.
Now the real question is whether cryptologists work in IT or mathematics.
Now there's vaulting, I can just jump in through any window on the ground floor that has a gun.
Now they're fucking everywhere.
Now they're giving me more.
Now they're so nice.
now TSB is going down from 5% to 3% and reducing the max amount by £500.
now win 20 in a row.
Now you can do live kernel updates, you can get infinite uptime!!!!!
Now you can reach 3k.
Now you don't need to use Chrome.
Now you have to live like me.
No, you can't mine it.
No, you clamp to your desk.
No you don't spend 40 hours, you just try to convince them you do.
No you don't understand, every day in the post-zombie-apocalypse is a fight for survival.
No you're just an autist.
No you're not lmao.
np.
np IDK if I want it anyway.
np I got shit to do too.
np it's good shit.
np let me know what you're gonna buy.
np m9.
np what address do you want me to send to this time?
n recent years we have specialised in cannabis seeds and some cannabis related products. An understanding & knowledge of this culture is an advantage although not essential..
NSA creates jobs.
NSFW.
NSFW!!!!!!
NSFW!!!!!!!!1.
NSFW FFS.
NSFW OMG.
Nuclear is a great alternative until solar develops more.
Nuclear weapons are scary.
Nuke has been added to the official map pool and Inferno removed!
Nukes ended WW2 and saved millions of lives.
Nukes save lives.
Numpads take up too much space.
Nutmeg are really high fees though.
Nutmeg cashback was £180 yesterday, you missed it!
Nutmeg fees are a ridiculous 0.95% though.
Nutmeg fees are really high.
Nutmeg is doing £170 cashback ATM IIRC.
Nutmeg isn't even good.
Nutmeg is only like £500 + £100 + £100 I think.
Nutmeg is reducing their fees from 0.95% to 0.75%. Still terrible though.
Nutmeg is shit.
Nutrition is never bad for you, all nutrition is healthy if balanced.
nVidia is better for Linux.
Nvidia told me to contact Palit.
nvm.
nvm back to garlic.
nvm I checked the health plan and I don't think it covers prescriptions :(.
nvm wrong link.
Nymeria.
Nymeria Sand is pretty cool I guess.
O2 was one of the ones we were considering.
obesity.
obesity is a spectrum.
Objectively mine is better.
Obsession with fat girls.
obviously.
Obviously I want her in the kitchen and the bedroom, so she's going to be in the same room as the PC sometimes.
Obviously I was just exaggerating, my gf is slightly prettier.
obviously we should make the minimum wage 10p an hour to stop migrants coming.
obvious troll.
Ocado is like Amazon?
occams razor.
Occams Razor, guns fired by guests have the same effect as guns fired by hosts.
Occams Razor. The guns are probably normal.
Occassionally horses.
OC it up to 5-5.2GHz.
October is weird, usually they reset in April.
OC your GPU.
Odd.
Oddsmatcher recommend depositing and betting more.
Oddsmonkey.
OddsMonkey joins forces with Betfair.
Of course it is lmao.
of course it's subsidised.
Of course m9.
Of course players have different skill, but no one has an unfair advantage.
Of course, the sort of people getting this money often won't have the same thoughts as I do.
Of course you can, interest rates are low.
Office.
office gym ftw.
office job.
Of GPS.
Often direct debits now.
OGG?
oh.
Oh.
Oh 0.2 is minimum.
Oh about the same as mine then.
Oh and bet type.
Oh and Dominoes.
Oh and got prosecuted too.
Oh as you said, no algo switching.
Oh a voicemail.
oh boy if only you knew what Force Staff did.
Oh btw.
oh btw I just got a payrise.
Oh btw my friend is gonna buy Philips Fidelio X2 and Creative E5 soon.
oh btw some of these cashback sites say the scheme is monitored and the authorities will be contacted if you're abusing it.
Oh congrats!
Oh cool.
Oh cool!
Oh cool Aria PC accepts it.
Oh cool, did she go to Starladder finals?
oh cool I have three screens now.
Oh cool, is the vacancy still up?
Oh cool  NiceHash runs on both CPU and GPU simultaneously.
Oh cool PIA accepts bitcoin.
Oh cool Protonmail is getting IMAP soon.
oh "ducks" right of course.
oh ffs I can't uninstall Skype.
oh ffs I put my worker name and not my username in that second screenshot.
oh ffs my gf is coming today.
Oh ffs now my Nationwide is working, my Co-Op and First Direct accounts have fucked up.
oh ffs price has suddenly gone up a lot.
oh ffs price went down.
oh ffs the Coral offer Atletico Madrid had to win BOTH halves.
oh ffs this algorithm is making my 970 crash and it didn't mine all night.
oh for fuck sake.
oh for fuck sake my work requires using symbols, numbers, upper and lower characters in our passwords now.
oh fuck.
Oh fuck.
Oh fuck I just got a car insurance quote for £500.
Oh fuck I just realised I can't sell <0.1 LTC on gdax.
Oh fuck I paid >£18k to my solicitor and now I only have a couple of thousand in my bank account.
oh fuck I paid the kebab van with £10 and they gave me an OLD £5 back.
Oh fuck it came back.
Oh fuck my modelled pension says I will only get £7.5k a year when I retire.
Oh fuck sake I got an email telling me that the terms changed a few months ago.
Oh fuck sake, I have to entertain my gf from 23rd - 28th.
OH FUCK SAKE IT'S THE TIME OF THE MONTH TO CHANGE MY PASSWORD.
oh fuck sry.
oh fuck that looks so good.
oh fuck yeah.
Oh god he's so bad at Rocket League.
oh god I have that next week.
Oh god I just read the guide and it looks convoluted as fuck.
oh god I looked on their website and it's not even 17/18k.
Oh god I love holidays.
oh god it's so bad.
oh god not Dr Pepper.
oh god pls no.
Oh god that sounds sexy.
oh god that white girl is so fat and ugly.
Oh good idea.
Oh goodie!
Oh good, there's a new version of Open Hardware Monitor.
Oh he's got until October 2018 to live.
Ohhhhhhhhhh.
Ohhhhh that's a good idea.
Ohhhh maybe I can.
Ohhhh that's a good idea.
Oh I can buy the label online.
Oh I didn't realise that if I delayed my application by a week I would have got more benefits.
Oh I don't know then.
Oh I hate that.
Oh I have to pay by debit card.
Oh I see.
Oh it has now I shut down Firefox.
Oh I think I sent that to everyone.
Oh it's an external internal test.
oh it's not mic input.
Oh it's the old one without the removeable cable.
Oh I've heard a white person say "do the needful" it made sense to me but it's an uncommon phrase..
oh lmao.
oh lmao I just won 81p.
oh lmao I might have seen that before.
oh lmao I thought you were calling me an evil cunt just then.
oh lmao it keeps going back to the main queue and I keep going through to people who put me on hold whilst they find the details and over and over.
Oh lmao price just spiked.
oh lmao someone is working on a davebot on Discord now.
oh lmao that was your post.
oh lmao they mail the label....
oh lmao we have a DUP coalition government now.
Oh looks like average is about 3,150 now.
Oh looks @ you.
oh mBTC.
oh my fucking god.
OH MY FUCKING GOD.
OH MY FUCKING GOD HSBC.
OH MY FUCKING GOD HSBC YOU FUCKING CUNTS.
oh nice.
Oh nice.
Oh nice!
Oh nice £10 thanks.
Oh nice, a kettle on your desk? I have to walk all the way to the kitchen!
Oh nice, I have a K65 too! I took it into my office and everyone got angry with me.
Oh nice, I have it set up for Arb and SNR now.
Oh nice, is that why you're on IRC so much?
Oh nice, it'll be coinbase to coinbase then.
Oh nice, my gf would really appreciate that.
Oh no, I think I use SwiftKey.
oh not what I was thinking of then.
OH NO WE CAN'T HAVE THAT!
oh nvm back to CryptoNight.
oh nvm Hotels.com does too.
Oh nvm I had the wrong filter on. You can get 5 3.5" m-itx cases.
oh nvm it's just firefox.
oh nvm it's only for new cars.
oh nvm it's on my account.
oh nvm reread it.
Oh nvm they're just empty directories.
Oh okay.
Oh Quidco has £35 cashback still.
Oh right.
Oh right I didn't know that.
Oh right illegal drugs okay.
Oh right, I thought the food was somehow jewishy.
oh right it's the library.
Oh right nvm then.
Oh right, so no discount on the upfront cot?
Oh right that sounds more sensible.
Oh right then the bumper sticker makes sense I guess.
Oh right two bedrooms.
Oh right, well I've made hundreds of £ from other stuff, but not from winning tournaments.
Oh right yeah it's fiat.
Oh right yeah it's Lord-Harlot that I saw.
Oh right yeah ofc.
Oh right, you've only just replaced them.
Oh she applied some discount code to my account or something.
Oh shit.
OH SHIT.
oh shit, 4 day weekend coming up.
Oh shit both you and your gf can do it?
oh shit BTC is $8,500.
Oh shit, do I have to pay for prescriptions in England?
Oh shit Firefox is so good for screenshots now.
oh shit fuck that.
Oh shit HIV?!?!?
Oh shit, I actually got these COPs for £74.63.
Oh shit I'd love to get my gf implanted.
Oh shit I forgot to bring my headphones into work today.
Oh shit I get another >1MH/s using my CPU.
Oh shit I have like £10k cash now.
Oh shit I just joined a pump and dump discordc.
Oh shit I just realised my trouser zip wasn't zipped up.
Oh shit I just took my GPU up to 90C and 3889RPM.
Oh shit I left my wallet with a shitload of cash on my desk then walked off.
Oh shit I'm calculating Nicehack CPU mining as more profitable than GRLC.
Oh shit I'm terrified of that last part.
oh shit I need to call Novatech.
Oh shit I need to get my shit in gear then.
Oh shit I only have £500 capacity left to earn >0.66% interest and I get paid £1,250 on Monday.
Oh shit I remember I have a £250 overdraft.
Oh shit I suddenly have to find £20k to pay my solicitor.
Oh shit it does do that.
oh shit IT just told me that my mobile phone bill was over £200 this month.
Oh shit it's metres squared.
oh shit it's payday.
Oh shit lastpass doesn't work with Firefox 57 yet.
Oh shit man.
Oh shit me too.
Oh shit mine too this morning.
Oh shit my Co-Op home insurance cashback is payable.
Oh shit, my ear just made a weird noise.
Oh shit my Firefox just went crazy and started eating up all the RAM.
Oh shit my TSB saver is about to mature.
Oh shit nvm that's not the one with the cashback.
Oh shit paying by credit card adds an additional charge.
Oh shit price is falling.
Oh shit price is increasing.
oh shit really?
Oh shit really?
oh shit rly?
Oh shit so many gambling sites have my phone number now.
Oh shit sometimes I check my bookies at work, could I get a disciplinary procedure?
Oh shit sorry.
Oh shit srsly? Link pls.
Oh shit that's cheaper than overclockers.co.uk.
oh shit that sounds nice.
oh shit that's pretty good, who are you with?
Oh shit that would be good for my screws.
Oh shit the student loans company isn't reducing my student loan payments when I use salary sacrafice.
Oh shit they're going to do the same for me and RDP?
Oh shit they're running PC Audit Pro on my work laptop.
oh shit when is mother's day?
oh shit yeah £105 payable.
oh shit yeah you want to max out a LISA for sure.
Oh shit you hear that? We're throwing our money away.
Oh shit you just reminded me to get my £250 from Clydesdale.
oh shit you live in a castle.
Oh shit, you're auto exchanging for LTC too?
Oh shit you're probably not even getting JSA then.
Oh shit you're unemployed? I'm so sorry m9.
Oh shit zombie hitler that's some scary shit man.
Oh so only people on the electoral register have to do it?
Oh sorry I forgot all about that..
Oh sorry I got the numbers wrong.
oh sorry I meant to ping MadPierrot.
Oh sorry, I missed it.
Oh sorry wrong channel.
Oh sorry. You should probably uncheck "receive promotional emails" or something.
oh that's cool.
Oh that's cool.
Oh that's good then.
Oh that's nice.
Oh that's really good then.
Oh that's so useful.
Oh the Betfair cashback just reduced today.
Oh, the heatsink?
Oh then the developers are retarded.
Oh the people.
Oh the politics man.
Oh there's a chat too.
Oh they only have to pay $300.
Oh they've removed Unity?
Oh total?
oh wait.
Oh wait.
oh wait, coffee shop coffee is full of sugar and like 1000 calories and I'll get fat ass fuck.
Oh wait, does this affect caffeine too?
Oh wait, I don't think I ever see those stats.
oh wait I had xmrig running in another window.
Oh wait, I have a £1k training budget too.
Oh wait, I just realised that I have a credit card with a £2,000 credit limit.
Oh wait it's gone down to £80 now.
Oh wait my clock is fast.
Oh wait now it's saying "...retry after 10 seconds" when I try too mine CryptoNIght.
Oh wait nvm working now.
Oh wait, the miner is back up.
Oh wait they changed it to 0.003 so it's actually 4%.
Oh wait, yes I do have a washing machine.
Oh wait, Yi Ti is where she's from not her name.
Oh wait, you mean me reset them for other people?
oh wait you said that.
Oh well.
Oh well, higher booking price and more cashback for me.
Oh well lesson learnt, it's only cost me like £2 and I'm making a shitload of profit on it anyway.
Oh well, probably only lost £1 max, and I don't see many K8 reload offers so not a big deal.
Oh we're preparing for GDPR too.
oh wow.
Oh wow BTC went down a lot today.
oh wow Dota is in VR now.
oh wow GRLC difficulty has dived.
oh wow he just responded, that was fast!
Oh wow it doubled in the past year.
oh wow it's even cheaper now!
Oh wow my Experian credit score is 548.
Oh wow my HTC One M9 is going to get the latest version of Android.
Oh wow my IEMs sound like crap.
oh wow nice.
oh wow only 6.66% that's only 5.66% more than me.
Oh wow srsly?
Oh wow that's cheap for unlimited data!
Oh wow that's interesting.
Oh wtf I don't even have Totesport added to Ultimatcher.
oh wtf I have to call/book with tastecard.
oh wtf it was 5.5% yesterday and now 4.7%.
Oh yay our IT policy is being reviewed this month, maybe they'll stop advising us to delete all our emails.
Oh yeah.
Oh yeah, and a lock!
Oh yeah because I didn't send an even amount of course....
Oh yeah but I'm still curious how your tariff compares to mine.
Oh yeah debt....
Oh yeah I have to use Chrome.....
Oh yeah I know them.
Oh yeah I'm probably going to pay for it all.
Oh yeah I see.
Oh yeah it is :(.
Oh yeah I've used the auto change it's neat.
Oh yeah the currency.
Oh yeah the market.
oh yeah weird.
Oh you did.
Oh you mean $$$.
Oh you mean a motorbikje?
Oh you mean David's friends?
Oh you mean in Chess?
Oh you mean it's ironic because it's a charity against slavery?
Oh you mean pregnant women? Yeah lmao.
Oh you mean the racist thing.
Oh you mean using RDP is against the policy?
Oh your CPU is fine then.
Oh you're asking what the elipsis is for.
Oh you remember you created a Davebot? Some guy in Discord created one too.
Oh, you want the same no-nonsense solution on mobile as well. And you don’t mind paying $12 for a worthy service? Sign up for LastPass then..
ok.
okay.
okay.....
Okay.
Okay....
Okay, all parts will arrive on Wednesday.
Okay, and what do you buy to boost your IP gain?
Okay are you free now?
Okay but I need to shut down my PC first.
Okay but LoL doesn't have the complexity of Dota to make the item balanced.
okay but where are the promotion?
Okay but you'll need a SATA cable for each drive you install.
Okay cool I'll let you know if I want one.
Okay cool, I'm off work tomorrow so I'll try and send it during the day.
Okay definitely not an ultrawide then.
Okay fine.
Okay, firstly that's the 2012 plan.
Okaygood.
Okay good. But one mystery remains, who the fuck is Mayson?
Okay good, CBA to do the bombsite defence shit again.
Okay good, LTC and Monero are all I'm mining.
Okay good to know that it's normal and that I don't have bowel cancer or some shit.
okay I called vodafone and they're removing the content control. I'm pretty shocked it's enabled by default though.
Okay I did it.
Okay if I start doing weed I'll ask you to supply me.
Okay I got it.
Okay I just calculated that if the interest rate goes up to 8% I will be fucked.
Okay I'll do that then.
Okay I'm going to have to order the new PSU tonight.
Okay I'm putting 50 garlic on the BCH market and the rest on BTC.
Okay I think that's enough for today's supply.
Okay. I've got the original box the case came in so I'll measure and weigh that with the case inside and then add a little for the other components.
Okay I've narrowed down my new phone to S8+, S8 and V30.
Okay I won't let them know next time I get a phone number.
Okay keep me updated.
okay keep paying for cleaners, chefs and prostitutes then.
Okay maybe not send cash in the post bit.
Okay, my grandfather will post it for me tomorrow, I just need your address now..
Okay next time I buy a phone, I will look at contract rates to make a price comparison.
okay np I'll ask rory or my dad.
Okay np I'll hopefully get my beta key soon anyway.
Okay probably about the equivalent of 3k mmr then.
Okay probably around 6 hours then.
Okay sending now.
Okay so a PSU has to be included, gotcha.
Okay so how are any of those good ISPs for gamers?
Okay so how does it exhaust the heat?
Okay so I did a vlookup but it's not going to help her.
Okay so I managed to figure out how to reduce my pump's RPM. I lowered the RPM by 600 and noticed only a 1C decrease in temps..
Okay so I spent £0 on booze does that count?
Okay so I've done this =IF(ROW()<=COUNTA(V:V), INDEX(V:V,ROW()), IF(ROW()>COUNTA(V:W), "", INDEX(W:W,ROW()-COUNTA(V:V)))).
Okay, so I want the cheapest contract with no upfront cost.
Okay so laundry and ironing is insignificant.
Okay so like Egypt, Libya, Morocco, etc.
Okay so my boobies are at least partially muscle then?
Okay so my PC is probably good then? It is fan-assisted.
Okay soo how much?
Okay so out of that 1.6k net what is your gross?
Okay so why is it that I am the creep for only being attracted to asians, but you just said you're only attracted to whites and nobody bats an eye.
Okay so why won't Hermes deliver my parcels to me?
Okay sure, I'm commending a 8.4/10 IMDB rating program, and I'm a troll for it.
Okay thanks man, I think I won't buy the COPs when I still have my DT770s.
Okay that's it I'm putting you on ignore and focusing on my work.
okay that worked.
Okay then.
Okay then, be back later.
Okay then I have about £9,300.
okay then mr smarty pants.
Okay this is rly weird, when it's fully inserted I only get audio from my left ear. If I pull it out slightly, I get audio from both ears.
Okay well it's fine if you want a motherboard that supports 128GB of RAM, but just get the 6700K because it's the best CPU for gaming.
Okay well it turns out that Amazon tells me what my mum has bought me from my wishlist.
okay wtf.
Okay wtf my PC survived 50 loops of X264 all night without a problem, then I start doing some basic office shit and it crashes.
Okay wtf the NH client profitability is way off from the calculator.
Okay your GRLC is on the way.
Okay, you still have 30 years to save for your retirement.
Okcupid is better.
OK sent.
Ok, unfortunately you can't create a new account to apply to code..
Old people don't care about others, it's a known fact.
Old people have skin like paper.
Old people really need to get a life.
Old people will die by themselves soon anyway.
Old photo maybe.
Olympics and FIFA are competing for who can be the most corrupt organisation.
OMBG.
OMFFG.
omfg.
OMFG.
omfg Fund TDF (2056-2058) has changed +8.4% from 12/04/2016 to 08/07/2016..
OMFGGGGGGGGG.
omfgh.
omfg Hermes just called me.
omfg If your initial deposit is made via Credit card or Paypal, the fees will be deducted from the depositing amount and therefore could affect the threshold that triggers the cashback. For example to make the £10 deposit with a 15p fee you will need to deposit £10.15..
OMFG I have £2,000 in my bank account right now.
omfg me too.
omfg really?
omfg srsly?
omfg stop fucking trolling me.
omfg the fucking DVLA sent my wife the wrong passport.
omg.
OMG.
omg £102 a month council tax wtf.
omg 16.04 LTS is out today!!!!!
omg 2% comission at Betfair for the rest of the year.
omg 60k.
omg 8 days until 420!!!!!!
omg after the 29th of August I won't have a holiday until the 26th December.
omg bitcoin reached 10k.
omg can't vent here without being trolled.
omg did you hear about the SJW shit in Overwatch?
omg did you know that 10% of England has never used the internet?
omg did you know that pay grade is gay parade backwards????
OMG DON'T DO THAT!!!!!!!!!!!1.
omg Dota 2 compendium, Overwatch anniversary event, and CS:GO operation all at the same time.
omg Dota just got a new patch.
omgf.
omg ffs petrol is so expensive now that I can't use my contactless to get contactless cashback when I fill my tank up.
omg fuck I'm in London tomorrow.
OMG FUCKING ORIGIN HAVEN'T SENT ME A FIBRE COMPATIBLE ROUTER.
omgggggggg.
OMGGGGGGGG.
omgggggggggg.
omgggggggggggg.
OMGGGGGGGGGGGGGG.
omggggggggggggggggg.
OMGGGGGGGGGGGGGGGGGGGGGG.
omg got my car insurance last night for only £186.
omg GRLC is going to the moon.
omg have you seen the new Stremio update?
omg how?!?!?!?
omg how do wasps keep getting in my room.
omg how do you get a free kebab!??!
omg I accidentally ran Overwatch on my 60hz monitor last night and it looked horrible.
omg I am getting fibre today.
omg I am hungry and I have biscuits here but I need to lose weight after being with my gf for a weekend and then eating a Dominoes pizza when I got home.
omg I am so upset.
omg I booked a meeting room so I can go make some phone calls in quiet, and then I find some assholes are already in there.
omg I called the taxi company to tell them I have a new mobile number and he said he'll call me back, then I realised I called him using my work landline which just shows the call centre number when making an outbound call!!!!!!!!!!!!1.
omg I can pay rent, council tax, service charges, water, electricity, gas, internet, contents insurance, and mobile phone for less than what my parents are charging me.
omg I checked my bank accounts last night and I have £7,500.
omg I didn't mean me personally.
omg I entered the address of my flat into the car insurance quote tool and it increases my premium so much higher than using my parents' address.
omg if my game doesn't arrive today then I won't have it until Thursday.
omg I found a feature in Wechat last night that lets me search for females in my area.
omg I found a store in Brighton where I could try on headphones.
omg I found my new favourite Firefox plugin last night.
omg I found out last night that my GPU has not been idling properly and why it's been running hot and loud even at idle.
omg I fucking hate the sound of my own voice.
omg I got to work so early today.
omg I hate cleaning suppliers.
omg I hate it when the bird arrives when I've got a drink in my hand.
omg I have a 15% student discount at KFC.
omg I have a 19.25% discount on KFC.
omg I have created the most complicated fucking flowchart for a simple process.
omg I have the opposite problem.
omg I have until April 30th before my annual health plan cashback resets. What should I get done?
omg I just ate a Dominoes pizza and now I am so tired.
omg I just cooked a meal.
omg I just did a really loud and smelly fart.
omg I just got 4 commends.
omg I just got told off for changing the administrator password and not saving it to the plaintext file on the network drive so others can see it.
omg I just realised yesterday that TSB stopped giving me contactless cashback back in December!!!!
OMG I JUST SAW A GOOGLE CAR.
omg I just spent £5.20 on the sandwich van.
omg I looked at flats in Leeds and you can buy them for 50k wtf.
omg I'm loving the new f.lux. I can make one screen darker when I am watching a film or playing a game.
omg I'm not trolling you your just autistic.
omg I'm really concerned about my pension because of the letter I just received.
omg I'm richer than you.
omg I'm so good at being jewish.
omg I'm so hungry right now.
omg I'm the only one in the office now.
omg I'm working from home today and my mum decides to randomly get an electricition to do some work and cuts off all the power and internet without telling me.
omg interest rates are going to go even lower?
omg I saw someone in Brighton on Sunday wearing M50X on the bus.
omg I spoke to a really Scottish women at First Direct.
omg I still can't find any of my contacts running the latest version of WhatsApp wtf.
omg it hurts so much.
OMG IT HURTS SO MUCH.
omg its 4:20.
omg it's 9/11 today.
omg it's been over a year since I've been ill now.
omg it's been stuck on "8/8/2016 10:48 National Hub Sorted" all day.
omg it's happening.
omg it's so hard working with this person "I have been trying to take the screen shot without success so I will try again shortly and send it to you".
omg I've been playing HotS and it's SO BAD.
omg I've heard the word "bespoke" about 1000 times this week but IDK wtf it means.
omg I've made £1.12 on Moneyfarm and 65p on Nutmeg.
omg I want to do a poo but I am worried my colleague will tell me I was gone a long time again.
omg I was told my 4 holiday days would carry over to this year, but they didn't.
omg I went on the darkweb last night.
omg I went to do a poo and when I got back to my desk my colleague said I had been gone a long time.
omg I went to Iceland today and there was an old man with really bad BO.
omg LTC peaked at $420.
omg lucky.
omg me too.
omg Microsoft Exchange is down and I can't send emails!!!!!!!!!!1.
omg mlink.
omg my 1080 TI has arrived.
omg my 1080 TI is coming today.
omg my adapter has arrived.
omg my colleague next to me is snoring and it's so distracting.
omg my co-worker asked me to protect the spreadsheet to stop her from fucking it up, now she's complaining she can't change anything because it's protected and it's my fault for not testing it.
omg my co-workers are talking about listening to music on their shitty little Lync headsets..
omg my dad is about to send me £2,000.
omg my employer health plan includes a massage.
omg my family keep harassing me asking me when I am moving and it's so annoying!!!!
omg my gf is going to meet my father today.
omg my gf is so into her bible things.
omg my gf just told me something really scary "If my period doesn't come in this week, i should do pregnant test next week".
omg my manager just went to the shop to buy me a crossant.
omg my mum got a 43" Samsung TV last night and it's amazing how light modern displays are.
omg my new monitor arm is amazing.
omg my Nutmeg claim is successful.
omg my PC boots in seconds because my CPU and RAM are so fast.
omg my sister just got diagnosed with myositis.
omg my student discount gives me 45% off Parcelforce.
omg my work is doing an online spot the difference competition.
omg my work laptop says it has installed software and needs to reset. It can fuck off.
omg my work laptop takes literally 10 minutes to finish loading all its shit.
omg new Kurzgesagty.
omg new Sennheiser headphones.
omg nice#.
omg only 4 days to go.
omg Overwatch is back in beta.
omg Overwatch is nothing like a fucking moba.
omg people used to memorise phone numbers.
omg Qatar has over twice the per capita carbon dioxide emissions of USA.
omg rory.
omg she has to present this.
omg she's day-snoring again.
omg Sky is selling broadband for £5.33 a month.
omg so many notifications.
omg speaking of teeth, my mum bought me a really nice toothbrush for my birthday yesterday.
omg srsly?
omg still nobody has bid more than 99p, I'm starting to get worried that it might cost me more to ship this item than I'll actually get for it.
omg still no more bids.
omg stop trolling.
omg that's so cool.
omg that sucks.
omg that was some nice icecream.
omg the AIO pump is by far the loudest part of my PC and it's pissing me off.
omg the amount of fucking people I say "good morning" to every day is ridiculous.
omg the box my CPU came in is about twice the size of my PC.
omg the grill behind me looks like Symmetra in Overwatch.
omg the hotel just emailed me to tell me their swimming pool will be out of order on the days I booked.
omg the light went out whilst I was pooing.
omg the man who sits behind me got their hair dyed and a sex change today.
omg the new HTC phone has no headphone jack.
omg the person next to me always makes me feel so guilty for going to the toilet. When I return to my desk she always asks me "WHERE HAVE OYU BEEN?!?!??!".
omg the person next to me never goes to the toilet.
OMG THE RACISTS HAVE WON.
omg there's a 30GB 4G SIM for £15.
omg the Samsung Galaxy S7 looks srsly fucking good.
omg the song I nominated for my away day song isn't on spotify, so I was told I have to choose another!!!!
omg they're coming round the office and giving everyone free cheese!!!!
omg this fucking guy keeps asking me about the new functionality, and I ask him what new functionality is he talking about, and he tells me "IDK I'll ask you next time you're in the office".
omg this laptop is so shit.
omg this stupid elevated monitor on top of the laptop dock is forcing bad posture on me.
omg this stupid woman at works wants £20 for her slow cooker that I can get off Amazon brand new for £25. I lowballed her at £10 but she said that she wants £20 because "it was a lot more than that new".
omg three times Origin told me there wasn't a problem with my payments and that they'd give me a set up date soon.
omg we finally got DP monitors at work.
omg we're getting some VR bikes for our office gym.
omg WhatsApp got OWS end to end open source encryption by default last night.
omg when I have my Beyer Custom One Pros in and listen to kpop, I have no idea how loud my farts are.
omg why are so many of my customers retired at 60.
omg why did you ban me from #uktrees again?!?!?
omg why is this laptop so fucking shit.
omg yes you do why do you think all the pizza places have really hot ovens?
omg you are fucking retarded.
omg you can get 10TB HDDs now.
omg you can grind them faster with currency boosters then, stop being so fucking pedantic.
omg you could buy a GTX 970 every single fucking day.
omg you fucking troll.
omg you guys are so fucking stupid.
omg you have a credit card?
omg you have diabetus?
omg your so creepy.
omg your so stupid.
omg your such a filthy casual.
omg you tell me to PM you and you put me on server-side ignore.
omg you've just reminded me it's been so long since I've last had a Dominos!!!!!!!
omg you will be as rich as rory.
on a 60hz monitor.
On an old case.
On average.
On average, they last a lot less.
On behalf of.
Once.
Once a month.
Once I get my 1070 TIs and my network switch and get the uptime up to 72 hours, I'll offer to rent it to you.
Once I get my 888poker cashback, I'm going to unsubscribe to their emails because they spam the fuck out of me.
Once I get my Nutmeg cashback I'm going to withdraw my investment.
Once I have the motherboard, I will buy new GPUs.
ONCE IT FUCKING ARRIVES.
Once I've sorted out my house.
Once MyHermes sorts out their shit.
Once people have paid off their mortgage, what do they do with all their £150k+ built up wealth?
Once that's finished, I'll start using Bank of Scotland or something just so it's easy to keep my balance between the interest-paying £0 and £5,000.
Once the API is up I should be able to set up a central electric heating/dehumidifying system.
Once their website comes back online, I might find out that all the rooms are gone anyway.
Once we reach 4k it might start replacing jmonitors.
Once you get a pair of Fidelio X2s, you'll be able appreciate a lot of other genres.
Once you go Korean or Chinese, you never go back..
Once you're sure what part is the problem, RMA it.
On CPU and GPU.
On Dota.
On-ear is stupid.
On-ear just has the disadvantages of both over-ear and in-ear.
On-ears are bad portability, bad comfort, bad sound quality.
on ear sucks.
One by one my enemies fall.
One cable, three headphones ^^.
One cable>two.
One cheap good quality one for 10 of your headphones, and one shitty expensive proprietary one for one of your headphones.
One click activates Office, Windows, etc, rather than entering new keys in every time.
One day.
One day delivery I guess.
One day they sent me a bigass cheque though.
One for my K702+modmic might be helpful.
One hand just to hold down a button wtf.
One hour to go!!!!!
One is enough for me.
one min.
One minute in.
One of a kind.
One of my bookies has £550....
One of my ears got fucked up and I couldn't enjoy listening to music any more.
One of our suppliers is based there.
One of the best shitposts subreddits on reddit.
One of the cards I just took out of my old wallet has an expiry date in 2010 lmao.
One of the games I bet on was postponed because of a terrorist attack wtf.
One of the good ones, along with Beyer and Audio Technica.
One of them even compared fat discrimination to black discrimination in pre-1970s America lmao.
One of the pros complained that they edited her interview to make it seem like they supported the BBC agenda.
One of the red priestesses who didn't get much air time.
One of the students is a pervert.
One of your selections may have let you down, but we certainly haven't. We've refunded your stake as a £50 free bet thanks to our Acca Five Insurance.*.
OnePlus 3 isn't waterproof.
One promotion on its own is profitable.
One thing I don't like about the S7 is the glass back. Glass backs are stupid because they are slipperier, easier to break, and attract fingerprints and smudges.
One thing I love about working from home is that I can spend as much time on the toilet as I like without anyone judging me.
One time I got a really bad ear infection and woke up with blood all over my pillow..
One time I went on the tube and this black man gave a speech to the carriage about how he was poor and struggling or something. I looked at him the whole time and he walked past me and told me to stop looking at him.
One time I woke up and my pillow was covered in blood because my ear was bleeding.
One time my co-worker left and put their autoreply to "as of tomorrow I will no longer be working at this organisation".
One time my PSU caught fire.
One year it'll decrease to $15m and people will be all like "omg Dota is a dead game because the prizepool is only $15m" lmao.
One year the prizepool will be lower than the previous year and people will claim Dota is a dying game.
On his wifi.
Online shopping is so much better for electronics.
Only £100?
Only 11p to withdraw it.
only £12 with cash back wtf.
Only 1/5 on heating and hot water.
Only £270?
Only 3,333 Spotify songs.
Only 3.5/5 isolation though.
Only 35 litres.
only 3.6/5.
only 40, did it at the end of a full-throttle full-body workout with my PT.
Only 500ml more.
Only £5 on my account though.
Only £60.
Only £6k.
Only 6 months?
Only £9.5k in gambling sites now.
Only accusations.
Only an ignorant person doesn't consider the possibility that one race may be physically and intellectually superior to another.
Only a shitty little laptop?
Only a single cable?
Only a very badly designed game wouldn't load the map during the loading screen.
Only because I don't have enough cooling performance to overclock at the moment.
Only because it currently benefits them.
Only because they are objectively more attractive.
Only came onto the market last night.
Only casual fucks care about RGB.
Only did isolated lifts though, they'd get ruined if I did cardio.
Only filthy casuals do work at work.
Only fucking casuals play for fun.
Only get Nutmeg for the cashback.
Only getting like £30.
only got about 0.2 atm.
Only got a single GTX 970 though :(.
only got two things.
Only have my SE215s and DT770s today :(.
Only if you're a pedant.
Only noobs play at 200fps.
Only occassionally, unless you travel for the company every week.
Only once the homeless outnumber the landlords will they do something about it.
Only one cable?
Only peasants play on consoles.
Only Pharah? That's going to limit your mmr.
Only problem is positioning I guess..
Only problem is that most PCs won't ever go above 500W.
Only regulated ones.
Only silvers think that.
Only the internet, because I like having free 2GB mobile contract from my employer.
Only the small-scale in-client automated tournaments though.
Only thing missing is Lastpass addon.
Only took them 40 fucking minutes.
Only using about 10% of it because I found out Spotify restricts how much I can save.
Only very quickly, I'll play a match on it before I give my opinion.
Only VGA.
Only way to get worse than that is a dictatorship.
Only winning matters.
Only withdrawal fee has changed AFAIK.
On my 4690K @ 4.7GHz.
On my GTX970.
On my home PC at least.
On my savings?
On my Windoze installation I just use the built-in AV and I have Malware Bytes too which picks up anything else.
On one hand, she'll be more supportive of me doing it, on the other she might want me to spend more money on her.
on such a small amount too.
On the bright side, I got another £12.50 free bet from Bet on Brazil so I think I discovered an exploit that I am going to exploit the fuck out of.
On the phone to Nationwide now.
On Thursday I'm going to connect my new mic to them.
On what?
On Windows.
On Youtube and Spotify, yeah.
ooooooooo nice.
ooooooooooooo ethereum price is on the rise.
oooooooooooooooooooo.
ooooooooo that would be nice.
Oops.
oops I just unleashed a really loud fart in a crowded office.
oops I overslept and didn't make it into work today.
Oops I sent you too much LTC lmao.
oops just farted in the office.
oops missed it.
oops sorry.
Oops, was I too harsh boy?
Opened within 6-12 months.
openmailbox isn't too bad.
openmailbox is the best.
openmailbox stores my emails encryptedly.
Openmailbox supports IMAP.
Open source ftw.
Open your wallet.
Opera.
Opportunity cost.
Opportunity cost = gold you aren't earning because you're dead.
Opportunity cost is a risk?
option 2 is better.
Or.
Or 0.03 ETH.
Or 10 blacks?
Or 30 RVN?
Or 7.
Or 7% and 16% at the employer I'm looking at.
Or a 144hz gsync.
Or a bag of sugar.
Or a case which makes it easy.
Or a coach.
Or a Creative Sound Blader Omni.
Or add backdoors.
Or a gaming PC for my gf.
Or Alienware.
Or Amazon marketplace.
Or America so I can import cheap PC components.
Or an O2+ODAC.
Or another pair of headphones that would suit my needs?
Or a pedo.
Or a political activist.
Or are they actually "bags for life or until you become disabled"?
Or are they just allowed to steal your shit?
Or are they just overpriced rubbish?
Or are they not portable enough for that?
Or are you using it for navigation?
Or a rota and take it in turns like rory[swag] suggested.
Or a Samsung Galaxy S7.
Or as quiet.
Or at least a keyboard lmao.
Or at least I assume she is white.
Or at least I think I do.
Or at least I think she bought it for £60.
Or at least, that's the conspiracy.
Or at least until next week when I get my Overwatch key!!!!!!!
Or attack both at the same time.
Or a used wired one for £49.14.
Or a VPN.
or BCH?
Or better headphones?
Or better yet, Killing Floor.
Or Beyer Custom One Pro which is like DT770 but with some extra features.
Or blackmail his gf.
Or buy a REALLY FUCKING NICE gaming PC.
Or buying a gaming laptop and mining at work.
Or can I get an Android box and install PIA VPN and Stremio on it?
Or contact the advertiser.
Or Corsair H110.
Or cover your ears with a hat or hair?
orCryptoNight 187.1H/s.
Or CS:GO DM.
Or days I'm not at work.
Ordered.
Ordered all my mining rig parts, should be online on Tuesday.
or devices, such as laptops and palm-top and hand-held devices, to access.
Or does acid not affect blind people?
Or do I need something faster?
Or do most of the work on it.
Or done any cable management.
Or don't answer the call.
Or do they just cover inner city areas?
Or do you use such a small amount of its potential that it doesn't need to?
Or drinking sugar-free energy drinks.
Oreos aren't vegan, and they aren't healthier than meat.
Or even £36 of just one stick.
Or even a fucking phone.
Or even a whole week.
Or even DT770s are pretty good at isolating.
Or even GRLC.
Or even if you accept the parcel, Amazon makes returns as easy as possible.
Or even my E5.
Or even sell me some headphones?
Or even the exact same PC for much cheaper.
Or even three factor.
Or even your lunch hour?
Or fiat?
Or fiat actually.
Or food I don't like.
Or forever whatevs.
Or from sacings.
Or gambling.
Or get a H100 then upgrade CPU later.
Or get a Phillippines VPN and get it for like £1.
Or Gnumeric.
Or half a kilogram of protein shake in one go.
Or headfi forum.
Or he doesn't have a basic education on statistics or business.
Or Helium 3 on the moon.
Or hold onto it for 10 years and sell it for £100,000.
Or hopefully the game will be ported to Source 2 and Vulkan and bring down the CPU load.
Or how do I modify the route on my phone?
Or I can buy it now.
Or I could just direct it at your address.
Or if Hillary was eliminated instead, would he have won over Donald?
Or if I give you a referral link for Nationwide, we get £100 each.
Or if I qualified for the free bets or not.
Or if there was an easy way to set intensity for all algorithms or something.
Or if you don't want to mod your card, just get the biggest open-air card you can.
Or if you have money to burn, get something like 2X8GB 4600mhz.
Or if you have money to kill, get something like 2X8GB 4600mhz.
Or if you need to speak to the checkout lady.
Or if you're going 1440p get 200hz or something.
Or if you want, I will promise I will.
Origin have an obligation to me but they're still shit.
Origin just gave me a £125 refund.
Origin never charged my credit card.....
Origin pulled their amazing deal on the 12 month super saver broadband and now it's £50 more expensive :(.
Origin Quidco cashback.
Or I might just buy a GTX 1080TI and mine using my gaming PC.
Or I might just keep using my M9.
Or instead of doing it just to fuck with you, they just don't want you seeing everything they look at.
Or is it 8?
Or is it Amazon Warehouse?
Or isolation.
Or is that Good Samaritans?
Or is that ill eagle?
Or is there a daily usage fee?
Or is there a double standard when it comes to body maintenance?
or I won't be able to afford it and we'll split up and I'll have to send her child maintenance.
Or I would have to sacrafice too much for it.
Or Japan, or Korea.
Or just a 4690K?
Or just a new cable.
Or just a small one.
Or just before I turn?
Or just being sassy.
Or just cut the vertical axis?
Or just enjoy the pizza on its own and drink water you fat fuck.
Or just get 2X8GB 3200mhz like a normal person.
Or just get rid of all jobs, that'll stop them from coming.
Or Justin Beiber.
Or just leave the EU and triple the debt IDK.
Or just let me take my milk for free ffs.
Or just living with my parents for free.
Or just not buy alcohol when people ask me for ID.
Or just once.
Or just P2P lending.
Or just rent there for cheap.
Or just retire after making a couple of mil.
Or just save the money and have £17,000 in the bank like me.
Or just save up for a house instead.
Or just use Firefox instead?
Or just use the phone's DAC if it's decent.
Or K70.
Or Korea.
Or Korea where all porn has been replaced with kpop.
Or labour.
Or lazy/made a dumb mistake.
Or let me just leave my money there and go.
Or Libre Calc.
Or literally anything.
Or make a coffee ourselves whilst on the way to work.
Or make checkouts faster.
Or make their own guns or tamper with the guns so they can shoot guests.
Or many homeless are struggling?
Or maybe a few times for those PC parts.
Or maybe even £100.
Or maybe I can plug my phone into it whilst it's also connected to my PC.
Or maybe I'll get some CIEMs and just use those whenever I'm out.
Or maybe I'll just buy some V-Moda M100s.
Or maybe I'll take a random week out late September or October.
or maybe I should buy some BCH then sell it.
Or maybe it does and I don't notice.
Or maybe it does and I don't notie.
Or maybe it's just my shit powerline connection?
Or maybe I will have one tonight and one tomorrow or Friday night.
Or maybe more than 100 years ago IDK.
Or maybe the government will build our own space program. If North Korea can do it so can we!!!!
Or maybe the $ is just down a lot.
Or maybe they all want me.
Or maybe they just wanted to go to the Manila Major?
Or MOLEX or some shit.
Or more accurately, I saved them womanhours.
Or my AKG K702.
Or my cousin.
Or my gf.
Or my other nephew.
Or not charge me £350 a month when I'm not using any of her water or food.
Or on a mountain?
Or on the bus/train/plane or something.
Or other obstacles.
Or Outlook.
Or Philips Fidelio X2.
Or play video games in the car.
or plebs whatever.
Or preferably all the time.
Or Prison Simulator?
Or put some fans on it for extreme cooing.
Or rather, that's the player:viewer ratio.
Or richer even.
Or RMA the thing.
Or rory's HD600.
Or run them over.
Or S7.
Or S7?
Or save up for a V30 for like £450?
Or say you're a terrorist or something.
Or she'll take over because she'll be the only person on the ballot.
Or *should* be in the left.
Or some other fish.
Or some other shit.
Or something like that.
Or some time after April.
Or stream it when I have wifi.
Or Takstar Pro 80.
Or that he is.
Or the bus driver.
Or the EPC, that'll tell you.
Or the evening.
Or the motherboard.
Or the oven and microwave.
Or the phone.
Or the real mustache.
Or they could come and take a reading and then I get a refund.
Or they're just doing it to monitor me more closely.
Or to make it more consistent.
Or try Tor Browser.
Or tweaked your GPU?
Or USB-C.
Or use Opera's built in one.
Or wait for the G7 and buy that or see how it affects prices?
Or watching TV.
Or way less lmao.
Or Wednesdays off.
Or were they Beats?
Or whatever it's called.
Or when I can't take my beyers.
Or when I finish a session in the gym and my muscles look so ripped in the mirror.
Or why don't you do it?
orWhy sent it to me?
Or will they just replace it with a shitty Dell?
Or X99?
Or you can just buy my PC if you want.
Or you can just pay me in fiat.
or your gf wants to sleep whilst you're gaming.
Or Z99?
Or Zootropolis, whatever.
OSSIC say they're developing the best gaming headphones ever.
Other browsers don't have as good extensions.
Other games might have a big playerbase but not many whales.
Other headphones are better.
Other than that, it does everything I need.
Otherwise I'd be paying a lot more £££.
Otherwise I'd probably have to take him to court to get the money back.
Otherwise I'm fucked.
Otherwise I might try applying for a new credit card.
Otherwise I should just stick to mining garlic on this rig.
Otherwise I won't have any credit.
Otherwise you could be unlucky and get a chip that won't OC very far.
Otherwise you're fucked.
Otherwise your just wasting time!!!!!
ouch.
Our 4 core CPUs not so much.
Our bodies aren't "designed" for anything.
Our dumbells only go up to 12.5kg, and it's really awkward to hold more than one.
Our headsets are awful.
Our offices are shut and all our emails and Skype are down wtf.
Our opinion is that Profitablemorrows.com is a Pyramid scheme that uses the money from new investors to pay withdrawal requests for older investors. We see NOT evidence that convinces us that they are a legitimate investment service..
Our pensions will suck.
Our public transport system is a joke.
Outlook.
Outlook,.
Outlook, Lync and Citrix are all down, guess I don't have to work any more today.
Out of a cannon?
Out of everyone here, I am in the best shape and have the most attractive gf.
Outputting 1000W of heat in the winter.
Over £1,000 into my bank account ^^.
over 14 hours ago.
over 24 months.
Over 300 now.
Over 56L.
Over 5+ years you want a S&S ISA for sure, the rate of return is great.
Over $90m has been awarded for winning video game competitions this year.
Overall £99 up.
Over a long enough period, you're guaranteed to be up.
Over a long enough time, you'll lose a lot of money.
Over an external wallet.
Over an infinite amount of time.
Overclocked?
Overclockers told me I'm too late by almost 2 years lmao.
overclocking = free performance.
Over-ear headphones aren't really that great for portability I'm finding.
Over-ears the best sound quality.
Over the course of a year, you lose £4,800.
Over two years, sure.
Overwatch and CS:GO are so dependant on CPU.
Overwatch and even Paladins>TF2.
Overwatch at 250FPS.
Overwatch didn't grow, it was born.
Overwatch has a serious problem where you only need to win one teamfight to capture a point.
Overwatch is getting 21:9 support soon!
Overwatch is really fun.
Overwatch is what's bothering me the most.
OVERWATCH LAUNCHES TONIGHT AND FUCKING GAME HASN'T SHIPPED ME MY KEY YET.
Overwatch queue times take around 3 minutes but there's no way Titanfall is more active than Overwatch lmao.
Overwatch release date announced.
Overwatch's business model?
Overwatrch is nothing like SMITE or League of Legends ffs.
Overwithdrawing, underwithdrawing, and risk of loss/theft.
OW, CS:GO.
OW event ends on 12th June, so I have booked off 7th, 8th and 9th of June. 10th and 11th are the weekend, so I should get a lot of hats before the event ends.
OW is just team fight after team fight after teamfight.
Owning my own house is a daydream.
OW streams might be watchable now the bitrate isn't so pathetic.
Oxymoron, right?
P2P investment.
P2W = Business model of attracting people to pay so that they have more gameplay-enhancing stuff.
P95 makes you too thermally limited if you're OCing.
Packet loss probably.
Paddy Power, Skybet and Betway :(.
Page not found.
Paid my final paycheck on 4th January, getting paid on 26th of February.
pain in the ass.
Paint the Town Red.
Palm grip is most comfortable IMO.
palm if the mouse is big enough.
Palm is more comfortable and better for accuracy IMO.
Paracetomol isn't a drug?
Paralel processing doesn't really improve gaming performance.
Parcelforce 48.
Parliament can overturn it and do whatever the fuck they want.
part time at co-op.
Party politics is just the worse.
Pascal has so much more performance per watt.
Pascall definitely.
Passed 40 loops of X264 and some gaming.
Password incorrect..
password+physical key+biometric.
Patience from Zhou.
Patio doors I call them.
pause.
Pause, purchase quickbuy, select courier, deliver, secret shop, return item, collect item, glypth, control groups, zoom in, zoom out, scoreboard.
Paycheque to paycheque is for the underclass poor people.
payday friday.
Payday of each month.
PAYE sucks because I'm poor and I get taxed way more than I should.
Pay for my GRLC in GRLC?
Paying 2/3 of your income into it and using it for bills and groceries and stuff makes it simple.
Paying for more data just because you can't save your collection locally is retarded.
Paying for your VPN and illegal drugs?
Paying out big time.
Pay it anyway?
Pay it off using mining profits.
Payments are so much bigger and less frequent.
Paypal is fully reversable for buyers only AFAIK.
Paypal took like £2.
Pay phone = public phone?
PC gaming.
PC gaming is better.
PCI-E graphics cards fit in pretty much any motherboard AFAIK.
PCI is what you plug graphics cards into.
PC master race.
PC Part Picker doesn't really work with mining rigs.
pea protein powder wtf.
Pennies are an insignificant amount to save.
Pension is deducted before I get salary.
People are going to be pissed.
People are offering to pay me for joining their pools.
People are weird.
People arrive at like 8 and tell me I am lazy for arriving late wtf.
People can play on the same map together but have different terrain and weather effects selected, so their maps will look completely different.
People don't seek low input lag so they can react faster, but because it helps them aim more accurately.
People don't want to lose hundreds of $$$ again.
People flip their shit when I tell them I haven't watched Star Wars.
People forget that free movement of people works two ways; UK people can go to Europe too.
People hate change.
People have 4k TVs?
People have all sorts of backgrounds.
People have called some of humanity's greatest inventions "retarded".
People have money to invest.
People in Discord say I am crazy for having over £10k on gambling sites.
People in Discord were joking about how someone buying $300 worth of GRLC was a major pump.
People in mining communities say that running your card at 80-90 with a high fan speed is going to kill your card.
People like you are why there's a diabetes epidemic among the poor.
People like you are why there's a suicide epidemic amongst the unemployed.
People nowadays want it all now.
People place orders for altcoins using bitcoin, and you fulfill the order.
People really want these headphones.
People should wipe their consoles before reselling them.
People still play Titanfall 2?
People think you're cool when you walk a dog but they think you're a retard when you walk your cat.
People used to play Quake at 125FPS on >60hz CRTs.
People use Password1 then Password2 then password3 etc.
People want cheap withdrawals.
People want lower fees.
People were giving them away by the truckload.
People who lower their vision angle by bending down with their legs fully extended are fucking up their back, they need to learn to squat.
People who make babies disgust me.
People will be angry at his successor instead.
People will develop strats specifically for the bots.
People will still want to buy diesel cars in 2040?
People with fast internet, what do you actually use the speed for?
People with small deposits?
People would get so pissed.
People would think you're a horrible person for dumping someone for their cancer.
Perfect casual gaming monitor.
Perfected in a lab.
Personally I'd prefer to have no OS.
Personally I recommend the Sound Blaster E5 because it's portable and can also be used for gaming.
Personally I think the V30 is the best phone.
Personally I would have gone with 240hz 1080p.
Petrol or a pizza probably.
phew I fixed it just before my colleague logged on.
Philips.
Philips doesn't have as good brand reputation.
Philips Fidelio X2.
Philips Fidelio X2 20% off on Amazon.
Phone calls and VoIP.
Phone calls are usually not the most efficient method of communication.
phones?
Phones.
Phones.....
Physically stronger = more jobs you can do.
PIA bought it yesterday for $29.
pia&factor%5Bexchanges%5D%5B%5D=poloniex&factor%5Bexchanges%5D%5B%5D=yobit&dataset=&commit=Calculate&adapt_q_280x=0&adapt_q_380=0&adapt_q_fury=0&adapt_q_470=0&adapt_q_480=0&adapt_q_750Ti=0&adapt_q_10606=0&adapt_q_1070=0&adapt_q_1080=0&adapt_q_1080Ti=1&adapt_1080Ti=true.
PIA is a VPN.
PIA scores highly on all of that.
piracy ftw.
Piracy ftw.
Pissed off.
Placed a £100 bet which I won and underlaid to make £0 profit on.
Place four £20 bets, get a £50 free bet.
Planes have Wifi now?
Planet of the Apes is good.
Planning to fail is failing to plan.
Play better yourself.
Play Dota probably.
Play enough games and the variance will be equalised.
Playing against AI is not like playing against a real person. A real person is smart, AI is both really smart and really duimb.
Playing Overwatch and Dota 2.
play/pause, next track, previous track, etc.
Play video games maybe?
please.
Please.
Please can I borrow £700 for a 1080TI? I will pay you back using my mining profits.
Please can I buy your GTX 1080TI?
Please can I have your identity so I can do your matched betting?
Please can you buy me a GTX 1080TI?
Please can you email it to me?
Please can you find me a £530 GTX 1080 TI too?
Please can you lend me £600 to buy a 1080TI? I'll pay you back with the mining profits.
Please can your family buy me Philips Fidelio X2?
Please check back after about an hour..
Please don't cross the line..
Please don't paste Facebook links here.
Please don't rob my house.
PLEASE GIVE ME MY SHIT MYHERMES.
Please link me.
Please may I have one?
Please may you bid a few £ for it?
Please may you give me a what.cd invitation?
Please may you post that to me?
Please nobody talk about Star Wars and Harry Potter, because I haven't watched those yet.
Please ping me if you're talking to me at all.
PLEASE REMOVE BAG FROM BAGGING AREA.
PLEASE REMOVE THE FUCKING ITEM FROM THE FUCKING BAGGING AREA!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!1.
Please take a few seconds to give Google your opinion of Scan Computers based on your recent shopping experience. We'll use your input to evaluate how they're doing and help other shoppers..
Please unban me from #uktrees.
Pleather is supposed to isolate better.
Pleather on outside.
Pleather on the outside, velour on the inside.
pleb.
Plouescat It's High Noon.
pls.
Pls can I borrow your GTX 1080TI for a bit?
Pls can you stop being so pervy all the time?
Plugged it in and it's instantly working, so easy!
Plug in a mic too.
Plug it all in again and check it's in securely.
Plug them into the back.
Plug two in.
plumbus wtf.
PLUS1 isn't spiking.
PLUS1 is so new though.
Plus bank holidays?
Plus I get the benefit of tracking my profit and balances.
Plus interest!
Plus, you need an E10K with your DT770s anyway.
PM me#.
PM me your first name, surname, date of birth and email.
PM me your first name, surname, date of birth and email, and I'll refer you.
PoE is more like D2 than D3.
Pokémon.
Pokemon Go?
Pokemon Go was such a fad.
Police are allowed to say they're police.
Police pension OP.
Politician?
pomegranate?
Ponzi scheme.
Pool our capital, time, knowledge and skills for the first one.
Poorer students got literally thousands £ more than me.
poor pay 47 pence a parcels and you had to pay for fuel running costs ect.
Poor people are often more religious because they don't have anything better to do.
Poo time!
pornhub is loading just fine.
Possibly, but I CBA to put lots of work into setting it up and then maintain it.
postage, packaging, etc.
Postage was £4.
Post its on their monitor is fucking retarded.
Post Office is probably closed by the time I leave work.
Potential payback is very high.
Potential win.
PotS, Cardstone and Overwatch are so dumbed down.
Poultry = bird meat.
Power consumption doesn't matter, if I wasn't using the power on mining then I'd be using it on a space heater.
Powershop.
Powershop doesn't say if it includes VAT or not....
PP have some good deals.
pre-binned delidded 7700K.
Precision German Engineering!
PRECISION GERMAN ENGINEERING.
Preferably.
Preferably a networked one so I can control dehumidifiers and heaters with it.
Preferably don't buy the salad at all and just buy a chicken.
Preferably I'd pay nothing for my electricity.
Prepare for Teresa May to take away all your freedoms.
president.
pretentious cringe.
Pretty damn cheap.
Pretty easy to naturalising in Irishland.
Pretty fucking good.
Pretty good.
Pretty good for an 85% LTV.
Pretty good man, but that's probably the most common combo I see in the game.
Pretty good modules.
Pretty good price for what I'm getting.
Pretty good retailer AFAIK.
Pretty good Sennheiser closed-back headphones for a good price.
pretty much.
Pretty much?
Pretty much all the developed world except for UK and USA.
Pretty much required when you live in a rural area.
Pretty stupid of you.
Pretty sure warez is NSFW.
Pretty sweet.
Prevents you from using Boompro or any other cable.
price?
Price?
Price could have gone down too.
Price is going up a bit now.
Price is low, but difficulty is low, so profitability is up wtf.
Prices just skyrocketed.
Prime location to watch planes flying.
Prison Architect.
Private Internet Access.
Private Internet Access omg.
probably.
Probably.
Probably 10GB would be enough.
Probably >£200.
Probably £280 absolute limit.
Probably £350-£450 for the kind of places I've looked at.
Probably about 3000 calories or something.
Probably about £5.
Probably an ISP with good speed and no traffic shaping is best.
Probably an upgrade, but still 2.3GHz is so low wtf that's less than 50% of the clockspeed of my desktop.
Probably a payback credit card.
Probably because I recalled a free bet after placing it in shop and they had to do it again on expenses and I put it on some Polish game....
Probably because my CPU load is constantly changing.
Probably because my debt to income ratio is so high.
Probably because they made the discs before the game finished development.
Probably best.
Probably better to get a more standard mass-produced case then.
Probably bitcoin cash or ethereum or zcash or monero will take over?
Probably comfier too.
Probably EthOS.
Probably fake.
Probably getting the bus would be cheaper.
Probably going up because of the NiceHash fiasco.
Probably good to start on the soft stuff.
Probably if I buy a faster SSD it would be instant.
Probably if it's not a regular saver.
Probably if you close the account they'll send you a cheque for £2,000.
Probably I should build an 8 GPU rig to get more heat in the winter.
Probably just fat burning at the most.
Probably kept it alive though?
Probably Lastpass.
Probably LG G7 and Samsung S9.
Probably like £500.
Probably mods/custom maps/idling on menu.
Probably my father if I ask him nicely.
Probably neither right now as I am poor and buying a house.
Probably next month. The solicitors are taking fucking forever.
Probably not even an SSD.
Probably not every youtube link is kpop though.
Probably not for much longer though.
Probably not good.
Probably not more than £1000 though.
Probably not worth it for 90% of people.
Probably one of the highest ranking Scientologists because he has a lot of money and Scientology is basically p2w.
Probably pay a shitload of tax on it.
Probably post-peak on consoles too, they move onto new games much quicker than PC gamers.
Probably powerline is better than wireless too.
Probably Ratesetter at 5% would be a better option for HansProleman.
Probably runs better than Twitch on Medium settings lmao.
Probably same as Quidco.
Probably saving a lot of battery life.
Probably some girls too.
Probably taking care of my dying grandmother.
Probably the best I've ever seen.
Probably the most performance you can get from a sub 20L build.
Probably the next person to get this SIM is going to be annoyed.
Probably to eat more donuts.
Probably when my grandparents die I'll spend my inheritance on CIEMs.
Probably with films too if they ever get released in >24fps.
Probably won't bother with a 3rd party cooler for a last-gen card.
Probably you will want to leave your gf for a much nicer girl.
Procurement.
Professional modder davehamil.
Profit.
Profitability has gone up, but not related to BTC increase.
Profitability is down so much atm.
Profitability is similar to Nicehack now.
Profitability went up too.
Profitable heating.
Pro gaming.
programme*.
Proof of Shit.
Proper window decorations.
proportion, on average around 20%..
Proprietary connectors suck, that's why I don't buy Senns.
Proprietary window decorations suck.
pros.
Pros don't stream because they focus on competition.
Prosecution cost + fine + community service or some shit.
Protection from MFAA.
protein bars?
Protein shakes are HORRIBLE with water.
ProtonMail doesn't support IMAP.
Protonmail IMAP is still in beta though.
Protonmail requires a stupid web browser and other restrictions.
Prove it.
ps3 controller wtf.
pub gee.
pub gee?
pub gee is a super buggy early access alpha with a £30 price tag, but it's still the most played game on Steam wtf.
pub gee new player record.
pub gee proved me wrong.
pub gee tonight?
PUBG is an experiment to see how many bugs users can deal with and continue to use the product.
Public pay cuts etc?
Puff, pathethic. The BRAND NEW Legue of Legends screensaver just rapes this sitthy 3d thing without a doubt..
pun intended?
Pun intended?
Push the VRAM, tell me how high you get it.
Pus is coming out of my ear wtf.
Put £150 aside every week, then we'll invest together.
Put a gag on him.
Put it into a savings account:?
Put it on Ratesetter.
Put it where omg.
Put the GPU in your mining rig.
Put two 1080TIs in there and make £500 a month.
pwned.
QC headphones are for trains and planes.
Quake and CS are so different they aren't really comparable.
Quake and Unreal Tournament.
Quake Live is dying.
Quality Silverstone and Noctua products.
QUANTUM IS GOOD.
Quantum is out HansProleman rory.
Queens Park I think?
Queues to get on the bus take fucking forever.
Quick, before it goes lower!
quidco is spazzing out.
Quite a lot for earpads.
Quite a lot. I spent £20 in Pizza Express and got two pizzas, garlic bread, and olives..
Quite expensive.....
Quite late tonight, gonna skip the rush hour.
Quoting /r/askreddit gets you kicked now?
R9 390 is a pretty good card.
Race traitor!
Racial and sexual sensitivity is at an all high time right now, so it's risky using certain words deemed offensive.
Racially, at least.
Racial seperation can be a very good thing if done right.
racism Iota.
racism is good.
racist?
Racist.
Racist people ALWAYS deny being racist.
RAID0 M.2 SSDs would boot my PC up in less than a second, it would be craaaaaaaaazy.
raided*.
Raisins and sultanas.
RAM and PSU have arrived.
RAM is good.
RAM is super important to framerates.
ramp up the fan speed if you have to.
RAM wouldn't cause a GPU problem.
raptor.
Rates are getting so bad now.
Ratesetter did a £150 cachback offer a few months ago, but I missed it :(.
Ratesetter is good shit.
Ratesetter is more ideal for you anyway.
Ratesetter is really good, you can withdraw any time you want and it has a really good consistent rate of return.
RateSetter Welcome Bonus 	.
Rather than dependant on benefits which public bodies constantly threaten to take away.
rats wtf.
Razer Blade Stealth or some shit.
Razer cheaps out on everything, always using lower quality switches and stuff.
Razer is 80% marketing and 20% engineering.
Razer is for plebs.
Razer peripherals, your fucking trolling me.
Razer products are all marketing and no engineering.
Razer's production quality is poor.
RDP?
RDP sucks.
RDP sucks ass.
RDP via citrix yeah I think so.
Reading is for nerds.
Read shitty stories.
Read some reviews you ignorant fuck.
Read the fucking store page.
Read the oddsmatcher guide.
Read the rules maybe?
really?
Really?
Really basic stuff.
Really don't want diabetes and cancer.
Really efficient mining.
Really good.
Really good for picking wallpapers I think.
Really good promising coin IMO.
Really great screen to body ratio, waterproof, no gimmicky fragile rounded glass, good DAC, good camera.
Really happy because my tests show I am very healthy and definitely not diabetic.
Really? How?
Really incredible headphones.
Really? I only have 0.0009.
Really? I send it to everyone.
Really? I thought governments would be trying to ban Bitcoin because they don't have control over it.
Really low effort too.
Really noob-friendly and low feesd.
Really not what I need right now.
Really only 10k?
Really really good.
Really sad because I had a car crash this morning.
Really shady.
Really sketchy.
Really sweet and tasty.
Really well scaling fans.
Really? You don't sound like a very ambitious person. I have lots of aims, such as becoming Global in CS:GO.
Real men are carnivores.
Real men are carnivorous.
Real men listen to kpop.
Real men play at 400.
Real men use AK.
Real men use Firefox.
Real men watch Twitch and play video games.
Reaper's fucking teleport skill has a weird autoaim too.
Rebooting too much inconvenience.
Recabled is actually better unmolested.
Reception told me nothing ever arrived.
recoil control is just muscle memory.
Recording it won't affect my profit.
Red Bull is a rip-off.
REDDIT AND TOILET TIME NOW FUCK YEAH.
reddit.com/r/kpics.
Reddit for memes.
Reddit is an American website.
reddit is full of SJWs and feminazis.
Reddit is Fun.
Red Orchestra?
Red Orchestra 2?
Reds make a noise.
Reduce your drugs budget a bit and save up for a masternode with me, you'll thank me later.
Reference cards get pretty loud.
Reference coolers are pretty bad on high-end cards.
Referendums are not legally binding, so legally the Government can ignore the results; for example, even if the result of a pre-legislative referendum were a majority of "No" for a proposed law, Parliament could pass it anyway, because parliament is sovereign..
referral link for what?
Refresh rate they have now with 240hz displays.
Refund period starts once the item is received, not when it's sent.
Regular.
rekt.
Rekt.
Rekt..
REKT.
rekt rly?
Relative to my other co-workers, I would have to score myself higher, but I don't think my level of knowledge is advanced.
Relative to the size of the property. Don't give me a BS answer please.
Religious schools seem like a relic from the olden days.
Reload offers too.
Remember kids, don't do drugs..
Remember, the more you weigh the faster you'll die.
Remember to always use big heatsinks and big fans.
Remember to tell them your retarded too.
Remember you'll need to stop eating 4000 calories soon.
Remind me never to do silly hitler poses with my dog.
Remind me yours.
Reminds me of my gf. I go play a match of Dota and come back to find 10 massive messages left by my gf.
Reminds me of Riot Game lmao.
reminds me of TF2 MvM.
Removable cable, bass port slider, improved sound quality.
Removable cables ftw.
Removeable cable too.
Rent on a basic one bedroom flat shouldn't be more than 50% of a minimum wager's salary.
Repeat every day.
Replaceable keycaps?
Replace the earpads to comfy Beyer-like ones.
Replace the pads?
replace the positions of r and r.
Replacing my COP earpads with my DT770 earpads made them so much comfier.
reply pls.
Reported.
Reported and muted.
reported for aimbot.
reported to network admins.
request for quotation?
Reset to stock.
Resilient little fucker isn't it.
restream for me.
Retail.
Retarded or genius.
Retardness disorder.
re the headphones?
re the sound leaking.
Retinal might come down in cost if smartphones start mass producing it.
Retire early sounds nice.
Return period starts once the item is received, not when it's sent.
Revolut supports crypto now.
RGB is a useless feature, although a lot of good high-end motherboards include it anyway.
Rich.
Rich people benefit more from tax than poor people, so it's fair that they should pay more.
Rich people like you?
Rich person.
rigged.
Right.
Right about what?
Right after there was a global controversy over the place which charged women more.
right, rory?
Right, rory?
Right so the huge budget necessary for funding of Trident is so controversial, but somehow some random dude makes one in his bedroom?!?!?
RimWorld.
Riot employee.
Riot Game*.
Riot Game is such a shady company.
Riot games has a really toxic company culture m9.
RIP beautiful yellow ranger.
RIP Brazillian football team.
Ripple is centralised AFAIK.
RIP UK 1707-2017.
risk profile 1.
RM5rMc8jwUsqA8irszFs7fgqYxcaXoetMi.
RMA it, it should be well within its warranty still.
R&M peaked at the end of season 1.
Roadhog?
road tax, MoT, service, insurance, GTX 1080TI, house, etc.
Robots use them faster than humans can.
Rocker Locker?????
Rockstars use expensive headphones lmao.
Rolling.
rorwat.
rory.
rory:.
rory?
RORY.
rory also wants to know my thoughts on the Fidelio X2 once I have them.
rory and I are going to play it together when it comes out.
rory and I are headphones enthusiasts.
rory and I hate wireless audio.
rory and I have spent hundreds of £ on audio equipment.
rory and I love torrent based streaming, don't we rory?
rory and I use Tree Style Tabs.
rory bought it for me.
rory cares.
rory cares too because he is a Sennheiser stakeholder.
rory_claus, HansProleman, Iota, MadPierrot, Bulwark:.
rory could buy a GTX 1080TI whenever he wanted but he won't because he's such a filthy fucking casual.
rory doesn't like kpop because he's culturally ignorant.
rory does real opimium because he's a massive druggie.
rory Happy Memorial Day.
rory has some good headphones.
rory has the money for it because he's really rich.
rory hates commoners.
rory hates people who play videogames on consoles.
rory have PUBG now.
rory:How?
rory:I like Firefox too.
rory is a fucking weirdo btw/..
rory is a fucking weirdo btwe.
rory is a lot richer than I am.
rory is always talking about his Boots lunches, he loves them!
rory is an anagram for rory.
rory is a pretentious snob.
rory is doing it.
Rory is heterosexual which means he is attracted to feminine features which Asians have the most of but he can't comprehend it because he's too narrow-minded.
rory is interested in my opinions on headphones.
rory is mining atm.
rory is rich as fuck.
rory is rich ass fuck.
rory:It's a really premium feel, but a bit larger on the desk.
rory knows because he has some good audio gear too.
rory lives in a cheap place.
rory:lmao.
rory:LMAO.
rory offered it to me several months ago but I didn't need it but I might need it soon because I'm buying a flat and I'm going to be so broke.
rory omfg.
rory omg.
RORY OMG.
rory pub gee tonight?
rory's is a bit more than just a "kink" he sounds like a full-on sexual deviant.
rory[swag] already has 40k.
rory wants to buy a shit stack.
rory what does your electricity cost?
rory:What do you think of my K65? Do you like it?
rory Why is Tesla so hyped?
rory wishes he was as smart as a bot.
rory works out too now.
rory:wtf.
ROTFLMFAO.
Royal Mail too.
rprJe;;p.
rrwtf.
RTP is <100%.
Rubbish company, having to go to small claim court to get a weeks pay.
Ruined the sound quality of my headphones.
Run at 420fps and it'll feel great.
Run everything on lowest graphics.
Running 120% power, + 240 core, +580 memory right now.
Running standard benchmark now brb.
Run off with all our money?
Run the fan higher then.
Rupert Murdoch?
Rupert Murdoch think you're a mouthbreather, you think I'm a mouthbreather, I think my mum is a mouthbreather, my mum thinks my unemployed aunty is a mouthbreather, she thinks Polish people are mouthbreathers, etc.
Rural taxis are expensive.
Russia can get away with it because they're a larger country.
RVN address RM5rMc8jwUsqA8irszFs7fgqYxcaXoetMi.
RVN is going to moon.
RVN is good.
RVN is good though.
RVN is so good.
RVN is the future.
RVN is trying to be the future of GPU mining.
RX 470 isn't a great GPU.
Ryzen is good for CPU mining because of all the cores.
Ryzen is looking good.
Ryzen is looking pretty sucky for gaming.
Ryzen is very good workstation CPUs, and their GPUs are very good for mining eth.
s//.
s/530/630/.
s/6/17.65/.
S6 is not waterproofing.
S7.
S7 is tempting me.
S9 is overpriced.
s/accas/acca/.
Sacha Baron Cohen in Grimsby reminds me of you.
s/addicting/addicted/.
Sad to see Firefox continuing to shrink.
Safari is bigger than ever it seems.
Safari is growing share though, whatever Safari is.
Sainsbury's.
Sainsbury's sucks.
Salary doesn't mean shit if your net income is less than mine.
Salary sacrafice is being scrapped.
sales lmao.
samburnett@msn.com.
same.
Same.
Same :(.
Same 500MB as cheapest S7 contract.
Same as everyone else in the channel then.
Same as jack has.
Same as last year IIRC.
Same as rory's then. I thought yours would be cheaper.
Same, but Ryzen 7 has so many cores so it's good for mining.
Same for Ladbrokes.....
Same for me, but tomorrow night.
Same here.
Same here m9.
same here omg.
Same, it's hilarious how much of a hippocrit our PM is.
Same omg.
Same thing with any market.
Same with alcohol and caffeine and tobacco and sugar m9.
Same with Clubcard and the other loyalty cards probably.
Samsung#2781.
Samsung Galaxy S4 only £50 on classified.
Samsung Galaxy S7?
Samsung is a brave and courageous company.  I applaud them for their courage..
s/anowher/another/.
Santander started it all when they reduced from 3% to 1.5%.
saranghae.
Saranghae.
saranghaeyo.
Sarcasm doesn't translate well onto the internet idiots omg.
s/arrived?/arrived!/.
Saturday racing promotions.
Sausage Party looks amazing, you should go watch the trailer now.
Sausage rolls wtf?
Saved a shitload of £££.
saved camera positions.
Saved myself £6 ^^.
Savers.
Savers win because they didn't invest and lose IDK.
Save up for 50% of a masternode pls.
Saving me £15 a month.
saving passwords in plaintext just feels so wrong....
savings.
Savings has no risk other than inflation I think.
Saw it this morning.
Saw that yesterday.
Say if new players couldn't buy the AK47.
Saying he's not a leader and he didn't deserve to be elected and he's unelectable or some shit.
Say it doesn't have the amount of VRAM advertised.
says excel.
Say you were on the toilet or something.
s/btwe/btw/..
Scan and DPD are amazing, Hermes is shit.
scan.co.uk.
Scan paid for next day delivery, but it was a day late.
Scan say my CPU cooler is on the way back to them and they'll get it within 48 hours. They asked me if I want it shipped back to me.
Scan will send my parcel back to me with DPD (once MyHermes eventually returns it to them) and I have requested my ebay seller change the deliver address to my grandparents.
s/carnivores/carnivorous/.
scart is fucking ancient.
s/cheap/free/.
Schitt stack?
Schoolkids and unemployed people.
s/cooler/PSU/.
Scotland has a larger pro-EU majority than pro-UK. Isn't leaving the EU making the breakup of the UK inevitable?
Scotland, Ireland and Gibraltar all want to split off.
Scotland, Ireland, Guernsey and Gibraltar will leave.
Scotland wants EU.
Scotland will probably leave the UK now.
Scottish people must be pissed.
s/CPU/CPU cooler/.
s/CPU/CPU\ Cooler/.
s/creative/creating/.
screenshot pls.
scrub.
s/cuber/cyber/.
s/cuck/SJW/.
s/dramqa/drama/.
SE215s are shit.
SE215s good for when I'm at gym or walking around or whatever.
s/E7/E5/.
SEA is pretty bad too.
Search my Steam name on dotabuff and you'll find it.
Sec, lemme check my calendar to figure out when I saw her last exactly.
sec, lemme find my source.
Sec, let me consult our social media policy.
Second hand GPUs are often great value.
see.
See.
See?
See any lucrative coins there like garlic?
See how fast it is.
See if you can get some fake ones on ebay.
Seemed like a safe one to go for.
Seems better, the normal is kinda noob UI.
Seems fair.
Seems like a bargain.
Seems like a really shitty situation either way.
Seems like it runs out of RAM or something and grinds to a halt too.
Seems pretty snappy.
Seems to be more profitable than Monero.
Seems to do a good job of handling a few hundred tabs.
Seems to work well for them.
Seen any good cashback offers recently?
Seen any more good cashback recently?
Seen the Fidelio X2 compared to 650 saying "650 but cheaper".
See what?
SEIG HEIL NEIN.
Self-employed drivers is the only reason they're alive though. If they employed drivers then they wouldn't have a price advantage over DPD.
Self-employed is fine as long as the pay and conditions are a high standard.
Self-employed position but treated like employed without the benefits! Told what to do, rubbish pay and no negotiation.
Sell any you have.
Selling for GBP.
Selling hats.
Sell it and buy a house.
Sell it as a gaming PC to someone.
sell my gaming PC and my car and put £50k into crypto.
Sell my house and then put £40k into crypto.
Sell them and put the money on smarkets.
Sell your DT770s and buy them.
Sell your M50s and your DT770s, buy the Beyers, and you'll be out ahead.
Sell your M50s then.
Semi-fanless 80+ gold.
s/emmigration/emigration/.
Send 37p first and put RORY as the reference. Save the details so you can repeat them without having to retype it.
Sending a Second Chance Offer is free but if your item sells, you will be charged a final value fee based on a percentage of the final sale price..
Send it to me and I'll refund your postage costs.
Send it to me pls.
Send like 37p, I'll confirm it, then use the saved details to send the rest.
Send to my bank account.
Sennheiser do make a lot of shit lowend products.
Sennheiser have a lot of shit low end products though.
Sennheiser is ripping you off.
Sennheiser is the biggest brand of any decent headphone manufacturer.
Sennheiser just announced a new range.
Sennheiser products aren't really for me.
Sennheisers have proprietary connections.
Sennheiser sucks.
Sent.
Sent it there 3 times.
Seolhyun.
Seriously, I can't use Firefox without it.
Serves them right for having no social skills.
Set max acceptable ping to 50.
Set that up.
Set the fan to 100%.
setx GPU_FORCE_64BIT_PTR 0.
setx GPU_MAX_ALLOC_PERCENT 100.
setx GPU_MAX_HEAP_SIZE 100.
setx GPU_SINGLE_ALLOC_PERCENT 100.
setx GPU_USE_SYNC_OBJECTS 1.
Set your own rate.
SFF desktops too.
SFW my ass.
SFX PSUs are so small too.
SG553 wtf.
s/gdac/gdax.
s/GPUI/GPU/.
s/grey/black/.
s/H100/H105/.
Shadow are one of the few things you should srsly consider turning up.
Shall I ask him if he'll meet me half way?
Shall I save this address for future trades with you?
Shall I try to cancel the order?
Shallow, vein, it's the same thing.
Shall we meet up when I go to Leeds?
shambles.
Shared ownership places are often advertised to everyone.
Share scheme = investment fund?
Share your progress with me!
Sharing the rent between two people doesn't sound too bad.
Shattering TI6's record.
shave at work obviously.
s/have/make/.
She already knows.
She also has good self-sustainability.
She also says we should join finances, but I told her I can't because her credit history is so poor.
She also wants me to pay her rent and buy her a house.
She also wants to save for a big house.
She always tells me she knows only one person who plays video games, and that's her colleague who is fat.
She basically just told me to be more careful.
She believe in Jesus and Fan Death.
She blames me for seducing her.
She can buy it from me.
She can cum.
She can work and bring in the money and I can play video games all day.
She cleans for me and I pay her weekly for it.
She comes from a country where they expect their bf to do everything for them.
She confused the fuck out of me.
She deserves it for referring to uploading as "downloading".
She didn't like that.
She doesn't have a job or any friends in this country so she's completely under my control.
She doesn't like contraception though.
She doesn't smoke.
She emails me Daily Mail articles every week.
she fell over.
She gets angry with me when I tell her to leave me alone.
She gets overexcited and puts coins in as fast as she can.
She gets to live with me for free, and I give her sex and money.
She goes really red when she drinks.
She got really drunk because it was her birthday, then fell over and took most of the skin off her forearm.
She had better fucking not.
She had better replace that.
She has no idea how to use Excel other than as a table of data.
She hasn't ever complained.
She has osteoporosis.
She hated it.
She is already Korean.
She is awake.
She is Korean.
She is KOREAN.
She is married to the most corrupt precident in recently history.
She isn't interested in butt stuff if it's her own butt.
She is sure she wants a bigger house but isn't sure enough to get a LISA....
She is very anti-debt and wants me to pay off my debts, but I'm trying to invest for the future.
She is very attracted to me.
She just left the office.
She just lost £1k potential deposit because she didn't get a LISA last tax year.
She just sees it as £600 wasted money.
She just spent 10 minutes trying to find an email she deleted.
She keeps me company too.
She keeps saying "I'm not happy with this".
She knows she has to cook and clean for me, because I pay the bills and keep her warm and comfortable.
Sheldon Cooper is hilarious.
She likes money and presents, and I like not making babies.
She likes my Fidelio X2s.
She literally owns a house now.
She'll beat Corbyn if they don't put him on the ballot.
She'll get angry with me and tell me that all my money is hers.
She'll just have to spend at least 1 hour a week gaming with me in return.
She'll say no and leave her £9001 in bank accounts earning no interest and losing value to inflation.
She looks half her age though.
She looks like kpop.
She loved it.
She makes me even if I really don't want it.
She means that I took 2 days annual leave 00:00 on Monday 13th - 00:00 on Tuesday 14th.
She might tell me to just withdraw my gambling money.
She needed visa to stay in the country.
She needs to know where you stand.
She only works part-time in a supermarket.
She pays for food sometimes.
She prides herself in being university education it's so weird.
She probably hasn't ever tried velour circumaurals, there's nothing comfier than that.
She rarely has contact with his father, and she is engaged to her new partner but not married yet.
She reminds me every day.
She's 31.
She's adding in comments into cells randomly and it breaks all the formula.
She's a fucking bad politician.
She's a fucking racist bitch.
She said £10.
She said I should have put real information in the fields instead of mashing my keyboard, which I would have done if I had some imagination and wasn't so concerned about my voice.
She said she didn't open it.
She said that Facebook and football and BBC news and shit is okay because you can't generate an income from it.
She's a minor character.
She's a plat scrub.
She's a really sexy Korean though.
She's Asian so it's hard to read her expressions.
She's a super strong dueler.
She says I should share everything with her.
She says it's against her religion.
She says she won't get pregnant if I do it at specific dates.
She scared me so much when she said she will take pregnancy test omg.
She's day-snoring.
She's dead get over it.
She's fat, so you can have her.
She's fitter than most grills in their 20s though.
She's Governance.
She should do both omg.
She's hundreds of miles away.
She's Korean.
She's Korean though....
She's like the FBI.
She's like your servant then.
She's making me do it.
She's never had a job before but she's in her 50s.
She's new to my company and doesn't know we don't use CVs for internal recruiting.
She sounds boring.
She sounds like a fucking dictator.
She sounds like a slut.
She's poo.
She's poor.
She's pretty anti-debt and pro-saving.
She's pretty isn't she?
She's pretty, right?
She's probably amazing in your mmr bracket.
She's probably my favourite hero now because she's great at both support and DPS.
She's Russian so I doubt it.
She's sitting on £9k doing nothing, it's so frustrating and a waste of cash power.
She's so needy.
She's so nice.
She's the biggest troll in gaming journalism.
She's the hottest gril in xmen.
She's the wong race anyway.
She's the wrong race anyway.
she's ugly ass fuck.
She supports it.
She's very good vs D.va, Rheinhardt, McCree, etc.
She takes up my time.
She talks Korean and eats Korean food.
She tells me I need to pay for her food and entertainment and condoms and things.
She thinks admitting error is a sign of weakness or something.
She thinks all my money is her money.
She thinks I am selfish because I don't want to pay for her all the time.
She thinks I have to do everything for her lmao.
She thinks she's so smart.
She thinks she will negotiate better with the EU because she is a "bloody difficult woman". IDK why she thinks the EU would prefer to negotiate with her than with JC.
She thinks the fan will kill us wtf.
She told me I am a bad bf.
She told me I need to do stuff in the test system.
She told me it would enable me to make payments through internet banking, and it's still broken.
She told me she's a nerd.
She told me that Hermes never came.
She told me that I am addicted to gambling.
She told me that if my hobbies were football and facebook then she wouldn't have a problem with it, but because I'm into crypto it's not okay.
She wants a baby and I don't, it's so fucked up.
She wants me to breed her too.
She wants me to help with housework and talk about buying things and stuff.
She wants me to pay most of the rent.
She wants to buy a bigger house with me.
She wants to get married.
She wants to get married ASAP because her visa expires later this year.
She wants to get rid of her rightful leader just because she thinks she can do a better job herself, even though nobody voted for her in the leadership election?!??!?
She wants to live with me and marry me next year.
She wants to live with me for free until/if she finds a job.
She was going on about how I'm a horrible person because the Daily Mail said so.
She was studying English when I met her.
She won't get anyone buying it at £20.
She won't play it, she thinks video games are for fat losers.
She works at another office more often now.
She would have grown up not knowing them and would be extremely mentally traumatised.
She would probably complain that I am lazy because I am watching Youtube videos and going on Reddit and playing video games more than working.
Shit customer support too. They don't take phone calls wtf.
Shit DAC, no headphone jack.
Shit dac, shit amp, no waterproofing.
Shit, have they?
SHIT headphones no doubt.
Shit, I drove past a police car this morning.
shit I forgot my IEMs and my towl.
Shit I gotta get to the gym before my next meeting.
Shit I just bought some to replace my DT770s.
Shit, I just cut my finger somehow.
Shit is getting more expensive to import now though.
Shit, my credit score is still only 719.
shit stack?
Shitty open source devs.
Shitty work wifi.
Shorter hours, more pay, bigger salary, better gym, bigger pension.
Short-sighted idiots.
Short term performance does not predict long term performance!!!!!!!!!1.
Should an ampersand be at the bottom alphabetically or the top?
Should be fine.
Should be more accurate before the deadline lock in 19 days.
Should be pretty fast.
Should do.
Should give me a shitload of overclocking.
Should have 24/7 uptime on my rig now.
Should have gone to Boots.
Should I arb Tommy French?
Should I ask my colleagues if I can borrow their shitty earphones and sources to see how bad low quality audio is in comparison to mine?
Should I auto exchange for eth or btc?
Should I be arriving before 9am to boot up my Windoze laptop?
Should I be worried?
Should I buy 25% of a flat for £26,250 and rent the remaining share for 75%, or should I stay living with my parents for a while and save up for 100% of a property?
Should I buy 5 days annual leave or not?
Should I buy 5kg of strawberry cream myprotein for £40?
Should I buy 6 more 1070 TIs?
Should I buy a G6 for £250?
Should I buy a G6 or V30?
Should I buy a GTX 1180?
Should I buy a house and have no disposable income, or buy a SO flat and have some disposable income?
Should I buy a jacket?
Should I buy CIEMs or a 7700k or Ryezen?
Should I buy extra holiday days?
Should I buy it?
Should I buy it for £30 and return the one she bought?
Should I buy more annual leave?
Should I buy some CIEMs?
Should I buy the V30, S8, S8+ or S7?
Should I call them?
Should I call them back?
Should I claim for the longest, shortest, or fastest?
Should I contact the ombudsman? I've spent way too much time on the phone to this company.
Should I disable mobile internet then if I only use Wi-Fi?
Should I do a rushed cheap wedding so my gf can stay in the country?
Should I do cardio today?
Should I dump her?
Should I get 2 pairs of Specsavers glasses, or one pair and buy insurance for it?
Should I get another year of PIA for $29?
Should I get a S7, V30 or G6?
Should I get a younger, richer and less religious gf?
Should I get Chromecast, Roku or Amaozon stick?
Should I get one of these direct debit cashback accounts?
Should I get some speakers for my TV for watching films and then get a Chromecast to use it for playing music too?
Should I get the flight from Bristol and meet you in Amsterdam, or shall I travel up to Leeds and fly to Amsterdam together?
Should I hodl XMR?
Should I indicate right along the whole slip road?
Should I just rent instead of buying?
Should I list all my GRLC at market price, or list some at higher prices?
Should I mine Ethereum with my GTX 970?
Should I mine garlic or Nicehack whilst I'm in Seoul?
Should I open a LISA.
Should I pay 6X the price for a cable which does the same thing?
Should I pay him?
Should I put it at 99p starting bid?
Should I restart it or not.
Should I send them back?
Should I start shirking at work?
Should I start using Ebay again?
Should I take my Beyers or my M50X to Korea with me? The Beyers have far better isolation and sound quality, but the M50X folds up into a more portable space.
Should I tell my manager I've applied externally? She says I should, but you're saying I shouldn't?
Should I turn on my immersion water heater at night on economy 7?
Should I underestimate my electricity usage so my monthly direct debits are lower and I can stooze the savings to earn interest before having to repay it?
Should I update my router's firmware?
Should I use Lastpass or Bitwarden?
Should I write to Tesco and tell them that their employee threatened me?
Should make mining nice and profitable.
Shouldn't the police handle their own recruitment?
Shouldn't they be using company addresses?
Should reach you without any damage. I've screwed everything down tight, stuffed the cables out of the way, put lots of Amazon paper in there, and will be sending it in the original box. I'll get the insurance just to be safe..
Show me yours.
Show mw yours.
Show us the boat.
Show you my modded M50X?
s/hoxx/hoax/.
shrekt.
s/HTV/HTC/.
Shure SE215  8.10   $99.
Shure SE215s are one of the safest choices.
Shure SE215s OP.
Side is good for best airflow.
Signal is the best one.
Sign up to Nutmeg and Moneyfarm.
sign which says "park at your own risk".
Silent gubbings should be illegal.
siliconlottery bin their CPUs and also do a delidding service. This really helps with overclocking.
siliconlottery.com.
Silkroad isn't the only site.
Silly old people don't know how to copy and paste.
silly rory.
silly rory_claus.
Silverstone 600 watts IIRC?
Silverstone RVZ01 and Noctua L9i.
Silverstone RVZ01 and Silverstone SFX600 or something.
Silverstone RVZ01B.
Similar to other mid-end headphones.
Similar weight, but MUCH more screen realestate.
SIM only is good.
SIM only is usually cheaper.
Simple as that..
Simpsons?
Simulators.
Since Christmas.
Since I have a Creative E5 now, if someone wants to listen/watch with me, they can just use headphones.
Since I like small form factor cases, I usually go for reference cards which draw fresh air from outside the case then blow them back out of the case.
Since I switched to coffee I've been having some IBS or something.
Since I want to retire at 55, 17% of my salary is currently going into my pension fund.
Since I won't be moving around or building up a sweat, circumaural headphones could be better than IEMs.
Since my insurance is so low, any gains would be nullified by admin fees anyway.
Since Thatcher?
Since they're getting so cheap now.
Since we agreed a contract and I have delivered my part.
Since when does "advantage" mean "instant win"? Stop strawmanning me pls.
Since when does fitness have to be boring wtf.
Since when is a phone capable of dozens of terraflops?
Since when is education supposed to be about milking the students for everything they have?
Since when is removing features a fucking upgrade.
Single V-Moda Boompro cable for multiple headphones ftw.
s/ingoings/revenues/.
s/inquiries/enquiries/.
s/install/download/.
siro jinjja anjowa.
s/Isn't/It's/.
Sister's wedding.
Site is laggy as fuck.
SIXTH PLACE.
s/kill/burn/.
Skins are going to make it harder to recognise heroes.
Sky Bet don't like me.
Skyping my gf.
Sky Vegas prize machine.
Sky Vegas promotions.
SLI is bad.
Slippery slope.
s/lot/look/.
Slot masheens.
slot masheens are boring though.
s/love/low/.
slow down your email program.".
Slower, more expensive, harder to fix.
Slow news day I guess.
s/Lynch/Lync/.
Small appliances are much easier to procure than large machines.
Small boobies is very healthy.
Smaller is better if I can get the same performance in a smaller size.
Smaller subscription fee for smaller library.
Small screwdrivers are not good when you want to work on big pieces of furniture.
Small things and big things.
Smarkets/matchbook is on top atm.
Smart meters lock you into the big suppliers.
Smart TVs are a dumb idea IMO.
s/me/him/.
smelly LoL nerds haha.
s/me/my/.
s/might/probably/.
Smirnoff Ice.
SMITE is nothing like an FPS.
s/'mlady/m'lady/.
s/m/me/.
Smoking is bad for your lungs!!!!!
Smoking is bad for you too.
Smoking is not cool.
Smoking makes your lungs radioactive.
smoking weed is not a marketable skill omfg.
s/monitords/monitors/.
Smoothing and motion blur is bad.
Smoothness is for when you don't have a 4:1 perfect downscaling.
s/mroe/more/.
s/mw/me/.
s/my/me/.
Snapchat kills batteries.
Sneaky dave.
Snoo36023.
s/not//.
s/not/bad/.
s/notie/notice/.
s/not/now/.
SNSD Gee.
SNSD - THE BEsT.
SNSD - THE BEST.
So.
So?
So 0.1%.
So 0.9% mining fee + 0.2% auto exchange fee + 0.1% withdrawal fee = 1.2% fees total.
So 105g?
So 15 minutes and 180 minutes are "about 45 minutes"?
So £160>£60.
So £200 total.
So 2 months out of work, and 2 months without any income.
So £440 in total.
So 4% in total?
So £50 a week more than living with my parents?
So £50 to borrow £2,000 for 32 months.
So £528.
So £56 a month?
So 7 million sales then.
So a big interest rate increase will make everyone really poor?
So about 24 hours.
So about £76 profit.
So after the initial setup, you can use it driverless just fine.
So a hybrid.
So all I have to do is not register to vote?
So although Hermes is FUCKING SHIT STUPID USELESS CUNTS, it hasn't actually affected me that much.
So ambigous!
So a month out of work without benefits.
So annoying.
So a non-RGB gaming keyboard is pretty much a business keyboard.
So apparently we're limited to whatever is available on Spotify.
So are you probably.
So a single core at 999FPS is best.
So as long as I'm gaming enough, I don't even need to use my heaters?
So atm it's never 1-1-1-1-1 vs 1-1-1-1-1-1 but it will be soon?
So at this rate it'll be 22-23m.
So basically just some random footballers died.
So basically pension?
So basically the DT770s but with a removable cable.
So basically whatever answer I give I'm wrong.
So because Apocalypse is strangling Mystique the film is sexist!!!!
So busy at work this week.
So busy now.
So can you only talk to Frank if you're a quitter!?!??!?
So cheap!
So Chromecast CAN be used just as a receiver?
Socialised healthcare just seems like an all-round great idea.
social media websites while you are at work. You may do this during working.
So close to buying a house now.
So comfortable and great isolation.
So confused.
So confused....
So didn't you get in trouble?
So did the centre core land or not?
So discriminating against women = bad but discrimination against men is okay?
So does it count?
So does my gaming PC count as a "fan-assisted electric heater"?
So don't expect a huge amount of heat :(.
So do you think you can find another crypto using a unique algorithm?
So easy.
So effectively cancelling out the interest?
So efficient.
So either there's a forcefield, or the gun is smart and just fires a blank.
So either women are patronised or they are not protected and provided for?
So equivalent to top 60% in Dota then.
So even with the higher fees, it might be worth it....
So excited to replace my RVZ01.
So far all my requests for refunds have been genuine.
so fucking annoying wtf.
So fucking expensive though.
So fucking glad I bought my Ncase M1 just before the referendum.
So fucking pointless.
So fucking stupid.
So Game owes me £750.
So glad they fully refunded me so I could switch to Vodafone.
So good.
So good for your health.
So guests can shoot guests?
So hard to build up my Bitcoin with only a GTX 970 :(.
So hard to find something just right.
So hard to get my money back from them.
So hard to login.
So have to go 3 months with being paid anything.
So he cut his ear off to have more company with woman?!??!
So he just gave me £25 back.
So he owes me for 56 miles.
So he's a sexual deviant?
So he's being a dick.
So hopefully I'll negate the additional interest by stoozing lots anyway.
So how will it work in rural areas?
So I am exchanging my GRLC to BTC, then  my BTC to BCH.
So I bought 9 graphics cards from Aria.
So I bought my Ncase M1 and H105 CPU cooler so I can get a sweet OC on my 4690K so it's not gonna bottleneck my GTX 970 any more ^^.
So I can be as rich as you.
So I can deposit £10, bet £10, then withdraw £50?
So I can drink it slower.
So I can get my cashback?
So I can just buy one of those from the supermarket..
So I can just order it through work and put it on my expenses form then?
So I can look around my room with my VR headset on?
So I can play Overwatch at more than the shitty 230FPS I have now.
So I can say anything I want?
So I can start looking now?
So I can't afford my rent now.
So I can't offer more.
So I can ventilate the whole room.
So I changed it to £500.
So I chose a kpop song.
So I could get banking bonuses.
So I couldn't even open the account.
So I deposited £40 and withdrew £108 lmao.
So I did it manually.
So I didn't get my cashback last night :(.
So I disabled that shit and now my games are super smooth again.
So IDK how accurate it will be.
So IDK how these people are getting jobs.
So IDK what I'll get next, maybe Beyer Custom One Pros?
So IDK what the point of it all was.
So IDK what the solution is.
So IDK why they told me that.
So I don't have to pay for it.
So I don't have to transport them every day.
So I don't have to use the shitty laptop and headset they gave me.
So I don't lose money from it.
So I don't pay tax on my £5 a month gym membership and personal trainer.
So I don't think I am at all suicidal.
So I don't touch those two accounts no matter what.
So I'd save £88.
So I'd strongly advise you seek my advice before making a purchase.
So if a nuclear power station is supplying my home with electricity and I use an electric heater, then I guess I'm heating my home with magic.
So if blink dagger doesn't stop channeling spells, then I guess it isn't OP either?
So if I deposit £100 and get another £100 to bet with then I'll statically probably make more profit.
So If I get really ill for 6 months and can't work, then my pension will be lower than modelled.
So if I make my gf pregnant, I will just kill myself instead.
So if I move out and don't pass my probation and lose my job, I will have to sleep on the street.
So if I need more heat, should I OC it higher?
So if I put some of it in my wife's name, then I get double the CGT allowance?
So if I set up cameras in my room, and I can look around my room like normal?
So if it doesn't arrive tomorrow, I won't have it until Thursday evening omfg.
So if it's so profitable.
So if Nicehack adds scrypt-n then suddenly it'll become the most profitable algorithm?
So if the UK goes to shit I can just move to Europe.
So if you asked them "Do you dislike me?" they would say "yes"?
So if you had 300 garlic.
so if you meet a kpop girl you wouldn't desire her?!?!?
So if your salary was £1,000 a month then you pay £3,000 a month in tax now?!?!?
So if you withdraw more than that, NiceHash is cheaper.
So I get first-helpings of the scraps.
So I get heat and profit in the winter.
So I get it all.
So I get the advantages of both.
So I got a good deal I think.
So I got benefits and a salary.
So I had to spend another £5k.
So I had to undelete it to get back in.
So I had to wait another month.
So I have £80 left over.
So I have high hopes for my Fidelio X2.
So I have multiple headsets.
So I have this crushed up tablet with me today.
So I have to do everything no matter what it is, how long it'll take, and regardless of my current workload.
So I have to pay them to send and rent me a router, and then store it for them?!?!?
So I have to phone up the fucking HMRC and Student Loan company and ask for my money back.
So I have to say to fill out the fields and stuff.
So I have to sell all my stuff on the market, lose like 15% of its value, then buy keys and sell them for btc or whatever.
So I just bought lots of Hi-Fi headphones and a new gaming PC.
So I just did goblin squats with a 16kg kettle bell.
So I just drink sugar-free energy drinks instead.
So I just lost 4 holiday days.
So I just stole the alcohol instead so I didn't have to wait next time.
So I'll ask for it again to measure the box.
So I'll be fucked.
So I'll be stuck trying to build up a deposit very slowly.
So I'll get a waterproof Samsung or something.
So I'll have 37 days of holiday in total not including bank holidays.
So I'll have to talk to you tonight.
So I'll have to withdraw to my Revolut app and then exchange to GBP.
So I'll just get a high-end AIO I think.
So I'll lose £6,000.
So I'll probably just hold less savings.
So I'll probably order a 40 pack of velcro cable ties.
So I'll stick to my K702s for competition.
So I'll stick with 1080p for now.
So I looked for a better alternative and found openmailbox.
So I look like I am not busy.
So I lost 3 stones earlier this year to bring my weight back in check.
So I lost about £1.50 last night.
So I lost my previous balance?
So I'm being patronised because I am protected and being provided for?!?!?
So I'm going for low risk stuff like bonds.
So I'm going to deposit and wager £50 and hope they authorise my next withdrawal.
So I'm going to have to get a multi-socket adapter then unplug and reconnect the router.
So I'm HODLing BCH now.
So I might buy that and sell my M50X.
So I'm just borrowing his.
So I'm just doing the ones I already have on my account.
So I'm losing money to try and boost my credit score.
So I'm not sure if it's my CPU or my GPU that's bottlenecking my framerate....
So I'm pretty knackered.
So I'm pretty much paid per hour.
So I'm pretty sure I need to upgrade to a GTX 1080TI.
So I'm probably going to sell them.
So I'm waiting for my replacement webcam to arrive so I can send back my birthday present.
So I need 3-4 banks.
So I need the money.
So I need to do it.
So I only drink the citric acid at weekends now.
So I only get £10 from Leovegas.
So I only got about £1,500 when she died.
So I only need a single cable for home and a single cable for work.
So I prefer DT770s in the office.
So I probably have almost TWICE the hashpower as you.
So I probably won't upgrade any components this year.
So I recommend you do that on yours too.
So I replaced them with some super comfy ones.
So I said "No I want to transfer £1".
So is being a fag, Bulwark.
So I set it to 1.95.
So I should disable bluetooth and NFC and flashlight too?
So I should either switch to a standard tariff and use my gaming PC / space heaters, or I should get better storage heaters and stay on E7.
So I should heat my house with air conditioners?
So is it worth it?
So I split my hashrate up into lots of workers.
So is the NHS going to pay it?
So I still can't use my M50X :(.
So I stopped mining it.
So it adds all the balances together, not just the LTC?
So it could go up 10X for example.
So it doesn't seem to be about "protect the children" anyway.
So it feels much better built.
So it felt better.
So it helps with cashflow if I know some money will be freed up.
So I think I have an Economy 7 tariff with shitty storage heaters that won't store the heat very well.
So I think I'll go ahead with the cable mod and get the  Philips X2 instead.
So I think I'll just cashout to my bank account.
So I think I'll stick with GPU mining to lessen the risk.
So I think it's possible to be entitled to benefits even with a salary.
So I thought she was about 20.
SO IT IS AN AMPDAC JESUS CHRIST.
So it isolates better.
So it'll become non-profitable pretty soon probably.
So it'll record everything with very little data inputting.
So it makes a wired mouse feel like wireless.
So it makes my ear get a bit achey from resisting it.
So it makes sense that I shop at cheap places.
So it must have done it by itself?
So I told her mine has 232gb.
So it only turns on when people are paying more for it.
So it's a bad idea to save if your employment is uncertain.
So it's about the same size as my G403 but over twice as heavy.
So it's a couple of pennies off.
So it's all the cons with none of the benefits.
So it's a really good implementation.
So it's better for OCing.
So it's better to get an APU unless you're spending £300 or more.
So it's down to £11.46 a month.
So it's easier to book a room and then use the shitty Lync headset in a quiet room.
So it's easy to watch.
So it's extra £££.
So it's fairly modern.
So it's fair they should be paying more tax.
So it's for rich people, IRL streamers, and people who love streaming video on their phones.
So it's fucking awkward to get it through doorways.
So it's going to be -£5 profit for me :(.
So it's just an amp.
So it's like the house of parliament and house of lords?
So it's more accurate.
So it's more expensive than an external wallet to withdraw small amounts, but cheaper for large amounts.
So it's more of a preventative measure.
So it's not double then.
So it's not that much harder than ATX.
So it's not very democratic really.
So? It's only an OS.
So it's probably not necessary.
So it's shit either way?
So it's theoretically impossible to make any investments.
So it's unique in its portability and versatility for a very high-end pair of headphones.
So it's very good for testing an overclock.
So it was manually coloured green, I set the conditional rule up which also set it to green, then the cell value changed so the rule didn't apply, but it stayed green instead of going blank.
So it won't fall off like my fucking modmic.
So I used my screwdriver to make sure it was secured as firmly as possible.
So I use MSE Credit Club and Clearscore.
So I use my Beyers at home / in the office.
So I've been really healthy for the past year.
So I've been told by several people.
So I want a list + a date range.
So I want to buy somewhere close to work.
So I was right and you were left?
So I was sleep-deprived over 3 months.
So I went with K702 because they have the biggest soundstage ever.
So I will apply to Nationwide because they have a gym and a subsidised canteen!!!
So I will just take my dumps in the nice one.
So I will not be going :(.
So I will sell you GRLC AND RVN.
So I won't benefit at all.
So I wouldn't have to worry about rent and fuel and things so much.
So just a list + dates.
So just guaranteed variable profits?
So just once I have the speed and position for merging then I guess.
s/Okja#/Okja.
Sold it all.
Sold my 80ohm DT770s.
Sold my item for £41.50.
Sold to Hans.
So little money, I'll just do some betting and mining.
Solo mining is gambling.
So low storage and low cpu cycles and stuff?
So lucrative.
So mainly just text really.
So make sure you can do lots of damage, support, flank, and initiate well.
So manufacturers usually undertweak it.
So many cute gilrs omg.
So many darkies where you work.
So many fatties.
So many features in such a small size.
So many fucking Indians where you work.
So many girls.
So many hats!
So many hats, so little time.
So many people have 4690K+GTX970, it's a ridiculously popular combination.
So many people just got a £100 free bet.
So many people told me that they can't rank up because they play solo and they have bad team mates.
So many quests!
So maybe I don't actually like bassy headphones.
So maybe I shouldn't buy one?
So maybe it'll be okay.
SOME ASSHOLE SCRATCHED UP MY CAR AND NOW IS REFUSING TO PAY FOR IT.
Some CIEMs maybe.
Some contractor.
Some days I feel so down.
Some days I lose a lot.
Some days I win a lot.
Some days you lose more walking to work than I lose in a month.
Some dude on the machine next to me gave me a bonus for today because he wouldn't be in Coral today.
Some games don't run in WINE.....
Some games you will lose without a chance. Your opponents experience it even more often.
Some gaming mice are full of useless features like 10,000 DPI and LEDs and customisable weights etc lmao.
Some guy called me a "race traitor" the other day.
Somehow nobody has told him or he hasn't realised that he's never going to make any more.
Some jobs require you to have a car.
Some of the components I've bought are really top-of-the-line quality parts.
Some of them are millionnaires.
Some of these custom terrains and weather decrease framerate and add visual complexity.
Some of the skins can affect the sounds.
Someone could look over it.
Someone emailing me at work.
Someone in /r/headphones said that their friend tried on their Fidelio X2s and said they had no bass lmao.
Someone is asking me to invest in a masternode with him.
Someone I work with suddenly died from a heart attack last night.
Someone just offered £85 including postage and packaging for my DT770s, should I accept it?
Someone just offered me £36.50 for my Fiio E10K. Shall I take it off ebay and reserve it for you?
Someone just pumped GRLC on Trade Satoshi.
Someone told me he clocked his founders card to 2.1GHz.
Someone told me in #techsupport last night why my FPS sucks.
Someone told me that headphones leave a sonic imprint on the cable, so it's a bad idea to use it for more than one pair of headphones.
Someone who said they're better with Excel than me is asking me to do a vlookup for them.
Someone who watches Japanese cartoons?
Someone will get to me.
Someone will see thaqt you're using lots of electricity and then get angry with you.
Some people are a few kilos overweight, some people are fucking fat as fuck.
Some people are saying the Solo 2 Beats headphones are decent though.
Some people come in at 08:00 and leave at 15:30.
Some people don't believe the allegations that Louis CK whipped his dick out....
Some people have thousands of GPUs because they're getting them shipped straight from the factory.
Some people say the Beats Solo 2 are actually decent.
Some sites ban my VPN for some reason wtf.
Some sort of local wallet?
Something about what AMPDAC to buy I think.
Something is wrong on that page.
Something like £700.
Something like that.
Something like that, let me have a look.
Something really cheap just to remote into my home PCs.
Something really similar to Spotify but with a bigger library.
Some things are inappropriate in certain situations omfg.
Something shit probably.
Something you know, something you have, and something you are.
Sometimes.
Sometimes amazing ones come through.
Sometimes because of bank holidays and shit, I'd go 31-32 days.
Sometimes bookies literally throw money at you.
Sometimes I actually have to do some work.
Sometimes I can't queue for like 4 hours.
Sometimes I can't tell if you're trolling or just really fucking stupid.
Sometimes I eat a whole chicken.
Sometimes I just IM my boss and talk about shit like the flat I want to buy and stuff.
Sometimes I'll be on the toilet, at my desk, in the kitchen, or even outside.
Sometimes I log onto Coral at work and place bets.
Sometimes I'm waiting there for like 10 minutes for someone to come and check my ID.
Sometimes I really wish my DT770 cable was a bit shorter.
Sometimes I talk on the phone whilst taking a dump.
Sometimes it can be really lowfi.
Sometimes I think about shoplifting just so I don't have to queue.
Sometimes it's £400.
Sometimes it's nice WFH because I can have sex with her and stuff, but sometimes I need to be left alone.
Sometimes it's only £320.
Sometimes it sounds like voices are coming into my right ear but not my left.
Sometimes I wear my headphones without plugging them in to try to stop them.
Sometimes I wish I built a bigger SLI rig for mining.
Sometimes I wish I didn't have a job so I'd have time for all my gaming.
Sometimes I wonder why I'm trying to grow my wealth so aggressively.
Sometimes nobody wants to do that if it's just a pub.
Sometimes when getting off the train you want to wear them around your neck so you can hear where you're going.
Sometimes you can get discount codes for more than the cashback.
Sometimes you get something really good, sometimes now.
So more people competing, the more the prize is divided.
So most people don't do it.
So much better than what you'd get at McDonalds for the same money.
So much BTC being bought.
So much content is unavailable ffs.
So much free £££.
So much good shit in Korea.
So much money omg.....
So much more detail and enjoyment.
So my current account balance decreases over 12 months.
So my DT770s are amazing at everything, but I just want niche headphones so I can swap depending on which strength I need.
So my manager agreed they would carry over.
So my PC is basically a personal computer/electric heater/air purifier/gaming machine then?
So new starter will potentially be paid a lot more than me.
So NiceHash won't be such a big target.
So no 5GHz 4C8T :(.
So no free bet.
So no open components.
So no pay for January.
So not really relevant.
So not the H100i V2, but the H100i V1 should be fine.
So now I can build the ultimate gaming headset!!!!!!!!!1.
So now I can only get 1 massage in the next 12 months.
So now if you use the same payment, there's no risk you'll accidentally put a 7 instead of an 8 on the account number or something.
So now I need to return it.
So now my headphones are unusable.
So now only one of the USB sockets worked.
So now she is threatening to go back to Korea.
So now you have two cables.
So nuclear won't help with reducing carbon emissions because we don't use it enough?
Sony.
SO NYEO SHI DAE.
Soooooo annoyed!!!!
Soooooooooooooo many azn grills in Shanghai.
So our tenants are calling me.
So over £1000.
So people aren't super loud when using my 16Ohm COPs.
so pissed.
So powerful, cool and quiet.
So probably even fatter now.
So profitability isn't hit too hard.
So really my M50X doesn't do anything that my other headphones don't do better.
So ridiculous.
Sorry.
Sorry, £39 not £37.
Sorry  about my original derisory offer. I was perusing looking for something  just right and saw yours. I made the offer and thought WTF was I  thinking. I didnt expect you to accept. I should have put £75 initially  and the only reason I have is because your charging £10 carriage and at  £95 with £10 carriage I could get a new unit. Hope you smiled when you  saw my mistake and called me a cheeky bugger lol..
Sorry, been really busy lately.
Sorry I can't agree with you right now because I am at work and we have anti-discrimination policies and shit.
Sorry I can't, I'm going to Brighton this weekend..
Sorry, I meant Universal Basic Income.
Sorry, I'm on webchat.
Sorry, I think I misread.
Sorry I thought you meant CPU.
Sorry it's so fucking slow.
Sorry, I was pretty busy at work today. Did you want to know more about betting?
Sorry, I won't be able to swap my Fidelio X2s with your HD600s now.
Sorry m9.
Sorry m9 I don't gamble.
Sorry man.
Sorry man I'm not in Brighton until the weekend.
Sorry man I thought I selected the best courier service I could.
sorry, meant to ping Lord-Harlot.
Sorry, the @ confused me.
Sorry wasn't watching.
SORRY, WE COULDN'T FIND THAT PAGE.
sorted in what way though?!??!?!?!?!?
sort your shit out.
So sad she died.
So she only has a Help 2 Buy because there's less withdrawal restrictions.
So she's a foreigner.
So she thinks all people who play video games are fat.
So should we cancel public services to make the UK a shithole to stop migrants coming?
So sick of this.
So sign up to Ratesetter using my promo code and we get £££.
So that £105 would have been less if I wasn't a member?
So that'll free up lots of cash to make lots more bets.
So that made me ineligible for unemployment benefit.
So the £15 is worth it?
So the Conservative party is basically BNP now?
So the ebay seller relisted the headphones, but I haven't received my refund yet.
So the food industry cut out fat from the food and replaced it with sugar.
So the game can either run at 100% on one core or run at 70% on multiple cores and a higher framerate, but can't use all cores fully?
So the hosts can still stab guests then?
So the HTC is best, then the Samsung, then most other phones.
So then I got 2.
So the parliament don't respect the public's opinion?
So the plane can't take off because it can't build up any speed, right?
So the product code is stuck inside the box that they didn't even post until like 6 hours before the launch.
s/other/bother/.
So there's a political incentive to keep them rising.
So there's no fee unless I actually use it?
So there's no "hidden" fees to withdraw funds, but what about tx fees?
So the same as a standard low end 8GB RAM + 4GB VRAM system.
So the solution is just to make profits illegal.
So the subreddits are still up?
So the two candidates are decided undemocratically before the election.
So they are banning sale of nitrogen and oxygen?>.
So they aren't good for portable use.
So they don't need a huge international catalogue like Spotify.
So they don't store heat at all?
So they exclude 99% of others?
So they have to rewrite over it constantly.
So they know what sight is like.
So they lied.
So they'll last longer.
So they're comfier and works with boompro.
So they're more wasteful.
So they should be even better now.
So they should reduce the quote.
So they turn gay?
So they will all fit in.
So they would not want to earn that much.
s/oto/too/.
Sound Blaster E5 has a battery built-in.
Sound Blaster E5/X7 is good if you're gonna use any of the features.
Sound of Sennheiser HD650 for less.
Sounds awful.
Sounds boring as fuck.
Sounds easy.
Sounds good then.
Sounds good tholugh?
sounds goood though.
Sounds inconvenient.
Sounds like a chill place.
Sounds like a good combination.
Sounds like a good deal?
Sounds like a lot of hassle.
Sounds like a pyramid scheme now.
Sounds like he thinks democracy shouldn't apply because he has money?
Sounds like my cousin's mother.
Sounds like my job.
Sounds like their repayment plan is to recover the stolen funds.
Sounds like whoever did the stacking is bad at their job.
Sounds like you're not open minded..
Sounds like you're obsessed with white girls m9.
Sounds ogod.
Sounds pretty misleading to me.
Source?
Source on the 7m?
s/outgoings/costs/ s/ingoings/revenues/.
south.
South.
South West.
so vi must deal vit it.
So weird.
So weird how you can put obviously false figures everywhere and still win.
So we missed each other.
So we must leave.
So we need to get rid of the police and salaries?
So we take it in turns.
So we would get the lower class rooms ^^.
So what counts and what doesn't?
So what do I need to do?
So what's stopping someone from getting a free graphics card of it?
So what's the answer to my question?
So what's the point in having coloured cables at all?
So when is it going to get decided whether to be legalised then?
So which is the best choice?
So why are you browsing /r/dota2?
So why should I pay extra for the Sennheiser headphone if it's not as good as the Fidelio X2?
So why should I trade up a guaranteed roof over my head?
So will it stream to Chromecast using my PC's connection?
So with a >0% night usage it's even better.
So yeah, lots of reasons why I need coins.
So yeah, no point really.
So yesterday the £ had its biggest drop since the referendum.
So you are guaranteed a certain speed which will probably be greater than what you get from a normal retail unit.
So you can buy for cheap on Trade Satoshi and withdraw to gdax for free and sell on gdax for freee.
So you can keep Firefox or other shit up to date without doing a dist upgrade.
So you can never go really silent.
So you can OC your CPU for more perofrmance maybe?
So you can pretty much live in a house for free if you buy 75% of it.
So you can see my three orders there.
So you can't buy caffeine any more?
So you can use them with V-moda Boompro and/or that Anker cable I just linked in the channel.
So you could ask them "do you like eating shit?" and they would say "yes"?
So you'd buy an album record or CD or tape?
So you do like kpop?
So you don't need to be nursed?
So you get £400 profit.
So you get a traditional reference fan design, but a AIO water cooler as well.
So you got your whole order excluding the spicy nuts for free after compensation?
So you have no gas bill then.
So you have to invest for 12 months for £180.
So you have to send them all your payslips and P60 and information every year.
So you keep a little money on each site then?
So you know that 10 3.5" drive case I linked earlier? You can put 20 4TB 2.5" drives in there for 80TB of storage.
So you lose.
So you lost £150?
So you made £500.
So you might be stuck in there for a couple of days until they decide you're probably going to die of dehydration.
So you need it to be small for portability but big and heavy for good cooling, you want it to be powerful to run stuff but weak to not overheat and kill the battery.
So you pay in 7% and your company pays in 10%?
So you pay less than you would on the open market.
so you're 50 now?
So you're a creepy racist.
So you're advising me not to buy a house?
So you're basically buying four monitors instead of one.
So you're content being shit then?
So you're going to buy a light mouse then?
So you're on gas but your energy bill is about the same as rory's which is on electricity.
So you're saying that if I create an account right now, I'll have all the same heroes and runes and masteries as your 10,000 accounts even though I haven't paid anything or unlocked any of them?
So your net salary is >£1800?
So your specs are shit?
So you sent me the entire map through a blur-filter?
So you should actively use it!
So you should be able to manage it m9.
So you think Hillary Clinton should be USA president?
So you think you'll inherit a lot?
So you use Outlook on Linux?
So you want to inject chemical castration into plebfood?
So you won't buy?
So you won’t know that I like you.
So you would dump a grill after she gets cancer?
Spamming the exchange.
s/parent's/parents'/.
Spare wheel, parcel shelf, boot carpet all on the back seats.
Speaking of bowel cancer, is Total Biscuit still alive?
Speak to you on Tuesday.
s/peasanta/peasants/.
special something?
Specs are a bit weak.
Spend £6 at McDonalds and you get shit in comparison.
Spending money is the ultimate aim of saving money.
Spend more time on it.
Spend some, save the rest.
Spend your money on a 240/280/360mm radiator instead.
Spicy food and poor gaming choices.
spiked so hard.
Split rent too?
spoilers wtf?
Spoken like a man who doesn't even have a Korean gf.
Sponsored gear = bad gear.
spooky things.
s/poo/poor/.
Spotify?
Spotify doesn't count though.
Spotify doesn't have all the songs I'm after.
Spotify has a lot.
Spotify is £5/m for me.
Spotify is limited by licensing restrictions and closed source software.
Spotify is really expensive actually.
Spotify is supposed to be more convenient than piracy, not less.
Spotify limits the amount of songs I can store on my device to 3,333.
Spotify should offer a discounted subscription fee to kpop fans in the UK.
Spotify too.
spotify:user:420sam:playlist:23FsVE8fE0jgnCEUp0UjH0.
s/pricer/price/.
s/problej/problem/.
s/process/progress/.
Squatting is healthy.
s/reduces/reduced/.
s/Refund/Return/.
s/ridiculous/retarded/.
s/rory/hansproleman/.
srsly.
srsly:??
srsly?
Srsly?
SRSLY?
srsly between conservative MPs saying stupid shit and labour MPs trying to oust a democratically elected leader, they're all a bunch of twats who shouldn't be running the country.
Srsly good value.
srsly how the fuck can you get into so much debt?
srsly IDK why everyone else isn't using it already.
srsly people who design charts and graphs are fucking idiots.
srsly this is pissing me off.
srsly though my gf looks a lot like her.
srsly? You sound like you're living in the 60s.
sry fucked up URL.
sry m9.
SSD is still overkill IMO though.
s/sellers/buyers/.
s/shit/amazing/.
s/shit/daebak/.
s/shit/the shit/.
s/shit/the\ shit/.
S&S ISA.
S&S ISA is for long-term investment.
s/SLI/.
s/SLI//.
s/smoothiews/smoothies/.
s/strash/trash/.
s/sway/sound \way/.
s/sway/sound way/.
s/switched/switches/.
Stable client is toxic.
Stable fast speed, low pings, no drop outs.
Stake exceeded, maximum of GBP2.34 is allowed on Horsens / Draw.
stamp duty only applies at 120k+.
Standing charge is a bit high, but my unit rates are pretty good.
Statistically, the enemy team will have more idiots than you on average.
Statistics.
Statistics are massively distorted when you round so heavily.
Stats don't lie m9.
stay and get my EE discounts pls.
Steam accepts Bitcoin payment now?
Steam has an app store now too.
Steam has more users than ever.
Steam is pretty good nowadays too.
Steelseries mouse pads aren't one of the most any more.
stfu.
stfu you weeb.
Stick an Accellero III on it like I did.
sticky notes?
Still 5k.
Still a learning experience for me.
Still don't have enough for a mortgage for 100% of a property.
Still fucking horrible.
Still going?
Still, I need to get it to 0.15BTC to minimise the withdrawal fee down to 2.2%.
still low.
Still no ladbrokes.....
Still no refund announcement lmao.
still on hold.
Still reading into what masternodes are.
Stil lreally good value.
Still sad.
Still, seems kinda pointless over a USB drive.
Still use all their shit.
Still waiting for my Philips Fidelio X2 too.
Still waiting for the fucking offer letter.
Still waiting on my 6 GTX 1070 TIs :(.
Still "welcome" to the UK.
Stockholm probably.
stock velour.
s/todau/today/.
Stop abandoning games then?
Stop being a dumbass pls.
stop being creepy.
Stop being unhealthy ffs.
Stop doing drugs omg.
Stop doing stupid shit when you're on a 60k fucking salary.
stop ignoring me omg.
Stop looking at batteries and buy some decent headphones ffs.
Stop looking at phones just by the brands.
stop lying omfg.
Stop posting NSFW links pls.
Stop pretending your headphones are good because they're the only pair you've ever paid more than £100 for.
Stop saying a Strawman Argument omg.
stop server side ignoring me omg.
stop slacking get fragging.
stop spamming.
Stop spamming.
Stop spreading FUD, you're not Micro$oft.
stop telling him that.
Stop thinking of Ratesetter as long-term ffs.
stop troling.
stop trolling.
Stop trolling.
stop trolling me.
Stop trolling me.
stop trolling me please.
Stop trolling omg.
Stop using weird jargon.
St. Patrick's Day was yesterday, dumbass..
Strangely they're 16 ohms but only slightly easier to drive than my 80ohms DT770s.
strategic diversity, burden of knowledge, toxicity.
Streaming services nowadays have offline downloading as a standard feature.
Street Fighter is a bit consolised though :(.
Stremio Android version is in alpha now.
Stremio does a pretty good job of finding sources for most films. I've struggled with Kodi.
Stremio is way better, and it's free.
Stremio supports Chromecast.
Stremio supports Netflix I think.
Stremio will notify me yay.
stricter requirements.
s/triple/quadruple/.
Stronger than ever?
STRONGLY disagree.
Struggling to save up for a house.
Struggling with my fucking spreadsheet.
st-smelly49 Oddsmonkey is pretty good.
Stuck at 400 ATM :(.
Student discounts and chicken stamps!
Student loans are just a graduate income tax.
Student loans aren't a debt, they're a tax.
Student loans don't count.
Student overdrafts are good btw.
Student overdrafts are great, but won't yours expire soon because you graduated almost three years ago?
Student Prime ftw.
Stuff is announced there before anywhere else.
Stuff that hasn't been on the market for >1 year is hard to get a big second-hand discount.
Stupid £50 winnings cap.
Stupid anti-discrimination laws.
Stupid Apple, stupid Samsung ffs.
Stupid Awesome Miner is making you mine Vertcoin instead of Zcoin like me.
Stupid booking in advance.
Stupid BT is blocking all my work websites.
STUPID CAR COSTS.
Stupid copyright.
Stupid copyright is making me think about going back to pirating music on Bittorrent instead.
Stupid electric storage heaters such a stupid idea.
stupid fake item.
Stupid FF kept crashing.
Stupid fucking Allium isn't creating enough heat.
Stupid fucking FF keeps crashing.
Stupid fucking fluctuating prices and decimalisation.
Stupid fucking Google Maps won't tell me.
Stupid Google Maps uses lots of data too even though I downloaded England.
Stupid GPU fan spins at over 4k RPM sometimes.
Stupid GPUs are taking forever.
Stupid GPU stock shortages.
Stupid headphones take up so much space.
Stupid LoL retard.
Stupid long cable was annoying me.
Stupid low existing salary.
Stupid matched betting is so expensive.
Stupid Michael Bay.
Stupid miningpoolhubstats.
Stupid monthly savers won't let me deposit everything in one account.
Stupid NiceHash downtime.
Stupid Origin told me they just needed the name of my direct debit bank.
Stupid Paddy Power gubbed me.
Stupid Samsung with their rounded edges and LG copying them.
Stupid shit.
Stupid shit work internet.
Stupid slots built up my bookie balances a lot.
Stupid Spotify doesn't let me download more than 3,333 songs wtf.
Stupid Spotify keeps making them unavailable.
Stupid Spotify removed the sharing feature.
Stupid starting salary.
Stupid timezones.
Stupid Topcashback.
Stupid Trade Satoshi won't load the market most of the time.
Stupid Waze has no offline maps wtf.
Stupid Windoze anti virus.
Stupid WinMiner isn't mining Monero or Vertcoin.
Stupid work and sleep.
Stupid work takes up way too much time lmao.
s/tutenota.com/tutanota.com/.
s/TV/PC/.
Submarines aren't though.
Subsidised cafeteria, 0.5% mortgage, 23% pension, and on-site gym omg.
Subsidised gym is the best.
Such a fucking cop out.
Such a good and respresentative sample.
Such an asshole move srsly.
Such a rory mistake.
Such as 5 free spins.
Such a waste of money.
Such is office life.
Sugar causes cancer.
Sugar causes cancer!!!!
Sugar is toxic ass fuck.
Sugar-related heart disease is becoming an epidemic in the west.
SUKA BLYAT.
s/unchange/revert/.
Sun got in my eyes, I lowered the sun visor and slowed down and hit them going about 1-2mph.
Sunk cost fallacy lmao.
Sunny.
Sunny is so protective of her.
Super comfy, sound great, replaceable pads and headband, removeable cable, customisable bass port.
Super comfy, super amazing sounding.
Super comfy too.
Super neutral, open, great soundstage is what you want for gaming.
Supported by microtransactions rather than selling boxed copies.
supports ITX mobos and SFX PSUs and full-length GPUs and 2X120mm radiators.
Supposed to a best-of-both kinda deal.
Supposed to be a good compromise between the two.
sure.
Sure.
sure, add me.
Sure, and I should buy a Ferrari whilst I'm at it.
sure, give it to me.
Sure if that's how you want to justify it.
Sure if you define your entire self worth by how much salary you currently get.
Sure, if you're a filthy casual.
Sure, if you want to be a filthy casual all your life.
Sure I'll come to London for a pint.
Sure, I'll get on that some time later this month or next month.
Sure, I'll get them posted to me soon.
Sure, I'll just go buy a dremel and a soldering iron.
Sure, I'll just learn how to be a computer programmer, can't be that hard.
Sure, I'll keep you posted!
Sure, I'll take pics of my M50s for you.
Sure, I play L4D2 and CS:GO.
SURE IT IS.
Sure, I will tonight!
Sure, let me know when you're ready.
SURELY.
Surely if it was my CPU, my CPU usage would be 100%???
Surely it would be the opposite?
Surely Outlook is coded not to slow down if you store lots of emails?
Surely the audio should work properly when the adapter is full inserted?
Surely they're used to it?
Surely they won't do like 30 miles or something.
Surely Windoze deletes any old and unnecessary temp files when hard drive space is getting low anyway?
Surely you have scales at your gym?
Surely you have to not discriminate and hire the best person for the job?
Surely you're home now?
sure m9.
Sure, thanks m9.
Sure, they're the future of warfare.
Sure, they sell shitloads of variants to cover whatever you need.
Sure you can.
Sure you can, I haven't raised my heartbeat beyond 150 for about 10 years, but I can still manage it.
swansea.
Swansea?
Swap what for what?
Swaying trees, high quality shadows, textures, water and lighting.
Swedish people shoot people in CS.
Swiftkey?
Swindon.
Switching to Google DNS fixed my imgur problej.
Switching to Google DNS fixed my imgur problem.
Switch to Nationwide pls.
Switch to TSB and get your free £125.
s/with/for/.
Swivels, moves in and out, rotates, etc.
s/workboots/workbooks/.
s/work/church/.
s/X99/X299/.
Syncing pushes and ults and stuff.
s/your/you/.
Syria is in the middle of a really bad civil war right now.
system.
s/yuet/yet/.
s/yya/yay/.
s/Z99/X99/.
Tabs ARE bookmarks now.
Tab Tree.
Tab Tree has some nifty features like removing the title bar and shrinking the bezels at the top.
Taiwan, Singapore, USA, etc.
Take it all apart and sell the parts individually.
Take out a loan if you have to.
Take pix of Asian girls pls.
Takes from the rich and gives to the poor.
Take the average of the two.
Take the reviews word for it.
Taking away their disability benefits just because the eyes have it wtf.
Taking fucking forever.
Taking my car to the dealership to get repaired on Thursday.
Talk about me pls.
Talking about fucking random family matters.
Talk later.
Talk to Frank or some shit.
Tastecard is too restrictive....
Tattoos are stupid and pointless.
Tax -33.80.
Tax free.
Taz is 29.
TBA wtf.
TBH I'd be happy with my 37mbit connection if it was just a bit more stable.
TBH the Fidelio X2 bass is superb and I don't see how you can beat that. The bass is amazing, but it has zero compromises on the rest of the headphone.
TDF (2056-2058) 10.7% (1 year actual growth).
TDF (2056-2058) 15.3% (1 year actual growth.
TDF (2056-2058) 15.3% (1 year actual growth).
TDF (2056-2058) 17.7%.
TDF (2056-2058) 20.0% (1 year actual growth).
TDF (2056-2058) 24.4%.
TDF (2056-2058) 25.6% (1 year actual growth).
TDF (2056-2058) 26.2% (1 year actual growth).
tea addict.
Tearing is barely even noticebale at 500FPS.
Tech support recommended I get a static IP as it could help with my ping, I spoke to sales and cancellations and they agreed to give me a static IP. My fibre speed is now as slow as ADSL and my ping has gone up to 150ms.
Telegram is sharing encrypted chats with the UK government?
Tell her to buy a Samsung Galaxy S7.
Telling me that £17 for a 170 mile trip is an unreasonable cost.
Telling me they're finding dead people and shit.
Tell me.
Tell me about the k8 offer later, but busy atm.
Tell me if you can hear any difference.
Tell me the withdrawal fee.
Tell me this evening pls.
Tell them you have to drop TLS 1.0.
Tell your boss that he isn't a Nazi.
Temps?
Temps don't go above 65C in mining and fan speed is low.
Temps don't go above 67C at ~1000RPM.
Tendai and Mayson, who the fuck are these people.
Tenkeyless = more space for mousepad.
Tennis match outcomes.
Teresa May and all the newspapers slander JC at every opportunity with very personal attacks.
Teresa May is a bitch.
Teresa May will make it illegal if she gets re-elected.
Teresa or Adolf?
Terrorism creates jobs too.
terrorist attack in London.
Terrorists should definitely be banned from public places though.
Terry Crews has spent a fucking shitload on that system.
Terry Crews just built a really powerful PC.
Tesco.
Tesco didn't even respond to me when I applied for a job :(.
Tesco let you drop 2X3,000 into two accounts without any monthly pay-ins.
test.
Test a different PSU if you have one.
Test it and let me know your results pls.
Test the card in another PC.
TF2 is a ded gaem.
TF2 is still full of casuals.
TF2 would be dead like DoD if it wasn't for F2P.
tghats sio good.
Thailand has just as many aircraft carriers as China.
Thankfully it's a bit cooler today.
Thank GOD for garlic coin.
Thank god for moneysavingsexpert credit club.
Thank god for the Tories.
thanks.
Thanks.
Thanks!
Thanks for encouraging me to break the law, dickhead.
Thanks for hanging in there your position in the queue is currently 12..
Thanks for hanging in there your position in the queue is currently 9..
Thanks for the advice guys.
Thanks for the games.
Thanks for the Smash Burger recommendation.
Thanks for the tip.
Thanks for your advice.
Thanks for your help, I'll read up on Amdahl's law at work today, got to sleep now because it's beyond midnight.
Thanks, I didn't know about 111.
Thanks, I'll have a look later.
Thanks, I'll read that tonight.
Thanks, I'll save it and have a look later.
thanks m9.
Thanks m9.
thanks man.
Thanks man, I'm going to get into as much credit card debt as I possibly can.
Thanks, need to mod it though.
THANKS NEIL FROM IT.
Thanks, that is a relief.
Thanks to FTSE.
thanks, working now.
Thank you.
Thank you Bulwark.
Thank you for proving it.
Thank you for your sympathy.
That £100 is more than £3,300 earning 3% for a whole year.
That Acer Z35 ultrawide 200hz monitor looks sick.
That actually sounds really fun.
That addon is just too fucking good.
That algorithm kills my PC's responsiveness.
That can be fun when you randomly find an interesting hat.
that can be reasonably expected*.
That can get you into big trouble with the police though.
That case is over 3X the size of mine.
That chip could be very good.
That comic mocks audiophiles?
That confirms this game is a joke.
That cooler is £100 on Amazon.
That could be anything.
That could happen if I torrent too much....
That could prevent you from gaining mmr.
That CPU cooler is fucking massive.
That day isn't when the terrorist attack happened lmao.
That Dell discount is really nice. Windows doesn't cost as much as $100 more than Ubuntu, so they're pricing the Ubuntu one really well.
That disincentives claimants from finding work.
That doesn't mean they aren't good.
That doesn't really seem like democracy, only a very limited implementation of it.
That doesn't seem very sensible.
That eliminates half the phones for me.
That explains a lot actually.
That first one looks like heart attack on a plate.
That format is disgusting.
That fucking addon.
That fucking question wtf.
That game has a shitload of depth no other games do.
that game is crazy popular.
That girl is fucking stupid.
That grill in my office was just flirting with me again.
That grill I posted is in her 30s btw.
That guy is such a piece of shit.
That I can control with my phone.
That include unpaid?
That is over a billion a year.
That is so bad for your motherboard.
That is so expensive!!!!
That is something worthy of congratulations?
That is totally stupid.
That is what is important.
That is why I mine LTC.
That is your bill?
That joke is so old.
That joke wasn't funny the first time.
That just looks retarded.
That just makes things more confusing!!!!!!!1.
That just takes time and cuts into my profit.
That kind of logic is why we have a two party FPTP system.
That last one is a probability.
That'll do.
That'll get rid of a couple of big cables and make it a lot cleaner.
That'll help.
That'll make my account look good and get some cash out.
That'll show Gaben.
That'll teach her for talking to herself.
That look okay?
That looks like 10 buildings were completely destroyed?
That makes her better than yours.
That makes you worse than a weeaboo lmao.
That means I have a poor score.
That means they pay for themselves in 9 months.
That might be why you're mining vertcoin.
That might get me in trouble.
That milk and fruit.
That motherboard is ridiculously overkill too.
That news might actually be interesting to plebs IDK.
That offer was ridiculously good.
That one in the article is a different contract.
That opinion is not general concensus though.
That overdraft is with your TSB 5% current account?
That PC was overdue an upgrade, so I built a completely new machine a few months later.
That PC will be a beast.
That phone is shatterproof.
That phone is so expensive omg.
That PSU will handle an overclocked 1080 TI no problem.
That punishment isn't even that bad.
That reminds me, the drone I bought on Amazon still hasn't arrived.
That requires land and money.
That's £0.03 each but I want £0.0307 each.
That's £14.84 for a year's worth of contents insurance hahahahhaa.
That's £15.83 a month.
That's £217 less I can save a month omg.
That's £217 more a month.
That's 23.61111111111111 hours at minimum wage.
That's 2/3 of the games I win.
That's £25 if KFC is 10 miles away.
That's £27 a month.
That's £400 of your money wasted a month.
That's £458.4 a year.
That's £650 a month.
That's £667 a month.
That's 68kg omg.
That's a big bump wtf.
That's a bit insulting.
That's about £2.50 a month?
That's a different kind of piracy omg.
That's a dog obviously.
That's a Dota/CS joke.
That's a Dota meme.
That's a DP limitation actually.
That's a good idea.
That's a good idea....
That's a good investment.
That's a good question actually, wtf is flirting?
That's a high fee.
That's a horrible business practice.
That's a huge oversimplification. You don't always lose gold. You also lose more gold in LoL than Dota because of a larger opportunity cost.
That's all I have to pay now.
That's all mining income?
That's all terrible.
That's almost enough to buy a new pair of headphones lmao.
That's almost half my day at work.
That's a lot.
That's a lot if you have £15,000 in savings with them.
That's a lot more risky.
That's a lot of money.
That's a lot of money in a shitcoin.
That's a lot of volatility.
That's a lot slower than the 80Mbps at my parent's house.
That's a lot slower than the 80Mbps at my parents' house.
That's ancient now.
That's an easy fact to prove.
That's an easy one.
That's a nice benefit.
That's an investment, not savings.
That's an old game.
That's a pretty baseless assumption.
That's a pretty big assumption to make.
That's a really fucking good price for those IEMs.
That's a retarded reason to pay into a bank account.
That's a ridiculously good deal.
that's a shitty GPU clock.
That's a sign that she should lose some weight.
That's average player hours not active players, not quite the same thing.
That's average players and peak players.
That's a whole rory.
That's bad, right?
That's be amazing.
That's better.
That's better than the last few CPUs.
That's BS.
That's bullshit.
That's cheaper rent than most 50% ownership.
That's CPI and only data for one month.
That's craaaaaaazy.
That's craaaaazy.
that's crazy.
that's creepy.
That's creepy.
That's creepy man.
That's discrimination!!!!
That seems like a really shitty design.
That seems like the worst of both options.
That seems really unlikely.
That seems to have done the trick.
That sentence doesn't make sense.
That's even less than I'm on now lmao.
That's even more undemocratic....
That's fine.
That's fine m9.
That's fine, you'll be thankful of it when you're 55.
That's from Rick and Morty.
That's from switching pool.
That's fuck all.
That's fuck all wtf.
That's fucking crazy when I think of it like that.
That's fucking expensive m9.
That's fucking insane.
That's fucking loads.
That's fucking retarded.
That's fucking unhealthy.
That's gay.
That's good.
That's good. Some days I don't do anything, mostly weekends..
That's good then.
That's half my salary.
That's higher than the mortgage payments.
That shit is so overpriced.
That should be instant.
That should calculate the comission and arb profit/loss automatically.
That should stop some of these stupid apps.
That's how I got my insurance so low.
That's how much I think I can get on the exchange.
That's how much my PCs are using.
That show was alright. Bryan Cranston is a really good actor.
That’s how you’ll get to like me even more.
That's if there's even a stage pension 40 years from now!
That sign up bonus was so fucking good.
That's inconvenient though!!!
That's insane.
That's just going to increase rents anyway.
That's just what big mattress wants you to do.
That's less than 1/2 of the price of rory's HD600s which are the same tier of sound quality.
That's less than 1/4 of what I was paying to my parents when they were charging me rent.
That's less than 6 GTX 1070s.
That's like 2p a day.
That's like 34% of what they go for on ebay.
That's like £700k a year.
That's like 99% of all trades.
That's like comparing GTA to Half Life.
That's like mining on a 2% fee pool instead of a 1% pool.
That's literally the only one.
That's money I could put towards a GTX 1080TI.
That's more likely to happen if you create lots of babies.
That's more space than I'll ever need.
That's more than I've ever made on Nicehack.
That's more than my take home pay.
That's my main savings account right now.
That's my plan.
That's news to me.
That's not a bad idea.
That's not a bad PC you've got.
That's not a feature you doofus.
That's not even divisible by 0.031.
That's not even enough to pay rent.
That's not good....
That's not good. The most important thing is consistently going.
That's nothing.
That's nothing, I did 150 miles in 2 hours yesterday.
That's not how it works omg.
That's not including switching bonuses.
That's not including the £271.86 I put into my pension.
That's not including VAT.
That's not kpop.
that's not kpop you pleb.
That's not my problem.
That's not P2P.
That's not possible....
That's not really a safe assumption; most of my internet accounts aren't my real name..
That's not really often enough.
THATS NOT WHAT I MEANT OMG.
That's not what the Royal Mail man told me.
That's okay.
That's okay, it'll probably be at least 2 weeks before my flat purchase completes..
That's old.
That solved my problem.
That's one coin I'd actually consider getting a masternode on.
That's one of many programs.
That's one of the reasons I like AIOs that most people don't consider; I'd rather have a 1kg radiator mounted to my case during shipping rather than to the motherboard itself.
That song was such a meme.
That's only 22 hours of free time a week.
That's only $2.42 a month.
That's only £27.591666 a year though.
That sounds hard.
That sounds insecure as fuck.
That sounds like a fuck up waiting to happen.
That sounds like a good idea tbh.
That sounds like an issue with your GPU. I get the same thing if my GPU has an unstable OC.
That sounds like BS.
That sounds like it takes time.
That sounds like way too much work.
That sounds pretty good.
That sounds really fucking irresponsible.
that sounds so boring.
That sounds so cruel, fucking over people who cannot manage their finances just to entertain the population.
That's over three times what I make.
That's pointless.
That's pre-HL2.
That's pretty cool.
That's probably a good thing.
That's probably okay.
That's quite a bit for a work night m9.
That;s quite a lot.
That's really fast RAM, because there's no VRAM with APUs.
That's really good value then.
That's really sad.
That's relative and subjective.
That's retarded.
That's ridiculous.
That's sadder than DOGE.
That's shit.
That's so bad for your lungs.
That's sold as a disc.
That's so much lower than my 17%.
That's so much money.
That's so stupid.
That's still $ 383.22 a month.
That's still too much.
That's such a long amount of time.
That's surprising.
That's the amount you can download across all devices.
That's the beauty of PC mining over ASICs.
That's the biggest nerf IMO.
That's the current price.
That's the dumbest shit I've ever heard.
That's the important hting.
That's their prize winnings, and that's not including their salaries.
That's the management fee.
That's the market price right now according to RVN/BTC on CryptoBridge and BTC/GBP on gdax.
That's the most profitable way.
That's the only downside, my fucking GTX 970 fan speeds up to 4000RPM and it sounds like a fucking jet engine.
That's the only way it'd make sense really.
That's the opposite of what most gamers want.
That's the point.
That's the price you pay for installing Google apps.
That's the show about the people living in a house together?
That's too expensive and he won't know what the fuck to do with it anyway.
That's twice as fast as mine.
That's twice my mortgage.
that sucks.
That sucks.
That sucks ass.
That s was missed intentionally.
That's way above my risk tolerance.
That's weird.
That's what a traffic policeman told me.
That's what drinking Dr Pepper is like.
That's what I'd do.
That's what I'm thinking of doing actually....
That's what I'm trying to do.
That's what I thought lmao.
That's what loading screens are for.
That's what retarded means, you retard.
That's what the Nazis said and look what happened to them.
That's what the oil companies want you to believe.
That's what you get for trusting criminals.
That's when I was having sex with her.
That's when the money starting getting big.
That's where my gf is from!!!!
That's why diabetes is so prevalent in America.
That's why everyone runs OW at low graphics.
That's why I always get my stuff delivered to the office even when I'm working from home. I know there's always going to be someone at reception to receive my parcel.
That's why I bought from Game, to get the beta codes.
That's why I bought it.
That's why I bought my K702s.
That's why I buy Logitech, Beyerdynamic and Corsair.
That's why I don't do drugs.
That's why I don't do pills.
That's why I don't think M50X is a good pair of headphones.
That's why I go to the gym during my lunch break.
That's why I have a 4.7GHz CPU.
That's why I'm only paying £4.99 a month.
That's why I'm running a quadcore at 4.7GHz instead of an octocore at 4GHz.
That's why I never drink them.
That's why I ordered a credit card.
That's why I stopped downloading torrents the traditional way.
That's why I think GRLC is still so profitable.
That's why it's growing.
That's why I use Coinbase.
That's why I want to get a couple of ML120 fans with a max RPM of ~2400.
That's why I went for it.
That's why nobody uses ISAs any more unless they're H2B or S&S.
That's why then.
That's why the prizepool has been the same for about 4 years.
That's why you don't do drugs m9.
That's why you need a 6700K @ 5GHz.
That's why you're still 2k.
That's with a buffer too.
That's without adding in my parents.
That's worse than an i7 for gaming.
That's your opinion.
That's your problem. Set everything to lowest apart from resolution and get a 144hz monitor and you'll gain 500mr easy.
That thing is fucking huge.
That title is BS.
That title must be misleading.
that ugly face.
That video does make me a lot more interested in VR.
That video you sent me last night looks srsly good.
That warning is pretty annoying.
That was amazing.
That was a risky google search.
That was every day for me, except it was my nephew screaming and running around all day.
That was fast.
That was fucking fast actually. I submitted the missing cashback claim on 27/06.
That was pretty fast.
That was the pivotol turning point.
That was the problem.
That way eventually I can work one hour a year for £50k an hour.
That way I can go up to 25kg from 16kg.
That website you linked me told me they can only do XLR, which is not what I need.
That Westworld twist made me so excited.
That will be a significant portion of my mortgage deposit.
That won't increase FPS.
That would be a cool feature.
That would be a dank meme.
That would be amazing.
That would be a small investment for me.
That would be fucking freaky but fucking cool.
That would be fucking weird.
That would be illegal.
That would be my dream build.
That would be so cool.
That would just raise even more questions.
That would make it less secure?
That would never happen.
That would probably require getting rid of at least one of my 2.5" drives.
THE.
The 1080 TI is still mining, but with a lower hashrate.
The 1600mhz 2X8GB C9 is probably all you need.
The 16GB in my build gives me lots of peace-of-mind that I will have enough for a long time.
The £25.99 monthly with £99.99 upfront comes up to a total of £515.83 with your discount.
The 25% bonus from deposits is the main thing though.
The 3.5% tax-free interest is pretty good even if I don't buy.
The 4600mhz RAM you're looking at is Gskill Ripjaw?
The 4690K?
The £50 is a year later.
The 7700K has the EXACT same IPC as the 6700K.
The 80ohm ones are definitely the best unless you have a high-end amp.
The 80ohm ones sound way better, especially when paired with an E10K.
The £90 one?
The absolute madman.
THE ABSOLUTE MONKEYS.
The acid is so bad for your teeth.
The acoustic efficiency and RPM range is really impressive. You don't get many fans which can idle really quietly whilst also having the ability to spin up to 2400RPM and deliver amazing airflow..
The actual motherboard model number is Gigabyte Z97N-WIFI, but it's discontinued now.
The actuation force feels much higher. I am making less mistakes and not accidentally holding a button down though.
The AD700X?
The advantage of GPUs is the secondary market.
The AIO is secured to the case and 2.5" drives are quite lightweight.
The airflow is amazing though, got lots of very high performance fans.
The AMD 5350 is only 25W quad core.
The amount of cool shit from R&D would be exciting too.
The amount of possible hardware combinations you can put in such a small case is amazing.
The amount of power I'm going to have in this tiny case will be incredible.
The amount of seats in parliament is HUGELY manipulated by the inefficient voting system, favouring the parties in power which don't want to change.
The amount of spam they're sending me is fucking ridiculous.
The AMP is really good though....
The amp is really powerful too!!!!
The annoying thing about using a VPN is that I'll have to disable it most of the time so I can play videogames anyway.
The answer machine just tells me to use their webchat.
The asking price, £41.50.
The autogenerated one takes me a slightly quicker but less enjoyable route.
The automatic disable for fullscreen is so good.
The autosyncing is really handy.
the average number of instructions executed for each clock cycle. It is the multiplicative inverse of cycles per instruction..
The back is the most important part of a chair, because proper back support prevents you from getting chronic back pain later in life.
The banks would give me money if I had some DDs.
The bank won't be happy if I have a dependant.
The bar is fixed to the smith machine.
The bass in the third position is just how I like it.
The bass is good, the highs are meh, and the mids are non-existant.
The bass is okay, but the mids are so bad.
The Beats have nothing going for them except that they fold up I guess.
The benchmarks show it scales really well with more threads and faster RAM.
The best card for mining right now is 1070 TI.
The best CPU (i7 6700k) is only like £250-£300.
The best I can find for the S7 is £9.99 upfront and £40.99 for 24 months.
The best meal deal near me is the Co-Op one. When I move I might check out the M&S one.
The best mining rigs aren't good gaming rigs.
The best monitors are 240hz now.
The best move for them is to keep doing what they're doing.
The best solution is a dedicated mining room really.
The best stuff is usually <0.5% fees AFAIK.
The best way to stop people stealing your PC is to buy a couple of defective consoles on ebay and putting them in the same room as your PC.
The beta has ended now.
The Beyer Custom One Pros are great IMO, although they don't fold at all.
The Beyer Custom One Pros are great. You get good isolation. You get the choice of bright sound signature, which is great for gaming if you also need the isolation in a noisy environment. You get neutral if you like neutral sound signature, you get a bass boost if you like to have a little emphasised bass like I do and makes them sound a lot.
The Beyers are great for glasses wearers because the earpads are so large that they don't cause discomfort when wearing glasses.
The Big Bang Theory just did an episode on Bitcoin.
The biggest e-sports event in the world  - BBC Newsbeat.
The biggest RVN pool operator stopped paying out and stole all our coins.
The bikes I've been told about aren't real VR though.
The bitrate was always too low.
The Bittorrent client?
The black Ncase M1 looks so good.
The board doesn't have an m.2 slot btw.
The bots learnt to creep block on their own omg.
The bots won't do cheese strats against each other.
The bottleneck is the CPU.
The box is gonna be fairly large because it's gonna have lots of styrofome.
The box is way bigger than the case itself.
The box won't come until tomorrow at the earliest.
The break even point is 0.025BTC where the total fee is the same between NiceHash wallet and external wallet.
The browser uses GBP actually, it's the client that doesn't support it any more.
The building was open and the reception was staffed.
The build quality is fantastic too. The rubber sides feel amazing, the shape hugs my hand, and the clicks are super tactile. Logitech's engineering team did a fantastic job.
The burger is way better than McDonalds lmao.
The cable actually physically goes somewhere.
The cable is detechable.
The cable mod doesn't need soldering or anything. You just unplug the old cable and plug the new one in.
The cable works fine, I use them with my AKG K702s.
The calendar is pretty cool too because it shows when a new TV episode or film I have saved is released.
The cans taste so much better than the 2L bottles.
The card is great for mining, but it just isn't much of an improvement over my GTX 970 for gaming.
The card with the best rates charges for cash withdrawals.
The case costs like £550 though.
The case, CPU, CPU cooler, motherboard and RAM I all want to replace though..
The case is but not in the box because it has all the protective foam.
The cashback would have been like £10-£11.
The ceesa paracord is considered to be a significant upgrade.
The ceesa paracord looks like a nice little cable upgrade though.
The CEO just walked past my desk.
The chance of everything is greater than zero.
The cheap 1-4GB ones have a big upfront cost.
The cheaper one also has a battery and dual headphone outputs, but IDK if I'll use those features.
The cheaper one is also 1kg lighter.
The cheapest I can find atm is like £200.
The cheapest I can find is £530.
The cheapest I can find is £630.
The cheapest S7 contract I can find is £768.
The cheapest, then spend your money on more important stuff.
The chicken obviously.
The comfort and isolation of customs is supposed to be unmatched by universals.
The company also notes that the HTC 10 was subjected to over 168 hours of extreme temperature tests, ranging from -20°C (-4°F) to 60°C (140°F), plus over 10,000 drop, bend, scratch, and corrosion tests.
The company benefits at Nationwide are insane.
The company that make it all use Linux, so I like them.
The competitive scene was doomed though; Activision only cares about consoles now.
the condom fell off.
The condom fell off because she bought shit cheap condoms from Poundland that are too small for my penis.
The condom fell off, what should I do?
The condom fell out.
The connection has been fast and stablew.
The Conservative campaign is getting pretty misleading. They are attacking specifically JC (not the Labour party) for wanting to decrease the defence budget and saying they will increase it themselves, even though the opposite is actually true.
The Conservatives would have raised tuition fees whether they went into coalition or not.
The contrast was amazing.
The cooler is a bitch to install though.
The cooling is incredible though.
The cool thing about my Creative Sound Blaster E5 is that it's not just an AMPDAC, but a feature-full sound system.
The co-op missions are pretty good.
The Corsair one is a little bit better suited to my build.
The £ cost they give you is calculated using some crazy algorithm and doesn't account for unit rate and standing charge.
The cost to manufacture will be too high, profitability too low.
The council are taking it to the dump.
The courier is a fucking liar. The receptionists told me that nothing ever came.
The courier is full of shit and needs to get sacked.
The courier is just fucking useless. He said that "occupant refused delivery" when I used another address too.
The courier is just incompotent.
The courier would be retarded to give my parcel to a hobo instead of the receptionist anyway.
The CPU, HDD, RAM and GPU are fucking weak.
The CPU is £300 non-delidded.
The CPU will be the bottleneck, not the RAM.
The current generation of AMD GPUs aren't good enough.
The current voting system is just inefficient, there's no denying that.
The Custom Art Music One is 9.55 and the next one is 8.85.
The customer returned this head phones saing.
The Custom One Pro come close, but they aren't foldable :(.
The Custom Studios can replace our Beyers and our M50s.
The custom terrain and weather is awesome too.
The DAC is okay but the bezels, battery, camera are all shit.
The Daily Mail is for plebs.
The day it stops being profitable, I will stop unless my house is cold.
The dealership want £453 to fix my car's seals.
The default voltage is usually set higher than your individual chip requires.
The delivery date of your parcel should be no later than 28/04/2017.
The delivery driver is wearing a gown wtf?
The depreciation will outweigh the RoI.
The designs and packaging are nice, but performance is what ultimately counts.
The developers lied about the game.
The devs are shady though, I reckon the 40k stolen funds was an inside job.
The diet stuff has a good texture.
The difference between 0.5% and 1% every year for 40 years will be A LOT.
The difference between 2650 and 2380 is nothing.
The difference between 720p and 1080p is very noticeable.
The difference between a GTX 1080 and an Xbox One is enormous.
The difference between my X2s and COPs is huge.
The difference between my X2s and my COPs is huge.
The difference between playing OW at 120fps and 240 is insane.
The difference between the stock cable and the Ceesa cable is huge. It makes the wired version feel like wireless because there's almost no cable drag.
The difference between you, HansProleman and ebay is only a few £ anyway.
The difference in input lag is so significant.
The difference in risk between them is so incredibly massive you can't even compare it.
The difference is like 1% journey length but 100% more enjoyment.
The difficulty is going down too.
The director at my company made a joke to me today.
The Discord one just spams scripted sentences AFAIK.
The Discord one seems to spam a pre-scripted response on some sort of timer.
The donor is not representative democracy.
The Dota short films are the highest production value fan-made video game videos I've ever seen.
The Dota system is very similar to the Tennis/Golf system now.
The DPD drive is naked?!?!?
The DPI needs to improve though.
The drunker you get, the shitter you play.
The DT770 pads are fucking comfy.
The DT770s are decades old now.
The DT770s probably have better sound quality in general.
The E5 is £100 cheaper.
The E5 you could use as a portable AMPDAC too.
The earcups of my beyers fell off when I accidentally dropped them, and I kept buying the wrong screwdriver sets.
The earpads were fucking tiny and pretty shit.
The easiest would be to buy a display which can act as 4 displays probably.
The ending was so fucking bad.
The enemy team was probably really low mmr.
The EQ is V as fuck.
The EU is going to punish the fuck out of the UK for leaving to set an example to Greece.
The European sports system.
The evening meal, because I skip breakfast, eat a shitty packed lunch mummy makes me, then get a delicious cooked meal as long as my mum is sober or doesn't decide to cook some shitty exotic dish.
The evil one.
The Exgynos versions of S7, S7E and Note 7 are decent.
The extensions help a lot..
the eyes, mason, what do they mean?
The fact thast you know that is pretty creepy.
The fan is just noisy....
The fan is kinda loud, so I flashed it so it doesn't turn on until it reaches 50C.
The FCC will end net neutrality on Dec 14th if we don't convince Congress to stop them. Join the Protest and Contact Congress to save net neutrality..
The fee is only 1% for 0.1LTC which should only take a couple of days to mine.
The fees are a big problem.
The female players are so much worse than men.
The Fidelio X2 has unrivalled bass for a high-end open headphone.
The Fidelio X2s are the closest thing to the perfect headphone TBH m9.
The Fidelio X2's bass is unmatched.
The figures aren't public for each game, so it's hard to say for sure.
The figure you got from your script and not Awesome Miner window?
The first game I played people were just wasting their ultis too.
The first place winners of TI7 will win more than double of the entire prize pool of the biggest LoL tournament.
The first time it didn't sit level, the second time it kept dying on me.
The flood has ruined quality?
The form factor of the M50X is really good for traveling, but the isolation really lets it down.
The free heat is what is most attractive to me.
The fucking annoying thing is that since I'm leaving my DT770s in the office and using my M50X as my home closed pair, the M50X has shit isolation, and I can hear my mum's stupid dog barking.
The fucking communal cleaning is such a rip off though.
The fucking director at GPS keeps asking to meet me and I CBA.
The fucking headband is kinked and it has the Gibson fucked up glue problem too.
The fucking milkshakes and burgers wtf.
The fucking police were in my house holding a gun at the weekend.
The fucking retarded thing is that all these super old pensioners are going to vote anti-EU, then they're gonna die and we're gonna be the ones to deal with it.
The fucking video pisses me off too.
the fucks.
The funds have come from the membership fees.
The funny thing is that people are saying that Dota will be dying if the prizepool is only $15m this year lmao.
The future of true PoW decentralisation.
The G403 is the closest thing to the perfect mouse right now.
The gains are so low and the fees are so high.
The game doesn't matter wtf.
The game is loaded into memory anyway.
The game is too far off I think.
The game launched over 12 hours ago and I still don't have my copy.
The game running on max graphics on Nuke looks pretty good.
The game runs like shit at low framerates.
The garage did some more work on my car today, hopefully water won't leak into my boot any more..
The garage told me they were finishing at lunch time today and I haven't received a phone call from them yet.
The Germans can live, I need their precision German engineering.
The global trend towards autocracy is worrying. First Donald Trump then Erdogan and now "strong and stable leader Teresa May".
The good thing about GPU mining is that even if mining becomes unprofitable, you still have a GPU.
The government also can't lock people up indefinitely without trial thanks to Europe!
The government is?
The government owns 25% of your home.
The government recently increased taxes for new registrations because cars were becoming too clean and they couldn't raise enough tax revenue.
The government then identified the cultural industry as the next growth driver. Numerous state research agencies were created and some projects were subsided in an attempt to boost the nation’s cultural industry..
The government wants to ban Signal to stop terrorists using it.
The government was very anti-gaming, but they can't ban PC components because people need them.
The government will use this as an excuse to privatise the NHS and ban encryption.
The GPU in that PC will be a bottleneck though.
The GPU isn't downclocking.
The GPU is the expensive one.
The graphics are very impressive.
The graphics cards with 2/3 large fans are only ever good if you have a very large case with very good ventilation.
The green triangles.
The grill is not attractive ffs.
The gril who plays Jubilee in the new Xmen is Vietnamese.
The GRLC_BCH market is dead :(.
The GTX 1070 is nice because of how power efficient the Pascall architecture is.
The GTX 970 was a fucking beast when it was first released.
The guests just have anti-bullet forcefields.
The guy had a 2 year old CV from me and didn't have my last two jobs.
The gym membership money can only be spent on the gym.
The H100 will push air onto the board too.
The £ has been declining aainst the dollar since the start of the 20th century, this isn't really anything new.
The £ has been depreciating for years, Brexit didn't cause it.
The £ has climbed a lot today.
The hashrate is low.
The £ has risen a fuckload today.
The headband and earpads are super comfortable and easy to replace like the DT770s.
The headband is made of leather, but not replaceable, which could be a problem in the future.....
The headband is replaceable too.
The headphones are okay at the price though.
The headphones I bought are right for me.
The headset had all its leather falling off.
The heat is great too.
The heat will be my profit.
The Help to Buy ISA is worth it even if it's just for the interest IMO. I have £4,100 cash earning 3.5% tax-free right now.
The Help to Buy ISA skews it so much though because I'm counting the bonus as interest.
The higher the price of Bitcoin, the higher the fiat price of withdrawing.
The higher the value, the higher the tax.
The highs and mids are crystal clear.
The hole is already big enough.
The Home Office has decided not to investigate whether my marriage is a sham..
The hotel I booked my gf and I into has a swimming pool.
The hottest temperature ever recorded in the UK was 38.5C (101.3F) in Faversham, Kent, in August 2003..
The housing association.
The housing market is so fucked in this country.
The housing sector is in shambled.
The HTC 10 is rumoured to have capacitive buttons which is controversial.
The HTC 10’s camera is also designed to launch “in as little as 0.6 seconds.” RAW format support is also a go..
The HTC has a seperate DAC and the S7 uses the Exognys SoC.
The human eye can see up to 420 fps.
The hype is wearing off I think.
The idiot was just throwing money away on the masheen.
The important thing is just make sure it doesn't interfere with airflow.
The important thing is that you keep your heartbeat in the cardio training zone for as long as possible.
The important thing is to learn my lesson so I don't repeat the mistake.
The information is being gathered now ready for when the police state is fully set up.
The initial pricetag is a bit steep though.
The inside of a smoker's lungs are more radioactive than Chernobyl.
The installer can't detect EFI BIOS?
The insurance says it doesn't cover fragile items so probably best not to lable it as such.
The interest on payday loans at like 3000% or some shit.
The interest rates are good for short-term hedging against inflation.
The International 2016's prizepool.
Their arguments against nuclear are borderline retarded.
Their branding probably didn't help things. "Coca Cola Life" doesn't really tell us what it is.
Their cereals have so much sugar.
Their customer service is terrible.
Their isolation is awful too.
Their jobs do seem kinda redundant.
Their mid and high end stuff is good, but their lowend stuff are crap.
Their odds are pathetic.
Their price:performance for workstation usage and eth mining is the best right now.
Their site just went down it looks like.
Their special beef is nice.
Their triple monitor laptop concept is interesting though.
Their weapons do change.
The isolation is so good for comfy velour pads.
The isolation of my ATH-M50X aren't really good enough.
The isolation of the M50X just can't compete with my Beyers.
The £ is so weak compared to a year ago.
The £ is up today.
The item will be sent out for delivery tomorrow.
The Job Centre told me I will never get housing benefit because I am a young white straight male.
The joke is that everything is black?
The joke went over your head m9.
The Korean LG G6 has a really good DAC.
The Korean LG G6 looks good, but the battery isn't as good as the V30.
The language was all in Chinese so it was really hard to find the option to change it to English.
The last election was about 8-10 months ago I think?
The last few gens of Intel CPUs have held their value. The difference between generations is like a 5% performance boost.
The later it gets, the more accurate my prediction will be.
The later one will probably be written off 7+ years later then.
The latest episode had all-time lowest viewers.
The latest Lastpass beta supports Quantum now.
The latest patch dropped my FPS really hard.
The law of diminishing returns is very real with headphones.
The letter told me that when I retire I will get an annual pension of £6,400.
The level of isolation my SE215s provide blows my M50X out of the water.
The lifetime ISA will be for first time buyers looking to buy >1 year from now.
The light went out when I was pooping so I used my phone.
The local courier has had it since 08:17 this morning.
The local government just called me, IDK why.
The LoL implementation of runes and masteries is more a design flaw than a feature.
The longer it goes, the more accurately I can predict it.
The look and feel is amazing.
The lower the better ofc.
The lowest pleb is more likely to win the lottery than you or me.
The LTC price is calculated at each interval?
The M10 isn't released yet.
The M50s look really nice, definitely very stylish headphones compared to the DT770s.
The M50X come close, but their isolation is pathetic.
The M50X has plastic backs but the DT770s has metal.
The M50X just wins out on portability, and only a little bit.
The main annoying thing about Chromecast is that I have to switch to HDMI 2 to use it because my gf is always watching the Sky.
The main character is a terrible actress.
The main feature is bigger screen to body ratio.
The main issue is the noise really.
The main problem I find with gaming audio is that developers are ignoring OpenAL Soft HRTF.
the maintenance isn't worth it.
The main thing mortgage companies look for is affordability, which you will pass no problem.
The main thing stopping me from using Linux full-time right now is lack of Overwatch support.
The main thing that pisses me off about Spotify is that my songs keep disappearing when they lose their license to play them in the UK or some BS.
The majority are filthy casuals.
The majority of my spending is on credit card.
The majority of the money I spent on Dota was raised by selling Dota items.
The manager drove his car into the restaurant in a similar incident.
The Manila Major was just announced.
The manual said to "tighted the thumb screws until all four corner are firmly secured".
The manufacturers are currently in the process of ramping up their production and have informed us that more graphics cards will be available as soon as possible but cannot give us a firm date..
The map is the exact same, but the textures are different.
The marina is nice too.
The max I'll hold in Coinbase before cashing out is 150 euros.
The meal soup is probably okay.
The media is just a bunch of shit-stirrers trying to provoke as much reaction as possible.
The meetings will be arranged for other days.
The middle-end stuff I have no use for because I'm not a filthy casual.
The mids are so weak omg.
The migrants or the refugees?
The milkshake is way better than McDonalds too.
The mining just offsets the cost.
The mod is a success.
The modmic is a pain in the fucking ass.
The moment I put them on, my ears felt like they were trapped in an insulated prison.
The money probably isn't worth the effort to gather this information.
The more I win, the more profit I get.
The more you buy, the more you'll benefit when crypto moons.
The more you can tax the same money, the better.
The mortgage will give me equity, so I can sell that 25% for £26,250 and use that as a deposit.
The most important thing is you NEVER buy Razer.
The most recommended for noobs.
The most recorded organ....
The motherboard is the older model than I could find on pcpartpicker.
The MPs seem a bit antidemocratic.
The M&S card?
Then 30 seconds is fucking slow.
Then a crazy terrorist started shooting people at his resort.
Then a fucking terrorist attack happened at his resort lmao.
Then a job agency put me in a job cleaning old peoples' toilet chairs *shudder*.
Then a month of waiting to get paid.
The Nazis were evil.
Then buy a new GPU.
Then buy a second COP for the office.
Then buy GPUs on credit.
Then cancelled my order for 8 of them.
The Ncase M1 is really nice, and the SG06/SG13 are very good for the price.
The NCase M1 is smaller than my RVZ01 but can fit a 240mm radiator!!!!
Then come home to a warm house.
Then complain that I don't do everything.
Then convert to GBP.
Then create a new profit switching profile for CPU mining.
Then disconnecting my powerline until I tell her that my Wi-Fi doesn't extend through 6 walls.
Then do an hour.
Then either they'll go back to the supplier, or they'll go to my neighbour or someone and sit idle and possibly get damaged/lost.
The network could go down.
The networked drives are supposed to be secure though I think, since we have a lot of private documents on there.
The new cards are going to be targeted by miners too.
The new compendium is SERIOUSLY good.
The new one, not the one most graduates have.
The news broke when I was already mid-journey driving to her office.
The news is about BTC not LTC.
The news presenters are just as retarded though.
The new UT is out now, go play it.
Then exchange my LTC for EUR.
Then exchanging for euros from gdax for basically free.
Then exchanging to £ with Revolut for basically free.
The next 4.5 years are going to suck no matter what I do.
the next thing that should have happened was the neighbor should have squirt her with a hose while mumbling, "little shit...".
Then get better.
Then get better and your mmr will increase.
Then get in on the betclub.
Then get O2 DAC or Schitt.
Then go.
Then goes back up.
Then go on a rampage.
Then go on holiday.
Then got fired mid-production.
Then he'd have to pay me.
Then he will die.
Then highlight my name ffs.
Then HMRC has no trail.
Then hopefully it won't get damaged like my HTC One M9 did.
Then how is it a level playing field wtf.
The NHS won't get better unless the government changes.
Then I became unemployed.
Then I blocked the toilet.
Then I can build up a deposit.
Then I can buy GTX 1080TI.
Then I can get an S7 or G6 for cheap.
Then I can give you my opinion of my M50X.
Then I can start working on my private pension.
Then I can't pay rent.
The NiceHash website is fucking awful.
Then I could argue I'm being paid less for being a female?
Then I could buy a house.
Then I couldn't find a job afterwards because even Sainsbury's didn't want me.
Then I die on the streets.
Then I don't get paid.
Then I don't have to stop listening to my music.
Then I found out it was frameskipping above 60hz.
Then I found the Creative E5.
Then if there's another good one I might go to that.
Then I get 0.1% withdrawal fee.
Then I get evicted.
Then I got better.
Then I got bored of it because Valve don't give a fuck about that game.
Then I have £11,540 personal allowance.
Then I have to take one on the 2nd of June for my fucking speed awareness course too.
Then I have to wait like 5 weeks notice period.
Then I know whether to be happy or disappointed.
Then I'll ask my parents.
Then I'll get some real good quality shit.
Then I'll probably have to look into either putting some rigs outside, buying a bigger house, or renting a room somewhere.
Then I'll probably leave my DT770s at the office.
Then I'll try to build 1-2 more rigs using the next-gen cards.
Then I modded my M50X.
Then I re-opened the Tesco account.
Then I researched that it costs $0.03 per 13,333 emails not deleted.
Then I spend my euros on European hotels.
Then I stopped and started using Thunderbird.
Then it costs me 0.1% to cash out.
Then I told them they got their figures wrong.
Then it's about time I start doing them, don't you think?
Then it's even more important it isn't launched until it's ready!!!!!!
Then I was thinking back to my economics education and I think I can probably make a stronger case against Conservatives.
Then I will ask the housing association for a viewing.
Then I will own it.
Then I will play games all day or something.
Then I won't even need the gains to be profitable.
Then just change your game settings ffs.
Then just ignored me.
Then just repay them it all 12 months later or whenever.
Then LCDs came along at 60hz.
Then lose my child support from my JSA, not have enough leftover to feed myself, and die of starvationb.
Then make it 1GB and then you don't have that problem ever again.
Then make sure GPU is stable.
Then maybe buy a 200hz Acer Z35 21:9 monitor hahahhahaa.
Then maybe Intel will finally give us 50GHz CPUs.
Then mine hard.
Then mine on it.
Then mining for heat and £££.
Then my gf and I can have LAN parties.
Then my motherboard came and all the cards were sold out globally.
Then my mum will tell me no.
Then my parents stopped paying for me.
Then need my P60 or P800 or whatever the fuck it is that tells me my total earnings.
Then obviously you're at an advantage.
The noise isolation is really really good, I really recommend these for budget IEMs.
Then ordered the wrong adapter.
Then pair it with a second hand GPU from ebay.
Then pay it all off 5 years later when I remortgage and start all over again.
Then Philips X2 Fidelio.
Then placed a £200 bet which I iwll make a £7 loss on.
then please explain this in the comments section of the form.".
Then plug 4 cables into it or something.
Then quit my job.
The NSA has a backdoor to every Windoze masheen, right?
Then see what Kabylake and Zen are like.
Then sell on gdax.
Then send it to the Student Loans Company.
The NSG S0 is tempting.
Then she asked him to apologise lmao.
Then she transferred £10.
Then stole all the coins.
Then stop losing.
Then tag all your transactions and you can see how much of your budget you're spending every month.
THEN TELL ME YOUR OFFICE IS CLOSED.
Then the ground loop isolator didn't work.
Then the M50X.
Then there's the £ difference in funding on personal appearance.
Then there's the objective genetic advantages.
Then the rewards get bigger.
Then the right adapter came but was broken.
Then they came for the fat people.
Then they changed it to OSX.
Then they're putting it in their mouth.
Then they told me that they liked my answer and want to hire me.
THEN TWO TRIPS TO ANDOVER.
Then we can invest in a multi-sig 50% masternode.
Then we'll see another 40 years without leaving orbit.
then when I died they asked for heals.
Then why aren't people paying lots for Scrypt on Nicehack?
Then why are you worried about Tesco?
Then why can I save £609 over 3 years with a fan-assisted storage heater?!?!?
Then why doesn't it work for prime ministers too?
Then why does the EPC say I can save over £200 a year by buying new storage heaters?
Then will you stop?
Then withdrawing to gdax for free.
Then you can collab on that?
Then you don't need to buy a bag?
Then you do your free spins and win £30.88.
Then you'll get done for drug and anime possession.
Then you're an idiot.
Then you're fine.
The O2/X7 is good for 10 years too.
The oddsmatcher doens't have a filter for high-profile events, so it's hard to find these matches.
The offer I made on a flat yesterday was rejected :(.
The office shuts down.
The onboard soundcard is probably dogshit.
The one I linked?
The one my father and stepmother gave me is so bad.
The one on the right looks a bit better, but still pretty bad.
The one with kpop.
The one with the most chicken.
theonion.com.
The Onion isn't a reputable news source by the way.
The only day I have a chance of getting a take-away pizza is Tuesday.
The only frontpanel interface I use is the power button.
The only good things are the VPNs.
The only issues are the size, the price, and future compatibility issues.
The only one I can find with decent privacy and works with Thunderbird is openmailbox.
The only one I've seen was the one in Brighton.
The only ones which stand a chance right now are ETH, LTC and BCH.
The only people who don't think Korean girls are racially superior are stupid ignorant racists.
The only person who is really testing this stuff is battlenonsense.
The only problem is I'll need a new motherboard and RAM too.....
The only problem is that I can't work from home and play video games very often.
The only problem is that my insurance is for women.
The only problem is that Office 2010 keeps telling me my trial will end soon.
The only problem is that one item is 0.
The only problem is that you can't withdraw as GBP.
The only problem with my scheme is that I have to log into Danske manually each month because Moneydashboard and Buxfer don't support autologin :(.
The only problem with that is that I'd probably have to give up my 240mm rad and get a 120mm for my CPU instead.
The only problem with the Sound Blaster E5 are the lack of Linux drivers.
The only "real sport" is the Olympics.
The only reason fiat is used so much by criminals is because it's mainstream.
The only reason I'm risking investing at all instead of putting my money into 3% accounts is because I want the cashback.
The only reason I'm struggling to buy everything I need is because my salary is so low.
The only reason I worked from home is that I was sick as a dog and felt like it was a good excuse to work naked all week.
The only reason we don't have a dictatorship yet is because they're still in the process of gathering dirt on everyone.
The only thing doing well is ETN.
The only thing holding me back is that Volta is releasing in early 2018......
The only thing I dislike about Rocket League is the lack of proper mouse control of the camera.
The only thing I don't like about having a gf is that I can't meet lots of new girls.
The only thing I don't like about it is the cost, because it makes it harder to keep the value of my PC below £1000, which means I need to declare it on my contents insurance.
The only thing I don't like about the COPs is that they don't fold up.....
The only thing I'm worried about is doing the heatshrinking part.
The only thing I'm worried about is if cryptocurrency dies out in general.
The only thing my M50X are good at is that they can fold up and I can remove the cable.
The only thing preventing me from uninstalling my Windoze installation is Overwatch.
The only thing putting me off having a live-in gf is that she'll probably bitch about all the time I'm spending on gaming.
The only thing putting me off the G6 is the poor battery life.
The only thing putting me off VR atm is the low refresh rates and low resolution.
The only things I can think of are faulty power cables or faulty graphics card.
The only thing stopping me is that I CBA to turn it on and off every time I play a game.
The only thing that puts me off is that I can't find a suitable closed case. I don't think my wife would let me put an open air frame in the house.
The only thing that stops me from playing CS:GO is the new Dota 2 expansion.
The only two options you get are awful, so you can't go wrong whichever way you vote.
The only way I found out I'm invited is that I saw my name on my parents' invitation.
The only way to be sure would be to open the phone, unsolder the SSD, and make a proper image.
The only way to make more savings is from old people.
The opinion on Nazis was different pre-war.
The opposite of UKIP.
the opposition?
The optimum power changes every day.
The organisation understands that you may wish to use your own computers.
The other guy bid  £4.98.
The other order hasn't arrived yet either even though it should have yesterday.
The other way around, idiots.
The owner sounds like a deutsche.
The pain has reduced a bit.
The pain is so bad.
The paracord is custom made by a German to be really flexible and light.
The parts are smaller and you need less cable management.
The pay is ridiculous when our job is basically just to scan documents.
The payment has come through.
The payout fee is so good.
The PC has RAM modules installed.
The people in #music say you're full of BS m9.
The people who claim their babies have a religion are stupid.
The perfect amouint of high quality sound and bass.
The perfect fans.
The person next to me talks to herself all day, it's so weird.
The person who just bought the flat I wanted to buy.
The person who works next to me keeps complaining that I can't hear her over my SE215s lmao.
The phone is shit, but the DAC is really good.
The phone looks really fucking nice.
The phone looks so good.
The PIA Android client blocks ads too.
The point of squatting is to give you more strength to lift by utilising your powerful leg muscles and also to reduce strain on your back.
The police aren't interested in lost passports?
The police just followed and murdered someone?
The police wouldn't use so many resources if he wasn't important.
The pool is more efficient for low hashrate miners anyway.
The poor and homeless would have an income to rely on.
The poor results are what I'm worried about.
The population's average walking speed is terrible.
The ports are just on the PC.
The possibilities are limitless.
THE POST IS FOR HEADPHONES.
The potato or the bird?
The president is just an office anyway.
The price is a bit more reasonable than the V30 and S8 too.
The price is high enough already.
The price of eth has halved in 30 days.
The price on the page is wrong.
The prize pool could go down to £10m and it would still dwarf every other tournament.
The problem ATM is that I have to concentrate on driving, so it's hard to do all that fun stuff simultaneously.
The problem could actually be caused by a regression in the display driver. You might get smoother FPS with an older driver.
The problem I have is the withdrawal fee as a % is quite high still.
The problem I have now is that my GPU fan is too loud and way louder than every other component.....
The problem I have right now is that I'm likely to get 12 GPUs delivered whilst I'm in Korea.
The problem is always a proprietary cable, bad earpads, inability to fold, bad noise isolation, or some other little problem.
The problem is getting the content.
The problem is that a sofa is larger than myself.
The problem is that I don't have enough deposit/salary.
The problem is that I don't have unlimited money.
The problem is that I have to pay for 90% of everything.
The problem is that I'm going to have to spend about £15,000 on a house next year.
The problem is that OEM headphones suck, and AKG don't want to enter the gaming headset market.
The problem is that selling stuff on the Steam market takes a cut.
The problem is that the powder I am mixing into the water makes it taste LIKE FUCKING SHIT.
The problem right now is that these adaptive sync monitors are too low refresh rate and you can't make use of them properly unless your PC sucks.
The problem with a laptop is that you can't fit good cooling into a small size.
The problem with coffee is that it's only at optimum temperature for a very short time.
The problem with gaming headsets is that most gamers don't know what they actually want.
The problem with mining is the up-front cost.
The problem with NiceHack is that it used BTC which had high transactions fees which incentivised people to keep a lot of money in their internal wallets.
The problem with renting is that once I move out, my parents won't let me come back.
The problem with selling on the exchange is that they want $.
The problem with spending all your money on one pair is that you are then limited to the sound signature and features of only one pair.
The problem with Tinder is that you can't filter by race.
The problem with Walking Dead is that there's lots of character development about characters nobody cares about and then they randomly kill them off and nobody gives a shit.
The product is heat, not ethereum.
The program is so fucking funny.
The promo is fucking good though.
The promotion capped winnings at £50.
The PSU I'm okay with using for another few years anyway.
The PSU is really good btw.
The pump noise isn't too bad, it just raises the potential noise floor a bit.
The Quake World Championship starts today.
The Queen is probably the most powerful person in the world.
The queen is the most powerful person.
The queen is ugly.
the queue.
The queues were almost non-existant too.
The RAM looks more sensible for a gaming PC Now.
The rate of growth is not slowing down.
The rates are so good compared to everything else on the market, and it's fixed for 12 months.
The really pretty one.
The Real Madrid vs Barcelona.
There are 18.5 days until crowd funding for The International 2017 ends..
There are 51.5 days until crowd funding for The International 2017 ends. A total of $2,936,020 remains to beat The International 2016 ($57,010 per day)..
There are a hundred million different products in the store, and IDK where the fuck they all are.
There are better lossy formats.
There are dozens of you!
There are lots of cute girls playing Pokemon Go in Socal.
There are lots of threads on /r/competitiveoverwatch about how dumb the system is.
There are many.
There are more cleaners here than people now.
There are no dota event staff; there are dozens of different organisations.
There are no special exemptions available.
There aren't any big problems with it AFAIK, and the open beta will be out in less than a month so we can all try it out for ourselves.
There aren't hats because Valve abandoned L4D.
There aren't many internal vacancies that interest me, and I would prefer to stay internal right now, so it's really disapponting I didn't get this one..
There aren't many investment platforms which have no fees.
There aren't many Windoze-only games which I actually want to play nowadays. It's just Overwatch really.
There are people whose jobs involve buying and selling shares. There's no way you can beat the investment of a trader.
There are phone lines available to talk to you if you're feeling suicidal.
There are rules?
There are shitloads here.
There are sites you can sell on. I also traded with people at uni. I bought games for them and they gave me cash.
There are still CoD4 tournaments?
There are still TF2 tournaments?!?!?
There are way too many defective versions of the Fidelio X2 to get a decent used one for cheap :(.
The reason why most people use multicore is because they cannot reach 999.
The reason why Rick and Morty is so good is because it's written by men.
The receptionists wouldn't lie to me about that; they take my DPD parcels all the time.
There could be a power cut.
There could be a Russian submarine spying on you right now.
the recruiter was really keen to impress on me how 'fun' the IT team at this place are.
The regular cycle of flights is what I'm most interested in. If space travel becomes regular, then there's a driver for cost-reduction which is what Musk wants to achieve..
The regulator needs to investigate them.
There has never been a war between two nuclear armed nations.
There have been latency benchmarks done with multicore and single-core processing.
There is no damage anywhere.
There is no space on my desk, but I could put it on another piece of furniture next to my desk like poopConsultant suggested.
There is no such thing as a 1090.
There is no "typical cpu load" though.
There isn't really a defined "gamer" demographic any more, it's become too diverse.
There is zero communication in this game.
The release date is the 24th.
There'll be lots of cheap GTX970s on ebay soon.
The remaining 75% share is only £130 rent + £52 service charges.
There might be a 1080TI by then.
The rent is higher than my salary.
The rent is quite cheap.
The represensative at Sainsbury's Bank told me it's because it's gambling.
There's 1.36bn in China alone.
There's 22.2GB of Windows installer files????
There's a 250 version.
There's a bidding war going on already and we're still over three days away.
There's a big $1m CS:GO tournament going on in Cologne right now.
There's a big tournament with a >$20m prize pool that's about to start which will make even more players millionnaires.
There's a button which does it.
There's a Cashflow Planner.
There's a couple of nice ones for £125k though.
There's a couple of semi-decent ones, like the Audio Technica one and the Sennheiser one.
There's a few coming in the next few months.
There's a fixed withdrawal fee.
There's a good way about Steve Jobs?
There's a grill at the office that I think wants the D.
There's a hidden mmr number behind the number you see.
There's a limit to how much performance money can buy.
There's a little M&S near my flat.
There's a .local/owa address.
There's a lot of cute grils where you live.
There's a lot of development on X16R miners.
There's a lot of hot grils in London though.
There's a lot of other mistakes on that page.
There's a lot of promotions on for a high-profile fight tomorrow.
There's a lot of shitcoins on this site.
There's a lot of snake oil in the audiophile world.
There's a lot of social stigma for dating someone of another race.
There's a lot of vaping shops in Brighton.
There's also housing benefit if you are a woman.
There's always going to be some fluctuation.
There's always the risk of the fan breaking or something on the GPU too.
Theresa May is trying to criminalise it IIRC.
Theresa May wants to spy on you and make you a criminal for doing drugs!
There's a mega hype Dota tournament on right now btw.
There's an argument that 8GB is better for gaming, but 16GB is probably overall better if you get decent modules.
There's an autistic Dota pro.
There's a new Chinese phone too, but I can't remember what it's called.
There's a new one?
There's a new phone that could be good called the Sony Xperia XZ.
There's a new version of NiceHash out.
There's a nice Korean restaurant in Brighton we can go to next time you're in the south.
There's an inverse correlation between alcohol consumption and mmr.
There's another election soon.
There's a really distracting Korean here though.
There's a really good Bet365 offer on atm.
There's a really good VPN comparison spreadsheet.
There's a second chance offer I think?
There's a shortage of bread half the time I go to the bakery section of my local bakery.
There's a tier-list.
There's at least one.
There's a way to check on Steam, but IDK if I can check from work.
There's a wind farm at Brighton now?
There's diminishing returns of course.
The researcher probably just used mode and said it was average.
There's going to be cheese strats which the bots never played againsty.
There's got to be a catch.
There's Hi-Fi shops in brighton?
There's liquidity on Betfair for events when there's nothing on other exchanges.
There's literally zero isolation with my Lync headset, it's pathetic how shit our headsets are.
There's lots of azn grills in all UK cities now, I love it!
There's lots of Chinese girls in China.
There's lots of dogging going on where I live.
There's lots of druggie markets.
There's lots of pros older than me.
There's lots of weirdos there.
There's lots to pay for.
There's more than one park?
There's my answer then I guess?
There's no buybacks or glyphs or anything to delay them.
There's no chicken in your diet!!!!!!
There's no desktop client.
There's no EPC yet.
There's no EQ either, which a lot of people want.
There's no EXID strategy if BTC suffers a catastrophic crash.
There's no gas.
There's no incentive to take proper precautions any more.
There's no monitor or peripherals though....
There's no need anymore now that we have fast internet.
There's no need to run an insignificant decision through 5 economic models.
There's no point paying more than about £1.5k.
There's no point ulting if you've already won the fight.
There's no reason I can't benefit from it too.
There's no such thing.
There's no such thing as islamophobia because islam is not a fucking race.
There's no such thing as zero friction, it's just a marketing term.
There's no such thing as zombies, George Romero just invented them to scare noobs like you.
There's not a general rule that braided=bad and plastic=good.
There's not enough scientific evidence to say right now.
There's no text logs, and it demands your immediate attention.
There's nothing in the T&Cs and dates which say the promotion is no longer running.
There's nothing risky about betting on football matches and horse races.
There's nothing special about her IMO.
There's nothing wrong with having relationships with someone of another race omfg.
There's not much nutrition there.
There's not much reason not to now that RAM is so cheap.
There's no warning about it either.
There's no way.
There's no way his shitty wireless Logitech gaming headset sounds better than my K702s though.
There's no way I'm clicking on that.
There's no way it cost me that much.
There's no way it's legal to marry yourself.
There's no way of knowing if it's an ex-mining card or not?
There's no way someone is sitting on 25% of that property and not charging any rent for it.
There's no way you can do that and have people pick secure and memorable passwords.
There's no way you could do it twice without it being intentional.
There's no way you'll win it for £39.
There's no website which can tell me the speed?
There's offers every day.
The resolution and colours looked a bit shit.
The resolution of some of the props is definitely better.
The resolution, response time and refresh rate aren't quite there.
The resolution will suck though.
There's one in Brighton.
There's only like 5 other people in the world who have a mouse with specs as good as mine.
There's only rumours so far.
There's pre-game stat modifiers too IIRC.
There's really a gap in the market for a good over-ear portable pair of headphones atm.
There's reasons why similar ships are not made today.
There's regulation that bookies should keep your account balance in a separate account.
There's so many features!
There's so many things wrong with that question.
There's some cool extra shit.
There's some downtime.
There's some nice graphs on reddit.com/r/dataisbeautiful.
There's some REALLY BAD music here.
There's something really fascinating about cramming as much power as possible into as small a space as possible....
There's some weird variables.
There's soooooooo many features LoL is lacking.
There's standard which is the permanent normal league, and there's seasonal leagues which are a bit different and only run for a limited time.
There's such a thing called the age of consent, you perv.
There's this grill at my work who looks like Symmetra in Overwatch lmao.
The rest is mostly spreadsheets.
There's too many betting sites.
There's turn rates in AoE btw.
There's very little consoles do better than PCs nowadays.
There's very minor rounding errors.
There's way too many people in that photo.
There's worse things than terrorism.
There's XMR but not LTC lmao.
The retailer will process your claim in due course. Please check the retailer's Quidco page for information on payment speeds..
There used to be competition between USA and USSR.
There was a big debate about it. A lot of people don't want to fork just because someone fucks up. They want to set a president.
There was only one board which supported the new Intel CPUs and IDE drives so I could reuse my old ones.
There will still be a $23m tournament.
There won't be a UK within 5 years.
There wouldn't be an EU but rather Europe would be Germany.
The risk is pretty negligable.
Thermals, speeds and noise are amazing.
Thermal throttling and hard limit doesn't mean the same thing?>.
THE ROBOT HANGS UP ON ME AFTER BEING ON HOLD FOR AGES.
The router.
The RPM is inaccurate, it's actually really low.
the rules are ambigious as fuck too.
The Russian Government would only be able to get at the Russian servers.
The S7 doesn't have as good a DAC or software.
The S7 is for sale now though?
The S7 is waterproof and has a decent DAC, so I'm hoping the S8 will be good too.
The S7 looks like the best DAC for a waterproof phone.
The S8 does really well in the durability tests.
The S8 has more features than any other phone though.
The S8 is so expensive.
The same guy who says "darta"?
The same number keeps calling me.
The scales say I'm at 163 with some clothes on.
The schedule for TI6 is so good; the games start once I finish work.
The Schitt.
The search and metadata doesn't matter at all if the library is a pathetic tiny poo.
These are adults....
These are gonna be my endgame headphones, except maybe for some CIEMs.
These are great earpads btw Arriving 9 May - 31 May.
These are my endgame.
These aren't just "minor cosmetic imperfection".
These Beats headphones look and feel like cheap Chinese shit.
The second bedroom isn't sealed off from the lounge?
The second course of antibiotics has been effective.
The second hand market of X2s is flooded with lemons.
These fans are amazing and pretty much silent at idle, but now my AIO pump is super noticeable....
These headphones are easily worth over £200 but I got them for only £116.99.
These headphones are fucking perfect in every way.
These headphones are pretty much perfect.
These headphones suck at stock.
The seller sold another one for £117, which is cheaper than the £127 one I bought!
The Sennheisers you linked are open.
These velcro cable ties are fantastic.
The sexy stuff will be on my monitors.
The shitty one.
The shop was okay.
The shortest possible route is 29 miles, and that's not the fastest one.
The show is getting fucking predictable.
The SIM equiv is £5 a month.
The simpler rides are the more dangerous.
The single room is only £390.
The single-threaded speed is so bad.
The size:performance ratio is insane.
The skins are getting ridiculous though.
The smaller the better.
The socket is still soldered in.
The soundcard itself works fine, but a lot of the DAC features are proprietary.
The specs are superior to everything else.
The specs look pretty good. Low motor noise, high RPM range, high airflow and static pressure.
The sport is a complete joke at this point.
The standard Steam refund policy applies to No Man's Sky. There are no special exemptions available. Click here for more detail on the Steam refund policy..
The stock earpads are made of leather and insulate the heat around your ears, so they will get warm over time.
The stock one probably.
The stock pads were pressed up close to my ears, giving them no space, no room to breath, they're made of leather and felt like shit compared to my super comfy K702s and DT770s.
The story missions are actually quite cool.
The strategy says deposit £100 for some reason.
The strats used to beat the bots aren't the same strats that ever get used against humans.
The stupid chair arms aren't adjustable, so they just get in the way.
The stupid decay rules brought me back down to 3k because of inactiviity.
The stupid withdrawal was delayed and then it finally sent it but after I mined more of it.
The sun burns me so bad.
The sun is reflecting off the dashboard into my windshield.
THE SWANS OMG.
The target demographic is obviously 14 year old boys though.
The technology is there.
The temperatures and noise level of my PC are fantastic now.
The term of the loan is 25 years on graduation.
The test system is a piece of shit.
The text doesn't even make any sense.
The textures on the ground and trees look really bad.
The thermal pads I bought are shit though, not thick and sticky enough.
The thermal pads I bought were shit.
The thermal pads I bought were too thin so I had to repurpose the ones from the reference cooler.
The thing is fucking massive.
The things in the left column.
The thing was just sitting on my desk for around 8 months.
The thing with phones is you take them out of the house and take them around with you everywhere and move them a lot so you need them to be rugged.
The ticket is the sunk cost.
The tips are fine actually.
The title says that only the threads were down.
The TI winner will get more $ than the Germany team after winning the FIFA WorldCup.
The tobacco industry causes a lot of pollution too.
The top one has a balance and 1 Tx.
The trailer is good.
The train fucks up a lot.
The transformation of dota?
The tropical one is fucking nice though.
The tutorial said I need a float of at least £50 but I have like £20k.
The tutorial said I need a willy of at least £50 but I have like £20k.
The two games I watch, Dota and CS, there are no dominant nationalities.
The two people typing on one keyboard was funny as fuck.
The UK is just so used to it.
The UK is the most racist country in western europe.
The unit cost and standing charges are higher though.
The USA is both nice and shit at the same time.
The USA political system is really corrupt and inefficient AFAIK.
The V30 looks really good, but it's so expensive.
The value of a GPU is backed by crypto.
The value of crypto and fiat are backed by nothing.
The values vary way too much.
The vendor didn't accept my offer of 108k. They said they want to wait for offers closer to the asking price.
The vendor will likely take it with them when they leave, but I'll find out this weekend.
The virgin one?
The V-Moda Boompro does the job.
The volatility today has been crazy.
The voltage you'll need isn't determined yet.
The voting system is pretty obviously flawed.
The VPN is blocked it seems but pretty much nothing else is.
The VSonic VC1000 looks really good.
The washing machine is in the wrong place.
The washing machine maybe, but a fridge and freezer probably not.
The way he phrased it was like he's not going to arrange any meetings with me because I want to work from home instead of me working from home because I have no meetings..
The wealthy don't want the poor to have any money.
The weather is so sanctimonious today.
The web site?
The website has too many capchas and API limits and other annoying shit.
The weekly rent payments are higher than my monthly mortgage payments.
The weight of the drinks caused the table to fall over and the leaflets went everywhere.
The weird thing is, pornhub was working fine anyway.....
The whole business model is based around p2w.
The whole fucking thing is a joke.
The whole team is in today.
The woman next to me keeps speaking to herself.
The world has changed..
The world's largest military air show is happening near my house tomorrow.
The worst kind of normie.
The worst thing about a laptop is that there's very little you can repair/upgrade.
The worst thing would be if I rush to buy a one bedroom flat that I can barely afford, marry my gf, then she gets pregnant and divorced and I go bankrupt.
The writers of the show are such asses srsly.
The writers sneak it into serious TV shows.
The X2s were super cheap on Amazon.
The XP key is piracy?
They advertised the RAM as 4GB when it's only 3.5.
They advised me to wait until my offer is accepted.
They all come in when the office staff leave here.
They all look like they're based on the same panel.
They allowed it for my colleague's phone because she never got a work phone.
They all think I am a rich white man.
They all want my skins.
They all want to marry me.
They always say "not related to terrorism" but never "not related to people smuggling" or "not related to drugs".
They always talk about ideology and use such a greedy business model whilst brainwashing their customers into defending it.
They are 15GB+ contracts.
They are also super small and my ears touched the side of the headphones and the earpads touched my ear all around the circumfrance.
They are always talking to themselves.
They are bad.
They are better than DT770s AFAIK.
They are cheap IEMs though.
They are collecting money for different Domestic Abuse charities in different offices, but I want my money to go to the one which offers services to men.
They are doing a service around currency.
They are done by individuals.
They are for poor people, they are for gamers, they are for professionals and power users.
They are like the BP of Asia?
They are most efficient so will be profitable for longer.
They are not cracking experts.
They are now.
They aren't all equal in every role.
They aren't as comfortable or nice-sounding as my K702s or DT770s or M50X though.
They aren't comfy at all.
They aren't financial services?
They aren't going to get very high quality candidates IMO; if they are smart they'll see through the BS.
They aren't Google.
They aren't happy about me leaving my account permanently overdrawn.
They aren't hard to drive.
They aren't legally obligated to pay me, right?
They aren't old enough / I'm clean enough for them to be in pretty good condition. Plus, you can replace the earpads for like £3 if you ever need to.
They aren't silent.
They aren't too dissimilar to my DT770s in terms of soundstage and sound quality.
They aren't very clear on this.
They are only ordering them because they built the phone wtf.
They are quite portable.
They are really quiet at idle, but move a shitload of air at load.
THEY ARE SO FUCKING RETARDED.
They are so overrated.
They are superior to my M50X in every way, except for not being foldable.
They are surprisingly small.
They are THE BEST headphones for gaming too; the soundstage is unbeatablew.
They are too expensive to gift.
They are too small....
They are worn now?
They asked for ID, I gave them my ID which clearly said I was 17, but they still sold to me 90% of the time wtf.
They asked me if I wanted them to attempt another delivery lmao.
They asked me to send them an email on Thursday with the days I intend to work from home the following week. They told me it's so they can arrange meetings when I am not in the office. It just seems such a backwards way of doing it that IDK if I'll bother any more..
They attempted to deliver at 09:17 yesterday but told me they couldn't because of a "security issue" wtf?
They auto-exchange "several times a day".
They ban me as soon as I join and ask how to get more FPS.
They banned /r/fatpeoplehate /r/jailbait and /r/incels.
They banned you for that?
They benefit more from government spending*.
They bought them for you?
They burn my mouth.
They buy expensive cars.
They calculate how much each person costs the company with pritning.
They called me a troll.
They can basically take any answer and consider it wrong.
They can be 15 minutes or >2 hours.
They can but they don't.
They can do that without fucking up their knees.
They can probably just get in through the passenger door.
They can't be, patches are constantly launching.
They can't increase resolution and stay within bandwidth constraints without lowering refresh rate or getting Display Port 2.0.
They can't just downgrade my service and then ask for more money to put it back!?!??
They can transfer to Coinbase instantly now.
They cheap out on stuff like switches so they wear down faster and don't perform as well.
They colour the sound a little and don't have any real benefits.
They come with lots of tips.
They cost £2,190 to purchase.
They could be. ESEA secretly patched in Bitcoin miners into its software.
They could be worth nothing tomorrow.
They could fuck the young harder by putting a minimum age on inheritance.
They could just be sleeping.
They could never confirm my identity.
They could never hear my DT770s or Custom One Pros.
They couldn't confirm my identity.
They couldn't tell me why, I asked them if it's because of my salary and they told me it could be.
They could prosecute me for mortgage fraud.
They could put me on an expensive SVR and make it impossible to find a new mortgage and I would be unable to pay it.
They create 'standard journeys' which are less miles than the shortest possible route.
They deliver my shit to me.
They'd get stolen by crypto thieves.
They'd have to unsolder the SSD from the motherboard.....
They didn't ask me for that on the phone last night.....
They didn't design encryption.
They didn't extend my contract and my mum told me I'm lazy and useless and can't even hold down a supermarket job.
They didn't notify me and I only found out when I queried it in chat.
They didn't want the call centre's number.
They'd lookup internal wallets first to see if they can do it internally.
They do?
They do a good meal deal according to rory.
They do if they are Christian.
They do if your'e borrowing the maximum 4.5 times your salary and it's one bedroom and you tell the bank you have no dependants.....
They do more harm to the economy than good.
They do more useful shit than a fucking Google Home.
They don't fit on properly.
They don't have as good sound quality as Fidelio X2s, don't have as good isolation as SE215 or sound quality, don't have the soundstage or detail of my K702s.
They don't have GCSEs up north?
They don't have interest in esports, they just play the game casually like candy crush.
They don't look like a single object.
They don't look terrible, but Dunu DN-1000 is probably better for that sort of money.
They don't reduce your minimum payments though.
They don't sit on my ears properly.
They don't sound awful.
They don't supply to my area :(.
They don't want a separate financial system that they aren't in control of.
They don't want to invest more into it.
They don't warn you before they turn up either, so I'd have to sit at home for days waiting for it.
They do shit like that because it's hard to market this stuff visually.
They'd think I'm an idiot.
They engineer the best headphones in the world.
They exchange one currency to another.
They failed to deliver again today wtf.
They fold up, but the headband will wear out really fast.
They fold up nicely.
They fold up really nicely, your gf can take them on your travels.
They fold up so cool!
They fold up so small.
They forgot their password and our password reset function isn't working.
They fucked up and Reddit took over.
They fucked up my internet when they installed this new web security shit.
They fuck up my car and refuse to compensate me.
They gave her a choice, either lose 50% of her salary or be fired.
They gave me a shit Vodafone phone though.
They generally won't last as long as a Logitech.
They get no commission if nobody is hired.
They get the cards before they even hit retail.
They get uncomfy after a while because the foam is trying to expand inside my ear.
They get what they deserve.
They give me so much.
They give you a competitive advantage.
They go red when they drink alcohol.
They got a super cheap trip out of it because they aren't paying me the amount we agreed on.
They had a bunch of cables connected to an aux cable so I could plug my phone in.
They had better compensate me if they lost the parcel.
They had lunch early, wasn't my fault.
They had the opportunity to turn them into really great games but they just turned super casual.
They had to compromise with the conservatives to go with Alternate Vote instead of Proportional Representation.
They harass me on the street.
They hate foreigners?
They hate people with an alternate opinion.
They have a lot more potential than Audio-Technica made them.
They have an Android app now, and a 5.0 update coming, and an Android USB Chromecast type thingy.
They have a removable cable and fold up!!!!
They have a shitload of failsafes on rollercoasters.
They have been for over a year now.
They have deep bass?
They have different stats and items, some will be better in certain roles and matchups than others.
They have "good tickling bass" and "noise cancellation" apparently.
They have like zero isolation.
They have Neoscrypt.
They have no patience.
They have no social awareness at all ffs. When they try to be nice to me I tell them to fuck off.
They have nothing better to do.
They have nothing to match the performance of the 1070/1080/1080TI right now.
They haven't been spending much of it, so they have £30,000 now.
They haven't even shipped it yet.
They have sniffer dogs all over the place looking for terrorists.
They have strengths that none of my other headphones have.
They have the weirdest fucking accents.
They have to exhaust air out of the building.
They include the PC and all accessories.
They increased the comfort of my M50s by over 9000%.
They increased the tax on insurance.
They just did it....
They just didn't turn up with the money.
They just gave Westeros to the dead.
They just have way better isolation.
They just lack the mids and highs that my DT770s can produce.
They just launched and it's still in beta.
They just took lots of famous pop artists and put them into commercials and now they have a massive brand.
They keep refunding me without having to send items back.
They keep removing features.
They keep voting for him.
They kept asking me about all my betting transactions.
They kept giving me my dole even though I was working.
They kept me waiting for two weeks and I made an offer on a flat and instructed my solicitor.
They kept paying me benefits even when I was in work.
They kept trying to type it into google and it led them to the wrong site lmao.
They kicked my older brother out when he was 16.
They'll be in a bunker somewhere.
They'll choose a new criticism probably.
They'll cool my GPU better.
They'll give you a current account but probably won't offer you an overdraft.
They'll kick it up a notch soon.
They'll make their own UK.
They'll never get into power.
They'll only look back 6 years.
They'll redeliver my headphones in 2-3 days, but fuck knows when I'm getting my CPU cooler.
They'll sell for the same amount I guess.
They'll start with porn so that any protestors can be dismissed as perverts.
They locked my account and told me to send them some identity documents.
They look bad because they're bulky to cool off the high TDP components.
They look different.
They looked like one really fat man hahahahhaa.
They look fucking awful.
They look incredible.
They look like DT990s.
They look really good.
They made millions of people open their countdown page then autorefreshed it.
They made the headphones easy to lose so they can get a revenue from it.
They made them feel so good!
They make good CPUs.
They make the weapon OP to sell skins.
They might be faulty though....
They might find it cheaper to hire a hitman for less than they pay my salary.
They might give her more or less than 50%.
They might sacrifice your flat for jihad.
They might still be the best deal then.
They might think I have a gambling addiction problem and can't manage my money properly.
They must have some crazy good pension scheme or something?>.
They nailed the folding mechanism.
They need to get out of their ivory tower.
They need to get rid of the fees too.
They need to keep the MAFFIA out.
They need to learn against humans.
They need to learn from humans.
They need to sort their shit out.
THEY NEED TO UP THE OFFLINE DOWNLOAD LIMIT FROM 3,333 TO 10K OR MORE OMFG.
They never used to.
They often don't tell me what they actually want, they just say "do a vlookup".
They often partially block Western services. This is to make Chinese people think that Western services are unreliable and make them prefer Chinese services.
They only come once your life is in danger lmao.
They only downloaded games ~45 minutes long?
They only support one IBAN per user.
They only want to empower people...... to whip them when they get it wrong, training is to expensive due to budgets. Top managers are clueless talk is very cheap within the management..
They owe me money from the past two years.
They own resources.
They paid £2 to use the heater at Thorpe Park to dry off. I got bored waiting for them and climbed inside. They claim I now owe them £1 for using it wtf.
They probably have a similar sound signature to Beats, but way better audio quality, comfort and soundstage.
They probably own more value of real estate than I will ever own at any point in my life.
They probably won't even compensate me the price of the game.
They produce some excellent consumer cans.
They promised 1080p back in 2005 and they're still not there.
they're*.
They're 100X more comfy than the stock M50 earpads.
They're 2p.
They're all a bunch of twats.
They're all old pervs who are so excited when a young person is there.
They're all shit.
They're all within a 40 minute commute of my workplace.
They really are shit.
They really liked it when I approached them.
They really only care about appealing to the old voters who own houses and have good pensions.
They really should give everyone two votes. So I can vote for both sides and people will stop flaming me.
They're already at capacity, and investing in more is risky because it's dependent on the crypto mining industry.
They're also disputing the £37 they agreed to pay me weeks ago for the Thorpe Park trip. We got back yesterday and now they're saying they don't want to pay me because they estimate my car running costs are less than I asked them for..
They're also the best gaming headphones if you do any of that.
They're always hardest to talk to.
They're assholes.
They're barely used.
They're both good addons though.
They're checking it is a suitable place for my cousin to live because her parents are doing heroin and can't look after her.
They're costing my ebay seller so much money.
They're designed to cancel out constant noise.
They're doing it at only 0.2%.
They're doing permanent damage to their knees.
They're earbuds I think?
They're either godlike or they're retarded.
They're either stupid or assholes or both.
They're far comfier because your ears don't actually touch the earpads and the only contact your head has with the headphones is on the headband and a larges velour circumfrances around the sides of your head.
They're for plebs.
They're fucking comfy though.
They're fucking retarded.
They're fucking up my deliveries AND I CANT UNDERSTAND WHY.
They're getting too casual.
They're giving me a full refund of everything I've paid them.
They're going to announce the winner soon.
They're going to lose profits to their competitors.
They're going to send it with a different courier.
They're gonna contact Hermes for me.
They're good.
They're good headphones.
They're good when you're unemployed.
They're great for the office though, but I might just use my M50X for that too now.
They're great office headphones.
They're great when my home is quiet.
They're hard to get in benching position, and often aren't heavy enough unless you go to a good gym.
They're increasing the price of imported goods!!!!
They're in like-new condition.
They're in very good condition.
They rejected Bernie.
They're just a retarded compromise.
They're just being stingy twats.
They're just cheap hotels.
They're just displays in front of the bikes.
They're just imaginary internet points.
They're just not as comfy or have as good sound quality as my Beyers.
They're just really good at marketing to plebs ffs.
They're launching a new site.
They're like a strawberry milkshake.
They're like the opposite of my K702s.
They're looking for terrorists mostly, but the dogs can smell drugs too.
They're lowend.
They're M50X I bought from Amazon.
They're made in Germany too.
They're making low-emission cars a lot more expensive to run.
They're making me lots of money.
They're making themselves look like authoritarians.
They're making us use Zscaler now but I can't get it to work on my desktop.
They're more stable releases.
They're more versatile.
They're my endgame headphones.
They're never getting her back now.
They're not very professional, they would get sacked if they did this at any other workplace.
They rent shop doors.
They're obsessed with investing in funds and mortgages.
They're obviously just hired extras and not her friends.
They're only 16ohms.
They're only allowed to post stupid shit like that on the first of April.
They're only MX Reds ffs.
They're on sale now.
They're open cans but with lots of fun bass.
They're open cans that are actually good for EDM and kpop.
They're paying new people more than me.
They're pointless without nuclear missiles.
They're pretty awesome though.
They're pretty bad for high refreshrate gaming.
They're pretty sucky for gaming.
They're probably already working on it.
They're probably better than mine.
they're probably busy answering phone calls from Overwatch customers.
They're probably even worse than Beats.
They're probably not on Windows7/10 then.
They're probably the most popular headphones in the world.
They're really fucking hard to drive even at only 62ohms.
They're really good.
They're really good fans.
They're really shy though.
They're running all the CPUs with a GTX 1080.
They reset progresses every few months by increasing the level cap or some shit.
They're shit.
They're shit anyway.
They're shit compared to Valve.
They're similar price it seems.
They're similar to the Fidelio X2s AFAIK.
They're slow as fuck and try to pay out less than they should.
They're smarter than a LoL player.
They're smelling for gunpowder and stuff.
They're so big and bulky.
They're so expensive though.
They're so good.
They're so incompotent.
They're sooooooooooo comfy.
They're so pretty omfg.
They're so useless.
They're still comfortable enough....
They're still interviewing.
They're still really cheap though.
They're such fascists in there.
They're super cheap.
They're super comfy and isolate really well.
They're supposed to be a lot comfier than universal IEMs.
They're supposed to deliver it.
They're supposed to have better isolation than any other IEM on the market other than some customs, but they're deep insertion.
They're that bad, huh?
They're the cheapest 38Mb.
They're the only thing that gives me joy in a life of misery.
They're thin but not uncomfortable, they're comfortable but isolate well, they're soft but don't pick up all the hairs and dirt.
They're too expensive.
They're "trash tier" now because they have a problem with the production.
They're trolling btw.
They're very nice headphones though.
They're visiting a completely different culture with a completely different language and they are naturally quite submissive so it makes sense that they are really shy.
They're way better than your HD6XX.
They're way overrated.
They're weird people.
They said Bitcoin is worth $5,000 wtf.
They said it almost a year ago now.
They said it was because they are too busy to try something new at the moment. Maybe I should ask them again in a month?
They said they'd pay for the damage and asked for a quote, but now they're saying the quote is too high and I shouldn't have parked near their skip..
They said they will send an engineer. wtf is the engineer going to do?
They said they would.
They say all men hate women.
They say I am the FPS troll.
They say that if my income in 28 day periods is below the threshold, then I get UC.
They say they're not for vegans ffs.
They say they will have to replace all my seals, but that it is not covered under the warranty.
They say we're all shit because we're men wtf.
They seem to be doing 10% at the start of each month.
They send me so many fucking emails.
They sent you two as well?
they seriously think the supermarkets are charging for bags to make more money?
They set the interest rate to target inflation rate.
They shit on your M50X.
They should at least be good.
They should ban people who are playing below 60fps.
They should have sent you in January, so you could go to Starladder LAN!
They should hire Korean grils to write S3.
They should hire more staff.
They should just pay it.
They should make RO:GO.
They should really change that.
They should start offering free VPNs.
They silent gubbed me too, the bastards.
They sing shitty songs.
They sound fantastic on my Creative E5 AMPDAC.
They sound like dogshit compared to my Fidelio X2s.
They sound really bad, but usable for free I guess.
They sound really nice, and have fantastic build quality.
They sound way better than my DT770s.
They spend more on marketing then engineering.
They started making us put a capital letter and a symbol and a number in there too.....
They stopped reporting subscriber numbers because it's upsetting shareholders.
They suck everywhere else.
They suck with the modmic because they have a curved mesh, so the modmic won't stick on properly.
They taste amazing, but they cost a shitload compared to McDonalds.
They text me today too.
They think being fat is healthy and that society is the problem and not them lmao.
They think foreigners should go back where they came from.
They think I'll be profiting even paying me £33 wtf.
They think I only planned the day out to make a profit wtf.
They think "oh dave will solve all my spreadsheet problems with a VLOOKUP".
They think only working with one other person and not working with the rest of the company offputs people.
They think they're better than us because they don't eat meet wtf.
They told me I need to walk more to build up bone density.
They told me it's against the law to send me the product before launch wtf.
They told me I was too slow or some shit.
They told me they'd call me at some point on the day.
They told me they've added an extra step to routing to increase stability, so I got 10mbit less bandwidth and double the pings.
They told me they will refund me.
They told me to ask the DVLA.
They told you that you don't do the job that you do?
They took a payment of £5000.
They took my money and I never got anything.
They took way too much money from me.
They tricked me again.
They've come top 8.
They've gone downhill in the last couple of decades too. Their older games were better than their new ones.
They've got some backend problem.
They've probably bled working-age people dry at this point.
They've purposefully tried to destroy and discredit the competition.
They've shut down.
They voted to join the EU and now they want to vote to leave wtf?
They wanted to stay in the UK and Europe.
They want it all and they want it now.
They want Putin to take over England.
They want to lose half their readers?
They want us to lock our screens all the time too, which just makes things worse.
They were £39 new a while ago.
They were all over the place, it was crazy!
They were doing giveaways for every worker.
They were doing the exact same thing.
They were going for £50 on ebay and scan and they were in amazing condition according to reviews.
They were gonna give me less than I should get.
They were never £70.
They were safe behind the wall.
They were shit, you wouldn't want them,.
They will probably just say I have too much capital to give me any money anyay.
They won't accept the calculations because "paying for wear and tear" is ridiculous.
They won't be able to discriminate you for your appearance properly.
They won't be betting.
They won't be released for a while yet.
They won't let me call them.
They won't pay out though.
They won't refund the interest, but you'll get your £6 back.
They work at Tesco.
They would get sued so hard.
They wouldn't release my Ncase from customs until I paid it.
The Zowie GTF-X is the lowest friction mousemat on the market.
Thieves are always console peasants.
Thin and crispy.
Thin and crispy Mighty Meteor.
Things like decoy pricing, individual value, etc.
Think about it for a second.
Think about the employee discounts!!!
Thinking of getting a 240hz gsync monitor soon.
Think it's about £100.
This app i good.
This browser is so good!
This build has been a fuckload of work.
This cable is wayyyyyyyyy better.
This card is a monster.
This channel moves too fast for me to keep up.
this chinese fuck.
This coin is also very power efficient, so we can compete with American and Chinese miners easier.
This coin is so good.
This coin is THE FUTURE of GPU mining.
This country is so fucked.
This CPU is fucking powerful.
This flat is so good value, that I'm afraid of not getting an opportunity like this again.
This flat is so weird, I buy 75% of it and then live in the remaining 25% for free.
This fucking GPU cooler is a fucking bitch.
This game doesn't seem to have enough depth to become a big esport.
This game is incredibly badly optimised.
This guy lives near me and he's going to bring it to my house tonight.
This is amazing.
This is an American politics thing, right?
This is a next-gen ASIC-resistant coin.
This is a once in a lifetime investment.
This is getting a bit NSFW.
This is going to be a fun few weeks.
This is going to take forever.
This is going to take longer than I thought.
This is gonna be nervewracking on Sunday.
This is how I'm always up on slots.
This is my first 'real' job.
This isn't a business keyboard, this is an OEM keyboard.
This is really beneficial for people paying hundreds of £.
This is ridiculous, literally 27% of my gains from Nutmeg go into their fees.
This is slower than my mobile connection.
This is so gay.
This is too NSFW for me.
This is what GRLC should have been.
This is why I don't buy <5GHz CPUs.
This is why I don't use a hardware wallet.
This is why I told my supplier not to deliver £3,000 worth of graphics cards whilst I'm gone.
THIS IS WHY WE SHOULD ALL BE USING LINUX!!!!!
This is why you should do matched betting.
This keyboard feels so bad to type on.
This one is delidded and pre-binned so it's guaranteed to hit 5GHz.
This one's been killed 6 times, you don't see him bitching about it..
This PC is shit even if I only run 1 tab though.
this policy..
This portfolio will predominantly be invested in bonds, but will also hold equities in smaller.
This retailer is fucking shit.
This set will be really useful for building and upgrading PCs too.
This shit is why I pirate.
This shitty 8GB Windoze laptop filled with bloatware struggles to run 200 tabs anyway.
This stupid internet.
This sucks.
This time I arranged it myself.
This weekend maybe?
This whole thing was a massive bail out.
This will ruin the show.
This woman keeps trying to phone me and messaging me on Lync.
This woman keeps trying to phone me and messaging me on Lynch.
This work laptop they gave me is shit.
Thorin Duncan Shields.
Those are closed-back, they aren't really comparable.
Those are high specs!
Those aren't built-in functions?
Those aren't commonly spoken words.
Those are on-ears.
Those are some heavy stones. You'll need about 14 of them to equal what my weight was at the start of the year.
Those are some srsly good phones.
Those energy drinks have so much sugar in them.
Those figures are always so inflated.
Those figures you linked could be created by 1m people or 13m.
Those forums have been obsolete for a long time.
Those fucking prawns man.
Those fucks.
Those headphones look fucking amazing.
Those integrated desks are always so bad.
Those look extremely similar to my tips.
Those look like fun headphones, like the Fidelo X2s!!!!
Those lyrics are fucking stupid omg.
Those people are gonna be so fucked when they get deported thanks to the UK government.
Those people think that unemployed people are the mouthbreathers.
Those purchase advice threads don't really help, because I am looking for something so specific.
Those scores are rather meaningless btw.
Thought it was only like £10.
Thought so, you sound very drunk.
THREE!
Three course meal, all-day catering.
THREE FUCKING JAMES IN A ROW.
Through my stepdad's work.
Thus absolving him from his contractual obligations.
thx m9.
thx m9 but not quite there yet.
TI6?
TI6 prizepool.
TI6 prizepool $20,047,768.
TI6 will be 60FPS on Twitch, about fucking time.
TIL you can take bigger dumps when not on probation.
Time for some cardio.
Time to go back to bed?
Time to quit my job.
Tinnitus?
tiny puny HansProleman.
t is possible that you had a student loan deduction in a pay period where you earned over the monthly or weekly threshold, but over the whole year your income did not exceed £17,335. This might happen if you receive a bonus payment or work overtime..
TL,DR:.
TLDR?
TLDW?
TL:DW you need at least 300FPS.
Tn.
Toals is so shit I barely used them.
To Amsterdam?
To a shit stack?
Tobacco companies create jobs.
Tobacco is really bad for your health.
To balance things out.
To be fair, a comment saying just "dick" doesn't really add much to the conversation and you deserve to be downvoted for it..
To be fair, everyone has strong preference for asian.
To be PM you must be in the strict age bracket of 40-60.
To clarify, the office gym I use only has a smith machine.
Today.
Today could be a big drop too.
Today he thinks I am a horrible person ripping him off.
Today I am wearing my M50X but without a cable.
Today I called them and they told me there was a problem with my payment.
To diversify my balance.
To get 999FPS in CS:GO.
To get all that cashback.
To get those extra gains.
To help towards my car and house.
To help with buying my flat and furnishing it.
To keep everyone cool in the shade.
To keep it under 80.
Told to remove all the formatting rules instead of just editing them.
To maintain my body.
Tom Cruise?
To mount the phone in fornt of me.
To my pension fund.
Tonight.
To not pay people on the months they start and stop work?
Tony Blair and George Bush would get upper class.
Too bad Hermes beats them on price.
Too bad I can't speak German.
Too bad I don't use any.
Too bad you can only get it on the iphone.
Took all my accrued holiday pay in one go.
Took hours though.
Took me like an hour.
Took the day off.
Too late.
Too late, I've moved on to WhatsApp.
too late now.
Too long and I'll be too thirsty.
Too many exogenous variables.
Too many problems with it.
Too much.....
Too much of an unnecessary luxury right now. I need to focus on my savings and upgrading my PC for Overwatch..
Too much time and effort.
Topcashback and Quidco <3.
To plug them into my V-Moda Boompro.
To port software back to the main release.
To read my messages I guess.
To replace all the formula they replaced with constants.
Torrenting isn't necessarily piracy.
Torrent them?
To sit at a PC.
TOSLINK isn't analogue?
To smoke/bbq.
To the headphones.
TO THE MOON.
to them your just a pleb.
To use for business purposes.
to wat?
Toyota Aygo?
TO ZE MOON.
Trade Satoshi down?
Trade Satoshi is a shit exchange.
Trade Satoshi is fucking shit.
Trade Satoshi is very slow to market movements, unlike a bigger exchange such as gdax.
Trade volume is crazy right now.
Trading hats.
Traffic isn't an issue if you leave for work at 9AM.
Trains are too unreliable and expensive.
Transaction fees encouraged internal wallets.
Transactions are fast, this is way better than BTC.
Transfer £3k to my bank account and I'll send it with DPD.
Transfer it to Moneyfarm.
Transfers are delayed on MPH atm, I'll check if it's going through a bit later.
Transfer to a low management fee global index tracker.
Transmission is the best IMO.
Transporting some chairs to give to my grandparents.
Travelling when overweight sounds like a bad idea to me.
TREE STYLE TABS.
Tree Style Tabs is amazing.
Tree Style Tabs seems less "crashy" on Quantum btw.
Tree surgery.
Tree Tab Style is old as fuck now.
Tree Tab Style seems to work better on FF57. I guess they focused on this version and neglected the old FF.
TRhat's pretty expensive.
Tried three browsers, stil can't get it to work.
TRIGGERED.
TRIP TO POOLE NEXT WEEK.
Trolling is illegal now.
True Linux masterraces play Dota and not shitty LoL.
Trump got elected because the mouth breathers got fed up of people with degrees sneering at them.
Trump will get elected and start WW3.
Trust me, that CPU cooler is not overkill, you need all the cooling and clockspeed you can get.
Try and figure out wtf I'm gonna do with my money.
Try buying a good pair of headphones without buying another good pair every couple of months.
try 'curl --help' or 'curl --manual' for more information.
Try Currys and AO.com.
Try doing three weightlifting sessions and two cardio sessions.
Try full fat milk and nuts if you want to gain weight easily.
Try gumtree.
Trying to do it in a way to evade suspiscion.
Trying to fill every use case.
Trying to find S9E11 of IASIF is so difficult, for example.
Trying to fuck with the audience.
Trying to get 500+ FPS in CS:GO is really fucking hard.
Trying to get it up to 999.
Trying to get some 1070 TIs but it's so hard.
Trying to lose my Betway deposit.
Trying to undercut people where I can without losing too much price.
Try matched betting.
Try not to dwell on the past.
Try overvolting/underclocking the GPU.
Try skipping.
Try that in the UK and you'll be laughed at by estate agents as you fail their affordability test.
Try the crosstrainer if your legs are getting too tired, and workout using your arms more.
Try the GPU in another PC.
Try the website of the local housing association too.
Try this.
Try to find one with a 3310 sensor.
Try to make sure you're good with at least one hero in every role, so you can be useful to your team.
Try undervolting then.
Try unplugging them and plugging them in again, it might be that they're loose.
Try updating the GPU driver.
Try upping the power target and lowering core/mem slightly. You might still get a positive OC.
Try using DDU then installing an updated display driver.
Try using one of the links below ....
TSB is doing cashback for switching ATM.
TSB is the best main account ATM IMO because of the 5% contactless cashback.
t-shirt.
TTS SNSD Girl's Generation So Nyeo Shi Dae FIGHTING!!!!
TTS So Nyeo Shi Dae.
Tube amps aren't the best IMO.
tumblr is shit.
Tunisia was a great budget holiday destination.
Turn it down if I need less.
Turn my Ncase into a wind tunnel.
Turok.
tutanota.com looks good.
tutenota.com looks good.
TV is for filthy casuals.
TV is for losers.
TV news is the worse.
TWICE.
TWICE?
TWICE Cheer Up.
TWICE FIGHTING.
twife?
Twitch.
Twitch, Youtube, Netflix, Filmon, etc.
Two 24" monitors.
two adapters*.
Two adaptors even....
TWO CABLES.
Two crashes.
Two for Tuesday from Dominoes then order a extra from somewhere else.
Two interviews this week.
Two is so limiting.
Two on the front, one on the back.
TWO PLANES.
Two players in the same match could have completely different weather and terrain.
Two weeks until Overwatch beta omfg!!!!!!!!!
tx fee?
ty.
Tying up my cash.
ty m9.
Typical Daily Mail reader.
UAG case.
Ublock, Treetabstyle and Lastpass are the important ones.
Ubuntu 16.04 is an LTS.
ue&factor%5Bbkv_hr%5D=0.0&factor%5Bbkv_p%5D=0.0&factor%5Bcost%5D=0.15&sort=Profitability24&volume=0&revenue=24h&factor%5Bexchanges%5D%5B%5D=&factor%5Bexchanges%5D%5B%5D=bittrex&factor%5Bexchanges%5D%5B%5D=bleutrade&factor%5Bexchanges%5D%5B%5D=btc_e&factor%5Bexchanges%5D%5B%5D=bter&factor%5Bexchanges%5D%5B%5D=c_cex&factor%5Bexchanges%5D%5B%5D=crypto.
ughhhh.
Ughhhhh I can get cash easily, I just have to minimise my opportunity cost.
Ughhhh my gf's visa expires soon too.
Ughhhh no.
ughhhh our IT usage policy does not mention anything about websites which make money or RDP or anything.
Ughhh no I've received no meausrable recognition.
Ughhh we never catch each other at the same time.
Ugly old woman.
uhhhh I mean screwdriver set.
uh oh.
UK?
UK, China and Korea fought back.
UK, China and Korea obviously.
UK Government pervert list?
UK people are racist too.
Ultrawides can't quite replace dual monitors yet IMO.
Ultrawides might be too expensive.
Ummmm.
Ummm no, HyperX has a shit mic.
Ummm no Koreans are not dominant in Dota or CS.
Ummm no lol I was thinking about upgrading to Ryzen but it won't give me an FPS boost.
Unban me from #depression.
unban me from #ubuntu-offtopic pls.
Uncertainty = risk.
Uncomortable.
Unconfident Asians are cute.
Under 0.5% I think, I can't remember exactly.
under 25 insurance excess is so high.
Underclocking would be the easiest fix if it works.
Underpaying our mileage claims.
Under the cliffs near Saltdean?
Undervolting will likely just make the problem worse.
Underwater welding pays a lot.
unelectable?
unemployed people really need to get a life.
unemployment benefits!!!!
unencrypted wtf?
Unfortunately not, the code is applied automatically and our system would recognise you had a pre-existing account.
Unfortunately, there's a missmatch in the drivers, and the right side is about 4db louder in certain sections in the bass [60hz and bellow] and throughout the midrange [2 - 6Khz],.
Unhealthyness is bad.
Unhealthyness is not.
Uninstalling Flash helps too.
UNITS OF WAT.
Universal Credit?
Universal Credit is too conditional on 40 hours of job search.
unlawful for you to read, copy, distribute, disclose or otherwise make use of the information herein" why the fuck did I find it in a google search then.
Unless he's an outliar.
Unless HTC or Sony come out with something better.
Unless I go to Brighton or something.
Unless I'm working from home then I wake up at 08:58.
Unless I send it as a letter I guess?
Unless it's Apple?
Unless it's a statistical certainty.
Unless it's clocked super low at stock.
Unless it's really really big.
Unless my gf fucks up my plans.
Unless MyHermes fucks up again.
Unless rory wants to buy me one?
Unless someone advertises it as ex-mining.
Unless that's the wrong hotel.
Unless they are fat/disabled.
Unless you buy one of these hybrid graphics cards.
Unless you convince me otherwise I guess.
Unless you don't have walls.
Unless you find me any good cashback deals.
Unless you have so much money and your security is so valuable.
unless your a Korean girl I'm not interested m9.
Unless your rent is £200 a month?
Unlike crypto, steam skins have real world use.
Unlike my dickhead friends, I fulfil my contracted legal obligations.
Unlike my M50X which is a very distinctive position.
Unlike my work laptop which fucking frustrates me when it crashes and I have to reboot it.
Unlimited for £20 a month.
unpixelated Japanese is sick?
Unplug each cable one by one.
Unplug from the PSU.
Unplug it.
Unplug the cables.
Unscrew completely, or just a little?
Until 16.04 and Overwatch.
Until America is a much more peaceful country, gun control should be increased.
Until then I'll just buy a better monitor.
Up and down like a fucking see saw.
Up north you can buy houses for £50k.
Up to £50 Free In-Play Bet on Liverpool v Arsenal.
Up to £6k IIRC.
uranium.
USA?
USA always has to be #1.
USA isn't in EU and look how fucked up their politics are.
USA is only one more party.
USA should get rid of party politics.
Use a phone booth?
use a virtual screen for collab.
Use comparison sites.
Used cars are better value.
Used the wrong IRC command sry.
used to go back in time to decrypt previously transmitted messages.".
Use encryption.
Use ethernet.
Useful if you have values super far apart.
Use headphones then.
Use it for work.
Use keepa, it's better.
Use Lastpass.
Useless for the office and noisy environments.
Use live exchange rates for each timestamp.
Use --lookup-gay=3.
use mine.
Users shouldn't be typing passwords in manually anyway IMO. Facebook is just supporting bad practices and stopping people from using password managers.
Use the function key.
Use your holiday days then.
Use your student email and get it for £5.
Using Bitcoin as the primary currency had so many problems though.
Using CNV7 atm on Nicehack.
Using four stacks of A4 paper atm.
Using fully standardized components.
Using gaming OC not mining OC.
Using it for AKG K702 and Beyer Custom One Pro mostly.
Using my CPU whilst mining decreases my hash rate by like 50%.
Using my ears.
Using my office laptop phone.....
Using student loan.
Using Synapse?
Using their prices... how do you know the prices are efficient?
Usually a game will have a packet loss counter like ping and FPS.
Usually it's £320.
Usually it's my wife who wants the sex though.
Usually it's recommended not to do anything too strenuous when sick.
usually spending extra on premium RAM isn't worth the money but OW is weird.
Usually the man pays.
Usually to store the brain, mouth, nose, eyes, etc.
Usually we talk about headphones, kpop and money.
Usually when people are sarcastic on Reddit they end their sentence with /s.
Usually whilst not trying to spy on everyone though.
Usually with a GPU crash the driver resets itself and you recover without crashing the entire system.
Usually you have to sign up for the housing register, but now you can just buy 25% of a flat and enjoy subsidised rent on the 75%.
Usually you need to communicate in these sort of games.
ut the dust build-up..
u wot m9.
V20 has no waterproofing and a shit battery though.
v2_hr%5D=64000.0&factor%5Blrev2_p%5D=190.0&ns=true&factor%5Bns_hr%5D=1400.0&factor%5Bns_p%5D=190.0&lbry=true&factor%5Blbry_hr%5D=460.0&factor%5Blbry_p%5D=190.0&bk2bf=true&factor%5Bbk2b_hr%5D=2750.0&factor%5Bbk2b_p%5D=190.0&bk14=true&factor%5Bbk14_hr%5D=4350.0&factor%5Bbk14_p%5D=210.0&pas=true&factor%5Bpas_hr%5D=1700.0&factor%5Bpas_p%5D=210.0&bkv=tr.
V30 or S8 are best.
valid reasons for checking your internet usage include suspicions that you.
Value for money and shit.
value of your home that was funded.
Valve are really pushing it hard.
Valve gave Icefrog control over the Dota 2 project which is why Dota was ported to a new engine without casualising anything.
Valve has done that with CS:GO guns recently....
Valve has only been catering to the filthy casuals in TF2.
Valve has proven you can make a shit load of money without being unfair to users.
Valve is leading development of VR.
Valve is more successful than Donald Trump's business.
Valve is updating the maps to try and make the game look more modern.
Valve just released the new Inferno in CS:GO.
Valve never whines about piracy.
Valve won't be working with them again.
Variance of what?
Varies depending on how many weeks there are in the month.
VAT.
VAT on electricity isn't 20%.
Veganism doesn't cause weight loss lmao.
velour earpads and remove the cable locking system.
velour is best IMO.
Velour is comfier too.
Versus is fun, especially with the competitive mod or L4D1, but the game gets repetitive fast in its current state.
Vertcoin has really low transaction fees.
Very good.
Very good price:performance.
Very immature, rory.
Very light stuff.
Very profound.
Very rarely.
Very rarely do I find an album where I like every single song.
Very very few people will want to buy a brand new diesel car in 2040.
Very well.
VGA is so last millenium.
VGA wtf that's fucking ancient technology.
video stream quality is so poor that it doesn't matter anyway.
Vietnam girls are fit.
Vincent van Gogh?
ViperFX won't make a bad DAC good.
Virgin is for virgins.
Virtual horses.
Virtual machines on a gaming rig.
Virtual reality.
Visa expires.
Visiting another office.
Vive looks better.
Vladmir Putin wanted Donald Trump to win.
V-Moda Boompro FTW.
V-Moda Boompro is better for gaming IMO.
VMs are cool.
Vodafone.
Vodafone isn't big?
Voice chat.
Voicemail never says anything that a text can't.
Volume is more important.
Vote for Conservative so they can bomb middle eastern countries to keep our children safe.
Voting is for losers.
VPN.
VPN + citrix I think.
VP vs EG is starting.
Vulkan>DX12 obviously.
Vulkan support is being added to Dota 2 -- probably sometime NEXT WEEK. The following depots have been added..
VW engine?
W10 on home PC and W7 on work PC.
Wait a bit first.
Wait, are you a girl?!?!?
Wait for 10k definitely.
Wait for it to sell before making another sell order.
Waiting for my BTC to come back.
Waiting for ranked to start again.
Waiting until 0.15BTC is optimal.
Wait, what money?
walked off for 5 mins.
Walking takes so much time though.
Wanking?
Wanna be flatmates?
Wanna be friends on Spotify?
Wanna be Master or Grand Master.
Wanna buy a 4690K?
Wanna buy a 4690K and RAM and motherboard?
Wanna buy a GTX 970?
Wanna buy a Sound Blaster E5?
Wanna buy my Beyerdynamic DT770s?
Wanna buy my DT770s?
Wanna buy my Fiio E10K £30+P&P?
Wanna buy my M50X?
Wanna buy my M50X? I've barely even used them.
Wanna buy some audiophile cans?
Wanna buy some DT770s with new EDT 770 SG earpads?
Wanna buy some LTC?
Wanna buy some really nice headphones?
Wanna do a phone swap?
Wanna get a group membership with me?
Wanna go halves on a masternode with me?
Wanna have a LAN party?
Wanna invest in a masternode with me?
Wanna make £100?
Wanna make an Overwatch team with me?
Wanna meet up?
Wanna open a Nationwide account? You can earn £200 if I refer you.
Wanna play Battlerite with me and Bulwark?
Wanna play Overwatch with me?
wanna play Overwatch with me and Bulwark?
Wanna play Overwatch with me and rory when it launches?
Wanna play OW tonight?
Wanna play pub gee with me and HansProleman?
wanna play PUBG tonight?
Wanna play some OW next week?
Wanna play with me?
Wanna put it in a UAG case.
Wanna skype each other with our new mics later?
Wanna switch to Nationwide? We get £100 each.
Wanna switch to Nationwide? You can get £200.
Want a referral code for a free £100?
Wanted to be sure it wasn't fraud.
Wanted to go on the darkweb to browse drug marketplaces.
Want me to build you a 5GHz system?
Want me to check if I have a PIA referral code?
Want me to coach you?
Want me to scan and email my medical records over to you?
Want me to send you a £200 Nationwide referral?
Want to be friends on Signal?
Want to buy an mitx case and CPU cooler?
Want to buy M50X?
Want to buy mine?
Want to buy my DT770s?
Want to buy my like-new M50X?
Want to buy some garlic????
Want to buy some garlic tonight?
Want to buy some GRLC?
Want to come see my flat?
Want to go to Tortila?
Want to invest with Ratesetter and get a big bonus?
Want to rank up in Overwatch.
Want to rent my rig?
Want to see a photo of my wedding?
Want to see my flat?
Want to trade?
wards any wagering requirements..
War is exactly what he needs.
Warm bacon sandwich <3.
Warm brie and chicken sandwich <3.
Warm can be good.
Warm home and £££.
Warm water is lighter than cold water.
War would be bad for Night King?
Was £3,700 up.
Was 888poker always confirmed or was it pending?
Was about £320.
Was always broken.
Was even worse with my GTX 970 though.
Was expensive.
Was funny.
Was Grenfell an inside job?
Was holding on for lower withdrawal fees.
Was hoping I could save £150 a year by not buying it.
Was it a Freudian Slip?
Was it an Acca?
Was it a spike?
Was it a wet dream?
Was it too boring for you?
Was looking at them.
Was mistake, I was only trying to download mine.
Wasn't even playing.
Wasn't he a massive racist?
Wasn't MSN dead back then?
Wasn't the 8800gt the GTX970 of its time?
Was on the phone to them, then BT cut me off because I reached my maximum spend cap.
Was pretty fun but nobody ever communicates.
Was pretty funny.
Was pretty funny seeing the look on my manager's face when he noticed I was in a telephone interview for another job.
Was pretty good, but I hope they don't do too much boring character development.
Was really scared for a moment.
was really weird.
Was she your wife when you met her?
was so funny.
Was so tired at work because I couldn't sleep.
Waste of money.
Wasting less energy to heat and noise.
Was your mum fat?
wat.
wat|?
wat?
Wat.
Wat?
WAT.
Wat about DHT?
wat about in the office!?!??!?
Wat about videogames?!?!?
wat case?
Watching girl streamers playing LoL.
Watch it go to >10k in 20 minutes.
Water comes out of the tap.
Water kept coming in.
Waterproof and supposed to have a good DAC.
Water proofing.
wat gaem?
Wat is my feiths?
wat line?
wat noise cancelling headphones do you have?
watr.
wat the fuck m9?
wat you pay 3X more tax than your previous gross salary?
way better.
Way better than shitty Tinder.
Way better than your DT770s+Modmic.
Way easier than Awesome Miner.
Wayland just makes sense. Mir is dead..
Wayyyyyyyy better isolation than my M50X.
Waze didn't warn me though.....
We all know cleaners are audiophile thieves.
Wealth isn't just about currency.
Wealthy people also own a lot of assets.
Wealthy people deserve to keep all their money.
Wealthy people own labour and raw materials and land and capital.
We apologise for this inconvenience and thank you for your patience in this global shortage..
We are pleased to inform you that our 0% Commission on All Sports promotion has been extended up until the 31st of March 2018..
We are stronger together.
We are witnessing the end of the bear market right here.
Wearing a wig doesn't make you a bad person.
Weather looks good 16th-20th.
We both know that's not going to happen.
We can claim all sorts of shit as expenses.
We can't ignore the changes happening to crypto right now.
We can't use the network shared drives.
Wechat is good shit man. I meet lots of Chinese girls on there.
We'd be unstoppable.
We'd have a multi-signature wallet so we can't withdraw alone anyway.
We did?
We did? I wasn't even alive back then.
Wednesday, 4 May.
We don't at my workplace.
We don't even host the servers.
We don't have onenote, so I use the sticky notes.
Weechat to meet Chinese.
Weed is expensive.
weed is illegal btw.
Weed is week shit.
Weed smokers are "losers" according to the Daily Mail.
Weekend with my gf now.
Weekly.
We even have a fridge in the office!
We go 50% on our first one together. If it goes well, then we can buy whole ones ourselves..
WE GOTTA TAKE BACK CONTROL OF OUR COUNTRY FROM THOSE DIRTY FOREIGNERS.
We have a lot of dates for supplier certifications, so I like to keep just the date in there so I can actually produce some meaningful reports with it. My colleague kept putting in text with the date, which makes it impossible to use formula. I took this text out and added it as a comment for the cell instead, but was told to remove a.
We have an inefficient political equilibrium.
We have evolved around our environment.
We have forwarded this information to support team, they will contact you within 1-2 working days.".
We have no way to backup because that would be too useful.
We haven't even seen any promo art or anything.
We have received your contribution of £1.00 and all funds have now been allocated to your account..
We have sex a lot, but 90% of the time it's because she wants it.
We have the internet and computers now, so people can communicate that easily.
We have too much sex too.
weimaraner.
Weinstein raped Terry Crews.
weird.
Weird-ass mouse.
Weirdest fucking promotion ever.
Weird how your bot outputs a different song than Spotify.
Weird, I made a 60.73 loss with them.
Weirdly, I've never seen one on my pirated copy at home.
Weirdly, my E7 has cheaper day unit rate than any non-E7 tariff on the market.
Weird, my net has increased more than my gross.
Weird shaped wall though?
Weird that you play LoL then.
Weird, the description said that the missmatch was <60hz and between 2khz and 6khz. But I find the missmatch noticeable at voice frequency.
Weird, the room is available on the Travelodge website but not expedia/hotels.
We issued you a full refund of £14.99 on 13 Aug 2017 to your PayPal account. The refund includes the purchase price plus original P&P..
well.
Well.
Well 200hz is pretty fucking amazing.
Well 24 kinda counts as early 20s I guess.
Well Apple said they were also ordered to add a backdoor into their OS, which they have refused to do.
We'll call it Stress Coin and we'll make it RAM and CPU intensive to stress test overclocks.
Well Dota 2 isn't really old.
Well even if you're paying for the electricity, you get a gaming PC, electric heater, and air purifier with just one device.
We'll find out.
We'll find out!
Well gaming mice and keyboards have certain mechanical features that non-gaming don't have.
Well he owes me for the tickets and parking too.
Well he's the boss of Valve.
Well Hillary is a really terrible person.
Well hopefully I'll be building some bone density from resistance training and I should be okay in a couple of years from now.
Well I am paid on salary too, but I am contracted to work 37 hours a week, not including a mandatory 30/60 minute break each day.
Well I asked her if it sounds awful and she said no.
Well I bring my own bag if I plan on going, but just pay 5p or carry in my arms for impromptu visits.
Well I can bench 12.5kg easily, it's just kinda awkward to get it into position.
Well I can't test them properly because my left ear doesn't work any more.....
Well I certainly don't condone nuclear warfare.
Well I did a health screening at work a while back. They told me my bone density is below average which is a bit worrying.....
Well I didn't have much data to work with, so my prediction was very unstable.
Well I don't have to retire to access my pension.
Well I do regulate my diet and exercise.
Well if GDPR forces you to drop TLS 1.0 then that's what you're gonna have to do.
well if the domain changed that would be just as inconvenient....
Well, if you consider £60-£80 to be budget.
Well I get a lot of free food and drinks and gym and good pension.
Well I get to see them every day now!
Well I guess if you can get 999FPS in CS:GO with one core then that is the absolute ideal.
Well I guess it depends on the definition. If it means broad knowledge instead of specialist, then I guess the chancellors and policy makers aren't really experts in their field.
Well I guess "revenue" would be a more accurate term.
Well I guess the money up-front would actually be beneficial if they know what they're doing. They have the money guaranteed instead of DWP fucking up, they can earn interest on it, can make any long-term upfront payments, etc.
Well I guess Theresa May will be getting all the hatemail instead of Nigel Frarage then.
Well I guess you would....
Well I have Google Maps, I just wish it'd tell me which fucking lane to get in.
Well I have to store it and give it back to them after 12 months.
Well I hope I get my money.
Well I kinda am Mr Moneybags, but I want to keep up payments into my monthly saver accounts as best as I can.
Well I kinda did when I bought my sofa.
Well I kinda suck at cabling too.
Well I know what it is, but not what the point of it is.
Well I live in the country and I play videogames, so I prove you wrong.
Well I live in the country, so I guess so?
Well I'm gonna get insurance on it.
Well I might not be able to maintain it for much longer.
Well I might not get one at all now.
Well I'm mostly building this new rig for OW. I built my last rig before OW was launched and it was fine for all my games. For some reason OW refuses to hit 300FPS unless you have 8 threads and really fast RAM.
Well I'm not impressed with my Shure SE215 IEMs.
Well I'm poor and single.
Well I'm sure the problem would be similar if everyone was equipped with flamethrowers or crossbows or RPGs.
Well I never intend to pay any interest on credit cards in my life.
Well I never opened a RBS account and planning to spend all my savings, so it probably won't affect me.
Well it depends what he needs it for. Casual gaming, films, office?
Well, it has other stuff too.
Well it kinda did actually.
Well it retards technical advancement.
Well it's been 12 hours and I still don't have it.
Well it's fucking not.
Well it's gone up 500% over the last 30 days.
Well it's hard to say without any products being available right now.
Well it shouldn't be causing my FPS to go down.
Well it's not as black and white as  that.
Well it's not really what I've been asked to do.
Well it's not the only reason or even the main reason.
Well it's only a couple of £ and I will make my money back from the cashback easily anyway.
Well it's technically hashing but use whatever interchangeable word you want.
Well I was too demotivated from all the sleep deprivation, so I got sacked and then found another job whilst claiming benefits..
Well I would be if I didn't find a job.
Well kinda.
Well labour MPs sure do sound like cunts.
Well maybe not you.
Well most shops I go to don't accept contactless, so I can't max it out anyway.
Well   MPs sure do sound like cunts.
Well my GTX 970 can't maintain a constant 300FPS in Overwatch or a constant 240FPS in Dota 2 or a constant 600FPS in CS:GO.
Well no, it's 170 miles between the three of uus.
Well not mine because I always claim more than 27 miles because I'm not an idiot.
Well not really.
Well not school church I think.
Well nVidia is a binary blob, but the performance is unrivaled.
Well obviously you can transfer the money to your dealer using your bank account and your bank will keep a record.
Well probably.
We'll put a 360mm radiator in there, with a really good motherboard and PSU, and get 5GHz.
Well she arranged it last time because she wanted to pay for the insurance to help get me driving.
Well she is white so I guess?
Well she said something last night and today as well.
Well technically it's an Amp+DAC put together into a single enclosure. AMPDAC is just much more convenient to type.
Well technically she's Ukranian but speaks Russian as her main language.
Well technically the amount you repay changes every year.
Well technically they do if they're electric.
well technically you're not from the internet, you're from leeds.
Well that Reddit post you linked me is interesting.
Well that's not really a detailed description, is it?
Well that's not what I said.
Well that still would have saved you £170.
Well that sucks.
Well the 2% is not a withdrawal fee, it's a service fee.
Well the amount of people being killed would probably decrease if there were less guns.
Well the format is quite different.
Well there's a lot more artists, albums and songs than there are TV shows and films.
Well there's a lot of old-people benefits to find savings from.
Well there's always gonna be some sort of gap.
Well there's lots of phones with really powerful amps but still sound like shit.
Well there's no point getting a 7700K and a Ryezen.
Well there's no real visible wear, other than maybe a tiny bit of dust.
Well there's the IT team sitting behind me in the open plan office, but everyone in my department isn't here.
Well the tax-free element isn't relevant for 90% of people right now because of the interest allowance.
Well the Ubuntu Forums say to paste these commands into terminal in sequence......
Well they're all the same sized hole.
Well they're doing a fucking bad job atm.
Well they sent me a broken product but they made up for it by sending me a replacement forout any work on my part.
Well they sent me a broken product but they made up with it by sending me a replacement without any work on my part.
Well they want £1750 deposited a month, and I only get £1246 salary after deductions.
Well thieves are console peasants anyway.
Well water is good for you, doesn't matter if it's warm or cold though.
Well we brought his mate and the two of them made the decision together not to pay me.
Well wouldn't a 25g switch be better then?
well yeah.
Well yeah I can produce the heat with my PC, a portable fan heater, a dehumidifier, etc and keep my body insulated, but the storage heaters are still there whether or not I use them.
Well yeah, I don't buy shit.
Well yeah I guess.
Well yeah, people always say that we get control of our country again if we leave the EU, but do we actually? We'll still be ruled by the same shitty government.
Well yeah, pretty much any voluntary agreement is.
Well yeah you probably pay a shitload of taxes with that kind of income.
Well yeah, you spend the time meeting grills.
well yes.
Well you can be a core gamer on a laptop.
Well you can buy more GB but I don't want to pay for it.
Well you can do that. I did that with my new build at first.
Well you can let them vote for MPs but not the leader.
Well you can use P95, but it makes my CPU so hot I'd probably have to scale my overclock back from 4.7GHz down to like 4.2GHz or something.
Well you'd have to make sure the soap is washed off completely and it is dried completely.
Well you get 9001GB more if you just pay an extra £5.
Well you kinda do because of compound interest.
Well you won't make it worse then.
We need 4k 480hz monitors for less than £500.
We need a monthly subscription with most/all content which is cheap/free for SD and a higher price for HD and then redistribute the revenue to content creators based on what is watched.
We need a Nicehack for altcoins.
We need a PIKU.
We need each other.
WE NEED FASTER CORES WHY IS INTEL NOT LISTENING TO US!??!?!
We need more immigration ffs.
We need that to be 100%.
We need to colonise Mars.
We need to earn 0.25BTC before withdrawing to minimise the fees.
We need to learn and adapt.
We need to pour money into development of more powerful CPUs.
We only have a one bedroom flat..
We only have a shower in one of our offices.
Were £129 new recently.
We're all competing for the same prize AFAIK.
We really need multi-display laptops already.
We're almost good to go.
We're assuming a normal plane here.
We're comparing oranges and oranges not apples and oranges.
We're entering a period of incredibly shitty bank accounts.
We're getting closer and closer to 1984.
We're getting our money back?
We're getting there.
We're going to be Archivists.
We're going to release vulkan support soon, probably sometime next week..
We're going to see some pretty big data leaks and blackmailing on an unprecedented scale.
We're having SO MUCH sex.
We're just doing small amounts anyway.
We're moving MiningPoolHubStats to a new cool domain. We'll be down for 5-10 minutes while everything is migrated.
We're not living in Aparthied any more.
Weren't people already inhaling from whipped cream cans? At least all my friends are.
Weren't those planes in international air space though?
We re-use numbers a lot.
We reviewed the case details and found that the return location for this item was significantly different from what was in the listing. You're not required to return the item. We're sorry you have a problem with your purchase..
We're writing to inform you that your investment of £1,000.00 that was matched to loan contract C173593384662​​ in the 1 Year market, has been fully repaid by the borrower..
Were you able to play videogames when you were on IV?
We saw a shitload of jews at Thorpe Park.
We should do a secret santa to decide who bullies who.
We should get a masternode together.
We should go to Leeds uni and meet lots of cute Chinese grils.
We should have hired Logitech to design our bodies. They do a fucking good job at designing their mice.
We should join the Chinese Union.
We should leave Europe and join China IMO.
We should leave the EU and join China.
We should make his tax evasion illegal.
We should meet in the middle somewhere and cut out the middle man.
We should meet up for drugs.
We should move to China.
We should put more Korean girls in our schools and workplaces though.
We should rent a botnet to suggest crystal meth.
We should sell them?
We should show off our flats to each other.
We should take 1000 people and put them all on acid.
Westworld has proven that AI can be conscious.
Westworld looks pretty god.
Westworld series 2 trailer is out.
We've done a lot of business in the last year or so.
We've mostly used the Chromecast for kpop so far.
We've never seen a spike this big before.
We've shipped your order! It should be with you very soon.".
We were going to be gym buddies, but I didn't move to Leeds.
We were going to Queens Park.
We will play Dota next weekend then.
We will win.
We won't even need to force infertility this way.
Whaere is your backup?
what.
what?
what/.
What.
What?
What????
WHAT.
WHAT?
What a bad way to introduce himself.
What about 5 years from now, is the CPU going to be bottlenecking even entry-level GPUs?
What about a list of values from a column from 5 sheets?
What about all the time you lose waiting for the bus too?
What about an adblock app for phone calls?
What about a problem with the socket? I could go in and make sure it's fixed properly and screw it in again.
What about Asian girls?
What about attack-move, hold position, and cancel?
What about BCH?
what a bout browns, blues, blacks, whites, etc?
What about BTG? You can mine it!
What about cars?
What about chest pain?
What about coaching?
What about CPU, motherboard, RAM, etc?
What about denies?
What about dumbell press or bicep curl?
What about during a really cold period of the winter?!?!?
What about free heroes.
What about Germany?
What about guides?
What about HDI?
What about headphone sound?
What about her?
What about heroes, runes and masteries.
What about it?
What about item trading.
What about Korea?
What about Korean wife? My Korean gf says she wants to marry me.
What about Lastpass?
What about laundry?
what about localbitcoins.com ?
What about LTC?
What about me?
What about men?
What about mods?
What about more than 0.1BTC?
What about my car?
What about my custom-build headset?
What about my software needs upgrading?
What about on the train or the bus!?!??
What about pick phase???
What about protein shake?
What about Razer blades?
What about respawn/push timing?
What about routes?
What about Russia?
What about Samoa?
What about SNSD, what about 2NE1, what about TWICE?
What about spectating?
What about standing charge?
What about standing charge though?
What about USA?
What about video games?
What about wardrobe simulator?
What about watching Twitch at 1080p 60FPS?
What about when your gf is watching Hollyoaks or some shit and you don't want to hear it?
What about XMR?
What about your 888poker?
What about your AMPDAC and headphones?
What about your DT770s?
What actually is space?
What addons you using?
What a fucking joke.
What a fucking sexual assaulter.
What a good friend I am.
What a hassle!
What algorithm?
What algorithm is it?
What algorithms are you using mostly?
What algorithms do you mine the most?
What am I doing wrong? =IF(Response!F3:F999<TODAY()-7,IF("<>Sole Trader", 1, 0),0).
What am I going to build up my stoozing pot with then?
What am I looking for?
What amp?
What amp are you thinking of getting?
What an odd question..
What? Apt-get is only for distros based on Debian.
What are chipsticks.
What are DTP hybris ports?
What are micros then.
What are peers?
What are some of your most valuable assets?
What are stake and deposit?
What are the best value headphones you've ever bought? Mine are probably my £74.63 Beyer Custom One Pros.
What are the dimensions of your Tecknet?
What are the fees?
What are the magic words I have to say to get them to offer me a gift card?
What are the maker and taker fees on tradesatoshi?
What are the max temps of your CPU and GPU?
What are the odds I would know the answer?
What are the odds of an NBA game going into overtime?
What are the odds of a red card?
What are the odds that I'll have to do jury duty at some point in my life?
What are the opinion polls saying?
What are the scores even for?
What are the specs?
What are the specs of your rig?
What are you 12 or something.
What are you auto exchanging to?
What are you buying?
What are you doing?
What are you going to buy for your mum?
What are you going to do in Amsterdam?
What are you modelling exactly?
What are you playing on that?
What are your best heroes?
What are your electricity tariff costs?
What are your eligibility requirements for being a mouthbreather then?
What are your graphical settings?
What are your IEMs?
What are your overclock settings, noise and temps like?
What are your PC specs?
What are your PC specs and peripherals?
What are your PC's specs.
What are your PC's specs?
What are your remote servers for?!?!??
What are your specs?
What are your specs right now?
What are you talking about?
What are you talking about? What is jammy?
What are you trying to achieve?
What are you trying to do?
What are you trying to do on netbet?
What are you watching?
What a time to be alive.
What a time to be alive!!!!!!1.
What a weird fucking question though.
What bank should I use as my main current account?
What benefits do your bookmarks have over tabs?
What bitcoin exchange has the lowest fee?
What blanket drugs ban?
What bookie?
What browser do you use then?
What can I try?
What card?
What car do you drive?
What case?
What case are you using?
What case did you get?
What cashback do you get?
What channels do you frequent?
What CIEMs did your friend buy?
What city are you in?
What clockspeed is your CPU running at?
What colour is that?
What companies actually use WhatsApp to communicate with their clients anyway lmao.
What component is causing Firefox to run so slowly when I open 500 tabs?
What computer/device would you recommend for casting to with a VPN for my TV?
What country is that?
What courier do you recommend?
What CPU and GPU do you run?
What CPU cooler?
What CPU cooler you got?
What CPU is it?
What date?
What date was that?
What did he do?
What did he mean exactly?
What did he say exactly?
What did I ask there?
What did I quote for the CPU? I can negotiate a different price if you think it's too high.
What did she want?
What did they say instead of "no"????
What did you downvote me three times for?
What did you get?
What did you set your power, core and memory to?
What did you study?
What did you tell me would get me gubbed up fast yesterday:?
What did you think of Nerve?
What did you use before google mail then?
What dip?
What distro?
What distro do you use?
What do Deliveroo charge?
What doeS?
What does a phone line look like?
WHAT DOES AWESOME MINER SAY NOW?
What does "built-in hearing technology" mean?
What does "c/o" mean?
What does CP stand for?
What does ctrl+Q do?
What does he mean by "higher resolution"?
What does it do exactly?
What does it mean to "do" Linux?
What does it say is the clock speed and memory clock speed?
What does it say is the total floor area?
What does "slick corp" "onboarding process" "personal insult" and "armchair psychologist" mean?
What doesthat even mean?
What does that green powder taste like?
What does that mean?
What does the House of Lords do?
What does the membership give me exactly?
What does this hard fork mean for me as a NiceHash miner?
What does this tell me that NiceHash isn't?
What does your gf think about your drug addiction?
What does your jotenheim do that my Sound Blaster can't.
What do general consumers actually need fibre for?
What do girls actually mean when they say they need to "powder their nose"?
WHAT DO THE ARROWS MEAN.
What do they cost actually?
What do they do?
What do they offer that's worth the premium?
What do you buy bitcoins for?
What do you buy them with then? Bitcoin?
What do you do then?
What do you do with your lunch hour atm?
What do you drive?
What do you have a gf for then?
What do you have in mind?
What do you like about two bedrooms?
What do you mean?
What do you mean 6-9?
What do you mean by "a crappy piece"?
What do you mean by "flatten it"?
What do you mean by "full circle"?
What do you mean by "It fits the way I browse Reddit"?
What do you mean by "we"?
What do you mean exactly?
What do you mean they're in the wilderness?
What do you need a seedbox for?
What do you need help with m9?
What do you need the password for?
What do you plan to use the LISA for?
What do you play?
What do you prefer out of sugar and aspartame?
What do you spend all your money on?
What do you suggest then?
What do you think?
What do you think about all the crazy people complaining that Mei looks slimmer in her new skin?
What do you think about Asian girls?
What do you think about Beyerdynamic Custom One Pro?
What do you think about buying 1000 DSR coins and running a masternode?
What do you think about that monitor?
What do you think about your G403?
What do you think is best, Chinese, Korean or white?
What do you think is causing this LTC rise? Is it because of NiceHack?
What do you think I should do. Mod the wired version or buy the wireless?
What do you think is the best newspaper, Sun, BILD or Daily Mail?
What do you think of my Ncase M1?
What do you think of Overwatch?
What do you think of Parcelforce? I'm tracking my parcel all the way from Taiwan with them!
What do you think of Protonmail and Openmailbox and other similar email providers?
What do you think of SensorPush?
What do you think of Stremio?
What do you think of the Custom Studio?
What do you think of the Fidelio X2?
What do you think of the flat?
What do you think of the Green Party?
What do you think of them?
What do you think of the Ncase M1 + Corsair H100i?
WHAT DO YOU THINK OF THE NCASE OMG.
What do you think of the V-Moda M100?
What do you think of those parts/price?
What do you think of your M50s compared to your DT770s?
What do you think of your new Schitt AMPDAC?
What do you think of Zhang Ziyi?
What do you think the performance bottleneck in my system probably is?
What do you use bitcoin for?
What do you use their web UI for?
What do you want EU citizenship for?
What email provider do you use?
What email providers does everyone use?
What esports do you play?
What ethnicity is she?
whatever im going home.
whatever m9.
What? Everyone wants an M50X.
What exactly are you looking for in headphones?
What exchange are you selling it again?
What feature?
What for?
What framerate do you get in CS:GO?
What game is this?
What games are you running on it?
What games will you test your G403 out with tonight?
What GPU and GPU cooler?
What happeened between Debian and Mozilla?
What happened?
What happened to bash.org ?
What happened to him?
What happened to Iceweasel?
What happened to your Deliveroo order?
What happened to your ear?
What happens at 10pm?
What happens if I don't stretch?
What happens if I submit it too early?
What happens if you can't afford to pay council tax?
What happens to your smartphone if the police arrests you?
What happens when Lastpass gets hacked?
What happens when you run out of wood on the map?
What has household debt got to do with government debt?
What hashrate you getting on your 1080 TI?
What has the lunch got to do with the teaching though?
What have you compared them to?
What have you done?
What headphones?
What headphones are you interested in?
What headphones did you use?
What headphones do you have?
What headphones do you have now?
What headphones do you use?
What headphones would you recommend if I want open back but with deep bass?
What headset is it?
What holiday wtf.
What hype train?
What IEMs do you use?
What if Brexit causes the GBP to go down?
What if Ethereum replaces it?
What if I am squatting to reach into the fridge or pick something up or peek into the oven? There are a hundred reasons to squat ffs.
What if I don't know their phone number or postal address?
What if I get a sex change?
What if I go to them with two halves of a bag, do I get 2 new bags?
What if I IM my boss, does that count.
What if I lose it?
What I find most dumb about it is that London has no residents all of a sudden.
What if instead of including my second hand PSU, I buy a brand new PSU and install it for you?
What if I sold you some RVN for some of your GRLC?
What if it never happens?!?!?
What if I told her she's a dirty ugly chink?
What if it's an actual forcefield?
What if it's an energy beam that can be switched off before it impacts?
What if it's between 0.5 and 0.6?
What if it's just spreadsheets and shit?
What if it's less profitable for me than mining garlic?
what if it starts with a 2?
What if it was 10 black men?
What if I used an Ubuntu repo?
What if only one of you is down?
What if the government think I am a nuisance?
What if the mmr is the same?
What if the ransomware got the backups too?
What if they're Arnold Schwarznager.
What if they're below school age?
What if they're both lvl 30 but one has everything unlocked and the other doesn't?
What if they're holding a gun or knife?
What if they're looking for work but haven't found anything yet?
What if they're really big?
What if they're retired?
What if they're terminally ill or severely disabled and cannot work?
What if they're there to hurt the resident though? If they didn't use enough force they could get badly hurt or even murdered.
What if they wake up after you knock them out?
What if they win the lottery so they never have to work again?
What if we have 1000hz 32k VR headsets?
What if we're playing pub gee whilst your gf is sleeping?
What if you become disabled and unable to carry the bag, will they supply you with a special disability bag for the rest of your life?
What if you buy it for your dog which has a lower life expectancy, is it cheaper?
What if you get ill and can't go to work any more?
What if you had to choose between alcohol and marijuanas?
What if you're already an adult?
What if you're in the middle of fucking nowhere?
What if you're the last one alive on defenders overtime?
What if you want to go to Brighton?
What if you want to sleep whilst your gf is gaming.
What incentive do people have to leave feedback on ebay?
what I never said that.
What intensity you using?
What investment?
What is 3,2,1?
What is a good idea?????
What is a good one?
What is a maker vs what is a taker?
What is an oddity?
What ISAs?
What is best, Bitcoin or Ethereum?
What is best, TBBT or IASIF?
What is best, white or asian?
What is better job, office or retail?
What is bittylicious?
What is castling?
What is cp?
what is #davebot ?
What is dead may never die.
What is deposit and which one is stake?
What is "dh"?
What is Domain Fronting?
What is ED?
what is fgs?
What is fitba?
What is Freetrade?
what is hash?
What is his medical condition?
What is it?
What is it now?
What is Linux?
what is mgtow?
What is most breakable?
What is my paypal address? The email address I log in with?
What is NBI?
What is nicehash exit scam?
What isn't sexual harassment nowadays?
What is optical audio used for?
What is "realm" exactly?
What is safest, implant or operation?
What is Scan going to do? They are not the delivery company.
What is "Send Second Chance Offer"?
What is SF standard?
What is SLA?
What is that in megabytes then?
What is that in USD?
What is that like? Do you pay service charges and live with lots of people?
What is the address?
What is the appropriate response to an office grill that clearly fancies me says "have a nice weekend"?
What is the BTC withdrawal fee?
What is the choice of snack/drink like?
What is the company policy on gambling at work?
What is the difference between Charles Dawin and Charles Dickens?
What is the difference between Elijah Wood and Daniel Radcliffe?
What is the difference between Harriet Harman and Teresa May?
What is the difference between heroin and alcohol?
What is the difference between Hitler and Trump?
What is the difference between Irish and British?
What is the difference between Natalie Portman and Keira Knightley?
What is the difference between /r/autism and /r/anime ?
What is the difference between Teresa May and Adolf Hitler?
What is the difference between these two other than price?
What is the easiest way of stealing electricity?
What is the fee?
What is the formula for calculating how much I should stake with the exchange?
What is the fucking point of a vote if the MPs are just going to override it.
What is the most profitable cryptocurrency to mine with my 4690K and GTX 970?
What is the point in an excellent location if you never get any asians?
What is the point of dual entry?
What is there to figure out?
what is the word?
What is this level cap you speak of?
What is to do?
What is too agile?
What is to stop WhatsApp from stealing my private key?
What is trf?
What is worse for your mental health, alcohol or marijuanna?
what is wr?
What is wrong with Abbott?
What is wrong with the photo?
What is your ambient right now?
What is your contingency plan?
What is your favourite email client?
What is your flat like?
What is your opinion of foreigners?
What is your opinion of Theresa May?
What is your PC?
What is your power and +gpu at?
What is your preferred sound signature?
What is your rent then?
What is yours?
What is your salary?
What is your Steam username?
What? It's plenty.
What kind of a name is Mayson.
What kind of Asian is she?
What kind oF BS promotion is that.
What kind of fucked up lifestyle is that?
What kind of sick world do we live in where Donald Trump becomes USA president instead of Bernie Sanders.
What law?
What laws do you actually care about?
What league are you in?
What leaks?
What letter?
What lvl are you?
What major version????
What make and model?
What maths?
What meme?
What mod?
What moods?!??
What mouse are you getting?
What mouse do you have?
What mousemat did you get?
What mouse/mousepad/headphones?
What network rules?
What new card?
What OEM?
What offer is it?
What % of the hashing power is done by ASICs nowadays?
What options are you using for whattomine update interval, profit switching time, and profit switch threshold?
What other channel?
What other headphones do you have?
What other things are indicators of depression? I don't think I have depression but it's a possibility.
What page?
What parts did you order then?
What phone do you currently use?
What phone should I buy? I'm thinking of buying the Korean LG G6.
What phone will you buy, HTC 10 or Samsung S7?
What phrase?
What pool are you using, and why?
what poor life choices?
What problem?
What profits?
What PSU is it?
what race is your gf?
What races were your last 5 gfs?
What RAM do you have?
What rank are you?
What rank are you in CS:GO?
What? Rory told me not to send it to him.
What's 111 for?
What's 42.5/2?
What's 4od?
What's a cafetiere?
What's a fast and free VPN?
What's a good CPU stress tester.
What's a good pair of headphones with the same level of comfort, isolation, removeable cable and sound quality of my Beyers Custom One Pros, but which folds up for traveling?
What's a good SIM if I want unlimited data?
What's a holiday account?
What's all this pishposh about Megan Markle? She looks like a white person to me.
What's alt right?
What same guy?
What's an i9?
What's a nuclear family?
WhatsApp and Steam.
WhatsApp and Waze and Reddit use such little data.
WhatsApp is encrypted by default, and Telegram uses some sort of proprietary encryption only in secret chats AFAIK.
WhatsApp, Wechat, Skype, Steam and Signal.
whats at the center of the universe? a refund.
What's bad about the crappy pieces then?
What's best, BTC, BCH or BTG?
What's best, crack or crystal meth?
What's best, Raspberry PI or Chromecast?
What's best, Ubuntu or Debian?
What's BvS?
What's chess got to do with LoL?
What's DBA?
What seems like a decent place to spend a year?
What sensor is in that mouse?
What's funny?
What's happened to Dota?
What's happening?
What's happening tonight? Is Google announcing their new phones?
What's happening with the stolen Nicehack BTC?
What's he going to use them? On-board audio?
What should I do?
What should I do with my GTX 970?
What should I do with my spare GTX 970?
What should I do with my spare phone?
What should I put in "room requests" for my hotel reservation?
What should I spend it on?
What signs?
What's inside it?
What's inside yours?
What's it for?
What's it like?
What's money tips?
What's more important,  being robbed and murdered, or going to jail for 20 years?
What's more important, not being robbed and murdered, or going to jail for 20 years?
What's my API key?
What software can I use for ebay sniping?
What sort of cuber criminals?
What sort of cyber criminals?
What sort of electric heating do you have? Economy 7 night storage heaters?
What sort of frequency? 12, 6, 3 or 1 times a year?
What sort of gambling do you do then?
What sort of hashrate can I expect mining Ethereum with my 7700K?
What sort of sick bastard steals bike wheels?
What sort of strats?
What sort of things would count as that?
What soundcard/headset do you have?
What, so you can stalk her?
What speakers should I buy for my desk?
What speed do you walk at?
What speed is your CPU and RAM running at?
What's ROTTR?
What's share scheme?
What's similar?
What's so bad about 'flights philippines'?
What's step 2?
What's stopping you from carrying just one?
What's temps like?
What's that?
What's that called, 'distraction pricing' or something.
What's that got to do with Ncase?
What's that in GBP?
What's that in LTC?
What's that pre-deductions?
What's that then?
What's the best drug to take for depression?
What's the best monero miner?
What's the biggest most reliable pool?
What's the biggest prize pool of independent LoL tournaments? $100k?
What's the budget?
What's the catch?
What's the context?
What's the DAC like?
What's the difference?
What's the difference between Christianity and Judaism?
What's the difference between csv and xls?
What's the difference between digital EQ and amp EQ then?
What's the difference between disliking immigration and racism?
What's the difference between Elijah Wood and Daniel Radcliffe?
What's the difference between HD600 and HD650, and which is better?
What's the difference between Nigel Farage and Nick Griffin?
What's the difference between Teresa May and Hitler?
What's the difference between the dark net and the dark web?
What's the dimensions?
What's the hardest drug, crack or crystal meth?
What's the log and cue for?
What's the maximum distance then?
What's the most CPU cooling I can get without too much maintenance?
What's the motive for electing police officers?
What's the name of the song? I'll look it up on Spotify.
What's the negative about?
What's the next step up from president of the united states? CEO of Walmart or something?
What's the point of being rich if you have shit audio and bad gaming?
What's the point of buying a tiny 1 bedroom house if I'm going to be spending almost all my income on the mortgage until I'm in my 50s?
What's the point of having gold then.
What's the point of saving money if you're never going to spend it?
What's the point of using it over USB then?
What's the post code?
What's the price?
What's the problem?
What's the right channel then?>.
What's the time investment like?
What's the withdrawal fee?
What's the withdraw fee?
What's this?
What's this machine for?
What's this? More cashback?
What stuff is covered under etc?
What subreddit is that?
What's weird about that?!?!?!?
What's with all the SJWs playing video games all of a sudden?
What's with the random quote?
What's worse, 10 black women or 10 white men?
What's wrong?
What's wrong with CCleaner?
What's wrong with Earth?
What's wrong with him?
What's wrong with it?
What's wrong with LA?
What's wrong with marrying a Korean girl? Korean girls are better than white girls.
What's wrong with NEST?
What's wrong with RAID0?
What's wrong with that?
What's wrong with Vodafone?
What's your 970 hashrate?
What's your address?
What's your battletag?
What's your budget?
What's your credit limit?
What's your credit score?
What's your daily income on NiceHash?
What's your day/night unit rates and standing charge?
What's your experian credit score?
What's your favourite flavour?
What's your favourite TWICE album?
What's your finders fee?
What's your food budget?
What's your garlic address?
What's your GBP/kwh? Mine is 11.214p in the day and 8.0115p at night.
What's your GPU? I have a GTX970.
What's your GRLC address?
What's your hashrate?
What's your hashrate in Equihash?
What's your hashrate now?
What's your income like?
What's your mining revenue atm?
What's your mmr?
What's your mobile data limit?
What's your monthly income?
What's your night rate and standing charge?
What's your office set?
What's your private key?
What's your rank in CS:GO?
What's your salary?
What's your Steam username? I will call you tonight.
What's your username?
What's Zen and A&A? I've never heard of those ISPs.
What tags?
What takes priority, the person sitting next to me that I can get back to as soon as my phone call has finished, or the person calling me who I don't know when I can get back to them?
What team do you work for?
What temp is your flat?
what the actual fuck.
WHAT THE ACTUAL FUCK.
what the actual fuck is this.
what the fuck.
what the fuck?
What the fuck.
WHAT THE FUCK.
what the fuck are you talking about.
What the fuck do you spend all your money on.
what the fuck FUNDS YOU ARE INVESTED IN.
what the fuck is happening.
WHAT THE FUCK IS THIS SHIT.
what the fuck my company is storing our customers' passwords in plaintext.
WHAT THE FUCK MYHERMES.
what the fuck was that.
what the fuck why is it boiling hot outside and fucking freezing cold at my desk.
What truth?
What uni are you at?
What uni is it?
What use is Facebook?
What vapor pc?
What variant are they?
What VPN do you use?
What was it like?
What was the bitrate before?
What was the issue?
What was wrong with your Deliveroo ordeR?
What was your gambling profit last month?
What was your job?
What website?
What we need are less miners and higher value of crypto.
What were you doing off work then?
what were you sick of.
What? When?
what why?
What, why?
What? why?
What? Why?
What will happen?
What will happen if I don't do anything?
What will happen if I park so close to someone that they can't open their front door?
What will happen if parliament voted no?
What will happen to Korean girls in youir 'Brave New World' then?
What will I tell them? Should I tell them I didn't realise it would be a cash withdrawal?
What will you do with your gaming PC?
What will you pay me in GBP?
What will your boss think?
What would be the point anyway?
What would happen if I get caught?
What would happen if I submit it too early?
What would happen if you lost it?
What would I actually use the fibre for?
What would you do in my situation?
What would your boss say if he finds out?
What yield do you get from your stock market trading? Have you ever considered using ratesetter.com at 5.5%?
What you are saying is not natural.
What you mining now?
When?
When actually I'm doing little jobs for 1000 different people.
When am I going to get my 888poker cashback?
When are we getting our 888poker cashback omg.
When are we going to get 8700k reviews?
When are you going on your drug holiday?
When are you going to build it?
When are you going to buy Fidelio X2?
When are you going to get a Philips Fidelio X2?
When are you going to reach 3k mmr in Overwatch?
When are you going to stop being 2k?
When are you going to upgrade your DT770s to COPs or Custom Studios?
When clocks go back, does that mean I get an extra hour to sleep?
When did that game launch? It's probably just another generic FPS that has release-day hype and then dies 6 months later.
When did this fucking duck start coming in here wtf.
When did you graduate?
When did you open it?
When did you start mining Garlic?
When did you start playing Dota?
When do you want me to build it?
When do you want me to ship your PC?
When driverless cars are invented, we can sleep on the way to work.
Whenever I leave alcohol in my room that isn't beer, she steals it wtf.
When government unrest starts, we'll be the first ones they come after.
When I bought 16GB in 2015 I thought it was a bit overkill.
when I don't lose my games because of idiots.
When I'd rather play video games.
When I first bought my smartphone I installed EVERY messaging app, now I only have 5.
When I gave her my username and password to my student discount account she stole my KFC discount and I couldn't claim my chicken stamps.
When I get back from Korea?
When I get back, I have like 2-3 weeks until I go on holiday again.
When I get back, we'll catch up and become millionaires together.
When I get bored doing office things.
When I get my own place, should I use Sky TV, Freesat, Stremio or Kodi as the OS for my TV?
When I grow up I want to move to Shenzhen.
When I'll be doing almost all my productive work on a desktop.
When I'm gaming, it goes so loud.
When I move I'm going to ask rory for a discount.
When I'm putting off all work equally, it's hard to get anything done.
When in the office.
When I OCed it to 189hz it was frameskpping.
When I only have "intermediate level of knowledge" too....
When I plug the splitter into my E10K and motherboard.
When I read "virtual desktop" I was thinking virtual machines lmao.
When I read your sentence I was thinking about sleep and film/TV spoilers.
When is cyber monday?
When is Keepass getting cloud servers?
when I started, my co worker just input data manually and changed formatting manually and copied and pasted data to produce reports and stuff.
When is the ISS getting a 3D printer?
When is the next vacancy opening?
When is the vote going ahead?
When is your operation?
When is your payday?
When it comes to expensive electronics, definitely.
When it's quiet.
When I was 16 £60 was like a fortune.
When I was asking my primary school teacher about his salary and tax brackets, he didn't correct me.
When I was with Origin I had drop outs all the time and the fucking Origin employee told me it was normal.
When I worked for the agency, I would just take the holiday pay.
When looking for headphones for gaming, soundstage is the most important thing.
When my gf gives me free bed and breakfast in Brighton I always have to sex with her.
When my weight started going up above optimum levels, I took preventative action to stop it from becoming dangerous. A responsible person tackles health issues before they even become a problem..
When Pascall launches.
When people ask me to do fucking VLOOKUPs when the fucking lookup data is different between spreadsheets because nobody uses the correct fucking reference code and everyones' fucking spreadsheets are a fucking mess.
When people went to church because they didn't have video games or anything fun to do.
When processing your withdrawal we noticed that you haven't yet fully wagered your most recent deposit, meaning there was not enough activity on Casino or Sportsbook between your last deposit and withdrawal..
When she says she's overdue by 4 days, does that mean day 30 or 36?
When shit is all they know, they think it's fine.
When someone says "I am now away from the business" does that mean they've left the company or they're just on leave?
When taking my regular commute out of my mileage claim, should I calculate the walking distance, cycling distance, or driving distance?
When walking around outside, do you use your IEMs or circumaural headphones?
When was the last time a fridge broke on you?
When was the last time a party other than the main two was elected?
When was the last time you got laid?
When was the last time you had a gf?
When was the last time you had sex?
When was the last time you saw dog as a Korean restaurant?
when we leave the EU and join NAFTA then we could get cheaper PC components....
When will all heroes be free?
When will batteries be invented with more recharge cycles and higher capacities?
When will Korea join the EU?
When will Linux be ready for me omg.
When will we get decentralised blockchain media? That could help with the massive bias issue we're currently experiencing.
When will you try the X2? They're not neutral at all, they're fun ass fuck.
When you buy illegal drugs on the darkweb, do you do it in a virtual machine in Tor browser?
When you buy shit using Paypal?
When you don't want to hear shit.
When you get as high mmr as me, less latency helps a lot.
When you get to 3k you get a shiny badge.
When you going to asia?
When you're playing on low graphics at 1080p at 200+ FPS, it's often the CPU that's the bottleneck.
When you swallow pills, are you just supposed to relax your throat and let gravity do the job, or are you supposed to use your throat muscles?
When you think about it, you need a shitload of bindings.
Where?
where are the 12 month EE plans?
where are you.
Where are you exactly?
Where are you going?
Where are you travelling to?
Whereas Dota is free.
Whereas I am more consistent.
Whereas I like to have different sound signatures, different levels of isolation and soundstage and portability.
Whereas I'm kinda the opposite, I got a credit card to buy a GTX 1080 TI.
Whereas in Keepass I have to type in a really long password every time I boot it up.
Whereas LoL is doing the American thing.
Whereas my Beyers have good soundstage and isolation.
Whereas Prime95 is way worse than a worst case scenario.
Whereas PUBG and CS:GO are western games.
Whereas the DT770s are really uncomfy to wear around your neck, which makes them very bad portable headphones.
Whereas there'd be more leakage with a worse storage heater.
Where can I buy some cheap swimming shorts?
Where can I find the official Popcorn Time binaries?
Where can I get a Audio-Technica ATH-AD700X with a removeable cable?
Where can I get Excel help?
Where did you get it?
Where did you get that estimation from?
Where did you live before?
Where does it get the current prices?
Where do yo ulive.
Where do you live?
where do you store your coins?!?!??!?!
Where do you work?
Where'd you find this?
Where else is it supposed to come from? My non-existant income?
Where have you been?
Where is HansProleman?
Where is it?
Where is it £20?
where is my fucking money omg.
Where is that?
Where it thinks the formulae is inconsistent.
Where I work.
Where shall I go? Seoul or Shanghai?
Where's Monero?
Where's my fucking money.
Where's the punchline?
Where's yours?
WHERE THE FUCK ARE MYHERMES PARCELS.
where the FUCK are you?
Where the fuck do I put things.
where the fuck do you live that a bus is only £14 a week.
where the fuck do you work.
Where the fuck do you work!??!?
Where the fuck has rory been all week omfg.
where the fuck is hans.
where the fuck is HansProleman.
Where the fuck is it?!?!?!?
where the fuck is leeds.
where the fuck is my 1080 TI.
WHERE THE FUCK IS MY 1080 TI DPD I THOUIGHT YOU WERE GOOD.
Where the fuck is my game.
where the fuck is rory.
where the fuck is that.
where the fuck is that?
where the fuck is the north.
where the fuck is york.
Whether I'm up or down, doesn't bother me much.
Whether it's pwning n00bs in CS:GO or travelling on the train or in the office or the gym or listening to music at home.
Whether they're sold in 2016 or 2010 doesn't make that much difference.
Whether you want it or not.
Which are durability, a good DAC and camera, and good battery life.
Which doesn't seem very likely atm.
Which don't use Nicehack algorithms?
Which do you like the most?
Which do you like the most?!?!??!
Which do you think is best?
Which do you think I should buy?
Which has the most bass?>.
Which he really should have learnt in the first few weeks.
Which IDK how to deal with.
Which I do a lot.
Which I do sometimes.
Which I have £1,000 in.
Which I just end up spending on my gf anyway.
Which I'll definitely be taking advantage of.
Which I may or may not do in the future.
Which I might do in a few mins.
Which is 1% of $23.
which is 70p each.
Which is an amazing feat considering how tiny the case is.
Which is a pain because now I'm going to have to manually change the cell colours all day.
Which is a very expensive PC.
Which is best? BT Fibre for £20.41 a month? or Origin broadband for £10.42 a month?
Which is Dota and kpop.
Which is fine since I never bought the 25%.
Which is good for the endgame.
Which is probably a good idea because people will get sweaty heads.
which ISP should I go with?
Which is shit compared to my home PC.
Which is smaller than >90% of cases.
Which is still decent considering it's all fully liquid and almost completely risk-free.
Which is useful in noisy environments.
Which is weird, since modern NA is made up of immigrants.
Which is why I bought K702.
Which is why I bought them.
Which is why our bodies are best suited to Earthlike conditions.
Which it probably will be because of regulation.
Which model exactly?
Which my M50X are.
Which offsets the interest?
Which of us do you think has the best employer benefits?
Which one?
Which one are you using ATM?>.
Which one do you work for again? TalkTalk?
Which one is the real one?
Which ones?
Which one should I buy in Korea?
Which only works on projectiles travelling over 100mph.
Which puts parts into lines and has colours and stuff.
Which sucks ass.
Which they sound like they do because you are quite whingy.
Which version?
Which will cost more to heat, a ground floor or first floor flat?
Which will increase the probability of another NiceHack.
Which will risk breaking them.
Which would allow me to reach a higher LTV.
Which wouldn't surprise me considering where I work.
Which you can sell to get your £700 back.
Whilst also telling me I'm the tight person.
Whilst I am mining nicehack-resistant coins.
Whilst I'm at work.
Whilst pub gee are growing, Dota, LoL and CS seem to be shrinking right now.
Whilst the price has gone down.
Whilst we're waiting, RVN is going up and BTC is going down.
Whining at Apple (me) to unlock the phone for her.
white.
White colller beats.
White devil!
White girls are dirty ugly sluts for sure.
White girls aren't comparable to Asian.
White people music is so shit.
White supremacists only date other white people.
White supremacists think the white race is the best and want to keep it pure.
White woman are ugly.
Who?
WHO?
who are you.
Who are you calling a filthy casual?!?
Who are you falling in love with.
Who are you talking about?
Who are you talking to?
Who are you with?
Who can'tr.
Who did? The pope?
Who did you share it with?
Who do they think I am.
Who do you like most, EXID or AOA?
Who do you love more, Tzuyu or Sana?
Who do you think is craziest, The Pope, or Tom Cruise?
Who do you think is craziest, Tom Cruise or The Pope?
Who do you use to book your train tickets?
Who do you want to become president, Donald Trump or Bernie Sanders?
Who do you want to win, North Korea or USA?
WHO GOT PAID!??!?!?!
Who has been sexually abusing you?
Who here plays Overwatch?
Who is Aaron Cooper and is he really the CEO of Profitablemorrows?
Who is also a casual racist and sociopath?
Who is a role model?
who is doing that omg.
Who is going to clean your flat then?
Who is going to Thailand.
Who is going to win the election?
Who is infra?
Who is it?
Who is Jeremy Hunt?
Who is MD and PM?
Who is ordering that?
Who is seeding all the music on what.cd?
Who is that?
Who is that dark woman?
Who is the most racist?
Who is the most sexist?
Who is the new starter? Is she Asian?
Who is this 4chan?
Who is this freenode guy?
who is tony montana?
Who is your £900 0% with?
Who is your employerr?
Who is your favourite 20th century German policitian?
Who is your favourite character?
Who is your favourite Overwatch hero?
Who is your favourite transexual Street Fighter player?
Who must've?
Who provides your internet? My billionaire friend is moving to UK and wants fast internet.
Whose fetish is fat people again?
Who the fuck does that.
Who the fuck has Starbucks gift cards anyway.
who the fuck is beardyman.
Who the fuck is com truise.
who the fuck is gonzo.
who the fuck is jade goody.
who the fuck is jasmine?
who the fuck is MAYSON.
Who the fuck is Noel Edmunds?
Who the fuck is Serotone?
Who the fuck is that weird looking dude.
Who the fuck uses the library anyway, just create a collection of playlists like a normal person.
Who told you that?
Who would buy an iphone nowadays when you could get an S8 or V30 instead?
Who would have thought that the most dangerous object is a book?
Who would you be in the Family Guy house then?
Wht about pc upgrades m9?
why.
why?
Why.
Why?
Why???
WHY.
Why £300 a month into BT shares wtf.
Why 42?
Why 50mb? It's not 1999 any more.
Why accidentally?
Why all in one go?!?!?
Why am I getting 1.5% rejected shares?
WHY AM I NOT GUBBED.
Why are my messages the most identifiable?
WHY ARE OFFICE PCS ALWAYS SO SLOW OMG.
Why are people trying to reset my passwords.
Why are programs called apps nowadays?
Why are there two?
Why are these cashback websites so fucking slow omg.
why are they called macros?
Why are they so fucking shit omg.
Why are they so shit compared to DPD.
Why are those the magic words?
Why are you asking me wtf.
Why are you assuming 11p per kWh? Nobody has electricity that cheap in the UK.
Why are you at a uni campus?
why are you banning me from every channel omfg.
Why are you cracking?
Why are you deaf in one ear?
Why are you doing that.
Why are you holding spacebar lmao.
Why are you in a UK channel if you're from USA?
Why, are you interested in buying it?
why are you in #uktrees then?
Why are you leaving?
Why are you looking at pre-builts wtf.
Why are you mining it?
Whya re you paying into a LISA?
why are you selfish?
Why are you skint wtf you earn like 3X what I do.
Why are you so bad with money.
Why are you so cheap?
why are you so fucking rich.
Why are you so obsessed with me?
why are you so poor?
Why are you so shit.
Why are you taking that drug?
Why are you talking about "high-end" when we're discussing DT770 then?
Why are you trying to remove thermal paste?
Why are you trying to save energy?
Why are you unsure if that's a good thing lmao.
Why are you watching it?
Why are you watching London Has Fallen instead of going to work?
Why Barclaycard Platinum?
Why blizzard software?
Why both?
Why can my work laptop connect to my Outlook and Lync, but my home PC can't?
WHY CANT I DOWNLOAD IT WTF.
Why can't I get cashback for travelodge?
Why can't I just use a password omg.
WHY CAN'T I SPEAK TO A FUCKING HUMAN.
Why can't they just buy a robot hooker to replace her job?
Why can't they just give us SSDs in our laptops?!?!??!?!?
Why can't they just pick easy names, like Tony Blair and David Cameron.
Why can't they just put all the pages into the PDF wtf.
Why can't they make up their fucking minds and send me proper financial info.
Why can't vlookup just work even if the lookup value isn't on the left wtf.
Why can't we just let Excel do the work for us.
Why can't you?
Why cheap £ good for me?
Why did he buy that such bad CPU?
Why did his brother stab his mum?
Why did I switch to them.
Why did Morrisons do that?
Why did Mozilla demand Debian rename Firefox wtf?
Why didn't you keep them?
Why did Ubuntu develop Unity so much if they were just going to abandon it a few years later?
Why did we buy GTX 1080 TIs for 1080p?
Why did we leave the EU again?
Why did you ask me to be online in the evening if you won't talk to me?
Why did you bid on my item?
Why did you buy a key?
Why did you buy the mouse I recommended you and not just some Razer shit then?
Why did you buy the Ncase M1? What motrivated you to buy it?
Why did you get DT770s instead of the M50X then?
Why did you include big red bars on your email?
Why did you meet drug dealers when you can just use the dark web?
Why did you order an X299 motherboard?
Why did you order an X99 motherboard?
Why did your Roonscape get banned?
Why did you ult?
Why disable auto exchange?
Why does Amazon charge me to call them wtf.
Why does Excel let me sort alphabetically then?
Why does having a larger playerbase make a game better?
Why does he like them so much? Is it because they are really comfortable and isolate really well?
Why does it blows?
Why does it have to be in denominations of 5? Why not 0.420?
Why does it sound cool?????
Why does it spike like that?
Why does Lync and Outlook work on my work laptop but not my personal PC?
Why does my EPC report say I can half the cost of my hot water but doesn't say how?
Why does my work email require me to use a PIN if my pattern is even more secure than a PIN?
Why doesn't Intel make good CPUs any more?!?!?
Why doesn't it just integrate with GTK wtf.
Why doesn't it just use RAM?
Why doesn't my PIA VPN work at work?
Why doesn't NiceHash support GBP any more??????????
Why doesn't she do some fucking work or something omg.
Why doesn't that ever work for me.
Why does Russia hate us?
Why does the EPC say I can save £609 over three years by getting fan-assisted storage heaters then?
Why does Thunderbird get my openmailbox emails instantly but my hotmail emails only come through once every 10 minutes?
Why does Thunderbird only get my Hotmail emails once every 10 minutes, but my openmailbox emails come through instantly?
Why does your build have a 7740X and a X299 motherboard then?
Why do headphones with single cables always have the cable on the left earcup?
Why do I always sound so bad in recordings.
Why do I get this email "You're receiving this email because you requested a password reset for your EA Account. If you did not request this change, you can safely ignore this email.".
Why do I get this since I switched ISP? "The owner of i.imgur.com has configured their website improperly. To protect your information from being stolen, Firefox has not connected to this website.".
Why do I have long purple marks below my chest?
Why do I have so many apps using my mobile data omg.
Why do I have to copy and paste relevant lines into another document instead of just deleting the few lines that aren't needed?!?!?!?
Why do I have to finance it?
Why do I have to pay VAT every time I buy a GTX 1080 TI wtf.
Why do I keep getting this wtf.
Why do I need VAT receipts?
Why do Korean girls look so good when they get out of the shower.
Why don't they just ask what your 8 favourite songs are? You'll get the same answer, right?
Why don't they just fill it themselves?
Why don't they just use Linux.
Why don't they just work normal office hours?
Why don't you do any matched betting?
Why don't you ever meet me when you're in London?
Why don't you get a student discount? Are you not a student?!?!?
Why don't you go ahead and make a draft build on pcpartpicker?
Why don't you grow up.
Why don't you have a job?
Why don't you have an Asian gf then?
Why don't you just clean your flat yourself?
Why don't you just get an HTC 10?
Why don't you just get the Sound Blaster E5 and spray paint it silveR?
Why don't you just mine on 2 cores then?
Why don't you just move to the UK?
Why don't you just use MPM?
Why don't you just use Spotify?
Why don't you just use your own PC?
Why don't you just work 4 days a week for the same pay like rory does?
Why don't you just work from home?
Why don't you just write Kim Jung Un a cheque for $15 every month?
Why don't you leave it on at night?
Why don't you like it?
Why don't you like Stremio?
Why don't you like the M50X?
Why don't you love Popcorn Time any more?
Why don't you overlay?
Why don't you stop then?
Why don't you think you'll get the cashback?
Why don't you use Stremio?
Why don't you walk?
Why don't you want to imagine them fat and naked?
Why do people have to breathe so loudly omg.
Why do people value that?
Why do people want altcoins instead of bitcoin?
why do radio people always look so weird.
Why do some headphones have dual entry?
Why do the eyes have it wtf.
Why do they have to shout so much and make so many personal attacks in parliament too?
Why do they need so much money omg.
Why do we even need fans in office laptops nowadays? Isn't cooling a problem smartphones and tablets managed to solve without fans?
Why do we still have music albums instead of just singles in 2016?
Why do you elect him then?
Why do you get triggered so easily wtf.
Why do you hate Koreans?
Why do you hate tumble dryers so much?
Why do you have 1,100 games?
Why do you have a £705 bonus wtf.
Why do you have an AMD hexacore?
Why do you have a new cable?
Why do you have a random assortment of parts?
Why do you have poor hearing? How do you know you have poor hearing?
Why do you have that shit.
Why do you have those?
Why do you have to keep the volume low?
Why do you like fat girls?
Why do you need a foster one then?
Why do you need an m.2 drive anyway?
Why do you need CUDA?
Why do you need fast internet? You only need enough to stream shitty 1080p torrents and play video games.
Why do you need more than 16GB?
Why do you need multiple virtual machines?
Why do you need one?
Why do you need so much storage anyway?
Why do you need them?
Why do you need to hit 0.003911?
Why do you need to see a chiropractor?
why do you need to see peoples' faces?
Why do you need to stay comfortbale?
Why do you rent a two bedroom flat if you only need one bedroom?
Why do your HD600s have dual entry?
Why do you think I care about white devils?
Why do you think I only listen to kpop?
Why do you think Radio 1 uses DT770s?
Why do you think that only physical goods have value?
Why do you think they have big radiators on the back?
Why do you use Protonmail instead of openmailbox?
Why do you want a gaming PC when you don't even play video games anyway?
Why do you want a new mouse then wtf.
Why do you want m-itx?
Why do you want to mine to a small pool instead of a large pool?
Why do you want to take me out to dinner wtf.
Why do you want writeups and photos?
Why do you watch Fear the Walking Dead instead of just Walking Dead?
Why do you work so long.
Why EUR and not USD/GBP?
Why external?
Why garlicpool and not freshgarlic?
WHY HAS THE WORLD GONE OPEN SOURCE MAD?
Why haven't you moved out yet? Are you saving up to buy?
Why is building a powerful computer a poor decision?
Why is Corbyn not a leader and.
Why is Dota for poor people?
Why is every call center terrible?
WHY IS EVERY FUCKING CALL CENTRE ALWAYS "VERY BUSY" NO MATTER WHAT DAY AND TIME I CALL THEM.
Why is everyone I'm working with insisting that spreadsheets are actually called "tabs" and workbooks are called "spreadsheets"?
Why is George Bush ranked so low?
Why is Google Drive the only backup site that WhatsApp supports wtf.
Why is Grover Cleveland 22 and 24?
Why is he being christened though?
WHY IS HERMES SO SHIT OMG.
Why is it?
Why is it a bad idea?
Why is it a dumb idea?
Why is it a manual process?
Why is it a pro choice?
Why is it bad to do that beforew they do?
Why is it BS?
Why is it called 401k then.
why is it called pizzagate wtf.
Why is it "definitely" better?
Why is it optimistic?
Why is it removing leading zeros and why is that a problem?
Why is it scored so low?
Why is it slowly getting faster????
Why is it so cheap?
Why is it so satisfying?
why is it so slow omg.
Why is it that the USA and UK have such terrible leaders which are forced onto the nation even though we are supposed to be a democracy lmao.
Why is it the "best" network?
Why is my balance still 0?
Why is my ebay seller taking so long to refund me ffs.
Why is my FPS still so low?
WHY IS MYHERMES SO SHIT.
Why is my laptop VGA.
Why is my MiningPoolHub balance still not showing?
Why is Office 2010 so hard to crack wtf.
Why is ordering broadband so fucking difficult omg.
Why is our spreadsheet collaboration functionality so non-existant omfg.
Why is Outlook "the real deal"?
Why is RAM so cheap?
Why is she coming then?
Why is she such an evil person?
Why is signing transaction so CPU intensive?
WHY IS SPOTIFY SO SHIT WHY DOES IT KEEP USING DEVICE STORAGE INSTEAD OF MY SD CARD.
Why is that?
Why is that a shame?
Why is that bad?
Why is that going to be awkward though?
why is that in a spreadsheet file.
Why is that lucky?
Why is that the best reply?
Why is the 16GB SIM cheaper than the 8GB?
Why is the Bitcoin price skyrocketing?
Why is the Discord team so cringy omg.
Why is the gender important?>.
Why is the government increasing insurance tax wtf.
Why is the parliament building so empty when they're discussing drugs but other times they're all shouting at each other over stupid shit?
Why is there no desktop Windows or Linux client for WhatsApp?
Why is Theresa May so an ugly white hag?
Why is voicemail so hard omg.
Why is womens' tennis so big?
why is your pension only £150? Shouldn't you put more into that because of the tax benefits?
Why is your profitability so low?
Why is your resolution so low?
Why LibreOffice?
Why lighter?
Why LTC so much more than other currencies?
Why Magic Actions and not any of the other Youtube addons?
Why? My parents are pushing me towards it.
Why no headphones?
why not.
why not?
Why not.
Why not?
Why not?!?!?!?!??
Why not 970?
Why not a Sennheiser or Sound Blaster?
Why not drive?
Why not for BTC?
Why not get a pair of open cans instead?
Why not get rid of the one at the new place and use your own?
Why not get the Sound Blaster E5?
Why not get the wired one and mod it?
Why not? It's quite common in UK.
Why not just apply for a free one?
Why not just be £13,337 in credit like me?
Why not just buy a masternode or something?
Why not just buy a triple monitor laptop?
Why not just call it London then?
Why not just drive?
Why not just get rid of the screen and carry a VR headset instead?
Why not just get the keys and move out at the same time?
Why not just listen to your discover weekly on your phone thne.
Why not just play video games if you get boreD?
Why not just put it in your pocket?
Why not just put the work sim into your personal phone?
Why not just use Nicehack?
Why not just withdraw £900 in one go?
Why not kimchi then?
Why not O2+ODAC?
Why not pend £10/mo on Origin?
Why not Rhodesia?
WHY NOT SHOW ENERGY WITH  VAT.
Why not use 0% one?
Why not use IEMs?
Why not yet?
Why not yet technologically feasible?
Why only one every 2 weeks.
Why painful?
Why Redhat? Because they are commercial like SUSE?
Why server?!?!?
Why SLI 1070?
Why so high?
Why sunglasses?
Why thai?
Why that coin specifically?
Why the fuck.
why the fuck am I mining ethereum then?
Why the FUCK are official gov.uk documents uploaded in proprietary Excel formats?
why the fuck are you doing that?
Why the FUCK are you in Wales?
Why the fuck are you sending me screenshots?
Why the fuck are you subscribed to Daily Mail anywya.
Why the fuck are you using Chrome?
why the fuck are you using OSX.
Why the fuck are you vegan anyway.
why the fuck are you wasting your time matched betting if you can earn so much?
Why the fuck are you watching Peep Show when you should be working?
Why the fuck did my employer overpay me, and should I be worried?
Why the fuck did they not sent it to me 2 weeks ago?
Why the fuck did they take dragons there anyway.
why the fuck did you not play with me last night?
Why the fuck does it say "Return to sender requested" ?
WHY THE FUCK DOES MY MUM KEEP EMAILING ME DAILY MAIL ARTICLES OH MY FUCKING GOD.
why the FUCK does my office still not have a bidet?
WHY THE FUCK DO THEY TELL ME I AM #3 IN QUEUE THEN #2 IN QUEUE THEN FIRST IN LINE AND THEN TELL ME "IM SORRY WE'RE TOO BUSY TO TAKE YOUR CALL" AND HANG UP FUCKING THREE TIMES IN A ROW.
Why the fuck do we have to pay tax for importing goods anyway.
Why the fuck do you care about such trivial stuff.
Why the fuck do you end a promotion but leave the promotion page on your website.
Why the fuck is a remote desktop easier than a VPN?
why the fuck is Chrome Chrome only?
Why the fuck is my company damaging my property and then trying to cover it up.
Why the fuck is my manager sending me emails at 06:05AM.
Why the fuck is my pension amount so low when I am contributing so much.
Why the fuck is nothing I want getting Black Friday.
Why the fuck isn't my GTX 970 idling properly.
Why the fuck is that against the law.
why the fuck is the new Firefox patch so unstable.
why the fuck is there a duck anyway.
why the fuck not.
why the fuck would I want a LISA.
Why the fuck would I want to go to that.
why the fuck would you go vegan and eat oreos.
Why they have to go and clean house.
Why they make it so hard to copy and paste.
Why two 250GB SSDs?
Why two lmao.
Why Valve software?
Why was it the worst decision?
Why were you doing that?
Why were you unemployed at 14 wtf.
Why will it be stuck?
Why will that shut down the high street shops?
Why won't people leave me alone.
Why won't you?
Why would anyone hate China wtf.
why would anyone name their offspring "rory".
Why would #bible be advertising in #anxiety?
Why would Blizzard be funding tournaments for Valve games?
Why would I buy a £450 PC when I have a £2,000 PC?
Why would I have a smith machine at home?!?!?
Why would I have IDE cables in my PC?
Why would I not have a good time?
Why would I want GRLC or GRLC?
Why wouldn't I know what sanctimonious means?
Why wouldn't you?
Why would they crash that hard?
Why would they do that?
WHY WOULD THEY DO THAT.
Why would they give me cashback if they'll make a loss?
Why would they limit you to 50mb?
Why would they port to Fedora?
Why would they release episode 1 and not the others?
Why would they say that but not say it's related to drugs or something else?
Why would they say "yes" instead of "no"?
Why would you ask me if I'm on Discord if you're not on Discord?
Why would you pay for a ticket if you don't want to go.
Why would you spend so much on a case and not put a high performance cooler in it?
Why would you take time off for SGDQ?
Why would you want them?
Why would you want to continue to be a fat piece of shit?
Why you ask?
Why you being so weird today?
Why? You busy today?
why you buy that shit.
WHY YOU LIE TO ME.
Why you need 2 now?
Why you read /r/btc and not /r/bitcoin ?
Why you want a new PC?
Why you want my pic.
WIDGET AREA 1.
Widow and McCree before nerf, IDK now though.
Widowmaker is so fucking OP.
Wilko is like Ikea then?
Will allow me to pay the mortgage for a few months until I find another job if I ever get sacked.
Will be 38 though.
Will be disappointing though, because these headphones are FUCKING COMFY and super amazing.
Will be embarrassing if I can't provide a high resolution version.
Will be interesting to see how it compares to my Sound Blaster E5.
Will be soooooooo cool.
will be the proportion of the market.
Will Brexit be cancelled after this election?
Will CPUs become cheaper and faster after Zen?
Will desktop motherboards have USB C soon?
Will do, buddy.
Will everyone in my office eventually have a VR headset each?
Will get it on the 25th/26th I guess.
William Hill just emailed me.
Will I get in trouble for doing it?
Will I get some good advice from that?
Will I have to pay import fees?
Will I need less voltage for my 4690K to pass Linpack than Prime95?
Will I need to reapply thermal paste?
Will it be 5% faster?
Will it get faster?
Will it get faster after 10 days?
Will Lightning make transactions fast and cheap?
Will micro DP replace full sized DP?
Will my car last longer if I keep it clean?
Will my CS:GO Prime still work if I change phone number?
Will my ISP protect me from all the spying laws the UK government is putting into place?
Will NiceHash tell me what it is:?
Will paying off my overdrafts every month improve my credit score?
Will probably upgrade my monitor at some point.
Will Teresa May make Bitcoin illegal?
Will that harm cooling?
Will the Brexit reduce house prices?
Will the car cleaner clean my car even though my car is filthy?
Will the government use this as an excuse to privatise the NHS?
Will the noise annoy her?
Will the retailer approve my cashback?
Will they improve the tinny sound quality?
Will Ubuntu do that automatically for me?
Will we do drugs?
Will we get really high and work out lots?
Will we hire prostitutes?
Will you?
Will you actually though?
Will you be happy if cannabis becomes legal?
Will you be online later?
Will you buy from me when you get there?
Will you buy other coins for me?
Will you get the S8 or HTC 11?
Will you go to Asia and find an Asian gf?
Will you meet lots of Chinese girls in China?
Will you mine until you reach 0.15BTC?
Will you pay?
Will you upgrade to the S7 if your S6 gets waterdamaged?
Will you use a webcam?
Will Zen create some competition again?
wimL-ASTvIA.
Win a shitload of money, not tell anyone, live the good life.
Windows 64 Bit..
Windows and looks flashy.
Windows just has way better proprietary application support.
windoze.
Windoze has more games though.
Windoze peasants will burn in hell.
Windoze phone really is a piece of shit.
Windoze process monitor tells me I use over 6GB usually.
WINNER".
win-win.
Wired is better in every way except for the cable drag.
Wireless latency isn't too bad nowadays with Logitech mice.
wish me luck m9.
Wish there was a Tesco near me.
with +303.
With 60% power.
With a 240hz gsync monitor.
With additional battery charging and more failures.
With a fidget spinnzer.
With all the Chinese girls?
With almost no risk.
With amazing high-fi headphones, triple monitor set up, incredibly powerful and quiet computer, etc etc.
With a pedigree in studio and live recording, Beyerdynamic is the number one choice at the BBC - check out photos on the BBC Radio 1 website and you will see most guests wearing the DT770..
With a very low salary.
With Bluetooth.....
With Caitlyn Jenner.
with crypto*.
With drama forced by the producers to create entertainment?
Withdrawing from exchanges is okay though?
Withdraw to Revolut when I reach 150 EUR.
With essays, you just keep working on it until it's good enough.
With everyones' messages.
With GPUs?
With Hi-Fi headphones and mic and AMPDAC.
With just the boompro cable.
With like £20,000.
With literally nothing else running.
With mobile authenticators and choosing 3 digits of my passcode and shit like that.
With multiple large displays, a mouse and keyboard.
With my direct debit set up for Paypal, will it take it out of my bank account directly?
With NiceHack going down, LTC will rise.
With nothing else running.
Without all the drawbacks.
Without coin purses.
With Paddy Power.
With positive EV.
With RBS for 2% on up to £5,000.
With /r/fatpeoplehate and /r/incels banned, is it time to move on from Reddit and its oppressive censorship?
With Ryan Reynolds.
With solar panels for mining.
With sweet pension, gym, health plan, etc.
With that kind of logic, I might as well write them a cheque for £5,000 tonight.
With the £500 tax-free interest allowance, do ISAs even matter any more?
With the amount of kpop I watch every day, I probably won't ever grow out of 20 year olds.
With the DT770 pads.
With the growing acceptance of YouTube during the late-2000s as a popular music sharing platform, K-pop has since become increasingly well known in many parts of the world, including the West.[268].
With the shiny fucking head.
With TV releases?
With water.
With winminer you're paid in USD and can transfer it to Paypal.
With your 33% discount.
With your gf?
Women will retire at 60 and men at 80 wtf.
Won a bet at odds of 56.
Won't be able to buy my house though :(.
Won the auction.
Won't look good.
Won't my gf just do all that?
Won't work.
Worked fine last time I checked.
Worked the night shift.
working but he still goes to the food bank to get free food.
Working is for plebs.
working; or that you have acted in a way that is in breach of the rules set out in.
Work is boring and takes up so much time.
Work is boring, play Battlerite instead.
Work is so busy.
Work makes us do it and we all just add a number to the end and increase it by 1 each time.
Works for me.
Works on CPU, and low power draw.
Works seamlessly.
Work thingy.
Work tomorrow.
World better because of Iraq War".
Worse sound quality.
Worst case scenario I'll send these back and pay a few £ for it.
Worst month for a while now :(.
Would a 240mm AIO cooler be best?
Would a 2 hour call to my ISP be expensive?
Would a 6700k be a big upgrde over my 4690K?
Would a Raspberry PI be sufficient for streaming video torrents?
Would a Raspberry PI be sufficient for streaming video torrents?".
Would banning mining in China be a good thing? They have cheap electricity and I can't compete with that.
Would be a big hassle.
Would be amazing.
Would be a nice safety net.
Would be better in VR.
Would be even higher if my PC was idle.
Would be funny.
Would be fun to work with you m9.
Would be good for your health.
Would be interesting to know.
Would be lower monthly payments, lower initial cost, and lower overall cost.
Would be so embarassing.
Would cause some tasty drama.
Would compliment your HD600s really well.
Would do some pull-ups if I had a pull-up bar.
Would have been more if my GPU didn't crash last night.
Would have been sooner if we had a 24/7 pharmacy.
Would HT help?
Would I actually die if I didn't take my antibiotics though?
Would I actually get any value from bitcoin mining using my gaming PC?
Would I get in trouble for installing Dota on my work laptop? I need to manage my fantasy Dota team when I go visit my Korean gf.
Would it actually make you more productive?
Would it be a good idea to rupture the eardrum manually?
Would it be cheaper to borrow £15,000 as a loan instead of a mortgage? Mortgages have crazy set up costs.
Would it be racist if I told my gf to go back to her own country?
Would it count as mental domestic abuse if I was racist to my gf?
Would it work?
Would like to know more.
Would my 4690K+GTX970 decade h265?
Wouldn't 10 children be better?
Wouldn't have made a difference though.
Wouldn't it be funny if incels gave up and fucked men instead?
Wouldn't it be good if the fire happened 3 weeks ago?
Wouldn't it go flat by the time you drink it.
Wouldn't it make more sense to put the microwave on top of the dumbbells?
Wouldn't my body just fight off the infection?
Wouldn't North Korea get invaded if they shot down planes in international air space?
Wouldn't people get pissed off when their wifi gets jammed?
Wouldn't soft be better though?
Wouldn't surprise me if they do.
Wouldn't that just as like get me assassinated?
Wouldn't that make the person inside less likely to open the door?
Wouldn't the two large pizzas come up to £23 alone?
Wouldn't they have to take it apart?
Wouldn't you be worried about your reputation if you did that?
Wouldn't you feel safer if it was equipped with nuclear missiles though?
Wouldn't you like to have a gf to cook and clean for you?
Would take fucking ages.
Would that defence hold up in a court of law?
Would the outside repainting be a priority? I'd rather not do it before I need it revalued or sold.
Would the Travelodge website reserve any rooms for booking on their own site?
Would we go 'on the pull'?
Would you be interested in my thoughts once I receive them?
Would you be interested in trading your crypto for my RVN?
Would you buy one then?
Would you buy/rent a flat if the service charges were £878.88?
Would you consent to your ISP recording your traffic and selling it on if it meant a reduction in your internet bill?
Would you date a grill if she had a child?
Would you dump a grill after she gets cancer?
Would you dump her after she got cancer?
Would you ever buy used headphones on ebay? I'm thinking of buying them to save money.
Would you ever date a Chinese?
Would you ever date an Asian?
Would you ever mine cryptocurrencies to generate heat in the winter?
Would you ever move to China or Korea?
Would you like a Ratesetter referral code?
Would you like me to bring you anything back from Korea?
Would you like to buy my M50X? It's in like-new condition, I only wore the stock pads once.
Would you pay 66% each or would you pay a bigger percentage than her?
Would you prefer the Chinese political system?
Would you recommend Fiio E10K and Beyer DT770s to HansProleman?
Would you take out a £4,000 loan at 5%?
Would you want to ever do jury duty?
wow.
wow £100.
wow 10k.
wow 10kg.
wow £142 is a good price, I paid like £250 for my GTX 970.
wow 158 billion views.
wow 16 years.
wow £30 srsly?
wow a $3.5m CS:GO league was just announced.
wow about time.
Wow all of that?
wow a lot of our customers still don't have email addresses.
wow council tax+mortgage+rent+service charge and it's still cheaper than living with my parents.
wow cryptos are down a lot today.
wow ebay must make a killing off that?
Wow fuck you Nationwide srsly.
wow fuck you srsly.
wow graphics cards are so expensive right now.
wow he recently died in the show too.
wow Hermes took my parcel back to Scan yesterday, and I already have it now.
wow he's been president for 30 years now.
wow he sounds old as fuck.
wow how do you have such a small amount of cash?
wow how do you use so much data? I never use more than 500MB.
wow how old are you?
wow I just realised I have 32 days holiday a year.
wow I just realised that I would have got a student loan ~£3,500 a year greater if my parents didn't have an income.
wow I just took my shoes off and looked at my feet and they had massive marks where my shoes were digging into my feet.
wow in America the police shoot to kill over 1,000 people a year.
wow in the period of about a minute, some DT770s went up from £46 to £75 on an ebay auction.
wow I put off 15kg.
WoW is an American MMO.
WoW is dying.
WoW is for nerds.
WoW is for people who have no life.
WoW is still going?
Wow it's amazing how nonchalantly you call people retards.
wow it's amazing how tech-illiterate company directors can be. I just read an email chain about a director struggling to type our web address into their web browser.
wow I've been saving double that.
wow I wish we had that here.
wow lucky.
wow MLG Columbus peaked at over 1.6M viewers.
wow my IT departments applies Windows updates now.
wow my net wage is <15k.
wow nice.
wow people buy you mechanical keyboards for your birthday? All I get is shitty clothes that take up space in my wardrobe but I never wear.
wow Prime95 crashed my PC way faster than Aida64.
WoW probably still has the biggest playerbase, but it's hard to say it's "some distance" now.
wow racist and a sexist?
wow really?
Wow really? Thanks m9!
Wow sucks.
wow Thailand has an aircraft carrier.
Wow that's a long time. I have sex every month.
wow that's a lot of money.
wow that's annoying.
wow that's awful.
wow that's cheap.
wow that's craaaaazy.
wow that's fast.
wow that's got to be the biggest genocide of jews since the holocaust.
wow that's low.
wow that's more than I earn in a year.
wow that sounds like it pays well.
wow that sucks.
wow that sucks, where do you work?
wow that website is kinda creepy.
wow the Humble Bundle is in Martin's Money Tips.
wow the £ is up a lot today.
wow the Overwatch subreddit is already bigger than the Dota one.
wow the queen is 90 on Thursday.
wow there's a lot of fat middle-aged white women in my office.
wow the retirement age sure has gone up a lot.
wow these headphones are bassy.
wow the weight difference must have been massive.
wow this new AoA album is really good.
wow what a dream job.
Wow what a good idea....
wow what a shit computer.
wow what a shit game.
wow why?
wow you can get a 3TB HDD for £64 now.
wow you have a lot of games.
wow you have over £300 in bitcoin?
wow you pay off £250 a month of debt.
wow you really should have learnt your lesson by now.
wow you're a racist fuck, aren't you?
wow your old.
wow you sound like a fucking nazi apologist.
wow you sound like a fucking nerd m9.
wow you sure do like shit hardware.
wow you weeb.
wstf Ripple is the #3 crypto currency now.
WTB headphones WTS headphones.
wtd does germinate mean? You make them German?
wtdf.
wtf.
wtf?
WTF.
wtf 10% Morrisons discount.
wtf 130lbs is 59kg.
wtf 1500w????
wtf 1 month old babies have mobile phones and email addresses now.
wtf 20 minutes every fucking day?
wtf 21Bet just gubbed me.
wtf 27k eth?!?!?
wtf 2k lmao.
wtf 4am.
wtf 625H/s?
wtf 6am.
wtf a 4790k costs as much/more than a 6700k.
wtf about it looks retarded?
wtf a decade.
wtf a desire for affordable housing = communist?
wtf Adobe Flash Player is dead?
wtf all that for £23?
wtf all the cheap contracts have upfront cost.
wtf and I lost it.
wtf another election.
wtf are blanket drugs?
wtf are chargers.
wtf are cheetos.
wtf are desert island disks.
wtf are "employable skills"?
wtf are flat packs.
wtf are "head shops"?
wtf are kodaks.
wtf are macros.
wtf are macros anyway.
wtf are magstripes?
wtf are minerals.
wtf are open exams.
wtf are ounces.
wtf are player performance stats.
wtf are "powdered greens"?
wtf are smoke shops?
wtf are streamed inboxes.
wtf are symantec products.
wtf are they?
wtf are you doing?
wtf are you gay?
wtf are you on?
wtf are you talking about.
wtf are you talking about?
wtf are you talking about????
wtf are you talking about m9.
wtf are you talking about, they're clearly homeless bums.
wtf at 0.95%?
wtf automatically?
wtf Bet on Brazil didn't pay me my free bets.
wtf Betway just gave me a £10 free bet for publishing a TrustPilot review. They didn't even want proof I posted it or to check it.
wtf blake2s pays really well for a few seconds then just stops.
wtf BTC down to 9k.
wtf BTC just lost like £1000 in valuew.
wtf BTC just went up 10% immediately.
wtf but I have a vpn.
wtf but that's a city.
wtf but you live in a city.
wtf but you mentioned it earlier?
wtf but you said you pay £3,000 in tax a month.
wtf causes this.
wtf dat volatility.
wtf delivery will cost me £7.57.
wtf did he do?
wtf didn't the Madeleine McCann kidnapping happen like 20 years ago? They need to get over it.
wtf did rory visit you at your home?
wtf did you just accidentally kick me?
wtf did you just say about my mum?
wtf does "doesn't do Linux" mean?
wtf does "information to be sorted in a different way" mean?
wtf does "meme tier" even mean?
wtf does Roonscape have to do with Bitcoin price?
wtf does that mean.
wtf does this mean? "Windows 10 Home OS (unlicensed) ".
wtf does "We are country people" in the context of "interests" mean?
wtf Donald Trump is a paedo?
wtf don't be racist pls.
wtf don't say creepy shit like that.
wtf do "tabs" mean?
wtf do you mean.
wtf do you mean "100% profit"?
wtf do you need nursing for? Aren't you like 26?
wtf Equihash just spiked in price and now I'm making almost 2 USD.
wtf expedia says no rooms available but hotels.com doesn't?
wtffffff.
wtfffffff.
wtffffffff.
wtfffffffff.
wtffffffffffff.
wtffffffffffffffffffffffffffffffffff.
wtfffffffff for a moped?!?!?
wtffffffff then?
wtf fires definitely happen m9.
wtf fucking tag your links as NSFW.
wtf fuck that.
wtf gmail is very new.
wtf gmail says that in order to use my work email on my personal phone, gmail requires admin rights to my phone.
wtf Google Reader is dead?
wtf GoT theme song is call centre hold music.
wtf has my work wifi banned my VPN?
wtf have you lost weight?
wtf Hermes said someone at work called S Atkinson took it at my office.
wtf Hermes tracking says my item has been delivered to the seller, but ebay is saying the item is still in transit.
wtf Hillary is a fuckhead.
wtf Hotmail adds deliveries to my calendar when Amazon emails me now.
wtf how?
wtf how are you ming so fast?
wtf how can you have a portable amp without a battery?>.
wtf how can you know profitability if you have no idea what your electricity costs?????
wtf how can you visibly see they are dead?
wtf how did you get aids?
wtf how did you get your ANC headphones for free?
wtf how does he not understand tax brackets then?
wtf how do they have a forensic copy?
wtf how do you get unlimited for £12.
wtf how do you have micro skills?
wtf how do you know them?
wtf how do you know what we both look like?
wtf how is Firefox not a real browser?
wtf how is that attractive?
wtf how the fuck did you fail your GCSEs.
wtf how would I know the characters?
wtf how you get that with TSB?
wtf I am mining Bitcoin Gold.
wtf I am muted in the channel!??!?
wtf Iam the youngest?
wtf I can hear ringing.
wtf I can't wait that long.
wtf I did .bang before you.
wtf I didn't need ID they just wanted my name and address. I could tell them I am someone else and vote again.
wtf I don't understand the world.
wtf if I save in my personal pension, then I will become ineligible for a government pension?
wtf if she is complaining about me not writing down her instructions, why didn't she just email me instead!??!
wtf if you get stuck in a lift and you don't have a health condition, you have to pay the fire brigade to save you.
wtf if you use the same sens then your muscle memory won't be affected.
wtf I got a £12.50 free bet from them.
wtf I got Z-lined?
wtf I have ear pain.
wtf I have no stats.
wtf I haven't been paid for 20 minutes.
wtf I have that problem too.
wtf I HAVE to use the app.
wtf I just got £125 in mileage. I'm pretty sure I didn't drive that much.
wtf I just got a threatening letter from TV license company.
wtf I just got banned from #cars.
wtf I just got the weirdest fucking 5 minute voicemail.
wtf I just logged in this morning and I have 10 garlics already.
wtf I just noticed that my laptop only has one VGA output.
wtf I just overheard my coworkers talking about Unreal Tournament and Quake.
wtf I just read that 3 million more people voted for Hillary than Donald.
wtf I just read that 3 million more people voted for Hillary than Donald.
wtf I just said that.
wtf I just went to the gym for about 60-65 minutes and my manager said I took too long.
wtf I just won like £16 from a 25p spin.
wtf I left for work 15 minutes earlier this morning, but the traffic was worse than normal and I only got to work 5 minutes earlier.
wtf I'm allowed to mention specific darknet markets now?
wtf I'm being charged by customs to receive a parcel from family abroad.
wtf immigrants eat swans?
wtf I'm on NeoScrypt £4.83.
wtf I paid 0.45 garlic to my tradesatoshi wallet but it's not there when I log in?!?!?!?
wtf I placed an order on Argos and then immediately called them to cancel it. They told me that they can't cancel the delivery but they will refund my money and told me to reject the delivery. But I can't reject the delivery because the receptionists will accept it. IDK what to do.
wtf I read the opposite because of the bass ports.
wtf is 1154L tax code? I can't find it anywhere on the internets.
wtf is "14 units"?
wtf is 4chan?
wtf is 80/20 split.
wtf is a 125.
wtf is ABBA?
wtf is a brainless moe?
wtf is a buy in amount?
wtf is a Camden.
wtf is a COO.
wtf is a "copy spreadsheet" anyway?
wtf is a creative financial advisor.
wtf is a DBA.
wtf is a deloran.
wtf is a delorean.
wtf is a deloreann.
wtf is a dob description.
wtf is a fwb.
wtf is a goth.
wtf is a goth shop.
wtf is a grammar school?
wtf is a hobo going to do with that.
wtf is a hubro relationship.
wtf is a jack black.
wtf is a jobsworth.
wtf is a koreboos.
wtf is a "level one service".
wtf is a libtard.
wtf is a log apocalypse?
wtf is a lognet.
wtf is a love letter.
WTF IS A MiB.
wtf is a millneials.
wtf is an alternative fact.
wtf is an alternative factr.
wtf is an ALU?
wtf is a personal day anyway.
wtf is a pivot table.
wtf is a POS team?
wtf is a PPP username.
wtf is a pro rts monitor.
wtf is a rand.
wtf is ardr.
wtf is a "rollover"?
wtf ISAs are shit why are you trying to max it?
wtf is a simps.
wtf is a special upgrade deal?
wtf is a third muscle.
wtf is a "toilet guy"?
wtf is a TOSLINK cable.
wtf is a water based air cooler?
wtf is bank of dad.
wtf is BHS?
wtf is big brother anyway.
wtf is "binance".
wtf is bint?
wtf is CIMA.
wtf is covfefe.
wtf is crossfeed?
wtf is degreasing.
wtf is deposit protection scheme.
wtf is diamond 1? Is that like 3k?
wtf is DMT.
wtf is dnmuk.
wtf is doss.
wtf is DPS?
wtf is Dream.
wtf is DSP framework?
wtf is EFI?
wtf is forced password iteration?
wtf is FYAD.
wtf is gigabit.
wtf is GITS SAC.
wtf is going on.
wtf is going on with the price of bitcoin.
wtf is going on with the price of BTC?
wtf is going on with the price of garlic?
wtf is gouda.
wtf is he saying now? He wants to nuke more terrorists?
wtf is he talking about.
wtf is hibiscrub.
wtf is Hipchat?
wtf is "Hodl" algo?
wtf is hxc.
wtf is iban?
wtf is "Jobs simulator"? Is it about getting cancer?
wtf is kanger.
wtf is k-on.
wtf is K-on.
wtf is k tv.
wtf is l2DPI.
wtf is lent.
wtf is loli hentai.
wtf is MD.
wtf is MGTOW.
wtf is mining inflation.
wtf is monero.
wtf is Monster Cables?
wtf is MtF?
wtf is nest.
wtf is non-linear.
wtf is NSFW about that?
wtf isn't your holiday allowance about to reset?
wtf is Ocado anyway? Is that Tesco but for rich people?
wtf is Ocado deliver.
wtf is OCC.
wtf is oggi.
wtf is "pausing" universal credit?
wtf is PoF?
wtf is postie.
wtf is Poundstretcher.
wtf is Red.
wtf is redpill?
wtf is /r/uktrees.
wtf is "samsung bullshit layer"?
wtf is scss.
wtf is she actually trying to say?
wtf is sin gravity.
wtf is skag?
wtf is snooper's charter.
wtf is so great about grammar schools then?
wtf is stromfront.
wtf is Sunbird and Seamonkey?
wtf is T9.
wtf is tampermonkey?
wtf is TCR.
wtf is that.
wtf is that?
wtf is that all about.
wtf is that an English player?
wtf is that crazy language they're speaking.
wtf is that in GBP?
wtf is that message.
wtf is that shit.
wtf is that the Massdrop 6XX?
wtf is that thing?
wtf is that weird creature.
wtf is the command.
wtf is the difference?
wtf is "the next"?
Wtf is "the ping"?
wtf is the point in a leadership election if the MPs can just overthrow someone?
wtf is the point of a 3 year 2.2% bond if I can get better than that with a current account?
wtf is the point of police if politicians need to use twitter to keep our children safe?!?!?!?!?
wtf is the point of that?
wtf is this.
wtf is this?
wtf is this BS.
wtf is this BS "Bank import currently only supports US and Canadian banks, but file based import is coming soon.".
wtf is this k8 offer you are referring to?
wtf is this "Pocket" thing in my Firefox?
wtf is this shit.
wtf is this shit? "Our courier has attempted delivery of your parcel; however it was refused by an occupant at the delivery address".
wtf is this shit Please note, £5.00 has been retained from your payable cashback below for your annual membership deduction..
wtf is this shitty crypto.
wtf is this undemocratic shit.
wtf is this vagueness.
wtf is tht?
wtf I submitted my Nutmeg missing cashback claim to Quidco over 3 months and they've only just sent it to the merchant.
wtf is UKIP?
wtf is VM.
wtf is VS.
wtf is waterworld.
wtf I swear people used to make money mining using their gaming PCs.
wtf is westworld.
wtf is what-network?
wtf is wilko?
wtf is with your creepy obsession with my gf?
wtf is wrong with you? I invite you to do some fun activities with me and you respond with only hostility?!?
wtf is wrong with your card?
wtf is wrong with your PC?
wtf is wrong with you srsly.
wtf is wrt.
wtf is wuxia?
wtf is your diet 90% pizza then?
wtf is your problem?
wtf it doesn't?
wtf it doesn't work.
wtf I think it's mining on my IGP too.
wtf I think I've mined more than you.
wtf I thought Dick Cheney owned USA?
wtf I thought it's next Sunday?
wtf I thought I was the poorest person here.
wtf I thought they're still on their first season?
wtf I thought we were friends.
wtf I thought you didn't have M50X any more.
wtf I thought you were going in April?
wtf it is?
wtf I told me gf not to talk about bible stuff when she meets me father and she started flaming me.
wtf I told me gf not to talk about bible stuff when she meets my father and she started flaming me.
wtf I told my gf not to talk about bible stuff when she myets my father and she started flaming my.
wtf it's £10 per referral that's pretty sick.
wtf it's awful?
wtf it says "Return to sender requested" now.
wtf it should have been delivered last Friday.
wtf it's not actually a wall?
wtf it's not even about Dota.
wtf it's on Popcorn Time right now.
wtf it's snowing???
wtf it's so weird how my 16ohm Custom One Pros aren't any easier to drive than my 80ohm DT770s.
wtf? It's the most popular version.
wtf IT told me that they can't install Lync on my phone. Last night I installed it on my PC and my phone.
wtf I was told that the board would be having lunch at 12:40 and that I should go replenish the refreshments, but it looks like they've already had lunch!!!!!!
wtf just got banned from #techsupport for saying that not all bittorrent is piracy.
wtf just had a caughing fit.
wtf keepass is approved by the EU???
wtf Kevin Spacey is gay.
wtf kpop is amazing m9.
WTF LANE AM I SUPPOSED TO GET INTO.
wtf like what?
wtf litecoin is doing well.
wtf Lync is dead? I used that today.
wtf m9?
wtf m9 why you ban me from #uktrees ?
wtf man.
wtf man just use ubuntu.
wtf my buddy invited me round for some drinks and his friend kept flaming me for charging my buddy too much for mileage when we both agreed to it and he never paid me anyway.
wtf my Coinbase address changed.
wtf my colleague complained that the temporary password I gave him is too long and that he doesn't want to type it all in.
wtf my co-worker has to do jury duty.
wtf my coworker just called me a slob for wearing tracksuit bottoms to work on dress down friday.
wtf my co-worker just got suspended for sharing confidential information from a director's inbox.
wtf my co-worker just sits at her desk on the phone talking about Game of Thrones.
wtf my Firefox is using over 2.2GB of RAM.
wtf my fucking Outlook is using 20GB.
wtf my GBP is going down.
wtf my gf can never visit me because she's working all the time but whenever I visit her she has no money.
wtf my graphic card crashed and took out half my programs wit hit.
wtf my IEMs always have ear wax on them when I take them out of my ears.
wtf my ladbrokes isn't showing.
wtf my laptop froze up trying to open a spreadsheet.
wtf my manager just told me off for going on crypto sites.
wtf my mum said she put a court summons on my bed a couple of days ago but I can't find it.
wtf my mum told me she is taking my sister to the hospital today because she thinks she might have leukemia.
wtf my mum told me that there's no point asking for my student loan overepayments back because I have to pay back the money eventually anyway.
wtf my new company firewall has blocked Keepa.
wtf my profitability just spiked to over 2.4USD.
wtf my router only has 60MB RAM.
wtf my score is higher than Daily Mail.
wtf my sister didn't send me a wedding invitation.
wtf my Steam inventory is worth £500.
wtf my waifu just asked me to go to a LoL event in Seoul.
wtf my wife just asked me to go to a LoL event in Seoul.
wtf my work PC just got a Windoze activation error.
wtf network is even more expensive.
wtf next Thursday we have a working lunch but no food is being provided and I'm not allowed to leave.
wtf next year I will pay less tax but pay more NI.
wtf NiceHash just took my GPU up to 91C and >6000RPM.
wtf ninja and yolandi are married?
wtf no.
wtf no algorithm is laggy any more?
wtf nobody cares if I arrive to work 15 minutes early or leave 15 minutes late, but if I arrive 10 minutes late then I get a sarcastic comment.
wtf no I have a gf.
wtf no it's not.
wtf no marriage is a unilateral partnership.
wtf none of these trade-in sites accept DT770s but they take Beats!?!??!
wtf North Korea wants to shoot down USA planes in international air space and claim that USA started a war.
wtf no they can't.
wtf nothing about that is NSFW.
wtf no you're not?
wtf no you said it was a nug.
wtf no you weren't.
wtf oddsmonkey just changed their favicon?
wtf one of my colleagues is doing money laundering training today.
wtf only 10 million people use Lastpass.
wtf only £400?
wtf only 7,172?
wtf openmailbox has a storage limit of 1GB.
wtf openmailbox is having problems again, I might switch to Protonmail.
wtf Oscar Pistorious convicted of murder but only gets 6 years in jail.
wtf our home-working solution is a remote desktop and not a VPN?!?!?
wtf our new Expenses Procuredure is such BS. "Standard routes should be included in the claim form" but the standard route is 27 miles and I can't find a route on Google Maps for anywhere near that few miles.
wtf Overwatch really benefits from faster RAM. I OCed my RAM last night and now I've got >200 FPS all the time.
wtf police are elected now?
wtf really?
wtf Redbet just left me a creepy voicemail.
wtf reject me for paying in full?
wtf Riot has been shitting all over Dota for years.
wtf rory has noise cancelling headphones?
wtf she's the one who needs sex all the time.
wtf since when does HMRC care about people living with their parents?
wtf so how is that spending £257 on Deliveroo?
wtf so many incorrect answers.
wtf some asshole scratched my car and is now refusing to pay for it.
wtf some guy from IT told me that I am the only person in the business who uses Firefox and they need to remove it from my PC because it is unsupported.
wtf somehow I just took a screenshot of my lockscreen.
wtf someone just sent me a .pages file.
wtf someone stole my Qck+ mousepad.
wtf sometimes people send an email to me asking me to do something, but its so small that they probably could have done it themself in the time it took them to write the email..
wtf source?
wtf so you're not getting your G403 for another week?
wtf so you work 30 mins more a day than me.
wtf Spotify is Netflix now?
wtf spotify my kpop playlist keeps shrinking.
wtf Spotify removed the feature to send songs in-app.
wtf stupid children playing pop music outside my window.
wtf stupid touchpad is positioned so closely to the keyboard and it made me change page.
wtf that delivery cost is crazy.
wtf that gif is so realistic.
wtf that makes no sense. How is expensive good?
wtf that's 171.5 deliveries?
wtf that's BS.
wtf that's even worse.
wtf that's fine.
wtf that's fucking creepy.
wtf that sounds so abusable.
wtf that's rude.
wtf that's shit.
wtf that's so racist.
wtf that sucks.
wtf that's way less than my car is worth.
wtf the amount of GRLC I'm mining has increased.
wtf the box price is really high.
wtf the Conservatives won't fuck the old because the old give them lots of votes.
wtf the GPU in my laptop keeps crashing which causes my Lync and Firefox to crash with it.
wtf the great country of Rhodesia has turned into the shithole Zimbabwe?
wtf the median income is not in the 40% tax band.
wtf the more work I do the more I'm given.
wtf the NSA is spying on Linux users?
wtf the Origin tech support guy said it's normal for my connection to drop multiple times a week "because of firmware update checking and stuff".
wtf the price of bitcoin just dropped $4000.
wtf the price of Iota is only $4.15 and you can't mine it!??!?
wtf there are people with 1000+ hours who are worse than me when I first started playing.
wtf there are so many e-cigarrete shops all of a sudden.
wtf there is?
wtf there's a new Quake?
wtf there's an inconvenience fee too? Ebay sure does have a lot of fees.
wtf there's a size limit?
wtf there's more than one.
wtf there's no such thing.
wtf there's only 3 of you at your office?
wtf there were other buildings than the twin towers destroyed?
wtf The Simpsons.
wtf the Spotify app is constantly being updated but there's no patch notes.
wtf the wii uses scart?
wtf they do?
wtf they don't give your money back unless you ask them for it?
wtf they put a 30g weight inside it?
wtf they released the weekly newsletter but didn't announce the photo competition winner.
wtf they're throttling encrypted traffic?
wtf they voted for him a few months ago and now they want to remove him?
wtf this call centre has GoT theme song as the hold music.
wtf this financial assessment website just sent me my username and password in plaintext by email.
wtf this isn't hold music it's just static.
wtf this slot.
wtf those cookies are fucking expensive.
wtf those hours.
wtf Thunderbird is an IRC client?
wtf Tommy French still send me promotional emails even though I am gubbed.
wtf Twitch has banned my VPN.
wtf two girls just went to the toilet together to talk.
wtf upfront.
wtf Vine is dead?
wtf we have a mutual friend on Steam.
wtf we live in a country where people in work can't afford to rent a one bedroom flat?
wtf were police doing at your door.
wtf we use a lot of web-based systems which don't work properly in Chrome and the Javascript only works in IE WTF.
wtf "we will not be issuing tournament licenses for large-scale events with prize pools over $10k".
wtf what a load of rubbish.
wtf what is your salary now then?
wtf what kind of fancy place do you live?
wtf what kind of fucking small company is that.
wtf when did you learn Russian?
wtf when I push my 3.5mm to 2.5mm adapter in fully, I can only hear out of my right earcup. When I pull it out slightly, I can hear out of both..
wtf where do you find these people?
wtf where the fuck is this little shit.
wtf who are you.
wtf why.
wtf why?
wtf why 58?
wtf why am I banned from #uktrees ?
wtf why are people sending me a PDF document one page at a time.
wtf why are Poundland sandwiches so boring.
wtf why are there always people at my office smoking outside whenever I look out the window.
wtf why are you asking me that.
wtf why are you even drinking beer at a business dinner.
wtf why are you looking at 16 year olds?
wtf why are you watching korean tv?
wtf why can't you?
wtf why couldn't I sleep last night now I feel tired and shit.
wtf why did he arrive an hour early?
wtf why did you bid £5?
wtf why did you go to Minks.
wtf why did you have £500 in cash?
wtf why did your doctor say that?
wtf why do 90% of people date someone within 1 year age of them?
wtf why does double you look like a double vee.
wtf why does Excel take so long to delete 10,000 rows.
wtf why does index match sometimes give me a value from the wrong row?
wtf why does it seem like Spotify only plays the same 50 songs out of my 3,000 track playlist?
wtf why does my Firefox keep crashing.
wtf why does my kpop playlist keep shrinking.
wtf why does my work block PIA VPN?!?!?
wtf why does the Destiny 2 have so many viewers.
wtf why do humans think they are the parents of dogs?
wtf why do I have a missed call from a number belonging to "Multiple Sclerosis Society Of Great Britain & Northern Ireland".
wtf why do most of our business websites only work with Internet Explorer.
wtf why do my colleagues always call directories "folders"?
wtf why don't you have a personal phone?
wtf why do you care about Reddit karma?
wtf why do you hate GabeN so much?
wtf why do you hate torrent based streaming?!?!?
wtf why do you have a £5000 laptop?
wtf why do you have foster parents?
wtf why do you keep talking about dirty laundry?
wtf why do you need all that?
wtf why do you side with Somalians?
wtf why do you sleep apart?
wtf why do you stay in 3 hotels a week?!?!?
wtf why do you want Riot API data?
wtf why especially me?
wtf why have the conditional formatting rules duplicated itself a hundred times?
wtf why is a USB 2.0 cable so expensive?
wtf why is everyone in my team female.
wtf why is every single fucking person in HR on maternity leave.
wtf why is it flying so low?
wtf why is it miniXLR?
wtf why is Matt Damon not in Bourne Legacy?
wtf why is my co-worker telling me that oil electric heaters are more efficient?
wtf why is my manager making me drive 42.4 miles just for a one to one.
wtf why is my office so noisy it's not even a call centre.
wtf why is my score so low.
wtf why is only one person able to edit an Excel file at a time.
wtf why is someone in my team who said they have an "advanced level of knowledge" in Excel asking me to do a vlookup for them?
wtf why is Spotify using so much mobile data? I set my playlists to be offline!
wtf why is the coffee made for me so bad compared to the coffee I make myself.
wtf why is this fucking Windoze phone always out of battery.
wtf why is your desk so tiny.
wtf why is your LTC balance so low?
wtf why is your PC in your bedroom????
wtf why not.
wtf why not?
wtf why priests and clergy?
wtf why would I get a trackball?
wtf why would you buy a gtx960 instead of gtx970.
wtf why would you want to.
wtf why you ban him?
wtf why you get all that?
wtf why you get so sweaty?
wtf why you have 2????
wtf why you kick m.
wtf why you kick me.
wtf why you selling so much?
wtf Windows won't get ANY updates if you use a new CPU?
wtf Windoze 7 doesn't let you put the taskbar on all displays?
wtf XMP has overtaken LTC and IOTA.
wtf yes you can.
wtf you accidentally kicked me and wrote me a rude message.
wtf you are?
wtf you are earning £1k a day?!?!?!?
wtf you are hoping your grandmother dies at a specific time?
wtf you are muscular?
wtf you can be British ethnicity but Irish nationality.
wtf you can claim cashback on hotels booked through work?
wtf you can do that now?
wtf you can hear your PC from your bedroom wiht the door closed?
wtf you can't do that?
wtf you creepy granny basher.
wtf you didn't buy that shit.
wtf you didn't know that?
wtf you don't even have an S7?
wtf you don't have a job?
wtf you don't pay higher rate tax?
wtf you earn £1000 a week?
wtf you get paid £1k a day!??!?
wtf you got a 1080TI?!?!?!
wtf you had a bf before?
wtf you have a gf?
wtf you have a GTX 1080TI but don't even have a 144hz monitor????
wtf you have a wife.
wtf you have HD600s?!?!??!?!?
wtf you have Nationwide?
wtf you haven't known me for 3 years.
wtf you have so many misconceptions about gaming.
wtf you have to go to your GP first?
wtf you inherited £20k?
wtf you let your boss know you play video games?
wtf you'll arrange to deport all the white people?!?!?!?
wtf you make £2.25 profit a day?!?!?!?
wtf you make £3,000 a month?
wtf you make 86 a day!??!?!?
wtf you only have 2 browser tabs open?
wtf you play OW?
wtf your 28.
wtf your dad calls you "honey"?
wtf your desk is tiny.
wtf you're confusing it with zombies.
wtf you're going to Amsterdam for 2.5 weeks on your own?
wtf you're having surgery?!?!?
wtf you're really old?
wtf your gay now?
wtf your getting a vasectomy?
wtf your gf says your penis is a big salad?!?!?
wtf your taste in music is awful.
wtf you said you had £30.
wtf you started on Saturday and didn't tell me until now?
wtf you start work before 08:00?
wtf you still live with your parents?
wtf you still use open office? Libre office is where it's at.
wtf you talking about.
wtf you talking about m9?
wtf you think I am stupid?
wtf you think kpop is weeaboo but Pokemon is not?
wtf you think you need to be a pro to benefit from 144hz?
wtf you travelled all the way to Singapore just to buy headphones?!?!?!??
wtf you used MSN when you were doing A Levels?
wtf you used to have a gf that had cancer?
wtf you use your M50s in the gym?
wtf you wear pony hoodies?
wtf you were running a PC on less than 4GB RAM in 2016?
wtf you work in marketing.
wtf you work in marketing?
Wth low-end systems, do you really need GDDR5 for the RAM?
www.esportsearnings.com.
www.tomshardware.com/reviews/thermal-paste-comparison,5108-8.html.
x16r algorithm is really cool.
X264 is above peak typical load but not to ridiculous levels.
X264 is what I'm using to stress test.
X2s are better than HD600s.
X2s are seriously good headphones.
XBMC = Kodi?
xbmc=old kodi?
Xbox 360 I think.
Xbox One X November 2017 launch £450.
Xenial Xerus.
XLR is a pain in the fucking ass.
XMR?
xylophone.
yay.
yay >£1000 more sitting in my bank account thanks to smarkets and betfair.
yay £118.80 once it gets authorised and payday.
Yay a fridge and a freezer <3.
yay Barney is bringing me a 144hz monitor today!
yay BGO confirmed my £27.50 cashback.
yay Boris Johnson.
yay Co-Op just paid me by £150 switching bonus.
yay dentist said my teeth are good.
Yay Ebay is giving me my money back.
yay for some reason I have a pro account on openmailbox, so I am able to use IMAP again!
yay go dave.
yay going to the board meeting tomorrow.
Yay going to view the flat tomorrow.
Yay got a new credit card.
yay I am due a refund of >£100 on my student loan.
yay I get paid £1,300 this month because of mileage.
yay I got my Ncase M1.
Yay I got my P60 telling me I earnt less than £15k this year.
yay I got some shitty bundles earphones with my Vodafone phone. I'm gonna try them on to see how bad they are.
yay I have 241 at most restaurantsfor 3 months now.
yay I have 7 positive ebay feedbacks now ^^.
yay I have a 4 day weekend now.
yay I just got my mortgage interest rate reduced.
yay I just got my mortgage interest rate reduces.
yay I just got paid and now I have £ 14,743.75.
Yay I just improvised by using elastic bands as cable ties.
yay I just sent my letter to the Student Loans Company asking for £102 of my money back.
yay I'm alone for the next hour.
yay I'm going to get my second monitor arm today.
yay in a month from now my monthly salary will increase by £7.92.
yay I returned the webcam my mum bought me for my birthday and now I have £60 Amazon credit.
yay it's still alive.
yay it';s working.
yay I've got my new mouse.
yay I've installed my new radiator fans.
yay leftover catering food from the board meeting.
yay my 2.5mm to 3.5mm adapter for my M50X has arrived!
yay my £40 Ladbrokes cashback is payable.
Yay my £47.25 10Bet cashback has been confirmed.
yay my ComeOn withdrawal has been successful.
yay my credit card is all set up now.
yay my DT770s are up to £18.11 with over 4 days to go.
yay my Duronic monitor arm has arrived.
Yay my gf just started her period.
yay my headphone amp has arrived.
Yay my manager is leaving today so she passed my probationary period and made me permanent.
yay my MoT+service is only going to cost me £95-£100.
yay my Ncase M1 has been shipped.
yay my phone battery couldn't hold for 12 hours so now IT is going to give me "the Vodafone equivalent of the iphone" whatever that means.
yay my portfolio bounced back from the drop yesterday and now it's higher than ever.
yay my portfolio is at an all time high today.
Yay my portfolio is up 0.83 % from 15/12/2016.
yay my work desk has two monitors on display arms and I can also use my laptop screen.
yay my work is giving me a £500 bonus.
Yay my XLR adapter has arrived? I can't wait to take it home tonight and build my new ultimate gaming headset!!!!!!
yay nobody around me can hear my new beyers even when I crank them up really high and open up the bass ports.
Yay the person next to me has gone home for the day.
yay the retailer say they'll send me a new wallet without me having to return it.
YAY THORPE PARK TOMORROW.
yay training days tomorrow and Wednesday.
yay won 3/5 of my Coral acca.
yay won 3/5 of my Coral accas.
Yeag.
yeah.
yeah.....
Yeah.
Yeah :(.
Yeah?
Yeah....
Yeah.....
Yeah............
Yeah 1070s are good, but the price is inflated by miners right now.
Yeah 16GB C9 with scope for overclocking.
Yeah £20+.
Yeah £30 is a bit too low to get something decent.
Yeah ~75% of my capital is in current accounts atm.
Yeah £8.33 wtgf.
Yeah 88C is too hot.
Yeah after my billionnaire dumped lots of coins.
Yeah agreed.
Yeah all dat sugar.
Yeah American groceries are pretty awful.
Yeah and 10% off if you have a student discount.
Yeah and a flat too.
Yeah and Amazon or my Credit card company will probably refund me if I get scammed anyway?
Yeah and a really fucking nice rig too.
Yeah and a shitload of £££.
Yeah and cheap.
Yeah and good headphones are basically crack in audio form.
yeah and I found out today the isolation is way better than my M50X.
Yeah and it seems fairly future-proof.
Yeah and it was 4% until recently.
Yeah and makes your ears warm and uncomfortable!!!!!
Yeah, and my port is line/mic/optical in.
Yeah and my salary will pay my overdraft and the money I borrowed from my grandparents to pay my rent.
Yeah and recruitment agencies told me they won't give me any interviews because I didn't have any Excel experience.
Yeah and super easy to switch headsets too.
Yeah and the DT770 pads are fucking amazing.
Yeah and the police are absent during the whole film lmao.
Yeah and the stands are rubbish.
Yeah and they're having some problems with the most profitable coins tyoo.
Yeah and turn it into £5,000.
Yeah and tweaking miner settings.
Yeah and with the added benefit of not needing MSI Afterburner to poll the temperature every 1000ms to adjust the fan curve in sofware.
Yeah and you block the toilet.
Yeah and you get a new flagship smartphone every year IIRC?
Yeah Asian girls are very beautiful.
Yeah Asians are darker than white.
Yeah Asians are so pretty.
Yeah as long as you don't get drunk.
Yeah a soldering iron.
Yeah Awesome Miner is a little awkward to set up.
Yeah because BTC sucks.
Yeah because everyone knows the human eye can only see 144fps /s.
Yeah because Joey Barton is so admired.
Yeah because Microsoft are lazy.
Yeah because MX Red is best for gaming.
Yeah because obviously the UK has the best social norms in the world.
Yeah because that's going to make me look so good....
Yeah because they're trying to make cutbacks. If you don't give people social security it saves money.
Yeah because you're a lowfi pleb.
Yeah because you're using the shitty stock tiny leather earpads lmao.
Yeah, better than Rio for sure.
Yeah better than their other videos I think.
Yeah Big Daddy is fucking good for like £6.
Yeah but £250 is.
Yeah but after those 66 years, we've slowed down..
Yeah but also it was slowing down my computer.
Yeah but also you get way less input lag with lower graphics.
Yeah but a pure democracy would still be better than what we have now.
Yeah but CBA to carry it around with me.
Yeah but CBA with fees and shit.
Yeah but Chinese phones have shit DACs.
Yeah but E2E encryption.
Yeah but Fidelio X2 are just as good or even better than HD600?
Yeah but Five Guys is fast food.
Yeah but funny trash.
Yeah but haven't had the time recently.
Yeah but have you looked at how much cooling it has for its size?
Yeah but he's "unelectable" because he's too old or some shit.
Yeah, but he was on a boat at the time.
Yeah but how?
Yeah but I agreed on a £39 price for taking my friend to the theme park and he says he's only going to pay me 33.
Yeah but I also need to upgrade my PC's cooling for the summer.
Yeah but I am a First-Time-Buyer.
yeah but I am on probation so I'm scared of losing my job.
Yeah but I called them and gave them all the information they asked for.
Yeah but I can't remember my weird password that changes every 3 months.
Yeah but I didn't know she was 13 obviously.
Yeah but I didn't want to go into my storage and find the Creative 5.1 speaker kit.
Yeah but IDK how I'd do that.
Yeah but IDK if it'll be any more useful than what we currently have.
Yeah but I don't know how to spell Jeremy Corbin.
Yeah but I don't think the sofa will be included.
Yeah but if Apple called me "Mcfucknugget" would you then assume it was my real name?
Yeah but if it changes to 70 in 2054 then that will affect us.
yeah but if it doesn't support VPN then I'll have to create my own version.
Yeah but if you get hit by a bus or something.
Yeah but if you know how to build and maintain a computer already, it's not too hard to mine effectively.
Yeah but I get half her stuff too.
Yeah but I hate paying for things twice.
Yeah but I have a feeling someone will tell me that they aren't able to put comments in the cell value or something.
Yeah but I have a shitload of cash reserves to help with any variance.
Yeah but I like the mileage money anyway.
Yeah but I'll wipe my history and web browse on my mining rig just to save me any sacking or shit.
Yeah but I'm gonna do the cable mod then get back to you.
Yeah but I'm lazy.
Yeah but I'm not sure which to buy.
Yeah but I'm only going to be keeping my OS and games on it.
Yeah but I'm planning to buy a 240hz monitor.
Yeah but I need to put specific text in too sometimes.
Yeah but in the mean time you have somewhere to live.
Yeah but I read that the 80Ohms version sounds better.
Yeah but I recommend sending a small amount first to make sure you entered the details in correctly.
Yeah but I still don't have my Nutmeg or Moneyfarm cashback from Quidco and I don't have my Ladbrokes cashback yet either.
Yeah but it covers me.
Yeah but it has mic input....
Yeah but it'll be used for future CPUs too.
Yeah but it's a fucking nice chair.
Yeah but it's designed to be user friendly, it's not for technical geeks like you.
Yeah, but it's gonna be <£3 whether I go with RM or MH.
Yeah but it's hard.
Yeah but it's on sale so often that you can get keys easily for £5 any time of year.
Yeah but it's still nice to have your opinion.
Yeah but it's such a small amount of savings.
Yeah but it stands out to stop you from reading it.
Yeah but it's UC now.
Yeah but it's very illegal, right?
Yeah but it's what I need to do....
Yeah but it was over $18m last year.
Yeah but it will cost the NHS £££ every minute they delay.
Yeah but it would still be a hassle.
Yeah but I've seen other keyboards with the same amount of buttons but much smaller.
Yeah but I want the NSA to stop spying on me.
Yeah but I want to get 300FPS.
Yeah but I want to get a 240hz monitor once I have a PC capable of keeping the FPS above 240.
Yeah but I won't be if I buy fibre.
Yeah but Keepass is less secure than not storing your passwords electronically.
yeah but mostly sugar, alcohol and tobacco.
Yeah but most nights I want at least 2 hours of gaming.
Yeah but my friend does.
Yeah but my washing masheen has a 5 year warranty on parts and labour and 10 years on the inversion motor.
Yeah but nuclear is cleaner and safer than most other power plants.
Yeah but objectively Korean girls are clearly superior physically and intellectually than Aryan girls.
Yeah but paper is expensive and harmful to the environment if you use too much of it.
Yeah but probably worth it. I bought my RVZ01 as a quick solution and regret it now. It was fairly expensive and limits my CPU cooling options.
Yeah but rory was adamant that contract is cheaper.
Yeah but she gets horny so can't help it.
Yeah but she looks exactly like my gf.
Yeah but SIPP does that too.
Yeah but sometimes I am AFK.
Yeah but tablets didn't exist back then.
Yeah but talking to your team mates.
Yeah but that'll probably increase over the coming years.
Yeah but that requires getting out of my desk and walking 10 feet down the office.
Yeah but that's also to get the poor people to vote for them.
Yeah but that's less efficient.
Yeah but that's like £800.
Yeah but that's optional.
Yeah but the avacado was in the middle and only three pieces.
Yeah but the game won't arrive later than tomorrow probably.
Yeah but the GTX 970 is a better GPU.
Yeah but the interest isn't much.
Yeah but the market has gotten worse.
Yeah but then what if I get seriously ill and can't go to work?
Yeah but the police can arrest me later and make me pay like £500 for the milk.
Yeah but there's a minor fault with the motherboard you should be aware of.
Yeah but there's one in brighton.
Yeah but there's so much missing when I search for individual songs.
Yeah but these are competitive team esports.
Yeah but they have shit isolation!!!!
yeah but they might only compensate me for £50 because it's a refurbished model.
Yeah but they're cooler.
Yeah but they're gonna be 50k in debt soon.
Yeah but they still won't accept me.
Yeah but they told me I'm being a greedy jew for asking for that much.
Yeah but think of all the money you could save if you cancel and re-order it....
Yeah but usually you get VAC banned for that.
Yeah but Walmart is a bigger company.
Yeah but we're past the point of no return on that.
Yeah but what about the next  5 years?
Yeah but what am I likely to win?
Yeah but what CPU cooler?!?!??!??
Yeah but what if I don't know whether I want to get on the A420 or the A322?
Yeah but what is it.
Yeah but which do you prefer?
Yeah but who cares about Northern Ireland?
Yeah but who is seeding all the music now?!?!?
Yeah but why hasn't it been done already then?
Yeah but without interest.
Yeah but won't you get bored without the internet?
YEAH BUT WTF DOES SHE MEAN BY IMAGINED CHILDREN/ABUSERS?!?!??!?!?
Yeah but you also enjoy casual Steam games so your opinion is not reliable.
Yeah but you both live in expensive places.
Yeah but you can be a student at any age.
Yeah but you can get cards a lot bigger than that.
Yeah but you could be fucked within the next couple of years.
Yeah but you don't have a £5 office gym.
Yeah but you don't live with your parents.
Yeah but you don't watch football.
Yeah but you get noise and heat from it.
Yeah but you live in a block of flats with other people?
Yeah but you make sure you don't get in debt before you even get interest and fees.
Yeah but you might find some. Don't buy until the last day.
Yeah but you need a pretty light plane with lots of wind to take off vertically like that.
Yeah but you only go to bed before midnight because you have to work.
Yeah but you probably go on holiday every year and have a really good gaming PC.
Yeah but you're a noob.
Yeah but you're a rich white man so they'll all want you.
Yeah but you're not a high mmr gamer like me.
Yeah but you're not gonna take it out the house with you?
Yeah but yours is better than mine.
Yeah but you want a good portable one too.
Yeah but you want to get the most amazing soundstage.
Yeah, casual gamers often move to whatever the next big casual game is.
Yeah Chrome has proprietary window decorations and theme wtf.
Yeah CS:GO could really use it.
Yeah E17.
Yeah eventually.
Yeah every game has to do that in China.
Yeah everyone is aware of that.
yeah exactly.
Yeah exactly.
Yeah excess sugar is really bad for you.
Yeah Expectation.
Yeah Family Guy is pretty bad now.
Yeah famous people need to get around a lot.
Yeah for a few years now.
Yeah fuck size limits.
Yeah fuck that.
Yeah fuck those guys.
Yeah gaming audio marketing is pretty bad.
Yeah gaming stuff is mostly just styling.
Yeah get some IEMs.
Yeah gonna put data validation everywhere.
Yeah good point, probably not worth it.
Yeah got my £50 free bet now.
Yeah got over £10,000 now including Overdrafts.
Yeah gotta chart those budget constraints and indifference curves too.
Yeah he's a whiny bitch.
Yeah he's pre-judging me to be busy.
Yeah he's that famous white singer who died a few years ago and made Google block everyone googling him because they thought it was an attack.
Yeah him.
Yeah holding cash is a fucking bad idea.
Yeah hopefully the sale will go through and I get the job..
Yeah I always call sales.
Yeah, I always recommend getting a good PSU now.
Yeah I am.
Yeah I assumed that.
Yeah I assumed that too.
Yeah I came in because I have a meeting today, then it got cancelled.....
Yeah I can easily lookup peoples' names.
Yeah I can't get a cheap refurbished one any more.
Yeah I CBA either.
Yeah I CBA to do that.
Yeah I CBA with TNAB either.
Yeah I considered getting a swing arm Blue Yeti for gaming, but it's just so overkill.
Yeah I didn't think so.
Yeah, I did the sugar free stuff for a while. It's still really bad for your teeth and your wallet.
Yeah IDK if any of the fatal1ty gear was any good.
Yeah IDK if I like kimchi though.
Yeah IDK whether my manager would want that.
Yeah IDK why....
Yeah I'd much rather watch stuff on Stremio.
Yeah I do. And if that was Bulwark's attempt at sarcasm then he clearly hasn't mastered it yet.
Yeah I do, but I don't use FD atm.
Yeah I don't bother putting my GCSEs on application forms any more. Sometimes I just put English and Maths on there.
Yeah I don't even know how to pay in cheques....
Yeah I don't get it.
Yeah I don't give a fuck about the library.
Yeah I don't mean get rid of them completely.
Yeah I don't mind if my house *looks* like shit.
Yeah, I'd rather have a living room too.
Yeah I'd want her to find a job and pay me rent and leave me alone.
Yeah, I even got high on Lemsip once.
Yeah I explained that I'm having problems with Hermes with other parcels.
yeah if I win it then I'm kinda fucked.
Yeah if you don't withdraw it when the market crashes like 2 years after you start it.
Yeah I get >=£800 when I purchase a property.
Yeah I get like 400.
Yeah I get way less FPS when I change from low to ultra settings.
Yeah I got 1.5% this year.
Yeah I got a free chinacast. It works with Stremio but doesn't work with a lot of Google features.
Yeah I got a great deal because I've been looking out for them for several months now, just waiting for a good deal to pop up.
Yeah I got it when I was 17.
Yeah I guess.
Yeah I guess so.
Yeah I guess so....
Yeah I guess so, as long as the latency and resolution are good.
Yeah I guess so, but she works in Brighton and it's hard for her to find a job here because she doesn't speak English very well.
Yeah I guess so with internet speeds today. I could probably download a 5MB song in like a second.
Yeah I had my GTX 970 in there before upgrading to my Ncase. IDK like £60 for it? It's £87 new.
Yeah I had my interview yesterday I told you this already.
Yeah I have a car.
Yeah I have Boomsound disabled, but it still has an annoying persistant boomsound notification that I can't disable.
Yeah I have drivers installed.
Yeah I have l33t Dota and CS skills and a Korean gf.
Yeah I haven't turned my heaters on yet; it's pretty comfortable right now.
Yeah I have to push it in at an angle or pull it out slightly for audio to reach both earpads.
Yeah I heard.
Yeah I imagine not.
Yeah I intentionally avoid listening to online Spotify playlists and streaming videos and stuff.
Yeah I just ranted to my wife about the fucking government "save the children" agenda that is turning this country into 1984.
Yeah I just saw it.
Yeah I kinda want to learn Mandarin.
Yeah I knew you were trolling me.
Yeah I know, but Experian is the big one.
Yeah I know but I am upset that I can only use my DT770s in the office now.
Yeah I know, but it shouldn't be more than about 30ms.
Yeah I know, it's even an exponential trend.
Yeah I know I've been there a lot.
Yeah I know powerline isn't ideal, but Wi-Fi is probably so much worser.
Yeah I know some.
Yeah I like Chinese too.
yeah I like co-op for the broader range of "snacks". Fuck meal-deals where the snack is a packet of crisp.
Yeah I like Debian stable too.
Yeah I like how things are more likely to work on Ubuntu, so I can spend more time gaming and less trying to get some stupid proprietary game to stop fucking up over some minor issue.
Yeah, I like kpop that's a few years old now.
Yeah I like lyra2.
Yeah I like the K65 because it's the right compromise of size for me.
Yeah I like Transmission too.
Yeah I'll definitely sell for fiat.
Yeah illegal drugs really need to be regulated.
Yeah I'll have to.
Yeah I'll leave it running to mine crypto for me.
Yeah, I'll look into it. I'm going to view it this weekend. I don't have to make any decision right now.
Yeah I love chips.
Yeah, I'm a bit skeptical too.
Yeah I'm a bit worried about that.
Yeah I'm a bit worried about that too.....
Yeah imaging a hard drive is ez.
Yeah I'm earning more than you.
Yeah I'm going to do the same now.
Yeah I'm going to wait a year for the X2 QC issues to go away.
Yeah I might be okay too.
Yeah I might buy a 21:9 200hz monitor in September.
Yeah I might do, but I need to research this first for future reference anyway.
Yeah I might do it tonight.
Yeah I might do that too.
Yeah I might do to see what my PC is like without it..
Yeah I might get a Chromecast.
yeah I might get the contract and just not use the SIM.
Yeah I might have confused you by using GPU clockspeed and display speed in the same sentence.
Yeah I might move in with rory too.
Yeah I might not bother with trying to find any decent portable over-ears and just use CIEMs.
Yeah I might use the tagging stuff to help me budget when I move.
Yeah I'm in no rush either. I kinda want to build my next PC before I send this one so I don't have too much downtime preventing me from climbing the ladder in OW....
Yeah I'm not sure about curved either.
Yeah I'm not worried about type 1.
Yeah I moved it over to the left too.
Yeah I'm really worried about interest rates.
Yeah I'm taking her.
Yeah I'm targetting extremely high FPS.
Yeah I'm thinking of stealing electricity from work.
Yeah I'm thinking of using a public pool.
Yeah I'm with HansProleman.
Yeah I'm worried about my 6 month probation period.
Yeah I need to be careful of those sort of numbers now too.
Yeah I never get my gf flowers.
Yeah I never really used them.
Yeah instead of paying me £17 like we agreed 2 weeks ago, he changed his mind AFTER the trip.
Yeah I offered to take all the stuff in the flat so they don't need to spend money on removing everything.
Yeah I only buy it when my gf wants it.
Yeah I only use rear sockets anyway.
Yeah I probably won't ever pay it off, I'll just sell it and retire.
Yeah I put £1,000 on Ratesetter for the £100 cashback.
Yeah I ran around Dust 2 earlier.
Yeah I saw.
Yeah I saw that last night.
Yeah I should probably invest some of this.
Yeah I signed up to that matched betting site and read the first tutorial.
Yeah I skip a lot too.
Yeah isn't that what I just said?
Yeah I started it in the Discord.
yeah it'd cost a fuckload to replace it.
Yeah it does.....
Yeah it fucking is.
Yeah it has dual headphone output, that's probably why you think it looks so weird.
Yeah I think £40 is about right.
Yeah I think he has two Sennheiser pairs.
Yeah I think I'll do the same.
Yeah I think I'll start bringing in my DT770s tomorrow.
Yeah I think I'm gonna use my IEMs instead of my M50X.
Yeah I think I should make sure I budget for it, just in case.
Yeah I think it would look bad to the sites.
Yeah I think so.
Yeah I think so, it's what I need to go work at Nationwide.
Yeah I think so too.
Yeah I thought about doing an index of the values then doing vlookup on that.
Yeah I thought so.
Yeah it is.
Yeah it is, and 7 hour Fridays.
Yeah it is a scandal.
Yeah it is if you're like me.
Yeah it might give me diabetes and heart disease!!!
Yeah I told you.
yeah I trust DPD more than other couriers.
Yeah I trust you enough for that.
Yeah it's a good card.
Yeah it's a really nice keyboard.
Yeah it's awful, you have buttons like S and D to go forward and backwards through the menu.
Yeah it's Betfair.
Yeah it's better to pay back as little as possible because it's only 1% interest on your loan, which you can easily beat with any decent savings account.
Yeah it's big business around here.
Yeah it's changed a lot over the last 5 years.
Yeah it's charged depending on property vlaue.
Yeah it's credited very good.
Yeah it's expensive.
Yeah it's fine at night because it's not in the bedroom.
Yeah it's fucking good.
Yeah it's legit.
Yeah it's like there's another class of stupid people in our society who do stupid shit to waste money when they could be matched betting or GPU mining or something.
Yeah it's modular.
Yeah it's not.
Yeah it's not a church.
Yeah it's not bad.
Yeah it's not much more expensive.
yeah it's only £39, it's not worth it.
Yeah it's owned by the housing association.
Yeah it's probably illegal in the UK.
Yeah it's roughly when I'll move, I'm not entirely sure. Sainsbury's keep giving me vouchers to get like £20 off my first online shop.
Yeah it's subsidised rent.
Yeah it's the disk io and CPU cycles.
Yeah it's the wrong one.
yeah it sucks :(.
Yeah it sucks.
Yeah it's WAY better.
yeah it's weird.
Yeah it's weird.
yeah it's weird wtf.
Yeah it's what I hate most about crypto.
Yeah I used to use that.
Yeah I use Signal too.
Yeah I use USB sticks and internet for everything I used to use optical discs for.
Yeah I've been thinking about buying them myself anyway.
yeah I've put them all in a table now.
Yeah I've read it.
Yeah I've thought that maybe a 1080 will suffice.
Yeah I've used KDE before.
Yeah I've used the buses in Brighton.
yeah I wanna do that too.
Yeah I want to be rich like rory one day too.
Yeah I want to get m.2 one day.
Yeah I want to scan peoples' vitals.
Yeah I was considering auto exchanging to VTC.
Yeah I will do.
Yeah I will get him an Asian because they're better than white.
Yeah I wish I could mine it on Nicehack so I didn't have to switch.
Yeah I wish Stremio had a better library.
yeah I wouldn't get insurance for ordering from Amazon because I know Amazon will always make things right. But insurance for ordering an expensive item from a private seller sounds like a good idea..
Yeah, just can see overall stats.
Yeah just did that.
Yeah, just don't spend £2,000 a month on it.
Yeah just give me slightly more.
Yeah keep spouting BS m9.
Yeah kinda weird.
Yeah Lastpass addon needs to be improved.
Yeah like £1000, right?
Yeah like aggregating 4 lists into one big list.
Yeah like I never put sugar in my drinks or drink caffeine after 17:00.
Yeah like in Killing Floor.
Yeah like K702 and K65 and EC1A and i7 6700k and GTX 1080.
Yeah like me.
Yeah like not having a cable.
Yeah like pork.
yeah lmao.
Yeah Logitech is the best mouse brand right now for sure.
Yeah look it up.
Yeah luckily it was only 1.25kg.
Yeah man check out Ratesetter.
Yeah man she's Korean as fuck.
Yeah maybe.
Yeah maybe....
Yeah maybe I can get all my work done on my personal PC instead.
Yeah maybe I should have done that.....
Yeah maybe I should just buy a new mouse instead.
Yeah maybe, it wasn't my decision of what to do with it.
yeah me neither, I play Dota instead.
Yeah me neither really.
yeah me too.
Yeah me too.
Yeah me too....
Yeah me too, I bought a key in 2011.
Yeah me too, so I can skype my gf, watch twitch, and reddit at the same time.
yeah mine ends 0% in August 2018.
Yeah mixture of mistakes and bad luck.
Yeah mobas suck, CBA to ever play one.
yeah moneysavingsexpert is really good.
Yeah more than Green and Lib Dems and UKIP and BNP.
Yeah more than yoiu.
Yeah, motorbikes will be banned first.
Yeah my colleagues are pretty nice.
Yeah my company and our subcontractor are dicks.
Yeah my FPS is okay for CS:GO right now, but I'm trying to understand my PC performance more so I can get more FPS in other games.
Yeah my GTX 970 is bottlenecking my 7700K for sure.
Yeah my mum reads the Daily Mail.
Yeah my problem is I don't have enough money.
Yeah my spending goes way up once a month.
Yeah my wife's are tiny.
Yeah new customer stuff.
Yeah NiceHash needs at least 1 more decimal place then.
Yeah no reason not to.
Yeah no shit.
yeah not gonna click on that thanks m9.
Yeah not ideal.
Yeah not many story writers are children lmao.
Yeah now I want this job I'm being interviewed for tomorrow so I can use the extra salary to buy a delidded pre-binned 7700K.
Yeah of course I do, that's why I run at 420 FPS on a 144hz monitor.
Yeah of course it's going to cause a shock to the price.
Yeah of course, that's pretty important.
Yeah of course they aren't friends, but they are feeders.
Yeah okay good idea.
Yeah okay I'll keep my M9 then.
Yeah okay then.
Yeah omg I get paid to be here 9-5.
Yeah only got like £1.7k cash and £2k savings right now :(.
Yeah or China.
Yeah or he's drunk/on drugs.
Yeah or just use 0% pools for reduced variance.
Yeah or maybe I actually want to do the job properly and not just redirect blame?
Yeah or maybe I was just unlucky.
Yeah or maybe one PC for gaming and one PC for everything else.
Yeah or TI6.
Yeah otherwise you'd lose £200 like me.
yeah plus job seekers allowance and housing benefit.
Yeah PP was one of the first bookies I signed up to.
yeah pretty sure it'll be less than 30kg as it's an m-itx build.
Yeah probably.
Yeah probably about 20 mins usually.
Yeah probably because you have all the graphics turned up on your weak GPU.
Yeah probably just poor people.
Yeah probably not, assuming I actually get my cashback paid though.
Yeah probably won't worry about gift cards then.
Yeah really easy offer.
Yeah rory will have more cash than me soon.
yeah same.
Yeah same.
Yeah same....
Yeah same.....
Yeah same I hate white girls.
Yeah same, it's what you need for FPS.
Yeah same m9.
yeah same omg.
Yeah same, that's why I'm putting in the minimum amount to get the cashback for the minimum length of time and the minimum risk.
Yeah same, that's why I still use a GTX 970.
Yeah Samuel, I’m sorry that you even received such an email, that email is not affiliated with Apple nor iTunes at all and has nothing to do with your actual iTunes account, it is designed for you to follow a link and provide compromising details..
Yeah saw it earlier.
Yeah seen it.
Yeah selling and then withdrawing.
Yeah seperate any computers from your bedroom.
Yeah she loves bible shit.
Yeah she might not know she's fat. Make sure you clarify that to her.
Yeah she offered to give me a demo.
Yeah she only wants to spy on everyone.
Yeah she says she loves me.
Yeah she stole a bottle of Jack Daniels out of my room yesterday and drank it all and I got home to find her asleep.
Yeah Sky seems like a ripoff. My dad is paying something ridiculous like £100 a month.
Yeah so?
Yeah so come join us and have lots of fun!
Yeah so if you put £3,000 in an account earning 5% and leave it for a year, you'll get £150.
Yeah so Iota is telling people to go on holiday to Syria and obviously I'M the troll lmao.
yeah so I said I'd take £3,000 from her and put it into my Tesco current account earning 3% which should help a little.
Yeah so it's an inside job.
Yeah so it's up on yesterday.
Yeah so just wait a week or two and they'll get to it.
Yeah so like Dota.
Yeah some dudes measured it.
Yeah some LEGO or something.
Yeah something like that.
Yeah sometimes.
Yeah sometimes, although I'm not a huge fan of beef.
Yeah so probably not a good idea until marriage, right?
Yeah so why is she doing it?!?!?
Yeah so you have the option to charge+plug in headphones, or plug in a device whilst charging, or just plug in two headphones!
Yeah so you're not hosting it?
Yeah, spend more money on mice and stuff.
Yeah Steam is great.
Yeah sure.
Yeah sure, I probably won't be buying the X2s for a while though..
Yeah surely the cable would determine it and not the port?
Yeah sure man, I just need to play a couple of ranked OW matches.
Yeah TBBT is way better of course.
Yeah technically it's the same, but streaming means you're consuming it at the same time as downloading instead of later.
Yeah Teresa May declined.
Yeah that.
Yeah that burger looks nice!
Yeah that card is going to fix easily. This case supports full-length cards which are over twice the size of yours.
Yeah, that is a weird response.
Yeah that makes sense.
yeah that's my attitude.
Yeah that's one thing I dislike about the internal wallet.....
yeah that sounds good, but how much is the insurance gonna be?
yeah that's the upside of going with a 5 year fixed rate mortgage. The interest rate is higher, but it's guranteed for 5 years and it gives me more potential for stoozaing.
yeah that's true.
Yeah that sucks.
Yeah that's what I did. I bought a 480GB 2.5" one to be done with it, then I found out about motherboards with two m.2 slots and I want to RAID0 it now....
Yeah that's what I just said.
Yeah that's what I'm worried about. It's at the back of a staff carpark though.
Yeah that's what I said.
Yeah that's what I saw.
Yeah that's what I thought.
Yeah that's what I thought, but I'll test it myself.
yeah that's what I thought. It's almost as fast as fast food, but the pricing and quality is similar to a restaurant.
Yeah that's what I've done before. It's so fucking difficult to put multiple formulas into just one at time of creation.
Yeah that's what I was saying.
Yeah that's why his wife and all his children are WHITE.
Yeah that's why I cheaped out on the SSD.
Yeah that's why I do energy drinks.
Yeah that's why I'll get insurance.
Yeah that's why I'm 5k mmr.
yeah that's why I'm not sure if the Booking.com hotel was the same one.
Yeah that's why I need this delidded pre-binned CPU.
Yeah that's why I play Dota.
Yeah that's why I said I'm intermediate.
Yeah that's why I use DPD whenever possible.
Yeah that's why we're going 50% each.
Yeah that's why you don't do it short-term.
Yeah that was the plan.
Yeah that would be good.
Yeah, the cable is a bit heavy and not flexible enough, so it adds drag and makes your mouse feel heavier.
Yeah the deals are crucial.
Yeah the drama will be dead within a few days.
Yeah the drivers are great. You only really need them to tweak the settings on the mouse's internal storage, and to update firmware.
Yeah the monitor I'm looking at seems to come down in price by about £20 every week.
Yeah then it's good for MMOs which need lots of buttons I guess.
Yeah then maybe I will have enough money to financially support my Korean gf.
Yeah there are.
Yeah Theresa May used it as an example of a company bending to her will?
yeah there should be some tax concessions for redundancy pay really.
Yeah these parts are wayyyyyyy smaller than full fat atx.
Yeah they are shit regions.
Yeah they did, it would just be more convenient to have one phone.
Yeah they didn't seem as fast as KFC and McDonalds.
Yeah they go for ~£100 I think.
Yeah they have these things called "shadow profiles".
Yeah they'll refund all 7 of my £s lmao.
Yeah they're awful.
Yeah they're awful but Nymeria is okay.
Yeah they're filthy casuals.
Yeah they're gamer headsets.
Yeah they're nice.
Yeah they're one of the lead developers of the Open Banking Standard.
Yeah they sent me like 5.
Yeah they should just support their elected leader or fuck off.
Yeah, they told me that the product code is inside the box, so they can't even email it to me either.
Yeah this add-on is amazing you'd love it.
Yeah this morning was hectic though.
Yeah to 11k.
Yeah too bad I want to play fucking Overwatch.
Yeah too many whites and not enough asians.
Yeah unless OWL is somehow really successful.
Yeah USB because it's an Amp+DAC.
Yeah using fingerprint to encrypt your phone is stupid.
Yeah using normal assumptions, there's no way the plane can take off without building up some speed.
Yeah we already have that.
Yeah we had that shit too.
Yeah we'll be going to Gloucester instead.
Yeah well I don't think my parents are too happy about it.
yeah well they've fucked up pretty badly....
Yeah what Bulwark said.
yeah whatever.
Yeah what lota said.
yeah what rory said.
Yeah when I was 10 I was dirt poor.
Yeah who the fuck is MAYSON.
yeah why?
Yeah why?
Yeah, why?
Yeah why do you think so many smokers get lung cancer?
Yeah Windoze 10.
Yeah with a minimum standard criteria too.
Yeah women who make babies.
yeah wtf.
yeah wtf?
Yeah wtf.
Yeah wtf why do they hate nuclear power so much.
Yeah you can, Google it.
Yeah you'd just use Bitcoin or Riot currency points instead.
Yeah you'd probably prefer to have the nuts.
Yeah you got any for sale?
Yeah you have to OPT IN.
Yeah you made a good choice with the K65.
Yeah you need 120%.
Yeah, you put them in several baskets which will all decline in value simultaneously next time there's a big financial crash.
Yeah you really need to lose some weight.
Yeah you're unlikely to get hurt even if you're at the same resort as an attack.
Yeah your laptop is shit.
Yeah your mouse is awful.
yeah your PC can run it.
Yeah yours learns and gets smarter.
Yearly.
Yellow ranger the best ranger.
Yep.
Yep!
Yep 2 days.
Yep can't do that in Europe because it's not compatible with the EU's silly human rights legislation!
Yep, GTX970 is a great card.
Yep pretty much.
Yep she says that it has to be 00:01.
Yep, that's my AKG K702s!
yes.
Yes.
Yes!!!!
Yes?
Yes..
Yes.....
YEs.
Yes and I have a Korean gf.
Yes and Korean girls are really attractive.
Yes, and more money would be nice too.
Yes and you're a pleb unless you do.
Yes at the expert-level.
Yes both of those.
Yes, but a single core has less latency if the framerate is the samer.
Yes but can't start for ages.
Yes but do you make your own water?
Yes but I'm going to need a few hundred more watts to keep my house warm in the winter.
Yes but what if I want the heat too?
Yes everyone should be using Quantum.
yes exactly.
Yes, Germany has much higher quality manufacturing than China.
Yes give me your surplus pls.
YES GOT MY BENEFITS.
yes I fucking do omfg.
Yes I have.
YES I HAVE A ANDROID WORK PHONE NOW.
Yes I like cheap Chinese imports.
Yes, I'll be getting a 240hz monitor next.
Yes I'm tracking it.
Yes in the country.
Yes, I recently upgraded my amp and bought other pairs of headphones.
Yes it does. Lower voltage = lower temps and higher scope for overclocking further.
yes it is.
Yes it is.
Yes it is, I use it every day.
YES IT IS OMG.
Yes it's amazing.
Yes, it sounds very good.
Yes it's so good.
Yes, it's Warehouse I think.
Yes it was.
Yes it was.....
Yes it will.
Yes, I will just play my video games and drink energy drinks like a well-adjusted adult.
Yes, I would like a well-binned 7700K.
Yes, most people who disagree with me haven't.
Yes my mileage will be lower with the flat because it's closer to work.
YES my new headphone amp is arriving today!!!!
YES MY NEW HEADPHONES ARE ARRIVING TODAY.
YES MY PARCEL IS UNDER 1KG.
yes ofc.
Yes of course it's an upgrade.
YES OMFG.
yes omg.
Yes omg.
Yes, people have been getting refunds.
Yes please.
Yes pretty much.
YES She's gone off into town, so I can go do a poo now ^^.
Yes so it's a sunk cost lmao.
Yes sorry.
Yesterday evening.
yesterday he thought Thorpe Park was a great day out for only £39.
yes that's right.
Yes, that too.
Yes that too, higher maths scores.
Yes, the business model was just announced.
Yes the K65.
Yes there is.
Yes they do!!!!!
Yes they raise the level cap, then raise the gear cap, then increase paragon XP rate, etc.
Yes why.
Yes why?
yeswith stock cooler.
Yes you are.
yes you are lmao.
Yes you can.
Yes you do.
Yes you do, you advocate it all the time.
Yes you should.
YES YOU SHOULD OMG.
Yet I am shivering in my fucking office.
Yet the game has a huge casual audience.
Yet the prizepool is way bigger lmao.
YIFY and Popcorn Time and Streamfeed.
YMMV?
yo.
Yo.
york is neer leed.
You.
You?
You about?
You already have DT770s though?
You also have to factor in bitcoin price fluctuation.
You always get assholes on the other end telling me how I should kill myself and shit.
You and rory love your Boots meal deals.
You apply for an account and they match your details against my referral.
You are a disgusting human being.
You are a fucking retard srsly.
You are a healthy weight.
you are a heroin addict.
You are allowed to access social media websites if you have access to the.
You are a sexual deviant.
You are a white-personboo. I don't know if that's a word but it is now.
You are currently number 78 in the queue. You should be connected to an agent in about 18:32. The average amount of time a customer has to wait is 18:57..
You are currently number 78 in the queue. You should be connected to an agent in about 18:43. The average amount of time a customer has to wait is 19:22..
You are currently number 79 in the queue. You should be connected to an agent in about 17:33. The average amount of time a customer has to wait is 17:42..
You are in a cool down period, you can try again in 0.599393367767334 seconds..
You are in USA?
You are like my dog.
You are near the border.
You are not a good person like Iota.
You are not a machine.
You are on IRC in the sky?
You are procrastinating.
You are really muscly now?
You are richer than rory omg.
You are so creepy srsly.
You are so ignorant it hurts.
You are so rich man.
you are so rich omg.
You are such a filthy casual omg.
You are such a sucker for Riot propaganda. Don't you realise that it is just excuses to not improve the game?
You are the troll.
You are very welcome and great job in catching that email! I am glad that we were able to work together to get you on a clear path to a resolution. I want to be sure you are 100% satisfied with me before ending the chat. Is there anything else I can assist you with today?
You are worse than the Nicehack apologists.
You around?
You around? I need you quickly.
You ASSUMED.
You as well as everybody have been warned many times. But, obviously you didnt use internet carefuly. Whats the metter?- U are thinking right now. So thats the thing that I placed the malicious soft on a web-site with videos for adults (Рorn web-page) (u know whats up). Sacrifice was watching video for adults and device began working as dedicated desktop supplied with keylogger. The dedicated desktop helped me to find this e-mail, I thought that u ll.
You auto exchanging for LTC now too?
You booked Brack Friday off work???
You borrow £10,000, get £500 cashback, and only pay back like £10,100.
You bought dat 5GHz pre-binned one, right?
You bought into snake oil m9.
You bought one?
You bought shit headphones.
You buy a share, 25%-75%, then rent the remaining share from the housing association.
You buy bundles of kwhs.
You buy drugs with LTC then?
You buying GRLC? I can start selling to you instead.
You buy it now?
You buy the CPU based on what framerate you want, then the GPU based on what graphics settings you want to play at that framerate.
You can.
You can accuse someone of declaring war now?
You can add the delidded CPU as a custom part.
You can adjust the bass on them.
You can also customise the faceplates, but that's not really a selling feature for me.
You can also download without uploading and you won't get DMCA'd.
You can apply for one every 6 months AFAIK.
You can borrow thousands of ££££ and not have to pay it back for 2 years!!!!
You can build a better PC at the same cost of a console anyway.
You can build a pretty good PC that will blow any console out of the water for like £300.
You can build a system with a G4560 and GTX 1060 for £450.
You can build a whole SFF rig that's smaller than those external GPU docks.
You can build more than one mining rig probably.
You can build SFF rigs a lot smaller than mine and yours PCs.
You can build your own so much cheaper, especially if you buy your CPU and GPU second hand.
You can buy a really good AMPDAC.
You can buy a used one on finance with a 0% purchase card.
You can check MoT and service history.
You can choose to play at 30FPS on a 4:3 monitor with vsync on and put yourself at a disadvantage, but that's your choice.
You can claim a £10 free bet just by saying you did and you don't actually have to bother doing it.
You can commit crimes without physically killing people omg.
You can connect your phone via bluetooth and answer calls on it.
You can customise the headband like with the DT770 too.
You can customise them.
You can customise the sound signature, the faceplates, and the cable, to make your ultimate custom experience!
You can cut your internet bill by 50%.
You can do 4k downscaling and use the nvidia driver AA.
You can do it in Money Dashboard.
You can do that too.
You can do that without sunglasses just as easily.
You can do the fun88 new customer promotion as well as betting on some money-back promotion.
You can do the same with display arms.
You can do things in hotels you can't normally do.
You can do things like undervolting and tweaking fan curves to get your desired level of temperature and noise too.
You can drive them really fast.
You can easily go 35 in a 30 or 24 in a 20.
You can eat KFC in a balanced diet.
You can even use CPU and GPU liquid cooling!
You can fit large heatsinks in small cases with AIOs.
You can fuck up your knees if you weigh more than that.
You can get 16GB for £50 now.
You can get 1GB for £5 now I think.
You can get 20GB a month for £10.50 with Vodafone.
You can get ~30MH/s if you use your 1080TI.
You can get 32GB but it'll cost a lot more and probably be slower modules.
You can get 3.5% cashback.
You can get 8GB for £30.
You can get a £10k loan and make more interest by putting it in the bank.
You can get a boompro.
You can get a headphone amp just as good for half the cost though.
You can get an S7 for ~£390.
You can get arms which support 6 monitors or more.
You can get a used wireless one for £77.66 on Amazon.
You can get a V-Moda Boompro and turn it into a gaming headset.
You can get better interest on current accounts.
You can get cashback on train tickets?!?!??!
You can get cheap food I think.
You can get custom faceplates too, but I probably won't bother with that.
You can get efficient electric heating!
You can get faulty headphones on ebay which only play out of one channel for like 20% of the original value.
You can get help from another home ownership scheme called ‘Older People’s Shared Ownership’ if you’re aged 55 or over..
You can get Hoxx for Firefox for browsing.
You can get juice which contains all three?
You can get like 15GB of data for like £10 IIRC.
You can get mortgages where you pay them back less than you borroweds.
You can get one dirt cheap in a few weeks.
You can get one for like £35 on ebay last time I checked.
You can get pretty good cases for less than 1/3rd of the price.
You can get some phones with very good DACs nowadays.
You can get some really cheap deals.
You can get stools with 4 legs.
You can get stuff on there you can't get anywhere else.
You can get super cheap Beyers on ebay that only have one functional driver.
You can get the new version of job seekers allowance whilst also working full time.
You can get unlimited for £20 really easily.
You can get warranties for used cars I think.
You can give your wealth away ever year to reduce it more.
You can go really small without compromising any performance nowadays.
You can have the best DAC in the world, but if there's shitloads of electronic interference then it doesn't matter.
You can inherit a shitload without paying tax.
You can invest up to £20,000 fee-free with special codes.
You can invest without the ISA wrapper, that's what I do.
You can join me on Discord.
You can just get another job when you get back.
You can just watch the shows on torrent sources I guess.
You can lose and gain 50% every year.
You can make a lot of interest on your savings.
You can make coffee at home for like 30p.
you can make it 100% silent.
You can make lots of £££.
You can make money by not investing.
You can make so much money for drugs.
You can make the money back from mining on it anyway.
You can make unlimited withdrawals from the account. If you do take cash  out, you can pay back in during the same month provided your net  increase  isn't more than £500..
You can make way better ROI.
You can measure economic performance in a lot of ways.
You can mine it using your CPU!
You can often get stuff that works just as well as brand new but 20% cheaper.
You can only die of fan death in the bedroom AFAIK.
You can only forecast it, not accurately predict it.
You can only have like 10 tabs on the tab bar before it becomes cluttered as fuck.
You can order from two different places.
You can pay for premium which comes with the support and stuff, but I don't think it's needed.
You can play away from home.
You can play multiple playlists at a time.
You can probably find a hitman for less than £19k?
You can probably fit more performance in that case than any laptop.
You can probably get 5.1GHz from your CPU if you push it.
You can probably get one super cheap on ebay if you have a look.
You can probably pick up an amazing card for dirt cheap.
You can probably qualify for it by doing the Snooker promotion.
You can put 4X2TB disks in an Ncase M1 easily.
You can put a minimum income on it.
You can reapply the overclock I think.
You can rebind some stuff and play better with two hands, unless LoL is so simple that you only need like 12 key bindings.
You can reduce that to just 3ms if you run 300fps.
you can remove the cable locking system and put any random cable in there.
You can run a GRLC casino?
You can save/invest the money for a >0% return.
You can send a Second Chance Offer for up to 60 days after the listing ends..
You can share your stream with me directly through Steam, it's pretty cool.
You can sign up already?
You can smelt weed now?
you can spend the 5th day matched betting.
You can stay in a hotel.
You can still have good sound quality in one ear?
You can still have Hi-Fi mono I guess?
You can still move oyur mouse.
You can stream TV, films, watch Twitch, Youtube, etc.
You can subscribe to Youtube channels and TV series and it'll alert you when a new episode is out.
You can't afford to buy anything because you spent it all on a GTX 1080TI lmao.
You can take off vertically if you're light enough and have lots of wind.
You can talk to me about headphones if you want m9.
You can't ban that without removing lots of products and services.
You can't be a lecturer for teenage students if you do that sort of thing.
You can't beat myprotein on choice and value. I'd recommend just unsubscribing to their marketing emails. You probably checked it during registration. I never receive them..
You can't beat them on comfort, sound quality and features.
You can't be sure until you test it.
You can't escape from real life!
You can't get a CPU this good for half the cost.
You can't get customs for much cheaper than that.
You can't get earlier than that.
You can't get this level of CPU cooling in a smaller case.
You can't gym in travel time!!!!
You can't have 1000hz and 4k.
You can't just run around half-scoped in any more.
You can't just say one thing is more unhealthy than another.
You can't overvolt a PSU.
You can transmit analog signal through it.
You can't really go quieter unless you get a fucking massive heatsink mounted directly onto the motherboard.
You can't remove the cable, and they are well above £50.
You can't rent if your salary is below 20k where I live.
You can't replace with velour pads?
You can't replicate my human intelligence with a fucking shell script lmao.
You can't replicate price:performance ratio of a desktop PC with a mobile device.
You can't see all her hair.
You can't see fuzzy blob shadows around corners.
You can't tell if someone is alive just by looking at them.
You can't use a standard cable with the headphones.
You can't use gsync with a framerate higher than the monitor's refresh rate.
You can't withdraw from a LISA without paying fees AFAIK.
You can't withdraw your money?
You can underclock it.
You can unlink them now by yourself?
You can use Google images to search for your exact resolution.
You can use gsync and fast sync to get the lowest possible synced latency no matter if your framerate is below or above your monitor's refresh rate.
You can use Hangul with English.
You can use it as 4 1080p monitors.
You can use it as four 21" 1080p displays instead of one 4k display.
You can watch Barney's progress on our map..
You can watch Dota without playing it.
You can watch MLG.
You can watch Youtube in 1080p fine even with a shit line like mine.
You can withdraw at any time.
You can withdraw your TSB monthly cash right now.
You clicked in Iota's.
You could be placed with players of all skill levels.
You could bring the cost down to <£150 if you wanted to get a a lower spec APU.
You could build a fucking good gaming PC for that.
You could buy 300 cans of Relentless.
You could buy 40kg of protein powder every month.
You could buy a GTX 1080TI for less than that.
You could buy a new smartphone every month.
You could do anything and nobody would know.
You could do, I have RDP installed.
You could do matched betting?
You could do that.
You could easily build a PC just as good but £200 cheaper.
You could get high quality wired headphones for under £50.
You could get super tinnitus if you use shit headphones.
You could get three pairs of good headphones every month.
You could go on holiday to Turkey twice a month.
You could have bought a house by now if you didn't eat avacado.
You could have bought lots of Dota/CS items and you'd be rich now.
You could have got something just as good for less than half that price.
You could have gotten an AMD card or a GTX 1060/1070/1080.
you could have linked something much worse.
You could have saved £344.
You could hire an escort to sit at the resteraunt with you.
You could just clean them.
You could just disable work notifications after 17:30.
You could just flip it?
You could just subscribe when/if you need it?
You could lose 50% of it.
You could make it even worse by mixing in some of the antibiotics I'm taking.
You could make it under one name and share it anyway?
You could probably get your CPU up to 4.4/4.5GHz with that.
You could probably OC a CPU to 5GHz in that.
You could put it in a 3% current account and earn interest.
You could sell your house and build a really beastly gaming PC.
You could set it up with a miner and dehumidifier to maintain comfortable temperature and humidity.
You could try Bitwarden, it works well on Firefox.
You could try undervolting to make it quiet.
You CPU mining too?
you creep me out dude.
You creep me out man.
You cummimg fox.
You cunning fox.
You cut your work week down from 5 days to 2!!!!
You'd be better off getting HD800 with the E5 than your fucking £570 AMPDAC.
You'd be better off with integrated graphics than that card.
You'd be daft not to do it.
You'd be even more in heaven if you were listening to some Fidelio X2s.
You'd be retiring into poverty.
You'd die before you paid it back hahahahha.
You definitely should.
You definitely should m9.
You definitely should, spend £100 on a decent pair of cans and £30 on my Fiio E10K and you will have amazing sound quality for years.
You'd get sacked for doing stupid shit like that.
You'd have to assume two things. 1) the phone will let you just read from the SSD directly through the USB. And 2) that the firmware won't modify the data in any way during transfer.
You'd have to give up the graphics card, and an APU just isn't fast enough.
You'd have to question their intelligence to do their job though.
You did it on purpose.
You didn't know?
you disgust me.
You'd just need to remove the paper.
You'd like her.
You'd love it.
You'd love it because you're so rich you can dump lots of money in.
You'd love it here.
You'd love my gf.
You dodged a bullet there m9.
You doing slots?
You done benchmarks?
You don't do drugs with a prostitute either.
You don't even have decent headphones.
you don't even know what a woman's CV looks like!
You don't even know your wattage or electricity costs ffs.
You don't even need the money.
You don't even need to break even for it to be worth it.
You don't even need to save for the initial deposit.
You don't even pay tax on the first £1000.
You don't get any increased performance.
You don't get them when you create an account.
You don't go to a church with a prostitute, dumbass.
You don't have £3,000 in there for the whole year.
You don't have a baby.
You don't have a desktop?
You don't have a house.
You don't have to be a student to claim student discounts omfg.
YOU DON'T HAVE TO COMMIT WITH RATESETTER OMG.
You don't have to save up for a credit card.
You don't know what's in them, and they can srsly fuck you up.
You don't look at boys too?
You don't need a full desktop PC.
You don't need any knowledge of sports.
You don't need audiophile headphones either.
You don't need more than 600W for a gaming PC even if OCed.
You don't need those.
You don't need to get rid of your regular saver. The switching bonuses are always better paying than the interest you earn anyway.
You don't need to know how to play an instrument to be really successful lmao.
You don't need to play Dota to watch it.
You don't need to turn your head.
You don't need weed but I bet you'd disagree with that.
You don't pay council tax unless you rent an entire property.
You don't pay direct debits.
You don't pay for your electricity?
You don't pay your usual 40% on matched betting.
You don't put your fridge freezer, washing machine and dehumidifier in the bedroom.
You don't really need Battlerite when you have Dota.
You don't see an England team in any videogame lmao.
You don't think HTC 10 is good?
You don't think I will buy 6 GPUs until 6 years later?
You don't think Korea is better than Malaysia?
You don't use Linux at all?
You don't use your DT770 any more?
You don't want back problems.
You don't want it.
You don't want it to be heavy and resist your movement.
You don't want more GRLC.
You don't want shit like that.
You don't want that shit.
You don't want to be dependent on a single algo, you want good resale value, and you want power efficiency if you have heat/power issues.
You don't want to block a PSU fan.....
You do realise that tobacco is radioactive, right?
You do to make the best pizzas.
You'd place 100 slightly above market rate, 100 a bit higher, then 100 really high?
You'd probably be complaining even if Hillary became the precident.
You'd probably get gubbed pretty fast doing that though.
You'd probably kill yourself out of boredom.
You drive a motorbike?
you druggie.
You druggie.
You'd think someone would call them out on their BS.
You earn £60k annual salary.
You earn enough to have a very comfortable living.
You earn like £40k.
You either pay money, or pay for an item that gives you in-game currency that gives you boosted in-game curency so you unlock faster and makes you think you're not paying money, or you pay with time.
You either win and get filthy rich or lose and don't have to repay the debt.
You enjoying your 1080TI?
you enjoy paying more than twice as much rent?
You excited for the airdrop?
you filthy casual.
You forgot what logarithmic means?
You fucking druggie omg.
YOU FUCKING FUCKS.
you fucking racist.
You fucking racist..
You fucking slob.
you fucking weeb.
You generally don't want your CPU and GPU to go above 85C.
You get a 6 month ban in Dota.
You get a lovely warm home in the winter and you get paid to do it.
you get a new LTS every 18 months.
You get bored of pasties pretty quickly.
You get cash faster.
You get event lootboxes even for playing ranked mm.
You get event lootboxes for unranked too.
You get free heat.
You get free phones from work.
You get less fps.
You get more RAM, bigger HDD, faster CPU, and better graphics.
You get some ice from the supermarket and process it into water.
You getting inheritance?
You get warranties on the individual parts anyway!!!!!!
You get what you pay for.
You going to OC it, right?
You gonna buy my garlic????
You gonna do it?
You gonna go back to NiceHack?
You gonna go custom water cooling too?
You gonna pre-order Overwatch and play the open beta with me?
You gonna watch lots of Youtube videos and play some videogames?
You got 1 or 2 bedrooms?
You got a car?
You got all the halloween OW skins yet?
you got any BTC yet?
You got Auto Exchange enabled?
You got Discord?
you got Firefox 55?
YOu got Quantum eyt?
You gotta disable blake 2b too.
You gotta do more slots man.
You gotta question stuff that looks like it's probably a scam.
You got the new version of NiceHash?
You got WinMiner yet?>.
You got your overdraft when you created your account?
You greatly increase the risk of catching diabetes with that sort of diet.
You guise are so weird.
You had an operation?
You had your own place on 13k?
You have £3,080.
You have 5 pints every night?
You have a 1080TI.
You have a 4690K and a 1080 TI.
You have air conditioning?
You have a much better awareness around you.
you have a weird relationship.
You have a wife?
You have Beats by Dre wtf.
You have BTC.
You have COPs?
You have drugs being posted to you?
You have had the M50X, rory has had the DT770s, but only I have had both.
You have it clocked so low.
You have lower IPC though.
You have more in common with Minecraft players than me.
You have more to choose from.
You have much less time in the evenings than me.
You have no appreciation for fine music.
You have no fiat?
You have no idea what you're talking about.
You have no space to move your mouse around.
You have no way of knowing that.
You have problems.
You have spacebar bound to center the camera on your hero?
You have the same GPU as me.
You have the weirdest problem.
You have to adapt your whole playstyle to play against bots rather than humans.
You have to buy an extra expensive proprietary cable.
You have to chase them to get it repaid.
You have to compromise on either refresh rate or resolution atm :(.
You have to dedicate a GPU just to the virtual machine it seems.
You have to keep 1:1?
You have to make like 2 payments each and wait 30 days or something.
You have too much free time.
You have to pay excess.
You have to sacrafice sound quality and convenience and comfort.
You have to watch the film at a fixed time and you can't pause it if you need a piss.
YOU HIPPOCRIT FUCK.
You hired a sassy cleaner.
You hoard your ultimates, then use them to win the teamfight, take over the point, then you win.
You installed UK keyboard layout.
You interested in buying some?
You interested, or know someone who might be?
You invested in Nutmeg?
You jealous of my 35 MH/s?
You just artificially raised the price which will deter other people from entering a bidding war ffs.
You just do a promotion as normal, but you qualify for a second free bet.
You just don't understand his genuis.
You just go in there to meet them, give them your "proof" of 40 hours of job search, get your benefits approve, then fuck off for a week.
You just have bad taste.
You just like 420.
You just lost £330?
You just made £500 profit?
You just need a student email address.
You just need to duct the airflow.
You just need to lower your graphics to minimum.
You just want to prevent mouthbreathers from breeding.
You keep saying it.
You kinda want to play every hero at least a little bit to get a feel for their capabilities so you can play against them better.
You know how guns and knives and grenades work?>.
You know how I bought the possibly faulty X2 with a slightly louder left channel?
You know how Overwatch is super laggy at 60fps but fairly smooth at 300fps?
You know how weapons work, right?
You know how you always say that 1kw electricity = 1kw of heat?
you know karma doesn't actually have any value, right?
You know that less than 100 years ago Ireland was part of the UK?
You know the old saying "if everyone is an asshole you are".
You know what else complicates things?
You know what else is gay? Waiting in queues at theme parks!
You know what else is good? The Prestige.
You know what happens when the SAS shoot a terrorist with an assault rifle?
You know what I mean.
You know what's the worst part of my job?
You know what you're doing omg.
You know when you rewrite a sentence but forget to change all the words so it makes sense?
you know you can get prosecuted for wasting their time, right?
You know you can make virtual displays inside VR, right?
You know you can use m-itx GPUs in full-size PCs and full-size GPUs in m-itx  cases, right?
You know you have a well-engineered product when it's made in Austria!!!!!!!
You know you have to mine ~£83 worth of bitcoin in order to break even from using the NiceHash wallet?
you know you have too much money and no life when you want to spend £900 on a fucking office chair.
You lack imagination.
You like LoL and MLP. Maybe you should re-evaluate your life.
You linked them.
You listen to shitty white people music.
You live in London now?
You live in the wrong country then lmao.
You live near the park, right?
You'll be paying like £1,000 a month just to make sure you're covered if you have a heart attack.
you'll be so rich.
You'll cause a crash.
You'll definitely get more cashback then you'll ever lose.
You'll earn more than me lmao.
You'll get more credit in 2-3 days.
You'll get the hang of it.
You'll get way better returns from Ratesetter.
you'll have plenty of money to pick up thai prozzies in retirement davehamil.
You'll lose less if you do blackjack.
You'll lose some of your Steam money though. The commission is low on sites like OPSkins, but prices are lower as well.
You'll love it.
You'll need to upgrade the CPU and RAM way before you need 128GB lmao.
You'll now get less bitcoin for your hashing power, so the fiat equivalent of the withdrawal fee is higher.
You'll only get a specific package from backports or whatever.
You'll probably find something.
You'll probably find that your CPU is the bottleneck in some games and your GPU is in others.
You'll probably get to 3.5k by the time you reach lvl 200.
You'll probably withdraw from it when it crashes.
You'll still have like £4k.
You look like you've gained weight.
You lose some, you win some, but over time you will always gain.
You love Big Bang Theory too?
You make £2.1k a day?!?!?!
You make the same amount in a week that I do in a month lmao.
You married quite young then.
you master baiter.
You matched betting yet?
You may decide you do not want a refund, in which case you will pay off your loan more quickly and pay less interest on the outstanding balance..
You may have fantastic food, but I have fantastic headphones.
You mean all legal drugs are now illegal?
You mean convergence?
You mean gross?
You mean it has a built-in amp?
You mean it makes them warmer?
You mean like Mylie Cyrus isn't real?
You mean like Walking Dead?
You mean m0e?
You mean the food or the bird?
You mean your anime pillow?
You might find that all her cash gets spent on her care before she dies; that's what happened with my grandmother.
You might find that card is a bit noisier than longer cards though because it has less heatsink size.
You might have mortgage without children like me.
You might have schizophrenia.
You might just have a bad card?
You might not....
You might notice Spotify has some big limitations the more you use it.
You might want to.
You mining?
You mining garlic?
You mining on CPU?
You missed the £190 Nutmeg cashback deal.
You must be filthy rich m9.
You must be really out of shape if you're working that many hours.
You must have been the first person to wake up in the morning?
You must think I'm an absolute cunt.
You need 420 DOGE.
You need a 6700K + Corsair H100.
You need a bigger desk.
You need a G403!!!!!
You need a large amount of liquid assets in case you lose your job or unable to work.
You need a Logitech G403.
You need an emergency fund!!!!!!
You need a really high IQ to understand it, maybe it isn't for you.
You need a repair man for Tumblr wtf.
You need a tournament license to hold an esports tournament now?
You need fast RAM for the graphics.
You need multiple GPUs.
You need openmailbox or protonmail m9.
You need the crosshair to be a 1:1 reaction to your mouse movement.
You need three of those for a party of 10.
You need to.
You need to check your white male privilege.
You need to circumvent the throttling!!!!
You need to co-ordinate to push together instead of dying solo I think?
You need to do 30 mins.
You need to do stuff that benefits from many cores for an AMD CPU to be worth it.
You need to do what I do and not spend any money.
You need to get 3k.
You need to go holy shit.
You need to make £30 just to break even.
You need to make use of cheaper E7 rate electricity to maximise your profits!!!
You need to OC it.
You need to put yourself into debt to build up a credit score.
You need to raise your heartbeat above 150!!!!
You need to replace the whole laptop to upgrade/repair the monitor, GPU, CPU, motherboard, PSU, etc.
You need to scale back the OC then.
You need to sort your priorities out.
You need to stop being an audio pleb.
You need to upgrade that to a 1080.
You NEED to work together.
You never need to use closed back!?!?
Young children definitely aren't old enough to make informed decisions on religious and political affiliation.
You normally wake up at 6am, right?
You OCed your 1080TI yet? I'm running mine at 2038/5994/1.063V.
you old fogie.
You on E7? Cheaper electricity at night.
You only buy GRLC, or do you want to buy some other promising altcoins from me?
You only earn £300 a week or whatever.
You only get a say once every couple of years, and you only have two options.
You only increased it by £1, so it's okay.
You only lose some unreliable gold.
You only need like £100 to get a decent pair of headphones.
You only need one player to have +1 hp over another for the game to be p2w.
You only need one VR headset to act as multiple virtual monitords.
You only need one VR headset to act as multiple virtual monitors.
You only pay lots of tax because your salary is so high.
You on the Garlic Coin Discord?
You on Wi-Fi?
You own a country?
You paid way too much.
You pay 7.00% of your benefit salary, your company adds 10.00% of your benefit salary.
You pay a little extra, but you get a guarantee that your CPU will OC well.
You pay higher fees though?
You pay more and get a worse product.
You pay more and you're less flexible if you buy phone and contract together.
You pay more tax than my take home pay.
You pay more than £850 a month in rent?
You pay twice as much as me.
You play CS:GO?
You play Dota 2?
You prefer working over gaming.
You prioritise an external keyboard over good headphones smh.
You probably can't get better headphones for less than £130 haha.
You probably don't want assertive women.
You probably have gas central heating?
You probably only have like $300 worth anyway.
You probably said something retarded.
You probably shouldn't even eat half the packet.
You probably shouldn't spend more than half of that.
You probably stream some videos to your phone?
You put the wrong price though?
your*.
You race traitor.
your a creepy fuck.
your actually the gayest person I know m9.
your a filthy casual m9.
your a fucking idiot.
your a fucking retard seriously.
Your aim must be really bad.
Your AMPDAC uses mini USB? I thought mini USB was dead?
your an egocentrist.
your an idiot.
Your an idiot if you buy IEMs for aesthetics.
Your anti-depressants must be working well then.
your a pedo.
your a racist cunt.
your a spoiled brat.
Your attitude is why you are still gold nova.
Your biggest problem will be HDD spins and coil whine.
Your bike is less safe.
Your bike might have more mpg than my car, but it has less miles per fatality.
Your boss is liek the opposite of Indian though.
Your budget? Na, not interested in detail.
Your calculations are off.
Your card is reference, right?
your case and PSU should be compatible with almost any GPU.
your case and PSU should be compatible with almost any GPUI.
Your case has a separate compartment specifically designed for full-length cards.
Your case is pretty generous with GPU space though.
Your Claim on 07 Jan 17 for £144.00 cashback at Moneyfarm has been sent to the retailer..
Your Claim on 18 Jan 17 for £126.00 cashback at Nutmeg Stocks and Shares ISA has been successful..
Your connection is crazy good though.
Your co-workers seem more curious than mine.
Your CPU and GPU are underpowered.
Your CPU mining m9.
Your credit history will be fine by then hopefully.
Your credit score is not good?
your creepy m9.
Your dad is a cunt then.
your dad is a virgin.
Your dad is too old to enjoy the money though.
Your drivers are fully up to date?
You're a bit of an elitist, aren't you?
You're a creepy fuck srsly.
You're acting like there are other options.
You're a fucking retard m9.
You're a girl?
You realise IT stands for INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY, right?
You're allowed a few thousand before they reduce your JSA.
You really don't understand it.
You really should try some Fidelio X2s some time. They'll make you want to throw your Sennheisers in the bin.
You really think a 3.5ghz processor is just as fast as a 4.5?
You really think that German-made headphones are snake oil?!?!?!?!??!?
You really think whining about it is going to solve anything?
You're a lot lighter than me too.
You're also paying £15 for an Oddsmonkey subscription.
You're a meanie!
Your earpads must stink.
You're assuming constant profitability.
You're assuming the bullet is a chunk of metal which will do physical damage.
You're at a disadvantage in the next team fight now because you don't have ult.
You're basically higher tax bracket.
You rebel!
You're better at doing drugs than gaming.
You recommended Origin to me.
You're confusing me.
You're confusing the bible with Dawn of the Dead.
You're creepy.
You're doing reload offers now?
You're fucking rich m9.
You're fucking tilting me.
you're going all that way just to put some water on your step-nephew's forehead and pray to a false god?
You're going to London just for a Christmas party?
You're going to throttle.
you're gubbed with Bet 365????
You're helping me manage my compulsive spending problem :).
You're in your 30s but you play a videogame designed for children lmao.
You're just betting.
You're just comparing the isolation to your AD700s lmao.
You're just compromising too much unless you get a decent ampdac though.
You're just jealous because my gf is Korean.
You're just jealous of mine and rory's superior office headphones.
You're just making the cancer worse.
You're limited on bandwidth.
You're literally blowing electricity onto a motherboard covered in water.
You're literally breathing radiation.
You're looking at it wayyyyyyyyyyy too simply.
You're looking at the Creative X7?
You're looking at Topcashback, right? I used Quidco and it doesn't say that.
You're losing £30 a month.
You're losing £x of your future wealth by ruining your health.
You remind me of Tom Cruise defending his cult. He doesn't think he's wrong, everyone else is!
You're more of a Fedora guy?
You're no better than my shithead friend who agreed to pay me £39 then unfriended me because he didn't want to pay me that much any more.
you're not?
You're not a good gambler.
You're not an investor if you buy Bitcoin, you're a currency speculator.
You're not CPU mining too?
You're not getting the most out of it.
You're not getting the most out of your hardware.
You're not going to China or Korea?!??!?
You're not gonna play OW at all for 3 weeks?
You're not supposed to mine bitcoin on a GPU or CPU.
You're only using it to buy a house, or you intend to use it for pension too?
You're overspending on the RAM, SSD and GPU.
You're overweight.
You're paying £7.56 a month for literally nothing.
You're paying for a Windoze license too.
You're paying for marketing.
You're paying for the store space, salesman, etc.
You're paying in cash?
You're playing in "normal" skill matches.
you're playing now!
You're pretty bad with statistics.
You're probably missing out on a lot of the sound.
You're really creepy.
You're really ignorant and racist.
You're richer than rory omg.
you're so fucking racist omfg.
You're still 2k IIRC.
You're such a hater.
You're such a racist.
You're supposed to make decisions together.
You're talking about an entirely different type of student loan.
You're the reason we have Brexit.
You're thinking of closed-back.
You're thinking of Ubuntu forums.
You're thinking small.
you're too skinny and she's too fat.
You're trading?
You're trolling me.
You're very vein if breast size is important to your choice of mate.
You're weaker than some girls.
You're weird.
You're wrong, it's aimed at an international audience.
Your eyes can only see 170 FoV.
Your eyes can't see more than 170.
You're younger than my gf.
Your FoV would be great.
your full of shit.
Your gaming PC is probably low-end shit though.
your gf has a 1950s housewife fetish wtf.
Your gf is white.
your god damn bloody brother!!!!!!1.
Your GPU costs literally 4X as much.
Your GPU fan will probably be the loudest part when your system is stressed.
Your GPU is an absolute beast. a GTX 1070 would have paired up better with your CPU.
Your GPU is fine too I think.
Your GPU is so OP.
Your GPU not going above 50 seems a bit suspect though.
Your HD600 are neutral, right?
Your HD600s are pretty good for it.
Your heat dissipation isn't good like mine.
Your HR department aren't allowed to discriminate on sex or race or religion or disability.
Your idea of beauty is so distorted.
your internet is fast as fuck.
Your investment can go up and down, how is that not the definiton of risk?
Your just jealous because I have a Korean gf.
Your keyboard too wtf.
Your legs are stronger and less prone to injury and pain.
Your location.
Your message?
Your mined income so far?
Your mmr is very low.
Your mouse feet must hate you.
Your mouse is trash, your headset is trash and your monitor is strash.
Your mouse is trash, your headset is trash and your monitor is trash.
Your neighbours smoekd it.
your not fucking funny m9.
your on IRC and Reddit at work.
Your overclock might crash and it'll stop mining.
Your overreacting m9.
Your parcel has been sorted at our hub and is on its way to our delivery depot..
Your parcel is being held in our delivery depot awaiting payment of customs charges. The addressee is being sent a letter outlining the charges and how to pay..
Your parents must be so proud.
Your payment came through.
Your PC is a fucking beast now.
Your PC should arrive todau.
Your PC should arrive today.
Your PC won't even use 400 watts. Mine uses 400 watts only when my 1080 TI is at 120%.
Your PC would probably be okay to ship if you remove the graphics card.
Your ping is 170 in CS:GO?
your probably just a racist.
Your PSU is overkill. You should have spent less on it and bought a better CPU and GPU.
Your rent could be double in 5 years time and mine will be exactly the same.
your rich, just buy the game.
your rolling in money.
Your S6 is not waterproof AFAIK, right?
yours aren't even on the guide!!!!
Your Sennheisers are wasted on that rubbish.
Your shitty work laptop with only 8GB of RAM, an i3 CPU, a HDD, and only two displays lmao.
your sick.
Yours is too big.
your slurring your words a little.
your such a dick.
Your such an idiot srsly.
Yours will probably be a mansion.
Your take-home pay would go up under any government.
Your taste in music is fucking atrocious.
your the normie with your white gf.
Your train is only 4 minutes.
your triggering me so hard right now.
Your trolling game is weak today m9.
Your ult did literally nothing.
You running xmrig now?
Your weird sexual fetish is really unhealthy man.
your welcome m9.
your welcum m9.
Your welcum m9.
your welcum then.
You said Force Staff isn't OP because it doesn't stop channeling spells.
You said I had to wait weeks.
You said it's "coming back".
You said it was your binge show.
You said it would take a "good while".
You said she's your waifu.
You said something about getting your penis snipped off when you turn 30?
You said that electric heating is 100% efficient.
You said to put fragile stickers on the box, but I've researched it and I don't think it's a good idea. I read about someone who put fragile stickers on the box then couldn't claim on the insurance.
You said you didn't want the graphics card.
You said you'd put it at £1.04.
You said your current is 5% up to 2.5k.
you said you sold your headphones.
You said you want to pay 10% more tax so you can live in a socialist utopia.
You said you were going to replace them agaes ago.
You sat still outside in shorts and a t-shirt?
You seem a bit excited.
You seem to care a lot about physical things.
You seem to know a lot more about it than I do.
you sent me a screenshot with all your IRC channels.
You serious?
You should.
You should aim for 3k.
You should also unscrew the left earcup and remove the cable locking mechanism whilst you're modding the earpads.
You should always hold onto some cash.
You should apply for a Nationwide and First Direct overdraft. I have £250 forever with First Direct and 12 months £500 with Nationwide. You can also get £2,000 for up to 3 years with Santander Graduate Account.
You should automate your manager's job.
You should be 65-75kg.
You should be a social conformist, drink beer, and watch football.
You should be careful using that word nowadays; you could get arrested for terrorism.
You should be getting at least 7MH/s.
You should be grateful for my presence.
You should be more worried if the queen started doing that shit.
You should be plugging two cables in.....
You should be put on the sex offenders register.
You should build a mining rig.
You should buy a Logitech G403.
You should buy a seperate mouse for FPS then.
You should buy Fidelio X2.
You should buy it to diversify your portfolio.
You should buy more LTC I'm selling.
You should buy my M50X.
You should buy some.
You should buy some Litecoin.
You should call the bank and talk to them lmao.
You should cancel your order if you can and re-order it at the lower price.
You should check your PSU is decent enough though.
You should consider P2P too.
You should consider the Creative E5 too.
You should date a Chinese girl.
You should definitely go for that.
You should do more slots.
You should do slots.
You should do something more valuable with your time such as go to the gym.
You should drink water, it's much better for you.
You should exploit new customer offers more if you want free/cheap drugs.
You should factor in devaluation and wear and tear.
You should find a job with a lot of Asians.
You should get a 1070/1080.
You should get a 1080TI.
You should get a balance transfer for 50k on 0% interest for 36 months.
You should get a big credit limit because your salary is amazing.
You should get a broken xbox and playstation off ebay to put near your case.
You should get a car.
You should get a gf.
You should get a mitx motherboard.
You should get an Asian gf; it's the closest thing you can get to anime..
You should get an office job like me.
You should get it more often.
You should get NiceHash.
You should get one of those 200hz ultrawides.
You should get some Beyer Custom One Pros.
You should get some Beyer DT770 80Ohms.
You should get that checked out before it spreads and becomes unstoppable.
You should get the cheaper 6700k, cheaper 16GB RAM, and much cheaper motherboard, and put the cost savings into a bigger CPU cooler and better GPU.
You should get the earpads I did, they are wayyyyyyyy nicer.
You should get your teeth checked out every 18 months.
You should give them more favourable feedback if they are Asian.
You should go the BGO one, they paid out super fast.
You should go to a headphones shop and try on some of these cans.
You should go to KFC and get the 2,000 calories Big Daddy meal for £6.
You should go to Korea.
You should go to Korea, find a really beauitful Korean gf, marry her and live in Korea there and not come back to the UK.
You should go to one and try out the Fidelio X2.
You should have an S7.
You should have got Shure SE215 though.
You should have known there would be consequences of eating a locket without a bad throat!!!
You should have paid them £30 less so you'd be £420 in credit.
You should have voted for Bernie.
You should have waited until after Brexit, import taxes might be abolished from the USA.
You should have won the game with 15 mmr that's why you didn't earn much. You should have won the game you lost 30 mmr, that's why you lost so much.
You should hold a full-length card up against your motherboard.
You should just ask your company to issue everyone with DT770s.
You should listen to the new TWICE.
You should make student loan refund claims.
You should mine xmrig.
You should mod the cable locking system too.
You should move to Rhodesia.
you shouldn't have lost that game.
You shouldn't just cram the food in until you can't eat any more lmao.
you shouldn't keep it in the bedroom.....
You should OC.
You should open a S&S ISA in the new tax year and get some sweet cashback.
You should open Nationwide and earn £200 if I refer you.
You should order one, they're at the lowest price they've ever been right now!
You should pay off your credit cards before you invest considerable amounts in meme coins.
You should pirate his books then tell him you pirated them because he is trying to extract maximum profits from his students.
You should play CS:GO and Overwatch.
You should play CS:GO instead because it is esports.
You should probably get a separate mouse just for WoW then.
You should probably OC your CPU.
You should probably report your HR department to Ofcom or something.
You should put buy orders on the Steam market.
You should read the article, there are probably some interesting details there that the title carelessly omits.
You should see my gaming PC now.
You should sell now.
You should start building some muscle to bring you up to 75kg.
You should switch from Nationwide, then I can give you a referral so you can get £100 for swithcing back to Nationwide.
You should take them to the ombudsman for treating customers unfairly.
You should tell them that you're not interested in working there unless they hire some azn grills.
You should though.
You should track them down and bludgeon them.
You should transfer it to a cheaper provider.
You should try bright headphones like my K702.
You should try some Beyer COPs if you ever get the chance.
You should try to do something every day.
You should try to lose ~20lbsa.
You should upgrade that.
You should watch Crouching Tiger Hidden Dragon.
You should watch Dota.
You should watch it.
You should watch Okja.
You should watch Okja#.
you sold short.
You sound like a filthy fucking casual.
you sound like a fucking nazi.
You sound like a fucking stalker m9.
You sound like an Apple fanboytard.
You sound like a nazi.
You sound like a salty fuck.
You sound like someone who has only ever owned one pair of headphones and thinks M50x are le best.
You sound like such a Lastpass shill.
You sound like the kind of guy who doesn't give a shit about Edward Snowons.
You spend part on the food and part on the delivery.
You spend too much time on IRC instead of working!!!!
You spin it every day and sometimes you win a prize.
You squat every day as part of your day to day activities omg.
You srs?
You still haven't got your 888poker cashback?
You still need your crosshair to be near their head.
You still using Quantum?
You studied Economics too?
You subscribed?
you sure?
You take headphones with you?
You talking about BTC?
you there?
You think sex is all that matters?
You too m9.
You tried Mining Pool Hub and Awesome Miner?
You trolling me?
Youtube is so heavily compressed.
Youtube is up.
You turn off the bullet electronically.
You use an inferior web browser to me and HansProleman.
You use keepass then?
You use your work SIM for personal phone calls too?
You using NiceHash?
You using Revolut?
You using the 2.0 beta or the legacy client?
You've been reading too much r/TheRedPill/.
You've been very trolley lately.
You've never experienced high fidelity audio.
You've never experienced it because you've never had a gf.
You've played so much more than me.
You wanna be an engineer.
You want 142 constant for the best experience.
You want a Korean gf?
You want a mouse that is effortless to move around.
You want it instead?
You want my RVN?
You want some?
You want to be a drug dealer?
You want to buy 438 garlic?
You want to buy garlic from me directly?
You want to buy some?
You want to buy some RVN?
You want to die alone?
You want to get some return on your money but can't afford a big risk and need to keep it liquid.
You want to minimalise it at all cost.
You want to move your mouse.
you want to spend 20X as much.
You watch SC2?
You welcomed me to the chromecast masterrace?!?!?!
You were in the alpha?
You weren't around and I didn't want to wait to today.
You were paying 0.1 the other day.
You were the one who persuaded me to use NiceHack lmao.
you will be.
You will be.
You will die before me.
You will do if you get better at the game.
You will do once you're >3.5k.
You will get a free bet too.
You will get damp.
You will get PAID for heating!!!!
You WILL have to pay VAT at 20% on any of those items - IF YOU GET CAUGHT by HM Customs.  And, 90% of items (there are now 1000's per week) bought on eBay and shipped in from China pass through Customs without a hitch.  Most of the Far East traders will write on the Customs Slip, "Gift", in the hope that UK HM Customs will pass the item through wit.
You will lose £100,000.
You will need to buy a second plane seat.
You will not find a single person saying they enjoy meat in there. If you do, they will be called a troll and downvoted heavily..
You will not have enough money to pay for rent and food and things.
You will not have to pay Import Duty on goods such as Laptop Computers, Touch Screen Tablets or Mobile or Home phones purchased from an eBay trader in China..
You will regain interest..
You will when you sell it?
You win either way.
you wish.
You wish your gf was a sexy Korean.
You withdrew £500 and then £400?
You won't grow up big and strong.
You would have done me a favour.
You wouldn't be tired if you woke up later.
You wouldn't know what skill is because all you play is League of Legends and Clash of Clans.
You would prefer to stay in your rut than trying something new?
yo what's your Steam?
YTou can look after my LTC if you pay me for it.
YTS=YIFY Torrent Site or something.
YUe.
Yueah read only.
Yummy Amaretto.
Z170 chipset?
Z170 only?
Zarya is fucking strong IMO.
Zephine.
Zero Friction™.
Zero tax.
Zhang Ziyi.
Zoom out to 30 days, fucking vertical line.
Zootopia.
Zootopia is really fucking good.
Zootopia is the best though.
Zootopia looks fucking amqazing.
Zootopia was better.
Zowie and Razer really need to step up their game now.
Zowie make some really good ones.
Zowie makes the best mousemats.
Zowie mice are all fantastic.
ZTE Axon 7.
ZTE Axon 7 looks like an amazing budget phone.
